,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Analyst,"$38k-$65k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Snapshot
Location:

7500 East Columbia Street
Evansville, IN 47715
Job Type:

Retail
Date Posted:

9/16/2020
Job Description
Store number: Corporate Office
Shopping center: Evansville
Street address: 7500 E Columbia Street

Immediate opportunity! Join our Marketing team at our Corporate Headquarters in Evansville, Indiana and work directly for our stable, growing company in this full-time critical role. Due to the inability to provide sponsorships now or within the next three years, a U.S. Citizenship or Permanent Resident status is required.

Summary: The Data Analyst influences business decisions and strategies by analyzing and understanding customer behavior.

Primary Duties & Responsibilities:

Builds predictive models and performs descriptive analytics using statistical methods such as clustering and segmentation techniques, regression, and propensity modeling.
Provides ad-hoc reports and deep dives into customer analytics to help answer and guide strategic business decisions.
Analyzes Shoe Carnival customer data, demographics, segmentation, and market basket data to transform it into meaningful insights.
Ensures data integrity by leveraging proven methodologies, including data reconciliation, data integration, and data audits.
Translates complex analytics tasks into concise and easily consumable outputs (data storytelling and dashboards) to help business stakeholders make data driven decisions.
Designs and tests multivariate tests in collaboration with internal and external teams.
Provides multi-functional teams with data related to the performance of marketing channels, the health of the customer file, and the impact of pricing/promotions.

Requirements:

Ability to work independently and with cross-functional teams.
Strong problem-solving skills.
Strong communication and technical writing skills.
BA/BS degree in Business Analytics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, or related analytical degree and/or experience required.
Familiarity with a variety of statistical models including logistic/linear regression, cluster analysis, propensity models, and other modeling techniques required.
Experience with Tableau and/or Alteryx preferred.

Total Rewards:

The Shoe Carnival, Inc. Total Rewards program offers eligible associates highly competitive benefits, including the following:

Competitive Pay
Paid Time Off (Vacation & Sick Time)
Comprehensive Medical, Dental, & Vision Benefits
Flexible Spending Accounts
Life, Disability, and Voluntary Benefits
Fitness Membership Discounts
Employee Assistance Program
401(k) Retirement Plan
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
Employee & Family Discounts
Relocation Opportunities

Shoe Carnival, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.7,"Shoe Carnival Inc.
3.7","Evansville, IN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1978,Company - Public,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
1,Data Analyst,"$38k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst

Classification:

Exempt

Reports to:

Manager of Data Analytics & Reporting

JOB DESCRIPTION

General Summary: Fusion Medical Staffing works to provide top healthcare professional talent to our clients nationwide. Our thriving culture, both internally and externally, allows us to focus on our core values and improve the lives of those we touch. Fusion Medical Staffing is an equal opportunity employer.

Essential Functions:

Understanding of the ETL process, data warehousing and associated activities to implement the best programs to use in managing the data
Mine data, analyze data, and assist in the build out of internal analytical tools to improve decision making and support for the analytics team and reporting to cross functional teams.
Assist in the Design, development, and automation of metrics-based internal reporting, including visuals and Ad-Hoc reporting packages
Gather requirements and define scope for reporting needs, meeting to ensure specific data needed on a project basis.
Ability to manage multiple data sources and systems with logic to ensure proper data file creation.
Ensure a high level of communication and liaison duties with IT/Technology and Operational departments.
Work closely with the Finance Team and financial data on performance and variance analytics.
Ensure a high degree of data quality and accuracy in all results and reporting
Special projects, as requested

Competencies:

Strong written and verbal skills
Exceptional attention to detail
Excellent critical thinking skills
Team Player
Humble
Positive
Driven

Work Environment:

This job operates in an office environment and routinely uses standard office equipment.

Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.

Employee is regularly required to talk or hear
Is frequently required to sit; stand; walk; use hands to fingers, handle or feel;

Position Type/Expected hours worked:

This is a full-time, permanent position. Hours of work and days are Monday through Friday, in between the hours of 8:00am and 5:00pm (there may be some flexibility with start/end times). Regular, consistent and punctual attendance is required.

Required Education and Experience:

3+ Years Relevant Experience in the following focus areas:

BA/BS Business Science or Business Administration, MIS, analytics, statistics, Economics or related field
Experience with Business Intelligence (BI) tools such as Tableau
Strong experience with Tableau
Advanced proficiency in Excel, as well as MS office suites and including MS SQL
Experience in data extraction, data manipulation, synthesis and creating presentations
Experience with analytical initiatives with demonstrated ability to problem solve and think critically; ability to recognize key trends and evaluate results of analysis.
Proficient knowledge of financial and accounting practices and techniques.

Preferred Education and Experience:

Proficiency with SQL and VBA coding
Experience in recognizing, analyzing and communicating descriptive and predictive data for reporting and statistical methodologies.

Other Duties:

This job description is not a comprehensive list of all activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job and is subject to change at any time with or without notice.",4.6,"Fusion Medical Staffing
4.6","Omaha, NE",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
2,Business Data Analyst (Mortgage Operations),"$41k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","First Midwest, with assets over $20 billion, is the premier relationship-based banking franchise in the dynamic Chicagoland banking market. As one of the Chicago metropolitan area's largest independent bank holding companies, First Midwest provides the full range of commercial, retail banking, and wealth management services through some 120+ offices located in communities in metropolitan Chicago, Northwest Indiana, Central and Western Illinois, Eastern Iowa, and Southeast Wisconsin.

POSITION SUMMARY:

Working collaboratively with the management team, this position is responsible for creating and managing key periodic reports and ad hoc analyses in support of defined business objectives. This role will also champion the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business.

REQUIRED EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:
Bachelor’s degree preferred in some business discipline
5 years banking or related experience preferred
Advanced analysis and reporting experience required
In-depth knowledge of industry operating rules preferred
Ability to implement new procedures in response to, and in anticipation of, changes in the business environment desired
Possesses and applies comprehensive problem solving abilities for complex issues
High proficiency and analytical skills using Microsoft Office Suite of products required. Access Database and Excel graphing skills a plus.
Experience with financial reports and Falcon risk analytics a plus
Client focus and project management skills are required with an aptitude for creating operational efficiencies and positive client experiences
Demonstrated written and oral communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills
DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work collaboratively with the leadership team on the identification, development and ongoing refinement of periodic reports.
Proactively identify opportunities in support of defined business objectives by developing in-depth analyses.
Support the line of business data collection and distribution needs by working collaboratively with internal and external partners as needed.
Support the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business and maintain analytics related to impacts.
Assists in monthly planning, loss analysis, forecasting and variance reporting.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here and Supplement here.",3.5,"First Midwest Bank
3.5","Gurnee, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
3,Associate Data Analyst,-1,"Overview


Southeast Toyota Distributors is the world’s largest independent distributor of Toyotas. The company was established in 1968 when Jim Moran partnered with Toyota Motor Sales to help expand the automaker’s presence in the U.S. market. Today, Southeast Toyota distributes vehicles, parts and accessories to more than 177 independent Toyota dealerships in Alabama, Florida, Georgia, North Carolina and South Carolina. The company helps its dealers sell nearly 20 percent of all Toyotas in the nation through innovative sales and marketing programs, customer service, accessory development, fleet sales, and transportation and logistics.

Job Description


The Associate Data Analyst will partner closely with our Operations and Production teams at our three vehicle processing facilities. The Analyst will analyze, connect patterns/trends and present available data on incoming and historical product. This logistical and operational information will enable short/long term planning and operational goals to be determined. In addition, the Analyst will collect information from other subject matter experts to resolve issues within vehicle processing.

Our ideal candidate will be a subject matter expert in Tableau, Cognos and Excel in order to provide information, reporting, and problem-solving to various Southeast Toyota departments, ie. VPC Operations, Distribution, Accounting, Sales, IT. Superb customer service skills will enable the Analyst to work effectively with internal and external partners.

Specific responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Collect and analyze data to provide short and long term work plan reporting for our three Vehicle Processing Centers (VPC’s): Westlake, Commerce, and Talleyrand
Support internal customers on requirements including Cognos report queries and study of incoming data for problem solving
Create headcount analysis, projection reporting, and provide recommendations for labor sharing among shops and VPC’s based on forecasted production volumes
Develop interactive tools and performing general maintenance in Tableau, Cognos, Excel to track product needs.
Present and train key stakeholders on data analysis project results and interactive tools.
Connect patterns/trends to communicate and develop theories on vehicle flow, accessory volume, headcount and proactively work with Operations to communicate vehicle delays/transport concerns
Lead liaison and report generator for vehicle tracking, analysis of rail and ship arrival schedules, work capacity, and dealer accessory changes
Provide strategic vision and partners with various business units to assist with strategic initiatives based around process redesign that leverages technology solutions
Function as lead generator of daily and monthly reports
Work to minimize non-value added time by automating reporting
Regularly strive to find innovative solutions for problems, issues, and information requests
Other tasks & projects as required.
Job Requirements


Minimum Requirements:
Associate’s degree
High proficiency in Microsoft Office
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Proven organizational skills and detail oriented with ability to prioritize multiple job responsibilities
Ability to work independently and in a team-oriented, fast paced environment with aggressive project deadlines
Strong analytical skills, a proactive problem solving approach and be able to develop and work in spreadsheet applications
Ability to facilitate effective meetings and present with a variety of target audiences
Dependability with excellent negotiation, customer service and conflict resolution skills are required to be successful in this position
Ability to understand and document customer requirements for processes that may not be familiar
Exhibit flexibility and capacity to learn new job functions and take on projects as requested
Preferred Experience:
Bachelor’s degree
Basic understanding of the automotive industry
Tableau, Cognos Query and Report Studio, Microsoft Power BI or similar Business Intelligence and Performance Management application experience
Knowledge of SQL and mainframe experience
Familiarity with process improvement techniques, tools and strategies such as Six Sigma, TQM, Lean or Kaizen",5.0,"Southeast Toyota Distributors
5.0","Jacksonville, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1968,Company - Private,Vehicle Dealers,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
4,Web Data Analyst,"$65k-$79k
(Employer Est.)","Web Data Analyst
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Our customer promise is worth bragging about. Use your marketing and advertising expertise to spread the word and grow our business.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Collect web data and statistics for Uline’s various eCommerce websites (Uline.com, Uline.ca and Uline.mx).
Analyze data and provide weekly and monthly reports to management.
Make recommendations to improve website and reduce return rates.
Translate complex and analytical work into easy to understand data points.
Respond to ad hoc reporting requests and maintain relationships with various departments.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree.
Experience using Google Analytics or Adobe Analytics.
Experience using a data visualization tool such as Power BI or Tableau.
2+ years experience in website analysis.
Proficient in Microsoft Excel with some knowledge of SQL and / or Google BigQuery.
Well organized and detail-oriented with an ability to multitask.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café with executive chefs and seasonal dinner-to-go options.
First-class fitness center with complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Professional development classes and monthly in-house speakers.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled

#LI-SR1
#CORP",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Milwaukee, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
5,Clinical Data Analyst (RN) - MCS Research & Development - INTEGRIS,"$35k-$60k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst - MCS Research & Development - INTEGRIS

Don't miss out on this fantastic opportunity to take yournursing career in a new, exciting direction. INTEGRIS is look for a RN thatwould love to explore the Data field with in our Nazih Zuhdi Transplant Institute.Learn how to use your clinical experience to better understand data that isused to make business decisions, while working a M – F business schedule.

Job Code: 1729

Position Summary:

This position is responsible for the design, implementation, maintenance, integrity and data quality of the Nazih Zuhdi Transplant Institute (NZTI) in support of strict reporting requirements. This includes ongoing analysis of health care information, obtained from a variety of sources, including patient care, financial, and demographic data. It involves development and preparation of information products for transplant leadership, physicians and staff, including the assembly of documentation required for submission to regulatory agencies. It requires the ability to analyze health care data from conceptualization through presentation of the data. It requires proficiency with analytical tools (SAS, Excel), knowledge of data analysis methodology, use of presentation software, strong communication skills and a strong commitment to and affinity for delivering the highest level of customer service.

INTEGRIS Health is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.

Essential Functions:

The Data Analyst responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following:
Develop programs, methodologies, and files for analyzing and presenting data.
Works with customers to develop and understand product specifications.
Develops methodologies for collecting, analyzing, and presenting data products.
Delivers data products in report/presentation format, or verbally, to customer specifications and timelines.
Perform complex data analysis in support of ad-hoc and standing customer requests.
Develop information from a variety of data sources evaluates data.
Accountability:

Reports to the Director of Research Administration and NZTI Quality.

Required Physical Demands (Subject to Reasonable Accommodation):

Keyboarding/Dexterity: Frequently; activity exists from 1/3 to 2/3 of the time
Standing/Walking: Occasionally; activity exists up to 1/3 of the time
Strength (Lift/Carry/Push/Pull): Sedentary (exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally)
Talking (Must be able to effectively communicate verbally): Yes
Seeing: Yes
Hearing: Yes
Color Acuity (Must be able to distinguish and identify colors): No

This position may have additional or varied physical demand and/or respiratory fit test requirements. Please consult the Physical Demands Project SharePoint site or contact Risk Management/Employee Health for additional information.

Environmental Conditions:

Normal office environment.

All applicants will receive consideration regardless of membership in any protected status as defined by applicable state or federal law, including protected veteran or disability status.

Qualifications:
Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience or an Associate degree with 4 years of experience specifically involving data analysis, quality assurance, and support.
Masters degree in relevant discipline may substitute for experience.
Healthcare experience preferred.
Training and experience with Microsoft Excel, Access, Word and PowerPoint, Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services, and SAS preferred.
Must be able to communicate effectively in English (Verbal/Written).",2.8,"Integris Health
2.8","Midwest City, OK",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
6,IT Data Analyst,"$44k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Federated Insurance is looking for a passionate Data Analyst with experience in the insurance industry. The successful candidate will turn data into information, information into insights, and help lead the transformation toward data driven business decisions. Data analyst responsibilities include conducting system and process analysis to elicit data and reporting requirements. Data analysts will additionally develop, validate and promote data models and reporting capabilities.
Responsibilities
Lead requirements elicitation sessions with both technical and business partners to understand the business’ data, requirements, and business problems
Document business/functional requirements, ETL mapping requirements, and reporting requirements for the development of reporting and data consuming applications
Develop conceptual, logical, and physical data models and designs technical solutions to satisfy requirements
Define and support data lineage from data source to consumer
Design and execute tests validating data transformation accuracy, completeness, and reporting correctness
Develop partnerships and collaborate with a variety of business and functional areas
Requirements
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or Information Systems preferred
3-5+ years on a data-focused team, responsible for data warehousing, analytics and/or reporting
Knowledge/experience utilizing SQL databases - creating queries, reviewing data and performing data analysis
Data warehouse skills: source-to-target mapping, data profiling, data lineage
SQL Server experience and ACORD model knowledge desirable
Strong communication skills, analytical mindset and ability to collaborate with a team
Meticulous, downright excited about data and being a humble disruptor

At Federated Insurance, we do life-changing work, focused on our clients’ success. For our employees, we provide tremendous opportunities for growth. Over 95% of them believe our company has an outstanding future. We make lives better, and we’re looking for employees who want to make a difference in others’ lives, all while enhancing their own.
You will have opportunities to grow in your career. Our employees are encouraged to ask questions and learn on the job, and we are committed to promoting from within. We recognize your contributions with an exceptional rewards package that includes competitive pay and bonus programs, incredibly affordable health insurance, generous pension and 401(k) benefits, and gift matching and paid volunteer time to support your involvement in the community. Learn more about our Benefits.
If California Resident, please review Federated's enhanced Privacy Policy.",3.8,"Federated Mutual Insurance Company
3.8","Owatonna, MN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1904,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
7,Data Analyst,"$34k-$60k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We currently have a new opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our Accounting/Finance/Business Intelligence team. This position will work with data generated by a variety of credit union systems to create, validate, and generate business reports that management will use in decision making. This position will coordinate with various business areas to envision and develop report specifications, track the request pipeline and delivery metrics, suggest system enhancements, and create documentation.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities:

Build and maintain queries, dashboards, and reports.
Respond to day to day custom requests for data and reports.
Perform ad hoc data requests and analysis as needed.
Extract data from various systems.
Analyze results of data reports for anomalies, accuracy, and applicability to business unit requests.
Maintain and develop data dictionaries and documentation of deliverables. Actively participate in data quality related tasks.
Identify patterns and trends in data sets.
Provide recommendations and interpretations of data and information.
Assist with application used for workflow and cross sales program.

Desired Skills and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in a business, computer, or data science preferred. MBA a plus.
Four years of experience working in database environments designing reports and working with extracts.
Excellent analytical skills with experience managing large amounts of data from various sources.
Experience combining, analyzing and presenting data in a clear manner.
Working knowledge of SQL preferred. Experience with Oracle databases a plus.
Proficient use of Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel and SQL databases.
Exposure to core banking systems a plus.
Strong written and verbal communication skills with the ability to interact with all levels of end users and technical resources.
Self-motivated with the ability to react to change, feedback and critique quickly and positively.
Strong attention to detail.
Open and collaborative style, comfortable working in an environment where ideas are shared and challenged.
Ability to conceptualize and implement items in a changing environment.

Fox Communities Credit Union is a $2 billion in assets community-based credit union servicing over 104,000 members at 23 locations. We take pride in being a progressive, member-owned, full service financial institution dedicated to serving the community.

Fox Communities Credit Union believes our employees are our most important asset. We offer a great team environment, competitive salary and an excellent benefit package which includes, medical, dental, vision, life, short-term and long-term disability insurance, 401k (Roth and Traditional), which includes company contributions including match, and paid time off! As part of our commitment to the communities we serve we also offer all employee’s Paid Volunteer Time Off! If you are enthusiastic about a rewarding career with a successful & growing credit union, apply now!

Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans, and Individuals with Disabilities.",3.9,"Fox Communities Credit Union
3.9","Appleton, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1953,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
8,Marketing Data Analyst,"$34k-$62k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:
Can you work in a relationship with other people where it requires ongoing flexibility?
Do you have an upbeat, positive attitude?
Do you take pride in knowing you are helping to make things happen?

If you can answer yes to these questions, Idaho Central Credit Union may have an opportunity ideally suited for you.

As a Marketing Data Analyst, your primary function is to interpret credit union data, analyze results and implement decisions based on the data. You will be responsible for turning data into information and insight that aids in campaign and business decisions. Also you will be responsible for performing a range of functions in support of market research, market assessment and campaign implementation.

Responsibilities:

Assist in managing technical aspects of key marketing systems (marketing automation, CRM, data warehouse) used to generate, distribute, and report.
Establish and maintain scalable processes that ensure best practices in campaign and lead management.
Create and maintain metrics reports on marketing and sales activities, effectiveness, and business impact.
Analyze marketing and sales data to develop insights and make recommendations on areas for optimization
Monitor and maintain data quality within the marketing database.
Evaluate new technologies and add-on applications to improve and optimize marketing team performance.
Manage membership targeting to strengthen relationships, prevent attrition, and increase profitability.
Leverage web and email engagement to create member insight and data to help improve individual experiences with our digital channels.
Generate and govern segmentation efforts by developing queries and custom reports, target groups, and campaigns for product and service performance.
Track all marketing campaigns and provide meaningful analysis and insight for future efforts.
Analyze consumer segments and other demographic information from the membership database to provide insight for product development, usage, and cross-sell opportunities.
Manage third-party vendor integration with marketing systems including Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Salesforce Advertising Studio, Salesforce CRM, Adobe Analytics, Integrator MCIF, Encompass CRM and Microsoft Power BI.
Represent the Credit Union at community events as needed.

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree in Marketing, Mass Communication, Advertising or related field. 5-9 years of experience with database marketing required. Preferable experience with: Raddon Integrator MCIF, Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Salesforce Advertising Studio, Salesforce CRM, Adobe Analytics, Microsoft Power BI, SQL, and data warehouse experience. Strong analytical skills. Proficiency in marketing automation systems and integrating those systems with other technologies. Technically capable, excellent communicator and a desire to improve processes. Math skills, Secondary-level computer knowledge including Microsoft Office, especially Excel and pivot tables, etc. Ability to maintain the confidentiality of Credit Union and member records at all times. A demonstrated cooperative and positive attitude toward members and other Credit Union staff. Professional in appearance, attendance, quality, and quantity of work performed. Ability to analyze member needs, develop, and coordinate marketing activities to fit member needs with Credit Union products and services. Must be willing to comply with the Bank Secrecy Act and USA Patriot Act as implemented by Idaho Central Credit Union. Team member will be asked to work extended/unique hours.

Perform tasks requiring manual dexterity (processing paperwork, filing, stapling, sorting, collating, typing, counting cash, etc.) Sit for extended periods of time. Lift 20-40 pounds of office supplies (copy paper, computer paper, mail, etc). Some heavy lifting may be required in order to execute proper event logistics. Repetitive motion using wrists, hands, and fingers. Reach keyboards. Ability to operate basic office machines (calculator, computer, telephone, copy machine, fax machine, etc).

Must be eligible for membership at Idaho Central Credit Union to obtain employment.

EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability

Idaho Central Credit Union is a dynamic financial institution that is focused on helping our members achieve financial success. Established in 1940 we have become the largest and fastest growing financial institution in the state of Idaho. ICCU was voted for large companies the Best Place to work in Idaho. We have also been named by S&P Global Market Intelligence as the top performing credit union in the nation. We are a talent based organization looking for talented individuals to help our members achieve financial success.",4.2,"Idaho Central Credit Union
4.2","Chubbuck, ID",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
9,Data Analyst - Online Education,"$32k-$59k
(Glassdoor Est.)","THIS IS NOT A REMOTE POSITION


THIS POSITION WILL BE BASED OUT OF THE

TUCSON CORPORATE OFFICE

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Utilize advanced statistical abilities and tools to interpret data sets, paying particular attention to trends and patterns that could be valuable for diagnostic and predictive efforts.
Prepare reports and visualizations that effectively communicate trends, patterns, and predictions.
Assist with preparing, collecting, and analyzing quantitative (surveys, etc.) and qualitative (focus groups, etc.) data from students, faculty and staff.
Partner with stakeholders to gain a thorough understanding of needs.
Mine data from primary and secondary sources and reorganizes into a format that can be easily read by human or machine.
Work closely with IT in establishing data systems protocols for data needs.
Coach team members on how to use tools to their greatest benefit.
The list of essential functions is not exhaustive and may be supplemented.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s Degree or higher, preferably in a computational field such as computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Engineering.
Three (3) years of experience working with large data sets or relational databases.
Three (3) years of experience with forecasting, trend analysis, and predictive modeling.
Demonstrated experience using SQL, Excel, R or Python, and visualization platforms such as Tableau or Power BI.
Experience working in higher education preferred.
Take initiative and ownership of projects.
Problem solving and analytical skills.
Business acumen.
Time management skills and able to prioritize and deliver projects and deliverables on time.
Comfortable working in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment.
Collaborative and team focused.",4.6,"Pima Medical Institute
4.6","Tucson, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1972,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
10,Data Analyst,"$47k-$80k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This position is responsible for analyzing, reporting and maintaining information within iCare’s enterprise data warehouse and associated databases based on business unit priorities. Additionally, this position may be responsible for assisting with system configuration and support.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES and RESPONSIBILITIES:

Conducts business analysis, data modeling, logical and physical database design, database optimization, load strategy design and implementation, security and change management.
Create, manage and maintain reports using standard reporting technologies.
Develop strong working relationship with the business units to determine needs and solutions that monitor trends.
Maintain and manage a centralized data dictionary.
Ensure best practices are utilized in defining business processes, including identifying and reporting on trends and deviation.
Ensure adherence to company data architectural guidelines, principles and standards in all project milestones and deliverables.
Work with team to optimize system performance
Create appropriate documentation to support effective requirements definition including charts, graphs, and logic model diagrams as necessary.
Fully participate in iCare’s Compliance Program, including compliance with iCare’s Code of Conduct, policies and procedures, and all applicable Privacy and Security laws

An individual in this position must be able to successfully perform the essential duties and responsibilities listed above. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.

The above list reflects the general details necessary to describe the principle and essential functions of the position and shall not be construed as the only duties that may be assigned for the position.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Management Information Systems, Engineering or related field, or equivalent experience
2+ years proven design/development experience in methodologies related to ad hoc reporting, dimensional modeling and Enterprise Data Warehousing.
2+ years of experience with relational database systems.
Proficiency in database design concepts and techniques for OLAP
Experience with enterprise-level DBMS systems and tools.
Extensive experience in Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services and Microsoft BI Tool set.
Strong problem-solving skills, logical process thinking, and end-to-end system concepts.
Strong verbal and written communication skills which can clearly articulate complex concepts and ideas to all levels of the organization in both technical and non-technical terms.
Strong knowledge of data mapping and data modeling processes.
Strong knowledge and experience creating reports that allow business users to drill into details.
Analytical skills which effectively deal with conceptual and tangible ideas along with attention to detail.
Working knowledge of the IT development process and life cycle, i.e. roles/responsibilities, tasks, milestones, deliverables.
Team oriented with ability to work effectively with many different people across many diverse organizations.
Ability to work on multiple, concurrent projects in a dynamic environment and manage time appropriately.
Management skills with the ability to plan, organize, and orchestrate activities such as Joint Application Development and review sessions.
Ability to identify and manage risks and issues, providing appropriate escalation when needed.
Data Analyst I (1-4 years of experience in data analysis and/or ETL design & development)
Data Analyst II (4-10 years of experience in data analysis and ETL design & development)
Data Analyst III (10+ years of experience in data analysis, ETL, and/or EDW design & development

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Understanding of Medicaid/Medicare
Understanding of healthcare insurance industry

PHYSICAL AND MENTAL DEMANDS:

Physical and mental stamina to handle heavy workloads.
Ability to operate a computer and typical office equipment.

The mental and physical requirements described here are representative of those that must be met by an individual to successfully perform the essential functions of this position.

WORKING ENVIRONMENT:

iCare is a multi-cultural environment committed to diversity and service to people with disabilities.
Independent Care Health Plan is a professional, performance-oriented organization. Additional time and effort beyond a normal workweek may be required to accomplish company and individual objectives and to provide a high level of service to our members.
Most of work is performed in an office environment.
Periodic business-related travel may be required.
Work conditions may involve stress producing activities and/or timelines.

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an individual encounters while performing the essential functions of this position.

Experience
Required
1 year(s): experience in data analysis and/or ETL design & development
2 year(s): experience with relational database systems
2 year(s): design/development experience in methodologies related to ad hoc reporting, dimensional modeling and Enterprise Data Warehousing.
Education
Required
Bachelors or better in Engineering or related field
Bachelors or better in Management Information Systems or related field
Bachelors or better in Computer Science or related field
Behaviors
Preferred
Innovative: Consistently introduces new ideas and demonstrates original thinking
Functional Expert: Considered a thought leader on a subject
Detail Oriented: Capable of carrying out a given task with all details necessary to get the task done well
Motivations
Preferred
Growth Opportunities: Inspired to perform well by the chance to take on more responsibility
Self-Starter: Inspired to perform without outside help
Goal Completion: Inspired to perform well by the completion of tasks",2.9,"Independent Care Health Plan
2.9","Milwaukee, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
11,Data Analyst,"$46k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","System1’s Analytics org supports a diverse collection of teams, products, and business units, ensuring decisions at every level are made with data-driven insight. We are looking for a detail-oriented Data Analyst to join us and support our Ad Operations team, which drives initiatives to improve efficiency and effectiveness of advertising campaigns across varying markets.

You will work directly with product and technical teams to optimize workflows and find solutions to internal blockers using real-time data analysis. You’ll analyze data from a variety of sources, using proprietary and industry-leading tools and platforms. And you’ll work with teams across business units and of varying expertise, gaining a well-rounded understanding of all things System1.
The Role You Will Have
Partner with engineering, product, analytics, and business teams to deliver evidence-based solutions to business challenges
Experiment, model, and perform A/B testing on a variety of products and business strategies to help develop overall strategy and improvement
Support overall Ad Operations with routine analysis as well as ad-hoc projects, sometimes managing multiple projects at a time
Participate in overall improvements to the larger Analytics org by exemplifying time management and best practices, and collaborating to share knowledge and ideas
What You Will Bring
2+ years of relevant full-time work experience; within a tech organization is a plus
Bachelor's in Computer Science or another quantitative field preferred (mathematics, economics, finance, statistics, etc.)
Strong proficiency with SQL and large data sets
Proficiency with Python scripting is a plus
Experience with big data tools is a plus (AWS, Snowflake, Tableau, etc.)
What We Have to Offer
Unlimited paid sick time
17 PTO days
10 paid company holidays
Competitive benefits package and 401k",3.9,"System1
3.9","Bellevue, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
12,Data Scientist Risk Analyst,"$50k-$92k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

Oasis Systems has an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst to support the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) in Washington, DC.
The successful candidate shall provide support in data analytics, Python, data visualization, dashboards and use of data analytic tools. Activities which the contractor may be tasked to perform include gathering requirements from stakeholders, conducting financial data analysis and risk analysis in a Big Data environment, and creating interactive dashboard reports and documentations.

LOCATION: Washington, DC

JOB STATUS: Full-Time

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS (Education, Certifications, Experience, Skills)

SECURITY CLEARANCE: Ability to pass a Special Agreement Check (SAC) and a National Agency Check and Inquires (NACI) Background Investigation

EDUCATION: Bachelor’s degree

CERTIFICATIONS AND TOOLS: Certifications in Data Analytics program languages such as Python and R preferred but not required. Experience with Global Risk product a plus, but not required.

EXPERIENCE LEVEL: A minimum of 8 years of relevant experience in the data analysis field and a minimum of 5 years of industrial analytics experience using Python (recent use during the past 3 years) as well as extensive experience with SQL.
Specific experience with financial or market risk analysis is a Must.

DESCRIPTION: Functionally, the candidate will be responsible for:

Work closely with the customer to gather and document project requirements.
Perform data manipulation and advanced data analysis including financial modeling, data mining, and Machine Learning techniques.
Perform risk analysis which may include a broad range of financial risk measures, (such as Value at Risk (VaR): computation and evaluation, VaR tracking (VaR evolution over time), Incremental (and marginal) VaR calculation for individual asset classes /positions, conditional VaR, stress testing).
Test each project thoroughly before presenting it to the task order project manager for quality control. Document test results as part of the project closeout documentation.
Create documentation as required under the PMLC and the Configuration Change Board (CCB) in order to move projects to the production environment.
Coordinate with internal and external organizations providing data to understand and resolve improper data formatting and other integration issues.
Participate in facilitated meetings between stakeholders at CFTC which may include regular status meetings, user acceptance testing meetings and ad hoc development discussions.
Data analysis tasks may be varied. They will include complex data requests that require data mining, extraction, and query optimization services from Divisions throughout the CFTC.
Assist business users, economists, statisticians, and others, as required, to support effective use of analytic techniques and CFTC-approved tools to meet the customers various analytic needs.

Who We Are

Oasis Systems is a premier provider of customer-driven, cost-effective and quality Engineering Services; Enterprise Systems and Applications; Human Factors Engineering; Information Technology and Cyber Security; Professional Services; and Specialized Engineering Solutions to the Department of Defense, FAA, NRC and other federal agencies.

We strive to be an exciting and welcoming company that attracts, develops, motivates and retains the most talented, skilled and dedicated people in the industry; where they are encouraged to achieve personal excellence, purpose, and their full potential and career aspirations; while supporting mission-critical national security technologies and programs.

Oasis Systems is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of any legally protected characteristic including, but not limited to, race, color, religion, national origin, marital status, gender, sexual orientation, ancestry, age, medical condition, military veteran status or on the basis of physical handicap which, with reasonable accommodation, render the application to satisfactorily perform the job available.",3.7,"Oasis Systems LLC
3.7","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
13,Data Analyst II,"$53k-$91k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Who is Cenlar?

You are.

Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Data Analyst II.

Job Summary:

Responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external data) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies. Identifies and compiles data sets using a variety of tools (e.g. SQL, Access) to help predict, improve, and measure the success of key business to business outcomes. Responsible for documenting data requirements, data collection/processing/cleaning, and exploratory data analysis; which may include utilizing statistical models/algorithms and data visualization techniques. Incumbents in this role may often be referred to as Data Scientists.

Responsibilities:
Day-to-day actions are focused on administering defined procedures, analysis and report preparation.
Commands knowledge of data elements across the enterprise and industry – definitions, lineage and usage
Executes creation of tabular operational reports and aggregation reports with medium to high complexity.
Commands intermediate to expert level t-SQL coding proficiency
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Responsible for documenting metadata, data lineage, data definitions and business glossary entries.
Handles basic data transformation tasks such as date and decimal formatting, rounding of numeric values, and conversion of numeric values to percentages.
Has intermediate to expert level SSIS ETL build proficiency
Works with Data stewards to enforce adherence to standards for enhancements and new repositories.
Handles more complicated report requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing (e.g. Fibonacci or similar) and trend analysis.
Can deduce portfolio or market trends from reports or chart analysis.
Understands business logic for aggregation and analysis services.
Can perform data transformation and can produce dimensional reports
Can perform basic data profiling activities, understands cardinality
Helps to define guidelines for data management, governance and reporting
May direct day-to-day work of employees, but will not typically have formal management role.
Individual at this level is expected to use some independence of thought but to refer more complex problems to supervisors or other experts.
Individual would be expected to contribute to work flow or process change and redesign and to form a strong basic understanding of the specific product or process.
Qualifications:
Typically exhibits strong executional capabilities and is beginning to take on more responsibility.
Primary focus is on execution within defined parameters, with some expansion based on developing capabilities and or experiences. In partnership with more experienced staff.
Minimum of 5 years of experience.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, finance, mathematics, statistics (or similar) or equivalent work experience
Total Rewards:

Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Visit www.cenlar.com for more details.

Please apply online.",2.5,"Cenlar
2.5","Ewing, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
14,Data Analyst,-1,"DATA ANALYST*
Fast growing Columbia based E-Commerce hand tool company is taking applications for an On-Site Data Analyst. You must live within commuting distance to be considered for this position.
General Responsibilities: * Fast growing Columbia based E-Commerce hand tool company is taking applications for a full-time Data Analyst. A successful Data Analyst candidate will have various skills and qualifications that help them solve problems using large amounts of data. You will be required to interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques. You will be developing and implementing data collection, analysis and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality. You will be acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases. You will also be required to professionally organize, and update written operating procedures. You must have advanced problem-solving skills and experience with implementing / processing corrective actions with others. Excellent written & verbal communication and follow-up skills a must. *Excellent computer skills and experience using MS Office are required. You will need to have **professional level proficiency in office email use, Word, Excel and Access.*
Specific Responsibilities: *
*Gather Information from Data Sources*
Before they can analyze information, data reporting analysts need to gather the data from primary or secondary sources, which they maintain using organized data systems.
*Interpret Data*
Data reporting analysts use statistical techniques to interpret the results from the data they acquired so that they can use the information to create regular reports.
*Develop Databases*
Using data collection systems and analytical techniques, data reporting analysts implement databases and other strategies to optimize the statistical efficiency and quality of the data they work with. This includes filtering and cleaning the data by reviewing computer reports and performance indicators to correct any data problems.
*Identify Trends*
Data reporting analysts review information to identify and interpret any patterns or useful trends in complex data sets.
*Prioritize Business Goals*
Data reporting analysts work closely with management to prioritize business needs and stay up to date with the goals of the organization as they evolve. These analysts also work with other departments to find new ways to improve opportunities.
*Procedure Writing/Updating*
Organizing, writing, and updating written procedures for all aspects of Department to use for training new employees, ensuring consistency and ability to objectively assess subordinate job performance
*Interface with Service Providers*
Interface with service providers that impact any aspect related to Data processing including software (Shipstation/SkuVault), website (IT) carriers (USPS, UPS, FedEx), platforms (PayPal, eBay, Amazon), etc.
*Reporting*
Responsible for downloading, providing, and analyzing daily, weekly, and monthly reports detailing departmental activity and performance as requested by managers
Preferred Experience/Skills: *
High school diploma or equivalent. Bachelor's degree is preferred.
At least 2-3 years of data analyst experience.
Professional level proficiency in office email use, Word, Excel and Access.
Strong organizational and follow-through skills required.
Candidate must possess excellent written and oral skills and must have a high attention to detail.
If you are up for a fast-paced challenge and looking for a new career path in a technology-driven E-Commerce company with the potential for upward mobility, please send your resume. *Full-Time benefits available include: Holiday Pay, Paid Time Off, company contribution to Health Insurance.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $12.00 - $15.00 per hour

Benefits:
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We are following Social Distancing guidelines, The City of Columbia's Mask policy, as well as CDC guidelines for disinfection and hygiene

Experience:
Microsoft Office: 1 year (Required)
Database Development: 1 year (Preferred)
Statistical Analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Data Analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Location:
Columbia, MO 65202 (Required)
Application Question:
Are you within physical commuting distance to Columbia, MO? You will be required to be on-site daily.
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Company's website:
www.taytools.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/profile.php?id=100013952537811
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Taylor Toolworks LLC,"Columbia, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
15,"Data Analyst, Mid Level (27-01)","$51k-$94k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Category: Data Analyst

Title: Data Analyst, Mid Level (27-01)

Location(s): Annapolis Junction, MD

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with appropriate agency Polygraph

Join Freedom – we re a team of IT professionals dedicated to our passion for tech and loving where we work. As a member of our team, how you want to spend your time and which projects you d like to work on is important to us – which is part of the reason we ve been selected as a Top Workplace for multiple years in a row. You ll be part of our friendly, flexible office environment, hands-off management, a variety of social events, and endless growth opportunities. Tell us what you need to do your best work, and we work the magic to make it happen.

We believe in striking that perfect balance between work and play, where you can pursue your creativity and excel in your career, and still have time for all your extracurricular activities. At Freedom, there is no shortage of growth opportunities and a successful career path for a bright, well-rounded professional like you. We have something for everyone – check out our most recent available position below!

What You'll Do

Analyze/deconflict/join HR data created by various applications. Together these datasets represent the human resources available to support project team.

Qualifications and Technical Knowledge

Five+ (5 plus) years of experience analyzing large data sets, specifically:
Provide analytical insights on human resource (HR) data sets using Oracle SQL, PowerB and MS Excel/Access
Conduct detailed data analysis on HR data
Reliably join disparate data sources into a single source for reporting
Use the results of data evaluation to increase data quality and reveal opportunities for data automation (data automation examples: data cleansing, data collection, data loading)
Define and develop a core set of queries that match qualified candidates to language needs
Understand, construct and execute SQL queries to answer executive inquiries in real-time using repeatable processes
Provide data solutions, tools, and capabilities to enable self-service frameworks for data consumers
Provide expertise and translate the business needs to design; and develop tools, techniques, and metrics, and dashboards for insights and data visualization
Develop methods to monitor and report data quality issues
Responsible for establishing appreciation and adherence to the principles of data quality management, including metadata, lineage, and business definitions
Provide support to tech teams in managing security mechanisms and data access governance.

What s in It for You?
Flexible work environment
A team mentality – work with friendly, like-minded professionals
Work with innovative, cutting edge technologies
Enjoy extremely competitive compensation and benefits
A work-life balance you can count on
Opportunities to grow and advance your career on our dime
The Benefits You Get with Freedom
Amazing benefits including matching 401k, profit sharing, fully paid medical, and more
Generous paid time off – including paid site closure days
Competitive salary offerings
Paid training and tuition reimbursement
Referral bonuses
Fully paid life and disability
Annual logo wear allowance
Company sponsored events (game nights, holiday party, summer party, happy hours)
Interested in learning more about Freedom and our culture? Contact us today! We re constantly hosting hiring events in our office and elsewhere, to help you get a sense of what life is like at Freedom before joining the team.

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with an appropriate agency Polygraph is required

U.S. Citizenship is required

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, age, marital status, disability or veteran status

Applicant Federal & E-Verify Postings

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",4.4,"FREEDOM CONSULTING GROUP
4.4","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
16,Tactical Data Link (TDL) Analyst,"$50k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Working at USfalcon is about providing exceptional professional services to the DoD and various Federal Agencies. We have been excelling in diverse platforms for almost 30 years and continue to be an industry leader. If you thrive in an organization that values integrity, commitment, stewardship, and service, we want to meet you.
We have an exciting opportunity to join us in supporting one of our valued customers as a Tactical Data Link (TDL) Analyst located at Langley, AFB in Hampton, VA.

Develop Interface Control Proposals (ICPs) that make editorial and technical changes to current/future multi-TDL configuration items (US Military Standard (Mil-Std) 3011, 6011, 6016, 6017, 6020, MADL, Cursor on Target (CoT), etc.). Perform detailed technical analysis of ICPs as they relate to USAF platforms and systems.
Provide technical multi-TDL expertise to support the integration of multi-TDL capabilities into USAF platforms and systems.
Develop, or review previously-developed, bit-level implementation specifications for USAF platforms and systems. These implementations shall depict the total multi-TDL implementation requirements for the platform.
Provide technical support at Technical Interchange Meetings and Design Reviews concerning multi-TDL implementations.
Provide technical expertise to analyze concepts or problems with Air Force, Joint, or Coalition standards or implementation of those standards and provide solutions or recommendations in appropriate format as required.
Support development of operational concepts and architectures that use existing and emerging capabilities in support of USAF platform/system information exchange, interoperability, and operational employment requirements. This support shall include participation in Integrated Product Teams (IPTs) and other working groups to address specific technical and operational issues.
Provide analytical assessments addressing impacts on existing allied message standards and systems technical accuracy effect on doctrine and identification of potential problems and provide solutions and recommendations for implementation.
Attend and provide technical support for Air Force, Joint and Coalition-related multi-TDL meetings.
Additional duties as assigned

Required Skills:
At least 5 years recent experience (within past 10 years) in a job working formal operational and information exchange requirements development as they relate to fighter aircraft tactical data exchange.
At least 5 years recent experience (within past 10 years) in a job performing formal Multi-TDL configuration management (to include development and analysis of complex ICPs), data management, military standards management, and staff processes.
At least 5 years recent experience (within past 10 years) working with and exposure to Joint/Air Force doctrine and the NATO Consultation, Command and Control Board (C3B) and it subcommittees.
Desired Skills:
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications (e.g., Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Access, and Outlook)
Education: Bachelor's degree in a technical field (such as engineering, computer science, etc.) from an accredited institution
Clearance: US Secret and NATO Secret
Travel: 10%
Air Force
EPASS",4.4,"USfalcon
4.4","Hampton, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
17,Member Data Analyst,"$43k-$77k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Blue Federal Credit Union employees work hard, have fun, and win for our members and each other! Our Member Data Analyst performs quantitative and qualitative research using statistics to analyze programs, products and services offered, market potential, competitive intelligence and industry standards to recommend and guide market efforts. Recommends marketing activity based on research and technical analysis. Independently drives data analysis and develops insights for use by management.
Directs central market research function, anticipates and evaluates useful market information, establishes standards for research methodology, and identifies opportunities to expand the scope of business.
Identifies, analyzes and interprets trends and patterns in complex data sets to develop recommendations to be used in promoting the organization and improving positioning, image and support within the target market.
Maintain appropriate databases and data systems for the department. Implements data collection systems and updates. Acquires and abstracts primary and secondary data from existing internal or external data sources.
Develops graphs, reports and presentations. Performs statistical analysis upon request. Creates and presents quality dashboards. 3-4 bullets on education and experience
Assists in development and production of direct marketing initiatives through analysis of target market universe, list development, design and production.
Must comply with applicable laws and regulations, including but not limited to, the Bank Secrecy Act, the Patriot Act, and the Office of Foreign Assets Control.
Experience: Three years to five years of similar or related experience, including preparatory experience.

Education/Certifications/Licenses: A college degree.

Interpersonal Skills: A significant level of trust, credibility and diplomacy is required. In-depth dialogues, conversations and explanations with customers, direct and indirect reports and outside vendors can be of a sensitive and/or highly confidential nature. Communications may involve motivating, influencing, educating and/or advising others on matters of significance.

Other Skills: Strong analytical spreadsheet and communication skills, demonstrated ability to handle multiple project simultaneously, new product development, packaging design, competitive analysis, consumer promotion, advertising media and copy, scan data analysis. Familiarity with MCIF systems, CD-ROM directories and market data on disc, survey research and statistical analysis software, mapping software, market research directories and online data services.",4.1,"Blue Federal Credit Union
4.1","Cheyenne, WY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Other Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
18,Data Management Analyst,"$30k-$61k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Management Analyst
Duty Site


Redstone Arsenal, AL

FLSA Status


Exempt

Emp. Status

RT

Apply Now


Job Code:
3377

S3, Inc. is a woman owned small business founded in 1991, headquartered in Huntsville, AL, that provides technical, programmatic, and logistics services to US Department of Defense, other US Government Agencies, and Partner Nation militaries, co-located with Government requirements. S3 has a wholly owned subsidiary, KBFS, that provides aviation pilot training, heavy lift, aircraft maintenance, and related aircraft services to Government and commercial requirements IAW multiple FAA certifications.

S3 Inc. is seeking a Data Management Analyst to support projects on Redstone Arsenal. AL.

Position Description: The Data Management Analyst is responsible for managing the PMO Data Management System to include: reviewing of all submitted contractor technical data for correctness ( format, topic relevance, completeness, and data rights markings); distribution of the contractor data to the appropriate government and contractor personnel; consolidating and preparing Contract Data Requirements Lists (CDRLs-DD1423s) and Document Summary List (DSL) packages for Contract Requirements Packages (CRP) to be submitted through government contracting channels; forecasting and tracking CDRL deliveries to ensure compliance with DD 1423s; support, administer, and maintain the document repository containing all CDRLs; create and manage multiple SharePoint sites and manage SharePoint user accounts; and prepare weekly metric reports for PMO leadership regarding CDRL submissions, CDRLs in-work, and CDRLs needing signature. Will review Assertions List from prime and subcontractors to determine compliance with DFARS and support the challenge procedures and complete Defense Logistics Agency (DLA) Post Award and Intercept Database (PAID) and Procurement Aging and Staging System (PASS) actions assuring proper administrative lead times. Also will search the electronic data management systems (EDMS) such as SharePoint, PFRMS networks, and MEARS to support user's request for information.

Experience/Skills Required:

• 2 years of experience reviewing contractor technical data for correctness and distributing data.

• 2 years of experience consolidating and preparing CDRLs and DSL for contract requirements packages.

• 2 years of experience forecasting and tracking CDRL deliveries in compliance with requirements lists.

• 1 year of experience in maintaining a document repository.

• 1 year of experience with managing SharePoint site and SharePoint user accounts or similar.

• 1 year of experience with preparation of reports on technical data submissions.

• 2 years of experience searching databases for information needed by users.

• 1 year of experience working with DLA, PAID, and PASS actions or similar.

Education Required: Bachelors’ Degree and 8 years of relevant experience or HS and 11 years overall experience.

Security Clearance Required: Secret Clearance.

Certifications/Licenses: None.

Other: N/A

Systems Studies and Simulation, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.
If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request a reasonable accommodation. If you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access the S3 Inc. Careers Page as a result of your disability, you can request reasonable accommodations by calling (256) 539-1700 Ext 1127 or by sending an email to: recruiter@s3inc.com . Thank you for your interest in S3 Inc.",4.0,"S3, Inc
4.0","Huntsville, AL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
19,Senior Data Analyst,"$83k-$141k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Do you want to innovate customer experiences and make business decisions smarter through data? Are you ready to join a collaborative and motivated team diving into cutting edge big data technology? As an Senior Data Analyst on the Single View of the Customer (SVOC) team, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information, and uses that information to drive action. You will have the opportunity to interact with all our SVOC scrum teams, ensuring that we are incorporating new technologies seamlessly, all while providing value to our customers. This opportunity also allows you to dive in to complex technologies, and work with a very forward-thinking group of peers!

Familiar, but never leveraged big data technologies? No worries! When you first join our SVOC team, you will have the opportunity to come up to speed on the cutting-edge technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o Significant experience in facilitating the discovery process with functional stakeholders to identify requirements and expected outcomes.
o Experience in developing test plans and scenarios to ensure the highest quality deliverables
o Strong SQL, data mapping, and data profiling skills
o Working knowledge of Big Data and the Hadoop Ecosystem
o Outstanding time management skills and attention to detail
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o Strong presentation skills. Should be comfortable with presenting to all levels of management
o A Bachelor's degree in Information Technology, related field (business, finance, mathematics, computer science), or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Qualifications:

o Understanding and experience with Web Services and APIs
o Experience in querying NoSQL databases
o Knowledge and experience working in an Agile environment
o Exposure to QLIK or other data visualization tools
o Experience with providing Production Support

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO:

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time Senior Data Analyst, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
20,Data Analyst,"$43k-$80k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


We are looking for an expert in Data Analysis and technical consulting to join our team who is driven to deliver valuable customer experiences. Our analysts are team-oriented, collaborative, and focus on delivering value in everything we do. We use agile methods to analyze, define and document business requirements for software solutions which align with organizational goals and help our clients achieve their desired outcomes. We support our clients in their digital product needs – from vision to roadmap to execution.

Responsibilities
Develop thorough understanding of the business context and objectives by, among other things, eliciting and analyzing requirements from all relevant stakeholders (business users, data engineers, data scientists, and similar).
Able to operationalize business questions using data.
Demonstrate understanding of relational databases, data architecture and data modelling.
Capable building complex SQL statements to answer business questions.
Experience designing conceptual data models/ entity relationship diagrams/ business process models.
Able to transform and cleanse data using tools such as R, SQL or Python.
Able to interpret, understand, and explain data to clients.
Basic knowledge of dashboard management and creating (drag and drop) for storytelling of regular information reports and ad-hoc requests.
Build trust and respect, establish relationships, and develop rapport with technical and non-technical team members.
Experience documenting Data Analysis processes and outcomes.
Industry or subject matter expertise (e.g. finance, employment, hospitality, web analytics).
Qualifications
B.A. or B.S. (focus in Computer Information Systems, Business Management, Engineering, or related area of study is a plus)
1+ years’ experience in IT or related industry
Prior consulting or client management experience
Intermediate/Advanced SQL skills, Excel skills, including, and proficient in MS PowerPoint
Experience working with Data Visualization tools such as Tableau or Power BI
Preferred experience with cloud analytics products such as Google, AWS, or Microsoft
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets
Strong analytical aptitude and able to structure complex or undefined business problems
Strong verbal and written communication skills, report writing and presenting findings to varying stakeholders
Hands-on experience using tools to help clients make data-driven decisions
Knowledge and practice of core Agile values and principles a plus
Initiative to learn new strategies and trends to continue to educate self analytically, technically, and technologically
About Excella


Excella is a leading provider of Agile software development and data and analytics solutions to clients in the federal, commercial and non-profit sectors. We believe that great work leads to great things –- our experts measure success by the positive impact we make on our clients, community, and colleagues. We are growing fast and need passionate, innovative people who love working with technology and are ready to make an impact.

Here's what you can expect from us:
You'll work with great people who love what they do: our team includes published authors, certified trainers, and internationally renowned speakers.
We have a ""bring your own device"" workplace and will share the cost of a new computer of your choice -- Mac or PC. It's up to you.
We'll invest in your career by providing 3 days of paid professional development every year, including travel and registration fees to attend classes and conferences, in addition to tuition assistance for degrees and certifications.
Starting day one, every employee is bonus eligible and receives 15 days of paid vacation, 6 federal holidays, and 4 floating holidays.
You can bike, drive, or metro to work -- our commute reimbursement plan has you covered.
You'll have fun! We hold monthly social events all year long, including a summer event for you and your family.
Excella is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.2,"Excella Consulting
4.2","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
21,Accounting Data and Systems Analyst,"$35k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Make your mark. Our internal firm services focuses on the firm’s critical business needs. From marketing to internal accounting and everything in between, our integrated solution approach is designed to help enable and manage growth, leverage resources, and mitigate firm operations. At Plante Moran, we have a privilege of serving clients and providing consultative services as they face challenges and seek new opportunities.

Your role.

Your work will include, but not be limited to:

· Understand and report on financial data throughout various accounting systems.

· Work in a fast-paced environment as part of a team to support application administration for the various systems used in Internal Accounting and around the Firm for reporting, dashboards and alerts.

· Troubleshoot problems, resolve system issues and improve overall data quality and system usage experience for the Firm’s national and international entities.

· Participate in various system upgrades and implementation projects by collaborating with other internal teams such as Human Resources and Technology.

· Key resource for developing datasets, analyzing data and reporting inconsistencies, and communicating data limitations. Projects might include Firm budgeting, business rule verification and correction, and variance analysis across systems.

· Assisting 3400+ partners and staff with reporting and analysis requests or system needs and inquiries by being part of our internal helpdesk support solution.

· Design and provide support for ETL processes through SQL, Alteryx and Excel for the Internal Accounting department reporting, plan and analysis functions.

The qualifications.

· Accounting Skills desired

o Understanding of general ledger and associated journal entries

o Understands key performance measures and indicators that drive reporting and analytics

· Technology Skills required

o Understanding of relational database concepts

o Experience building and /or designing datasets, reports, or dashboards

o Advanced knowledge of Excel, as well as proficiency with MS office 365 suite

o Familiarity with SQL databases and coding, SQL Reporting Services, and/or Crystal Reports preferred

· Analytical abilities required

o Creative, critical thinking, and problem solving

o Strong troubleshooting skills.

o Analyze and organize data

o Understand internal processes and terminology

· Strong aptitude for technology with a desire to understand systems, challenge and streamline existing processes, and create new processes

· Experience with financial system management/maintenance preferred but not required.

· Strong time management skills and ability to meet deadlines.

· Strong interpersonal and communication skills required to:

o promote positive working relationships with diverse personalities/roles at all levels in the firm

o explain and interpret accounting/financial information to non-financial people

o Contribute to a positive team attitude and environment as well as project collaboration

· Bachelor’s degree in Accounting, Computer Sciences or a related field is required

· Qualified individuals must either reside in or near the Metro Detroit area or be willing to relocate to the area for this opportunity. This position may require some local and national travel.

Our difference.

We are a nationally recognized public accounting, consulting, and wealth management firm, consistently ranked as one of FORTUNE magazine’s “100 Best Companies to Work For.” At Plante Moran, we live by the Golden Rule, fostering a relatively “jerk-free” culture with the lowest staff turnover rate in the industry. Our supportive network of well-rounded professionals is excited to catapult your growth and help pave your pathway to professional excellence.

Apply now. Make your mark.

This is an exempt position, so you may have to work hours that exceed the standard 40-hour work week.

Plante Moran is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse workplace.

Interested applicants must submit their resume for consideration using our applicant tracking system. Due to the high volume of applications received, only candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. Candidates must be legally authorized to work in the United States without sponsorship, with the exception of candidates that are bilingual in Japanese and English. Unsolicited resumes from search firms or employment agencies, or similar, will not be paid a fee and become the property of Plante Moran.

The specific statements above are not intended to be all-inclusive.",3.9,"Plante Moran
3.9","Southfield, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1924,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
22,Business Analyst - Digital Data and Analytics Virtual Hiring Event,-1,"Kforce Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Tuesday, October 13, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Internal Audit

Director of Financial Planning & Analysis

IT Manager

Senior Financial Analyst

Accounting Manager

Accounts Payable Specialist

Tableau Consultant

Senior Internal Auditor

Payroll Manager

VP of Finance

Human Resource Generalist

Staff Accountant

API Architect

Application Systems Analyst

Mortgage Processor

Business Analyst - Digital Data and Analytics

Active Directory Engineer

Lead Developer

Intake Details:

What to bring to this event

Resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About Kforce

Choosing a career is one of the hardest decisions you make in your life. And we are here to help. We’re here to understand you. Your goals. Your unique skills. Your purpose.

As a professional staffing and solutions firm, we specialize in building and managing Technology and Finance & Accounting teams across top employers nationwide. It’s our mission to help you achieve success by maintaining strong, lasting relationships.

We value your input. And because you tell us how to be better, we’ve earned the best reputation among our peers. We're honored to have top Glassdoor ratings, world-class Net Promoter® Scores (NPS) from both clients and consultants and top brand recognition among IT consultants.

As a Best of Staffing® Award winner for the last 5 years, our 2,000 career experts take pride in matching talented professionals with our world-class clients. We have relationships with cutting-edge companies, and they need experts like you.

Ready to take the next step in your career? Count on us to be your champion.

We Love What We Do. We Love Who We Serve.®

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Kforce has a client in search of a Business Analyst - Digital Data Analytics in Benton Harbor, MI. Overview: You are able to lead technical digital data projects autonomously and unlock the value of data. You have a proven track record of establishing Data Engineering processes at previous companies and care deeply about using data to solve business problems. Duties:

Conceive, lead, and execute projects to manage an exceptional data access solution, supporting user requests from various stakeholder groups
Work with a wide range of business partners, particularly in GIS and product management, to develop innovative analytics solutions that address top outcomes, including feature development/enhancement, system health monitoring, testing, and troubleshooting
Building strong relationships with stakeholders and mentoring junior team members

Requirements

Bachelor's degree required
2 years of experience required
Experience working with web analytics and digital media performance data
Experience with or exposed to Google Analytics, Adobe DTM, Adobe Launch, data warehouse, data-lake or data virtualization solutions
Knowledgeable about data analysis/visualization tools such as Tableau
Knowledge and understanding of data governance challenges and best practices for website analytics tagging, metadata, data quality, and data stewardship
Know about data profiling or defining data quality rules - especially digital data collected digitally using Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics, Google Ads, etc.
Experience writing/editing internal communications or training-related materials in a corporate environment
Skilled in interpreting business measurement/reporting needs; Coordinate multiple stakeholder requests and project activities at any one time to ensure accurate, timely, and efficient reporting and analysis deliverables
Business analyst - able to synthesize data and draw insights; Able to present insights directly to business stakeholders
Understanding of digital data - like website analytics data and media analytics data

Preferred:

Experience working with multiple data sources - web data, SAP/HANA, CRM, etc.
Has experience combining different data sources into one report - either directly or leveraging a data team

Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.

Know someone perfect for this role? Recommend your friends and make money when they're hired using our app, KFORCEconnect. The more you refer, the more you earn! Download the app today to Connect. Refer. Get Paid.

Kforce is a solutions firm that builds and manages expert teams in technology and finance & accounting. We deliver on our client's objectives by combining a global knowledge force with flexible delivery and an unmatched drive for excellence. Kforce not only serves as a trusted partner to our customers, providing next level insights and powerful results, but also offers many consultants comprehensive benefits including medical, dental, 401(K), life insurance and disability.",4.1,"Kforce
4.1","Grand Rapids, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
23,Data Standard Analyst - Biostatistics Team,"$34k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview :

Medpace is a full-service clinical contract research organization (CRO). We provide Phase I-IV clinical development services to the biotechnology, pharmaceutical and medical device industries. Our mission is to accelerate the global development of safe and effective medical therapeutics through its scientific and disciplined approach. We leverage local regulatory and therapeutic expertise across all major areas including oncology, cardiology, metabolic disease, endocrinology, central nervous system, anti-viral and anti-infective. Headquartered in Cincinnati, Ohio, employing approximately 3,500 people across almost 40 countries.

Job Summary:

Our corporate activities are growing rapidly, and we are currently seeking a full-time, office-based Data Standard Analyst to join our Biostatistics team. This position will work on a team to accomplish tasks and projects that are instrumental to the company’s success. If you want an exciting career where you use your previous expertise and can develop and grow your career even further, then this is the opportunity for you.

Responsibilities :
Create annotated CRFs per CDISC SDTM standard and mapping specifications for study level data collection source data to CDISC SDTM;
Implement data standard and create SDTM data;
Perform validation of CDISC SDTM data in accordance with SOPs and guidance documents; and
Ensure SDTM data conforms to the data standards expected by regulatory agencies.
Qualifications :
Bachelor's Degree in Math, Statistics, Life Sciences, or equivalent; and
SAS knowledge preferred.

TRAVEL: None

Why Medpace?:

When you join Medpace, you become part of a team dedicated to supporting the development of ground-breaking drugs and devices. Our employees provide hope for those living with debilitating diseases. We invite you to be a part of something that is impacting millions of people around the globe while enjoying a competitive total compensation and benefits package and internal growth opportunities.

Awards:

Medpace historically named a Top Cincinnati Workplace by the Cincinnati Enquirer
Medpace ranks amongst top CROs for site ratings across all 10 important attributes including CRA training, preparation & organization, accessibility of staff, open communication, and ensuring timely drug availability
Continually recognized with CRO Leadership Awards from Life Science Leader magazine based on expertise, quality, capabilities, reliability, and compatibility

What to Expect Next:

A member of our recruitment team will review your qualifications and, if interested, you will be contacted for an interview.

EO/AA Employer M/F/Disability/Vets
WARNING: Please beware of phishing scams that offer opportunities with Medpace in exchange for sending money. These scammers pose as legitimate employees from actual companies. Please be advised that a Medpace employee will never ask you for a credit card, send you a check, or ask you for any type of payment as part of consideration for a role with our company. All of our careers require that you first complete an online application and go through some sort of interview process.",2.6,"Medpace, Inc.
2.6","Cincinnati, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
24,Transportation Data Analyst III,"$55k-$94k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About the Opportunity
The Transportation Data Analyst III is responsible to develop and maintain data analytics to measure and drive outstanding service and financial performance of the transportation and customs compliance network, across the United States, Mexico and Canada. Ability to work in a fast pace environment; partnering with management and team members to develop dynamic analytics within transportation and customs compliance that will guide continuous business improvement decisions to optimize service and financial performance.
Responsibilities
Engage with leadership and team members within transportation, customs compliance, and cross functionally, to create data analytics around key performance and financial metrics to identify data driven business decisions.
Create, develop and manage analytics using Excel, SQL and Tableau.
Analyze, model, mine, and interpret data generate new ideas through a deep understanding of the data, supply chain, customers and business.
Manage large databases that include data from various sources.
Translate data into actionable insights.
Manage report data quality, stability, scalability and trustworthiness over time.
Conduct exploratory analysis for improvement opportunities in business areas not actively monitored by stakeholders.
Present business insights, data, and KPI’s to team members and leadership.
Oversee the process to pay carriers weekly, and perform month end reporting.
Develop and implement SOP’s to effectively manage data and reporting.
Candidate Profile


Bachelor’s degree in Supply Chain/ Logistics / Business Analytics with 3+yrs years’ experience in supply chain, logistics and/or transportation / customs compliance.
Excellent oral and written communications skills with the ability to communicate professionally and effectively at multiple levels both inside and outside of the organization.
Highly proficient with Tableau, SQL, and Microsoft Office applications, including Excel, Word, Power Point and Outlook.
Strong track record of performing high impact business analysis and building useful data tools with tangible business results.
Strong storytelling – interpreting insights into a concise and compelling story others can embrace.
Possess a thorough understanding of transportation finance, operations, internal systems and network functions.
Complete tasks and projects in an accurate, timely, and efficient manner.
Ability to thrive in a fast paced, and collaborative environment with a diverse group of individuals.
Bilingual – English/Spanish preferred.
Perform other duties as assigned by Driscoll’s management.
Driscoll's",4.3,"Driscoll's
4.3","Watsonville, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1900,Company - Private,Food Production,Agriculture & Forestry,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
25,Consumer Lending Data Analyst,"$44k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are searching for a Consumer Lending Data Analyst to research and analyze data in order to make strategic business recommendations. In this role, you will perform competitor research to enhance our product strategy and direction. Having 3 years' experience in a complex analyst role will help you succeed in this role. Additionally, having an understating of lending principals and risk metrics will help the candidate be successful.
Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job Duties:
In partnership with key stakeholders, analyze, test and launch new initiatives to increase productivity
Provide data driven insights and recommendations to various departments within the credit union
Perform key competitor research and analysis to better inform product strategy and direction
Creating advanced reports, dashboards and deep dive analyses that inform and drive the
credit union’s product and business strategy
Create and refine predictive models on product, marketing, and risk initiatives
Uncover actionable insights for increased product performance
Partnering with marketing, finance and digital teams to enable business and systems synergy
Essential Skills:
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience in a complex analyst role; financial institution strongly preferred
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience with data collection methodologies
Experience with relational databases, e.g., SQL, Alteryx, and Tableau will help you succeed in this role
Familiarity with coding languages, e.g., R, Python
Strong understanding of statistical overlays and models for predictive analytics
Ability to analyze data from a strategic point of view and contribute to and influence discussions that drive the business
Ability to use key performance metrics and data to provide insights and make strategic business recommendations
Proficiency to organize, analyze and interpret data to explain complex irregularities or trends
Form strong relationships with cross-functional teams where support, resources and synergy is needed
Basic understanding of lending principals and risk metrics
Project Management experience; familiarity with Six Sigma/DMAIC methodologies
Expert knowledge of Excel
Education: Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, other related fields of study or equivalent experience
Location: Hillsboro, OR 97124

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position

FT123

#LI-EK",3.3,"First Tech Federal Credit Union
3.3","Hillsboro, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
26,Master Data Analyst,"$42k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Summary:

Under general supervision, the Master Data Analyst will have the primary responsibility for ensuring that master data is maintained by entering, updating, and maintaining master data, as well as having a full understanding of the impact of this data across the value chain. This position is focused on ensuring data integrity, as well as data entry.

Essential Functions & Key Responsibilities:

Responsible for ensuring that master data is properly defined and setup in our IFS enterprise system. Working closely with the Master Data Manager, the Master Data Analyst is also responsible for data collection, entry and loading of local Master Data into IFS, including Bill of Materials, Customer and Material records, etc.
Understand the data elements and how they flow through the supply chain.
Receive and process requests from the user community for changes to, or creation of master data records, and manage the requests through a formal process of validation and approval.
Coordinate with the user community to ensure correctness and completeness of data contained in requests.
Pro-actively monitor and analyze all master data files for continuous improvements on the cleanliness of data.
Responsible for prompt implementation of all Master Data procedures to ensure that all information systems and services meet the company standards and end-user requirements.
Assist with testing configuration changes to master data elements.
Troubleshoot and resolve master data issues.

Candidate Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Business, Supply Chain, Logistics or 2-4 years' equivalent work experience.
Solid experience in Microsoft Office products, specifically Excel, (ability to perform Vlookups and formatting. Pivot-Tables a plus!)
Team player with strong verbal and written communication skills.
Experience in SAP strongly preferred, IFS a big plus!
Effective time manager - routinely called on to prioritize a large number of tasks and report on assignment status.
Excellent analytical, interpersonal and organizational skills. Written and verbal communication skills are critical.
Detailed oriented / Ability to maintain high data integrity during data transfer process.
Ability to manage multiple priorities simultaneously in an extremely fast-paced environment.
Ability to quickly and effectively prioritize a large volume of tasks to ensure timelines are met, and all information is available to the user community quickly and effectively.
Successful candidates must have a passion for on-time customer service, proactive problem-solving, superior attention to detail.

Please no recruiting agencies

Following GMP in compliance with all food safety requirements.

Novolex does not publicly post salary information on job boards.

Novolex™ is committed to providing equal employment opportunity in all employment practices, including but not limited to, selection, hiring, promotion, transfer, and compensation to all qualified applicants and employees without regard to age, race, color, national origin, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, handicap or disability, genetics, citizenship status, service member or veteran status, or any other category protected by federal, state, or local law. Any individual, who because of his or her disability, needs an accommodation in connection with an aspect of the Company’s application process should contact Jamie Wells at hrcompliance@novolex.com.

#LI-JF1 #MON1",3.0,"Novolex Holdings, LLC
3.0","Covington, KY",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Private,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
27,Data Insights Analyst,"$36k-$65k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Data Insights Analyst will analyze large data sets, identify trends, and build visuals that tell the Life.Church story hidden within the data.

Did you ever think God could use your talent at a church? We might not see how that’s possible, but God doesn’t work within our parameters. He creates opportunities we never could have imagined, but it’s up to us to embrace His plan. Your God-given skills and passion to serve Him could intersect right here, right now. When you bring your skills to Life.Church, there’s no telling where God could take your future.

The Life.Church Analytics team is passionate about giving data a seat at the table and providing the organization with the information it needs in clear and concise visuals to help make better decisions and drive the mission forward. We’re looking for a Data Insights Analyst who loves pulling useful nuggets of information out of a sea of data. Do you have a knack for numbers and love problem solving? Do you see patterns and connections everywhere you look? If so, continue reading for more details.
The basics:
SQL is your second language
Even though you appreciate a good spreadsheet, you know most people would rather look at a picture, so you are able to turn large data sets into easy-to-read visuals using data visualization software
You have exceptional analytical skills and your curiosity leads you to ask “Why?”
You understand statistics and data analysis techniques
You know how to get non-analytical people fired up about a p-value
The works:
You have a drive to deliver and an openness to new ideas and approaches
You’re flexible and adaptable with strong relationship-building skills
You’re a prioritization wizard who can complete multiple tasks with little to no supervision
You get energized by solving problems that have others stumped
You’re able to work independently while maintaining focus on achieving optimal outcomes as part of a collaborative team effort
The cherry on top:
Your resume is a visualization that tells your story
You are Tableau Certified
In your mind, R is more than just a letter and Python is not just a snake
To view the expectations and responsibilities of this role, please view the job description HERE.",5.0,"Life.Church
5.0","Edmond, OK",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Religious Organizations,Non-Profit,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
28,Data Verification Analyst,"$38k-$90k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are looking for a Data Verification Analyst to join us. This individual will work as part of the Data team to call, research, and verify First Orion data. This is a full time position.

What you'll be doing:
Research and verify data through phone-based contact and web-based searches, as well as First Orion internal tools
Work to ensure data quality across all internal and customer facing systems
What you'll need:
High School diploma
Microsoft Office proficient: Excel, Word, Outlook
Detail-oriented with excellent communication and problem-solving skills
Ability to work independently or in a group environment
Strong customer service and effective interpersonal skills, including ability to speak on the phone for many hours of the day in a professional and courteous manner
Bonus Points:
Fluent in Spanish is a plus
Previous research experience in an academic or work-related project
Company Benefits:

Our work environment is energetic, focused, fun, and collaborative. We’ve created a special culture where trust and transparency are the key and employees are empowered to make their own decisions. Our people are passionate about what we do and have an indomitable spirit to get things done. Everyone is a part of the big picture here.

First Orion has been voted a Great Place to Work with top rankings in every category! Learn more about what our employees have to say on our First Orion Glassdoor page!

At this time, we are not able to sponsor visas, such as H-1B, for this particular position, Data Verification Analyst. First Orion is interested in every qualified candidate who is eligible to work in the United States. First Orion’s immigration sponsorship policy is applied in a nondiscriminatory fashion regardless of race, gender, ethnic origin, or any other classification protected by law. First Orion is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.8,"First Orion
4.8","North Little Rock, AR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
29,Sales Ops Data Analyst,"$54k-$94k
(Glassdoor Est.)","TriNet is a leading provider of comprehensive human resources solutions for small to midsize businesses (SMBs). We enhance business productivity by enabling our clients to outsource their HR function to one strategic partner and allowing them to focus on operating and growing their core businesses. Our full-service HR solutions include features such as payroll processing, human capital consulting, employment law compliance and employee benefits, including health insurance, retirement plans and workers’ compensation insurance.

TriNet has a nationwide presence and an experienced executive team. Our stock is publicly traded on the NYSE under the ticker symbol TNET. If you’re passionate about innovation and making an impact on the large SMB market, come join us as we power our clients’ business success with extraordinary HR.

JOB SUMMARY/OVERVIEW

The Sales Ops Data Analyst is responsible and accountable for sales data enrichment, data analysis and related recommendations to influence business decisions, reporting and managing the dedupe data application. This role is responsible for ensuring data integrity of Salesforce and managing ongoing data needs, such as data entry, uploads, cleanup, evaluation, validation. In addition, this role is responsible for providing recommendations for continuous process improvement and leading implementation/adoption of new practices, as applicable.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES

• Identify data process inefficiencies, develop and implement solutions and track progress continuously to improve data quality
• Provide reporting coupled with suggested actions to leaders whose teams provide master data inputs, to reduce data quality issues, non-value record maintenance, and process deviation.
• Understand end to end business processes, flow of data within and between processes and recommend process improvements for better territory planning and forecasting process.
• Develops technical and functional specifications based on business requirements and
analysis of relevant workflows.
• Identify and manage data cleanup projects to improve data accuracy, lead relevant resources to desired project outcome
• Oversee ongoing data hygiene efforts and appends of prospect records
• Identifies issues in data quality that would impact reporting (i.e. duplicate records, missing data, etc.) and influence business decisions
• Develop and implement a periodic review, inclusive of robust reporting, of all master data to ensure data is current and accurate across business functions, conforms to business rules, and meets data quality standards
• Responsible for investigating industry information for accurate sales territory assignment. Provides recommendations to leadership to optimize territory assignment and related business results
• Provides expertise and resolution to questions from the Sales Teams related to data management and rules of engagement
• Build data quality executive dashboards and reports to track and monitor data accuracy for use by executive leadership with CRM
• Provides a pivotal role in the research for data mining, analytic and data quality assurance tools
• Responsible for resolving escalations that require in-depth research and judgement
• Perform data analysis in Salesforce using CRMFusion Demand Tool and other data deduplication applications in production and sandbox environment
• Partners with sales strategy and leadership to define the company’s Go-To-Market (GTM) strategy and provides downstream impact analysis and recommendations to existing operations
• Work with cross-functional team to clarify business process and data needs on process-related IT projects, as well as supporting and executing end-to-end UAT
• Respond to ad hoc data analysis requests and provide technical assistance
• Complies with all data best practices, rules of engagement and data protocols
• Other projects and responsibilities may be added at the manager’s discretion

JOB REQUIREMENTS AND QUALIFICATIONS

Education:
• Bachelor’s degree required
• 3+ years of Salesforce experience
• Previous experience working with PRM applications
• Previous experience with Analytical tools including MS Excel and Tableau
• Data cleanup skills required

Experience:
• 3+ years of experience in sales operations or sales support role
• Experience with deduping application tools
• Ability to work well with a variety of disciplines while remaining effective in a high-volume, tight-deadline driven environment with seasonally affected workloads
• Flexibility and adaptability to changing business needs
• Strong analytical skills and ability to generate sound business recommendations based on data
• Proficient in MS Office Suite
• Collaborative team player and project leader who is detailed oriented, focused on solution quality and execution
Other Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills
• Ability to communicate with employees at all levels of the organization
• Strong knowledge and understanding of both state and federal employment laws
• Excellent interpersonal skills
• Excellent presentation and facilitation skills
• Strong influential skills
• Excellent project leadership abilities
• A demonstrated commitment to high professional ethical standards and a diverse workplace
• Ability to adapt to a fast paced continually changing business and work environment while managing multiple priorities

WORK ENVIRONMENT/OTHER INFORMATION (Travel required, physical requirements, on-call schedules, etc.)
• Minimal travel required
• Work in clean, pleasant, and comfortable office setting
• The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Please Note: TriNet reserves the right to change or modify job duties and assignments at any time. The above job description is not all encompassing. Position functions and qualifications may vary depending on business necessity.

TriNet is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate against applicants based on race, religion, color, disability, medical condition, legally protected genetic information, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions), age, veteran status or other legally protected characteristics. Any applicant with a mental or physical disability who requires an accommodation during the application process should contact recruiting@trinet.com to request such an accommodation.

LI-RG1",3.3,"TriNet
3.3","Fort Mill, SC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
30,Tactical Data Link Analyst,-1,"Job Responsibilities

Provide Tactical Data Link (TDL) expertise, as well as logistical and training support to weapon system testing and integration as follows:

Certify international partner defense systems as interoperable with US defense systems
Perform test planning for interoperability testing including standards conformance testing
Collect test data from defense systems using government-furnished network and test tools
Analyze TDL data using government-furnished network and test tools
Prepare briefings/reports on TDL test findings to government customer
Provide implementation and improvement recommendations
Investigate and solve Tactical Communication system performance issues
Design, develop, and deliver leading edge TDL functionality for intelligence dissemination to theater operational forces for tactical execution
Support the performance, verification, and sustainment of fielded TDL systems and components

QUALIFICATIONS:

Required Education & Experience

Bachelor's degree in a technical field with ten (10) years relevant experience, or have a master's degree in a technical field with eight (8) years relevant experience, or an equivalent combination of education and experience.
Experience with building and analyzing Data Link (e.g. Link11, Link16, JREAP,TDL, etc.) architectures
Experience with MIL-STD-1553B interfaces as well as familiarity with common Tactical Datalink radios/terminals, to include MIDS, LVT, MIDS JTRS, BU1 and BU2.
Experience with common TDL equipment to include JRE Gateway and Air Defense System Integrator (ADSI)
Experience presenting design and project information at periodic reviews as well as recommending improvements to existing designs

Required Knowledge & Skills

Working knowledge of Mil-Standards 6018, 6016, 3011, and 6020
Able to read, interpret, create, and maintain spreadsheets, charts, reports, investigation and test plans, and procedures
Ability to communicate clearly (written and verbal) to technical and non-technical personnel
Ability to work both independently and within a team environment
Proficiency in Microsoft Office products (Word, Excel, et al) is required

Desired Qualifications

Experience as a military JICO

Other Requirements

Active DoD Confidential/Secret clearance
Up to 25% travel required",4.3,"Delta Research Inc
4.3","Huntsville, AL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
31,Data Analyst,-1,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking a Senior Data Analyst for Role in Washington, DC

My name is Stephen Hrutka and I am the owner of a Veteran Owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the VA, SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

One of my Veteran-owned clients is looking for a Senior Data Analyst to support a Federal Client in Washington, DC. The ideal candidate has Veterans Affairs experience and experience within the financial management office.

If this role is not a fit for you but you may know someone, I am glad to offer a referral bonus for any successful placements.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
HRUCKUS LLC

Executive Summary: HRUCKUS is seeking a Senior Data Analyst with 8 years of experience to support a Federal Client in Washington, DC.

Overall Job Description: This position will provide support services to a Federal Client in their initiative to provide fraud prevention services for the Veterans Benefits Administration in addressing its improper payment and fraud prevention/investigation needs.

Position Responsibilities:
Performs tasks which may include obtaining data through advanced computerized models
Extrapolating data patterns through advanced algorithms
Developing simple graphs and charts to explain how the mathematical information will influence the specific project or business
Presenting to managers how to best alter their business models to generate profitable future trends
Education Requirement: BA/BS degree",5.0,"HRUCKUS
5.0","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
32,SAP DATA ANALYST - DIRECT HIRE - UP TO $130K,"$44k-$84k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Immediate need for an SAP Business Analyst:

? Experience collecting and cleaning master data from legacy non SAP sources
? Experience with unit of measure conversions
? Manufacturing or food manufacturing data experience
? SAP Business One experience
? Migration template experience

Flexible hours. Excellent benefits and compensation package.
Please send resume for immediate consideration.
AppleOne is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Pursuant to applicable state and municipal Fair Chance Laws and Ordinances, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

0-1 years",3.4,"AppleOne
3.4","Anaheim, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1964,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
33,Data Analyst,"$49k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

A Data Analyst designs, executes and interprets past and real time data to identify trends, reconcile inconsistencies, and make recommendations to improved IT Service Delivery This includes active analysis of the traditional ITSM Event, Incident, Request, Problem, Knowledge, Change, Configuration and Release processes.

What You’ll Get to Do:
Monitors and queries the IT Service Delivery platform to analyze demand, usage, and performance
Uses data analytics to provide actionable, timely and accurate reporting to improve service delivery, infrastructure management, and conduct proactive problem and incident management.
Works with the ITSM Process Leads and Customer Engagement teams to identify and monitor process performance and service provider performance
Analyze, define, and report on trends identified in the data
Facilitate Technical Exchange Meeting related to data structure, quality assurance, and reporting
Leverage the various reporting and presentation tools to provide analysis and recommendations
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement data collection solutions, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality of information
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement and Continual Service Improvement (CSI) opportunities

You’ll Bring These Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI with Poly required
A bachelor's degree OR equivalent experience/4+ years of IT experience AND 1+ year of data analyst, performance management, and service delivery reporting
ITIL Foundations certification
A good understanding of IT Service Management delivery
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining, and segmentation techniques
Knowledge of statistics and experience with statistical tools to analyze data sets (Excel, SPSS, or SAS)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy

These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
Experience with the ServiceNow toolset
Experience with Tableau
Degree in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
ITIL Intermediate Certifications

What We Can Offer You:
We’ve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nation’s highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACI’s unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.

allspark
BITS3
Job Location
US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI
3.8","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
34,"Intern - Agile Transformation Analyst, Data & Analytics",-1,"Agile Transformation Analyst, Data & Analytics Intern
2021 Paid Summer Internship

As an intern for the data portfolio strategy group, you will be a servant leader and coach to help agile teams deliver value to their customers and adopt Agile principles. You will help agile teams communicate with stakeholders, manage risk, drive process improvements, and facilitate agile events and processes. You will also need to embrace the concepts of technology business management and support departmental operational activities including budget management, risk management, and compliance tracking.
What you would be involved in:

Evangelize Lean process excellence principles and kaizen within Enterprise Data and Analytics to define, measure, analyze and improve organizational effectiveness in delivering value.
Assist/Facilitate Program Increment Planning readiness (using Backlogs, and Pre- and Post-PI Planning meetings) and the quarterly PI planning event
Assist tracking the execution of features and capabilities by establishing PI measurement and metrics
Attend periodic synchronization meetings, facilitate feature and capability estimation with agile product teams and assist in rolling-up work items to Epics
Coach leaders, teams, and Scrum Masters in Lean-Agile practices and mindsets
Help manage risks and dependencies, escalating, tracking, and assisting in the resolution of impediments
Work with the Data Portfolio Strategy group on program execution and operational excellence
Qualifications
Working toward a Bachelor’s degree in Business
Administration, Computer Science, MIS or related degree

Knowledge or interest in
the following:
Scrum Master and understanding of common Agile practices,
service-oriented environments, and iterative development practices
IT full development life cycle
Scrum and Kanban Methodologies
Agile product and portfolio management
Scaled Agile Framework
Ability to establish credibility with clients, build
consensus, and achieve goals through influence
Ability to help teams write user stories/epics, identify
dependencies, and design optimal solutions
Flexibility to work with teams, individuals and executives
and willingness to help with a wide variety of work products and people
Excellent interpersonal/communication skills",3.3,"Zions Bancorporation
3.3","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
35,Data Warehouse Analyst III,"$85k-$142k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Posted: 9/14/2020

Job Status: Full Time

Job Reference #: f919583b-e6c4-4b15-9cd8-6fffba6ba4e5
Job Description
Rethink what’s possible with SwitchThink! SwitchThink Solutions is an IT Services CUSO from Desert Financial.
As a collaborative partner for innovation, SwitchThink Solutions offers technology solutions that help credit unions achieve their transformational goals. Our knowledgeable development, infrastructure, and IT operations experts work hand-in-hand with our clients to maximize the benefits of their technology and speed their results.

Who you are:
A hardworking analyst with a flair for consulting with and supporting client with their enterprise reporting, data integration, and data analytic needs, including the development of dashboards. You are motivated by the opportunity to work closely with clients to analyze and interpret data in support of identifying market and business trends, conduct root cause analyses of business problems and provide strategic suggestions for improvement. You are a proactive thinker that is focused on identifying services and solutions that can enhance the offering we present to clients.

A typical week might include the following:
Consulting with clients to understand their unique business problems, then with the utilization data recommending solutions that will ultimately assist in solving the business problem by defining data/reporting requirements and goals.

Designing and developing solutions that enable clients to make decisions based on data utilizing dashboards and self-service analytical reports

Providing support with troubleshooting and resolving reporting, data warehouse and ETL related issues

Assisting in establishing best-practices and development of content that improve the efficiency and adoption of the data platform in ways that support strategic initiatives and drive business results.

Planning for future state of the environment to increase functionality, improve efficiencies, support refresh cycles, and/or reduce operational costs

Performing other job-related duties as assigned.

This role might be right for you if you have:
A Bachelor's Degree in computer science, math or related field

8 years experience in business intelligence role

Strong understanding of relational database structures, theories, principals, and practices

Experience working with Talend or similar ETL tools

Visa Sponsorship:
We are interested in every qualified candidate who is eligible to work in the United States. However, we are not able to sponsor visas, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas.

Bonus Points:
5 years of experience in a quantitative/analysis/reporting role within the Financial Services industry

5 years building dashboards and reports in Power BI or similar platform

Experience working in a DB2 environment

Experience working with Python or another scripting language

About Us
We are considered leaders in the local credit union space, and we are growing like crazy. We’ve got a culture focused on smarts, kindness, continuous learning...and our people love it. A full 93% of our employees would recommend us to their friends. Come find out why! Learn more at jobs.desertfinancial.com.

We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

#IND456",3.2,"Desert Financial Credit Union
3.2","Phoenix, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1939,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
36,Data & Reporting Analyst - HR,-1,"Sr Analyst - Data & Reporting*
At a Glance*
A Sr Analyst - Data & Reporting who has experience in both data collection and analysis, and managing large to small scale projects from beginning to end.
You have been involved in Analytics/Projects through data collection, analysis, distribution, making recommendations to the business as it relates to business operations, and implementing process improvements.
You have experience utilizing Excel to answer questions for the business, perform audits on different data sets, and identify anomalies found within the data.
You excel at building relationships within a large matrixed organization and enjoy working with all levels of business partners. Your strong interpersonal soft skills allow you to be an effective member of any team.
Who are you?*
The Sr Analyst - Data and Reporting will be able to think critically and make suggestions for process improvements, presenting and tracking data, etc. for the HR function within Field Operations.
Demonstrate a consultative and client-oriented approach to HR data analysis and interpretation to be able to tell a story.
Strong PowerPoint building and presentations skills to be able to define story context and deliver business recommendations.
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
The Sr Analyst will identify trends and occurrences in data and translate findings into various mediums including text, charts, graphs, displays and tables.
Produce ad hoc reports to answer business questions quickly and thoroughly.
Define, document, implement and track process flows for processes, procedures, and policies for the department.
Interact with internal teams to ensure systems/tools are in accordance with business processes and rules; adjust systems/documentation accordingly.
Perform a cross-functional role to facilitate business process changes with stakeholders in other departments; work with stakeholders to support the integration of new processes, into existing operations.
The Sr Analyst - Data and Reporting will audit and recommend updates to existing methods, procedures and process documentation on an as needed basis for the HR team.
Participate in process requirements, planning and validation through operational testing to ensure plan changes meet business sponsor needs.
Support testing and roll out of all projects/process improvements that impact the HR department.
Understand policies, procedures and practices for analysis of business performance and impact.
Customizing communications for various audiences
Perform other duties as requested by management.
What does it take?*
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Ability to read, write, speak and understand English
Maintain working knowledge of all HR areas (i.e., Talent Acquisition, Training, Compensation)
Knowledge of database/reporting systems
Excellent written and verbal communication and presentation skills
Strong interpersonal skills
Ability to self-train and pick up new skills quickly
Advanced skills using PC software applications (Access, Excel, PowerPoint)
Ability to create and maintain spreadsheets
Commitment to quality service through appropriate follow through, urgency and persistence
Strong analytical skills and the ability to present information in an understandable format
Ability to effectively consult with department managers and business leaders
Strong attention to detail and ability to problem solve
Ability to prioritize and organize effectively
Education*
Bachelor’s degree in Business or related field or equivalent experience
Related Work Experience*
5+ years of Business Analyst/Data Analyst experience
2+ years of HRIS and Applicant Tracking System experience
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS*
_Related Work Experience_
Working knowledge of HRMS database systems (PeopleSoft and BrassRing)
1+ years of experience with data collection and database design experience
1+ years of experience in managing HR related projects
WORKING CONDITIONS*
Office environment

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
The health and safety of our employees and candidates is very important to us. Spectrum has adopted virtual mobile recruiting tools that allow us to continue meeting new candidates. We look forward to “virtually” meeting you.

Company's website:
https://jobs.spectrum.com/job/stamford/sr-analyst-data-and-reporting/4673/17178201
Work Remotely:
No",3.0,"Spectrum Communications
3.0","Stamford, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1979,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
37,Supply Chain Data Analyst,"$42k-$73k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Improving the health of our community in all we do

Northeast Georgia Health System (NGHS) is a non-profit community health system on a mission of improving the health of our community in all we do. Our team cares for more than 1 million people across the region through four hospitals and a variety of outpatient locations. Northeast Georgia Medical Center (NGMC) has campuses in Gainesville, Braselton, Winder and Dahlonega – with a total of more than 700 beds and more than 1,100 medical staff members representing more than 50 specialties. NGHS also encompasses Northeast Georgia Physicians Group, a multi-specialty group with more than 65 locations, and The Heart Center of Northeast Georgia Medical Center, a cardiology practice with more than 15 locations.

NGHS

The Supply Chain Data Analyst supports projects and processes, analyzes data, prepares meaningful analytical reports, through the use of Lawson MMIS, Epic, BlueBin, Qlik and Microsoft Office products. Additionally, this position work closely with the MMIS, Sourcing, Value Analysis and Logistics teams to identify process improvement and cost savings opportunities through financial reporting, benchmarking, and other Supply Chain related reporting tools.

Bachelor’s Degree with a degree in Computer Science or Information Technology with 3 years related experience, or 5 years prior experience in Data Analytics in a healthcare environment.

3 years prior experience in Data Analytics; preferably in Healthcare environment

Since first opening its doors in Gainesville in 1951, Northeast Georgia Medical Center has added hospital campuses in Braselton, Barrow and Dahlonega – and become Georgia’s most awarded hospital. Some recognitions include being named to these lists:

America’s 50 Best Hospitals – Healthgrades

100 Top Hospitals – Truven Health Analytics

100 Hospitals with Great Heart Programs – Beckers Hospital Review

America’s Top Quality Providers – Carechex

Atlanta’s Top 150 Workplaces – Atlanta Journal-Constitution

Healthcare’s Most Wired Hospitals and Health Systems – Hospitals & Health Networks magazine

NGMC has also been recognized in recent years as Georgia’s #1 Hospital for overall hospital care, overall surgical care, heart care, orthopedic surgery, women’s care and more.",3.5,"Northeast Georgia Health System
3.5","Gainesville, GA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1951,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
38,"Data Analyst, Governance and Quality","$43k-$77k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

Boston Private is a leading provider of fully integrated wealth management, trust and private banking services. For more than 25 years, Boston Private has taken a highly personalized approach to serving the complex financial needs of individuals, families, business owners, private partnerships, nonprofits and community partners. Boston Private is also an active provider of financing for affordable housing, first-time homebuyers, economic development, social services, community revitalization and small businesses.

Headquartered in Boston, Boston Private has offices across the U.S. including Boston, San Francisco, San Jose, Los Angeles and South Florida. Private banking and trust services are provided through Boston Private Bank & Trust Company. Wealth management services are provided through Boston Private Wealth LLC, an SEC registered investment adviser and a wholly owned subsidiary of Boston Private Bank & Trust Company.

Responsibilities:

As a member of the Data, Analytics and Reporting Team (DART) and reporting to the Head of Data Management, the Data Analyst – Governance and Quality will play a critical role to establish Enterprise Data Governance. Under the direction of the Head of Data Governance, this role will administer all aspects of the Data Governance (DG) process as well as serve as lead analyst for issues related to data standards and data policies. The role will also involve a component of change management for the definition, creation, and enforcement of DG processes.

This role will not only play an integral role in helping to stand up DG, but it will also play a role in shaping and evolving it. This is a great opportunity for an experienced and organized Business Analyst with data background to learn and grow along with Boston Private’s DG data function. Key stakeholders include the Data Governance Leadership Team, Data Analysts, BI Report Developers, Data Engineers, Data Stewards, and business data consumers.

Key responsibilities include:

Create and maintain BP’s Enterprise DG tools (e.g. Data Glossary, Master Report Inventory, Standards & Policies)
Collect and maintain a master list of DG required actions and their progress
Proactively gather, document data requirements and analysis including data integrity and data consistency related to DG standards
Establish DG monitoring processes and related reporting to track the organizations progress.
Work closely with DART Data and Reporting Analysts to inform data transformations, reporting and analysis.
Coordinate and prepare for Data Leadership Group, Data Steward Working Group, and Data Quality Working Group
Serve as curator for DG assets to help DART members and business stakeholders gain ready access to reference materials and tools.
Work closely with the Data Architecture team to enhance existing tools and data architecture to ensure a best in class control framework.
Leverage DART processes and tools to communicate, develop, and maintain DG assests such as documentation and analysis including Jira and steps required as part of DART’s development and launch control processes.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, information technology, or a similar subject required.
Master’s degree in Technology preferred, or equivalent work experience using software tools for data interrogation is a plus.
Demonstrated attention to detail and teamwork.
Exceptional written and verbal Communication skills.
Financial Services industry experience desired.

Skills & Experience

3+ years’ hands-on experience as a Business Analyst or equivalent required.
Experience producing and/or maintaining business and/or data requirements required.
Experience with SQL and demonstrated understanding of relational databases required.
Experience working on or directly supporting a data management team is desired.
Prior experience serving as part of a Data Governance organization or supporting one is a plus.",3.6,"Boston Private Bank & Trust Company
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1987,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
39,Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst,"$62k-$111k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst

Join a member-driven leader in a fast-paced, challenging and collaborative environment with the shared mission of supporting America’s network of rural electric cooperatives. Since its formation in 1969, National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation, or CFC, located in Dulles, Virginia, has provided capital and industry-leading financial products to more than 900 not-for-profit, consumer-controlled utility systems across the United States. Our exceptional team delivers the “CFC Difference” that encompasses our values of service, integrity and excellence in all our interactions.

CFC has a need for a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst in the BID - Industry Research & Analysis group. In this position you will maintain a high-degree of industry expertise and awareness of current developments in markets, regulations and technologies by conducting research and data analysis on emerging industry trends in the energy and utility sectors. This role contributes to CFC’s thought leadership through expertise and knowledge that is used to support management decision-making and identify areas where CFC can provide value to its utility member-owners with innovative financing products and services and business support tools.

As a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst, you will:

• Monitor and conduct analysis of evolving industry, regulatory and technology short and long term trends and developments and their impacts on the electric utility industry and electric cooperatives.
• Utilize data mining and various data analytics techniques including visualization, statistical modeling, regression and probabilistic analyses (e.g. Monte Carlo simulations) to create models that inform risk and opportunity based decision-making.
• Develop economic and financial analytical models and tools capable of forecasting financial performance for use in budgeting, scenario planning and strategic planning.
• Serve as a leader and resource for industry data, market intelligence and modeling expertise to internal and external stakeholders through industry meetings, conferences, membership meetings and other venues.
• Conduct financial and economic analysis of utility investment scenarios through pro forma analysis.
• Work collaboratively across all functions while building strong relationships and credibility through joint research and analysis.

To be successful, you will need:

• Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Finance, Engineering or other related field.
• Master’s degree in one of the above preferred.
• 8 years of experience in any combination of the following electric utility industry, consulting, finance, or economic forecast modeling and data analytics.
• Strong data mining, data analysis and modeling skills.
• Advanced knowledge of various database and analysis tools (e.g. Visual Basic, SQL, Qlikview, Monte Carlo, artificial intelligence techniques and statistical programming languages) and ability to build forecast models.
• Proficiency in regression analysis techniques and in extracting value from big data sets by leveraging business intelligence tools (e.g. Power BI, Tableau).
• Proven ability to work collaboratively and effectively in a matrixed and team environment and across the organization at all levels.
• Strong and effective verbal, written and presentation communication skills.
• Ability to work effectively in a consultative role.
• Highly organized, with ability to prioritize and manage multiple assignments in a dynamic work environment while maintaining high quality and error free work with minimal supervision.

We offer a comprehensive benefits package that includes short-term and long-term incentive opportunities; an employer-paid pension plan; 401(k); medical, dental and vision insurance; a generous leave policy; onsite gym; and more—all in a friendly, professional work environment. For additional information, please visit our website at www.nrucfc.coop.

CFC is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity.",3.4,"National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation
3.4","Dulles, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
40,Market Data Analyst,"$31k-$57k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are seeking a creative, data driven Marketing Analyst to join our fast paced, growing organization. Candidate is responsible for researching product and manufacturing trends, evaluating campaign results and making recommendations for growth and operating efficiency improvements to our management team. The ideal candidate will have experience with complex data mining/analysis and implementation. This is a growth position with upward mobility. Complete benefit package includes medical, dental, vision life insurance, student loan repayment assistance and a 401(k) company matched contribution.

Responsibilities:
Evaluate market trends and patterns to suggest new & complementary products
Manage Distribution Price List and analyze market data to identify cause and effect relationships
Evaluate product, pricing, placement (distribution channels) and promotion (advertisements/marketing campaigns) and present recommendations to management
Work closely with Distribution Channel Partners to grow market share in under-represented markets
Examine return on investment of marketing campaigns
Travel to customers and industry events to gather market intelligence
Visit other Amphenol Business Units domestically and internationally to learn best-practices and facilitate implementation internally
Work closely with Sales and Marketing to track competitive landscape and market trends
Requirements:
Undergraduate or Masters degree in Marketing, Business, Engineering or related field
Demonstrated aptitude for analytics
Proven record of leadership in a work setting and/or through extracurricular activities
Exceptional analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment
Ability to work effectively with people at all levels in an organization
Preferred:
1-3 years of experience in a fast-paced global manufacturing environment
“An Equal Opportunity Employer” Minority/Female/Disabled/Vet/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity or National Origin"" Drug free workplance.

ITAR - The candidate must be able to legally work in the United States; we are unable to provide sponsorship. Position requires candidate to be a US Person as defined in ITAR, 22 CFR 120.15 (US Citizenship or Resident Alien Status) and defined by 8 USC 1101(a) (20).

Apply for This Position",3.5,"SV Microwave
3.5","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1991,Company - Public,Telecommunications Manufacturing,Telecommunications,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
41,Investment Operations Data Analyst - Shift 11:00 - 7:00,"$39k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As part of the Market Data Services group, this individual will be responsible for the validation of information from third party sources and internal Putnam sources. The information will be specific to both fixed income and equity data required to support portfolio management, trading, research, client reporting and the portfolio construction process. The data analyst will be required to work in Putnam’s Boston office and will have daily interaction with the aforementioned teams.

The data analyst will be focused on security reference and analytical data for the universe of fixed income and equity securities held by Putnam and our respective benchmarks.

The data analyst will interface with external and internal data providers and will also have extensive contact with the investment teams in determining and resolving data requirements. The data analyst will also work closely with the systems groups in identifying and resolving issues.

The data analyst will update and maintain data in various databases used by the investment teams and will coordinate resolutions of any problems in a timely manner.

This individual will be responsible for knowing what data the vendors provide as well as understanding how the data is used at Putnam.

This individual is also responsible for doing analysis and testing when reviewing enhancements that may change any methodology or structures within our systems.

Primary responsibilities:

Perform timely and accurate review of data according to our set standards and procedures.
Maintain a high level of customer service by ensuring that all fixed income and equity data issues are resolved, and action is taken to communicate effectively with our internal clients.
Identify best practices and define procedures for market data validations & controls; streamline and document new processes and guidelines as needed.
Proactively identify redundant and/or underutilized procedures and/or data validation methods
Partner with peer team members of the Security Reference Data team to provide ad-hoc data analysis, and/or guidance on fixed income data conventions
Collaborate with Putnam’s technology group on special projects & database enhancements as needed.

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree and 1 year of related experience (fund accounting, corporate actions etc.)
Strong orientation to and knowledge of investment management information needs
Strong attention to detail – ability to detect errors & take corrective action
Aptitude for data mining technologies – Excel, Access, SQL, ODBC
Knowledge of equity market data required
Understanding of business concepts, basic accounting principles, accrual methodologies desirable
Exemplary communication, interpersonal, and presentation skills
Demonstrated ability to work independently and collaboratively with all levels of staff and management
Superior skill and ability in multi-tasking and appropriate prioritization
Ability to effectively respond to dynamically changing work environment and to positively influence business outcomes

At Putnam, we are committed to a diverse workforce and take positive steps to ensure equal opportunity in our recruitment process. We ensure that individuals with different abilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job applicant process. We strive to hire, develop and retain the most hardworking individuals by valuing the varied skills that they bring!",3.5,"Putnam Investments
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1937,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
42,Data Analyst (Must Speak Chinese),-1,"Founded in 2002, S2 HRC carries the important mission of providing a one-stop solution for clients of different needs.

Our head office is located in Markham, Toronto and its subsidiary operations comprise of Immigration service, Banking and Finance, Real Estate, Social Welfare and Career training / Mentor service.
We are looking for energetic professionals who are interested in starting a career in the financial industry, helping the business grow through value-based conversations and remarkable customer experience to join our growing team.

Must Speak Chinese

Data Analyst (Must Speak Chinese)

Responsibility:

3+ years of quantitative industry experience, ideally within the consumer product space or data journalism.
Excellent SQL skills, fluency in Python, and experience with at least one statistical package (R, Pandas/NumPy/SciPy/matplotlib, Stata, Matlab).
Experience writing compelling stories using data that convey technically sound analyses to a broad audience in an accessible way.
An eye for compelling data visualization and extensive experience with related tools (Tableau, Mode, Looker).
Solid understanding of statistical inference and analytic bias. Familiarity with financial modeling and advanced statistics (regression, non parametrics, predictive modeling) a plus.
Strongly desired: understanding of economic data and trends, and ability to examine relationships between our data and macro national/local trends.

Requirement:

Lead broad analytics projects core to our business and public reputation, communicate key insights using a combination of writing and data visualizations to a broad audience.
Manage tight deadlines and quickly iterate analyses to answer unstructured questions, deliver insightful learnings, and write reports for public consumption.
Work cross-functionally with public relations, product, and engineering to define, log, and measure key metrics.
Generate dashboards and automate reports that empower teams across the organization to make data-driven decisions.
Grow and maintain impactful relationships with stakeholders of both technical and non technical backgrounds with clear and
frequent communication.

This is a full-time position offering competitive benefits and compensation commensurate with experience and qualifications.


We would like to thank all applicants for their interest in S2 HRC, only those selected for an interview will be contacted
Please email your recent updated resume to us at info@s2consulting.ca, we will contact you soon.
E-mail: info@s2consulting.ca
Wechat: S2humanResources
Tel: 647-333-8811
Address: Unit 102, 50 Acadia Ave, Markham, ON, L3R 0B3",3.4,"CCUE Finance
3.4",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
43,Data and Reporting Analyst - Wealth and Trust,"$48k-$91k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

Boston Private is a leading provider of fully integrated wealth management, trust and private banking services. For more than 25 years, Boston Private has taken a highly personalized approach to serving the complex financial needs of individuals, families, business owners, private partnerships, nonprofits and community partners. Boston Private is also an active provider of financing for affordable housing, first-time homebuyers, economic development, social services, community revitalization and small businesses.

Headquartered in Boston, Boston Private has offices across the U.S. including Boston, San Francisco, San Jose, Los Angeles and South Florida. Private banking and trust services are provided through Boston Private Bank & Trust Company. Wealth management services are provided through Boston Private Wealth LLC, an SEC registered investment adviser and a wholly owned subsidiary of Boston Private Bank & Trust Company.

Responsibilities:

As a member of the Data, Analytics and Reporting Team (DART) and reporting to the Head of Data Management, the Data and Reporting Analyst – Wealth and Trust will have one main objective: Ensure the Wealth and Trust senior leadership team’s data and reporting needs are being met. Success in this role will be achieved by understanding Wealth & Trust business management data needs and continuously (and iteratively) delivering value through enhanced data and reporting to the business. The person in this role will wear two hats serving as both a Data Analyst and a Reporting Analyst. As a Data Analyst, the role is to proactively collect, understand, rationalize, and document data and reporting requirements. As a Report Analyst, the role is to translate the requirements into valuable decision-making analysis tools and reports. Key stakeholders include other DART members and members from the Wealth and Trust business including report end users and self-service “power users”.

This role will serve as the advocate and voice of Wealth and Trust within DART serving as a conduit for communications and priorities among and between DART, Data Stewards, data consumers and processors.

Key responsibilities include:

Proactively gather, document data requirements and analysis including lineage mapping source to use, data integrity and transformation rules and logic, BI and Reporting requirements.
Work closely with DART data engineers to inform data modeling for the Enterprise Data Warehouse and Wealth and Trust Reporting Mart.
Work closely with DART Report Developers to create BI Dashboards, Reports or other data delivery solutions to business stakeholders.
Translate business requirements and build-out insightful reporting solutions using Tableau and Boston Privates other reporting solutions.
Work closely with the Data Architecture team to enhance existing tools and data architecture supporting data interrogation, analysis and reporting.
Work with business “power users” to determine best data analysis tools and reports to accomplish their analyitical needs.
Work closely with the Head of Data Governance to gather and also enforce Wealth and Trust data standards and policies.
Lead and attend, feedback sessions to improve BI and Reporting.
Maintain a priority list of Wealth and Trust data pain points, issues and needs that reflect their business priorities.
Lead and maintain a Wealth and Trust report inventory (agonstic of reporting interface/system) to ensure consistent use and opptimzation of report creation, access and distribution.
Leverage DART processes and tools to communicate, develop, and maintain project assests such as documentation and analysis including Jira and steps required as part of DART’s development and launch control processes.

Skills and Experience

5+ years’ hands-on experience working on data requirements, data integrity analysis and/or data quality management.
Experience with SQL and demonstrated understanding of relational databases required.
Experience working on or directly supporting a data management team.
Proven experience of working in a business analyst role focusing on data requirements.

Prior experience using Tableau dashboards or equivalent to build BI/ Reporting Tools a plus.

Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, information technology, or a similar subject required.
Master’s degree in Technology preferred, or equivalent work experience using software tools for data interrogation is required.
Demonstrated attention to detail and teamwork.
Exceptional written and verbal Communication skills.
Wealth/Financial Services industry experience is required.

Boston Private is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.
Minorities/Females/Individuals With Disabilities/Protected Veterans.",3.6,"Boston Private Bank & Trust Company
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1987,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
44,Data Analyst for Online Retail,-1,"*About CTV INC: *

CTV Inc is an online leader in the Amazon Seller space. We work with national brands to deliver a top quality brand image experience. We have been growing exponentially year over year. There is definitely room to grow with CTV INC.

*We are looking for someone who can take a deep dive into data with excel and google sheets. *

*Responsibilities: *

Download data in multiple formats

Extract and manipulate data to show key metrics (KPI's)

*Must have experience with: *

Excel Pivot Tables

Advanced Formulas

*Bonus Experience: *

Google Scrips

Excel Power Query

Power BI

Google Data Studio

Database / MySQL

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $20.00 per hour

Schedule:
* 8 hour shift
* Day shift
* Monday to Friday

COVID-19 considerations:
Each team member has their own private office.

Experience:
* Excel: 3 years (Required)

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
* Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
* Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail

Benefit Conditions:
* Only full-time employees eligible

Work Remotely:
* No",3.5,"CTV, INC
3.5","Spring Valley, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1960,Subsidiary or Business Segment,TV Broadcast & Cable Networks,Media,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
45,Temporary Marketing Data Analyst,"$69k-$119k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description Summary:

The firmwide marketing technology/CRM team has a temporary opening for a Marketing Data Analyst (approximately 4-5 months) who will help us execute on firm reporting requests received through marketing and business development team members. This position can be based in any of our offices.

Job Description:
Create standard and advanced custom report types for cross object reporting in Salesforce.
Create custom, complex, cross-object and cross-platform reports and dashboards using Salesforce, Marketo, Apsona, Power BI and internal data sources. Develop and fine tune reports to yield meaningful results based on changing business needs.
Build reports from scratch using data from different systems and build templates for end users to self-serve. Determine best data source, set up reports and validate results. Work with business development partners to build meaningful dashboards.
Report on complex client relationships with multiple parties of interest in a non-traditional, non-linear sales environment where the relationship is the ‘sale’.
Build custom curated, segmented email distribution lists in Marketo. Work with business development partners to fine tune. Set up campaign workflows. Report campaign results by account, contact and campaign.
Participate in data governance and hygiene programs and projects.

Desired Skills and Qualifications:

Current hands-on experience developing reports in Salesforce and Marketo strongly preferred, minimum of 2-3 years. Experience with other platforms, in addition to SFDC/Mkto, highly desired.
Experience combining multiple data sources and developing reports independently.
Experience with data import/export using data loader.
Experience solving for marketing automation/CRM/relationship intelligence data integration challenges related to data gathering for reports.
Strong Excel, data validation and critical thinking skills.
Strong presentation and training skills and ability to effectively communicate technical concepts to a variety of audiences.
Strong project management and organizational skills and ability to work independently as an individual contributor and a team member.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, concierge service environment.
Law firm and other professional services industry experience highly preferred.",4.1,"Fenwick & West
4.1","Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1972,Company - Private,Legal,Accounting & Legal,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
46,Sr.Programmer Analyst- Precision Medicine Data Management,"$22k-$45k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Sr.Programmer Analyst- Precision Medicine Data Management

Requisition #: 271824
Location: Johns Hopkins Health System, Baltimore, MD 21201
Category: Information Technology
Work Shift: Day Shift
Work Week: Full Time (40 hours)
Weekend Work Required: Yes
Date Posted: Sept. 28, 2020

SR PROGRAMMER ANALYST

REQUSITION ID 271824

Position Summary:

The Sr. Programmer Analyst supports the Johns Hopkins in Health Precision Medicine initiative. The position has several responsibilities, including building ingest of data from source systems to the Precision Medicine data lake and transforming data to serve a number of different data consumers, including researchers for COVID-19.

The Sr. Programmer Analyst position reports to the Johns Hopkins IT Health Data Integration Services manager but is also expected to work closely with the Technology Innovation Center. This position plays an important role in helping Johns Hopkins leverage electronic medical record and other data assets for clinical research and for the development of clinical and patient facing applications. It is important for this role to understand the information and integration needs, source systems, quality standards, report and analytic requirements, and electronic medical record data to support centralized and decentralized development of institutional and business intelligence content.

Knowledge, Skills, & Abilities (KSA’s):

Requires some knowledge of data modeling, data management, and database development. Experience working in these areas in health system operations is preferred.
Requires some knowledge of data integration tools, data modeling tools, metadata tools, and database design. Understands the range of options and best practices for common ETL design techniques such as change data capture, key generation and optimization, and performance tuning.
Requires some proficiency in SQL programming, query writing, query performance tuning, and database technologies.
Requires some experience with all phases of the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC).
Requires analytical ability to solve complex technical problems and participate as part of a diversified staff in matrix-managed groups.
Requires ability to convey technical methods, approaches, and plans to an audience of varying degrees of technical understanding including peers and customers.
Knowledge of ETL processes, cloud-based storage and data management technologies, such as Azure Databricks and Azure Data Factory is preferred.
Preferred Experience with the following databases, workbenches, and codebases: SQL Server, SQL Server Management Studio, SSIS, Java, C++, PHP, Python, IIS, SharePoint and R.
Technical certification in Epic Clarity and/or Caboodle is preferred.
Candidate must be detail oriented and have the ability to work on multiple priorities effectively and prioritize conflicting demands.

Job Responsibilities:

The primary responsibility of the Sr Programmer Analyst is to work on data extraction, transformation and load to support research and data visualization projects. This may involve extending the data lake with additional data to meet business needs. To achieve this the Data Analyst will:

DESIGN, DEVELOPMENT, and DEPLOYMENT

Implement data ingest pipelines and transformations into the Precision Medicine Analytics Platform data lake;
Transform data to comply with standards such as the OMOP Common Data Model;
Extract and transform data to comply with researcher requirements;
Extract and transform data to comply with requirements from data visualization applications;
Deliver data to research groups using the Precision Medicine Analytics Platform;
Design and deliver guidelines that allow a broad base of internal and external developers to build content sourced in the data lake while adhering to established standards and strategy;
Develop and validate the creation and maintenance of enterprise data definitions and metadata;
Participate in project planning to ensure effective use of technology and/or business process to meet customers’ needs;

IMPLEMENTATION AND MAINTENANCE

Monitor changes and resolve highly complex problems by responding as problems arise; Accomplish this by reviewing all processing and output of the newly implemented solution, and by proactively ensuring the solution works successfully in order to satisfy customer requirements and to provide a smooth transition to the new solution;
Oversee changes by adhering to the change management policies and procedures for any given project to communicate to all parties the nature, significance, and risk factors of the solution;
Work with source system owners to establish and measure data quality metrics, investigate and resolve source data issues, and continuously evaluate and refine transformation rules;
Define roles and responsibilities for centralized and decentralized data management functions.

Required Education:
Bachelor’s degree required. Additional experience may be substituted for education.

Equivalency Formula:

JHH: Related experience beyond minimum training experience qualifications may substitute for formal education requirement on a two years experience-for-one year education basis.

Required Experience:
Three years of related work experience with computer systems and applications. Additional education may substitute for experience.

Johns Hopkins Health System and its affiliates are drug-free workplace employers.

We are committed to providing a healthy and safe environment for our patients, visitors and staff members. The Johns Hopkins Hospital has a tobacco-free at work policy. Employees must refrain from using any tobacco products during their work shifts — including while at lunch or on breaks, and whether they are on or off campus.

Johns Hopkins Health System and its affiliates are an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, national origin, mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, or any other status protected by federal, state, or local law.",3.4,"Johns Hopkins Health System
3.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1889,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
47,Data Analyst,"$33k-$59k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Our data operations team is the pharmacy support system for our customers - we help them transition to divvyDOSE, manage their prescriptions, answer their questions, and coordinate care with their health team. This work is coordinated across pharmacists, technicians, and customer support staff to ensure we provide the best care for our customers. Among other things, we transfer prescriptions to and from other pharmacies, contact medical care providers to understand treatments and request prescription refills and answer inbound questions from our customers.

You will:


Your goal is to help the operation run more effectively and efficiently through data analysis, reporting, dash-boarding, and special projects. You will help us build context through better reporting and drive the business forward by providing data-driven recommendations on ways to improve efficiency and optimize our operation. On any given day you might be presenting to our executive team, doing a deep dive on call analytics, or working with a small team to prototype and test new processes.
Become an expert and go-to resource for our process flows and our operational data
Work with operations management to develop actionable operations performance dashboards across all areas of the organization
Perform ad-hoc data analysis to identify measurable improvements to our operation, and advocate for those improvements via presentations and reports
Maintain and improve operations forecasting models
Collaborate with Finance and Technology teams to ensure we are able to continue to effectively measure our operation as technology improves
Communicate effectively and efficiently across multiple teams and work groups
Requirements
You have strong analytical and problem-solving skills
You are used to tackling very loosely defined problems and still deliver high-quality output
Advanced proficiency in Excel, PowerPoint, and strong written and oral communication
Ability to adapt quickly to a changing environment
3-5 years of analyst experience
Bachelor's degree, with major in analytical or technical field strongly preferred
Experience with BI tools such as Looker or Tableau is a plus
Job Title: Data Analyst

Job Type: Full-time

FLSA Status: Exempt

Benefits

In addition to competitive salary and a unique opportunity to thrive at a growing company, divvyDOSE offers various formal benefits as well.

INSURANCE, PAID TIME OFF, & RETIREMENT

Full-time employees receive Sick days, Vacation days, and Holiday Bonuses as well as employer-paid Medical (including a Health Savings Account with an employer contribution), Dental, Vision, and Life insurance. In addition, we're proud to offer Voluntary Life & AD&D, Short Term Disability, and Long Term Disability coverage. A 401k plan with employer contribution is available, too.

SOCIAL EVENTS

In our company description, you can tell the divvyTEAM likes to have fun. Regular potlucks, company events, pizza days, wellness challenges, and divvyNEWS You Can Use updates maintain our work-hard play-hard culture.

divvyDOSE provides equal employment opportunity to all qualified applicants regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, genetic information, or veteran status, or other legally protected classification in the state in which a person is seeking employment. Applicants encouraged to confidentially self-identify when applying. Local applicants encouraged to apply. Drug-free work environment. Must be eligible to work in the United States.

Apply for this job",3.4,"divvyDOSE
3.4","Moline, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
48,Quality Assurance Analyst - Data Warehouse ETL,"$41k-$87k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Quality Assurance Analyst - Data Warehouse ETL
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uncover your full potential in a collaborative environment where you'll design, develop and deliver custom solutions to big challenges. And you'll be doing it for a proven industry leader that runs one of the largest e-commerce sites in the U.S.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Plan and execute testing activities for data warehouse project.
Create and execute tests of ETL processes.
Validate data quality.
Test downstream consumption of reports and calculations.
Develop, execute and maintain test plans, test scenarios, test suites and test cases.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree in information technology, computer science or related discipline.
Proficient at independently writing complex SQL queries.
Fundamental knowledge of data warehouse concepts.
4+ years of QA (quality assurance) experience in an IT environment.
4 years experience in data warehouse testing.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café with executive chefs and seasonal dinner-to-go options.
First-class fitness center with complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Professional development classes and monthly in-house speakers.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Pleasant Prairie, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
49,Marketing Data Analyst,-1,"Overview


As a key member of the Analytics team, the Marketing DataAnalyst will be responsible for data-driven insights that enable eFinancial and Fidelity Life Association to optimize business processes and grow rapidly. The Marketing Data Analyst will gather, organize and aggregate large sets of data in order to produce meaningful business insight in areas such as lead management, call center effectiveness, marketing spend effectiveness, and revenue generation. If you would love being an owner-operator of a fast-growing complex online business with modern technology stacks, building analytical and infrastructure solutions, and driving profitability via analytics, the Senior Marketing Analyst role is for you!

Responsibilities
Own the end-to-end lead performance management analytics to maximize risk-adjusted lifetime value generated by converting marketing spend into revenue
Develop lead / traffic forecasts by marketing channel, interpret sales conversion data, analyze and monitor results and recommend adjustments to keep marketing spend efficiency on track
Develop point solutions such as dynamic bidding models to guide lead and media buy
Work effectively with cross-functional partners in Business Intelligence, Marketing, and Finance to keep data initiatives on track, and provide periodic sales lead performance reporting to management team
Extract/extrapolate trends from competitor, user behavior, and market positioning analyses and recommend tangible opportunities for Business Development teams to maximize value of marketing relationships
Qualifications
Proven analytical and quantitative skills and an ability to use hard data and metrics to back up assumptions, develop business cases, and complete root cause/ analyses
Strong verbal and written communications skills that enable you to explain complex insights with clarity and precision to executive management
Experience developing insights across various areas of customer related data: financial, product and marketing
Proficiency in MS SQL/MySQL, Tableau/PowerBI and mastery of Microsoft Suite (Excel)
Knowledge of cloud-based data structures including Redshift, and programming languages such as Python a huge plus
An analytical mindset with relevant education such as a Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Economics, Finance or any related field
2-5 years of experience as a Data/Business/Financial Analyst with large, complex data sources
EEOC/Other


eFinancial is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse workplace. As an eFinancial employee, you will be eligible for Medical and Dental Insurance, Health Savings Accounts, Flexible Spending Accounts (Health, Dependent Care & Transit), Vision Care, 401(K), Short-term and Long-term Disability, Life and AD&D coverages.",3.6,"Efinancial
3.6",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
50,Data Analyst,"$50k-$88k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Rational is growing, and we need amazing talent to join our team. If you have an entrepreneurial attitude with a deep spirit of service and killer subject expertise, we want to talk to you. We are always looking for the next great consultant to raise the bar and push Rational to be better than we were yesterday. Staying hungry, curious, and looking forward to what’s next is part of our DNA.

This Data Analyst will be part of Rational's Technology & Data Practice and supporting one of our large biotech projects. This individual will provide strategic and tactical consultation, leadership in delivering solutions, and oversight of processes and systems.  The position requires solid technical foundation, domain knowledge, as well as strong verbal and written communication skills with a proven ability to clearly communicate technical information to a non-technical audience.

This is a full time position within Rational's Technology Practice. This position is not available for Visa sponsorship or C2C work.

What you will do:
Serve as the Business Analyst subject matter expert supporting, but not limited to Commercial portfolio
Network with a new and evolving IT environment, business team, and vendors to foster strong relationships and build partnerships
Understand strategy and how it translates to executable programs, projects, and efforts that align with strategic goals while taking the environmental constraints and opportunities into account
Collaborate with cross-functional professionals to deliver high-quality and innovative solutions that meet the business needs and create new opportunities
Provide analytic support of various levels of complexity including large, multi-year, cross-functional efforts with internal and external influencing factors
Negotiate conflicts and complex issues to an expeditious and satisfactory resolution
What you will bring:
3+ years of exposure to the orchestrating technology solutions for technical and/or Biotechnology or Pharmaceutical organizations
3+ years of experience in the Business Analysis or equivalent role with solution delivery and process improvement supporting cross-functional implementation of IT solutions in the Biotechnology or Pharmaceutical industry
3+ years of experience in organization financials, financial reporting
Familiarity with applications used in the business area such as Salesforce and Veeva
Working experience in SQL Server and Snowflake (preferred, but not required)
Proven knowledge of IT solutions and application management through various product cycles and evolving work environments
Demonstrated technical understanding of application architecture to include application servers, web servers, configuration files, relational databases, and reporting applications
Ability to proactively plan, organize, deliver with limited oversight, prioritize, and quickly adapt to changing situations
Excellent communication skills, including the ability to interface and influence internal and external partners at multiple organization levels
Strong interpersonal and negotiation skills, with a high degree of self-motivation and ability to work independently
Proficient in essential tools such as Power BI, Smartsheets, PowerPoint, Visio, etc.
Who you are:
Data Lover. You know your numbers and value the metrics behind the buyer story.
Collaborative to the Core. Demonstrated ability to work in a team environment, as a leader and member.
Well-rounded Professional. You have amazing communication and organizational skills along with high EQ.
Proactive. You are always thinking ahead about what is best for the Client.
Adaptable. Change happens at lightning speed; you are flexible, enjoy challenge, and get behind new ideas
Rational is a customer experience (CX) solutions firm that pairs the capabilities of a strategic consultancy with the creativity of a full-service digital agency. We design and activate compelling experiences that create strong connections between people and brands. We put humans at the center of business and partner with our clients to deliver meaningful experiences that help their customers while driving business success. Customer satisfaction at every level is our ultimate metric, and it's what drives our mindset, skillset, and company culture.

Incredible people are our non-negotiable. Our experienced team of consultants spans the globe. We love what we do, and who we do it with – let’s begin our next chapter together.

Rational is committed to ensuring all candidates have an equal opportunity to be considered for employment. Please let us know if you need any reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process.",2.7,"Rational
2.7","Redmond, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
51,Senior Data Systems Analyst,-1,"Senior Data Systems Analyst
Information Technology - Enterprise, Resource & Planning

Exempt, Pay Grade 19

The Senior Data Systems Analyst will support the Enterprise Resource Planning group as the lead in the development, design and implementation of automated reports and dashboards across their internal and external reporting and data insights platforms. This role is foundationally responsible for providing internal and external user access to their various data assets via appealing and effective reports, extracts, dashboards, and analysis solutions primarily with Microsoft Power BI. This person will also play a critical role 1) helping the organization with the new ERP system implementation, and 2) helping to spearhead data governance methodologies and practices. This position will work as Project Manager for organizational data initiatives. Works as project leader over other staff on complex projects. Provides leadership for implementing both in house and vendor applications. Essential functions include, and are not limited to the following:

Leads implementation of current data governance methodologies and practices;
Project manager for organizational data initiatives and works as project leader for complex projects;
Provides assistance and recommendations in leading the new ERP system implementation;
Synthesizes and translates internal and external business data needs into the development and implementation of creative, enticing, clear and effective solutions with BI tools such as Tableau and Microsoft Power BI;
Works and partners with internal stakeholders to develop reports or address data access and visualization needs;
Acts as liaison between vendors, user departments, boards, and outside agencies;
Creates and maintain project plans and visualizations for explanation of progress reporting;
Liaise with other departments and teams to define and implement necessary data sets to fuel data access and visualization requirements;
Leads development, maintain, and manage advanced reporting, analytics, dashboards and other BI solutions;
Performs data analysis, data profiling, SQL coding/query tuning, data modeling, and data validation;
Performs and document data analysis, data validation, and data mapping/design, by accessing multiple data resources residing in data warehouses and transactional data environments/sources;
Performs all tasks of a Systems Analyst but at a high level of efficiency and on more complex assignments;
All other duties as assigned;
Demonstrates and follows the Albemarle County Pillars of High Performance as we are all stakeholders, who share leadership, ownership, and responsibility for the County's vision, mission, core values, and strategic goals;
Will follow the Leadership Philosophy, demonstrate the Core Values, and use the Business Operating Principles as a guide for operating process and how the work is accomplished;
Will provide every customer with an experience that is professional, empathetic, and responsive;
Promotes cultural understanding and competency and an organizational climate of equity and inclusion.

Qualifications: Five or more years combined experience as a systems analyst, programmer/analyst, or related position in a similar hardware and software environment. Prefer a Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field of study (Business, Math, Economics, Financial, Statistics, Science, Engineering); at least 1 year of experience working with SQL; at least 1 year of experience in a project-centric environment or cross-department teams; at least 1 year of experience in data analysis; 1+ year experience with Microsoft Power BI or similar business intelligence platform.

Familiar with modern data architecture and design. Familiar with working in cloud environments such as Azure and AWS. Passion for empowering internal and external peers/clients with their data access needs. Proven track record of designing creative and appealing visuals, reports, and dashboards. Ability to work effectively on multiple priorities with strict deliverable timelines. Experience working with relational databases and data warehousing environments. Strong in Microsoft SQL query creation and tuning (table joins, calculations, aggregations, etc). Experience in data modeling with strong and demonstratable data management skills. Strong troubleshooting and performance tuning with a high proficiency in optimization. Advanced computer skills in typical corporate software applications (Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook). Excellent written and communication skills. Ability to foster a cooperative work environment with multiple internal stakeholders (e.g. other divisions and departments).

Physical Conditions & Nature of Work Contacts: Work is typically performed in an office, computer room, computer classroom laboratory, and/or conference rooms. Continuous ability to communicate by phone is necessary. Regular use of keyboards, computers, laser printers, etc. is necessary. Work requires occasional handling of small fragile computer components and large components weighing in excess of 50 pounds. Occasional operation of county vehicles to travel to locations throughout the county is required. Regular contact is made with internal departments and senior persons at all levels of County government and the school division. Contacts are usually cooperative, however, require tact and diplomacy. External contacts with vendor companies and other information services agencies are necessary. Occasional need to perform urgent tasks to meet organizational deadlines. Frequent work activity after normal duty hours and occasional weekend duties are necessary.

Hiring Salary Range: $60,260 - $72,312 annual equivalent based on qualifications, and equity.

Application Deadline: Until Filled",-1,Albemarle County Public Schools and Local Government,Virginia,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
52,Big Data Analyst BSLEP7,"$44k-$80k
(Glassdoor Est.)","E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings requires the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel.
Through the use of effective “big data” technologies and solutions, CBP ensures that the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure. In response to this challenge, ManTech, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified and versatile data analysts to facilitate data-driven decision making in response to national security threats.
The primary objective of the data analysis team is three-fold: 1) Support the development of predictive models via the identification of behaviors and attributes that inform illicit activities; 2) Provide on-demand analysis to support emergent operational needs; and, 3) Develop performance dashboards and artifacts to inform resource allocation, justify requirements, and support statutory reporting mandates.
In all three areas, data analysts must be capable of transforming large volumes of raw data, both structured and unstructured forms, into mission-focused insights that enhance understanding of mission performance, workload, and/or behavioral trends (i.e., strategic, tactical, and operational insights). Analysts may be called upon to support a diverse array of initiatives involving complex queries in support of network analysis, entity resolution, threat research, visualization, and impact assessments.

The strongest applicants will engage in highly dynamic, threat/risk driven operating environments. They will bring a proven track record of working with decision support tools and applications operationally employed by mission-support entities. Within three to six months of joining the project, we expect analysts will:
Master relevant data schemas, reference data, joining conditions, and relationships of existing databases, as well as associated warehouses and data marts, involving trade, travel, national security, and law enforcement data.
Conduct exploratory analysis demonstrating: a refined understanding of the strengths and weaknesses of the underlying data; a willingness to explore non-traditional data sources and evaluation methods; and a clear link to mission need.
Construct query code as well as run, save, edit, optimize, and document queries using SQL and other languages including Spark to extract mission-critical insights.
Design, develop and deliver analytic artifacts such as dashboards, scorecards, and structured Excel reports that: support executive-level, at-a-glance findings; empower non-technical users to explore user-specific equities (e.g. PowerBI); and/or provide detailed information informing operational outcomes.
Assess validity, accuracy, completeness, consistency, and uniformity of data as well as develop mitigation steps and processes to address data quality issues in support of clean data.
Translate findings (e.g. mission impacts, limitations of findings/ analytical confidence, analytical methods and techniques employed) to clearly articulate the “so what” within the context of mission performance to technical and non-technical audiences in the form of written reports and in-person briefings.
Engage internal and external stakeholders in a professional and informed manner to collect analysis requirements and ensure alignment of expected outcomes.
Integrate with, and materially contribute to, portfolio teams as a matrixed resource to provide data analytics expertise in support of modeling, ad hoc query support, or performance assessment initiatives in collaboration with data scientists, intelligence analysts, developers, and other participants under the direction of a project manager.
Applicants should note that while some formal training exists to support building knowledge of missions and the implementation of data-driven solutions, but much of the knowledge must be gained through on-the-job training and individual initiative. Technical knowledge is insufficient to achieve effectiveness in this operating environment; expertise must be enhanced with rapid acquisition of mission knowledge and demonstrated commitment positive mission outcomes. Therefore, we seek self-starters who are capable of independent exploration and knowledge acquisition, willing to develop informal support networks, and with an appreciation for the immense challenge of safeguarding the Nation’s borders.

BS Degree in a related technical fields (Computer Science, Math, Statistics, etc.)
Hands on experience working with data-mining, analysis or statistical software such as R, Matlab, SAS Enterprise Miner, SPSS Modeler, or SQL Developer for data analysis
Hands on experience with at least one of the following technologies: Hadoop eco system, including HDFS, YARN, Cassandra, Hive, Pig, and Spark
Hands on experience with Batch-oriented and streaming distributed processing methods such as Nifi, Spark, Kafka, or Storm
Hands on experience with distributed search engines like Elasticsearch or Solr
Conceptual understanding of – and/or prior experiences related to – data profiling, fuzzy matching, entity resolution, and signal detection theory (specifically with respect to SD theory: designing and improving upon systems that monitor, minimize, and balance false positive and false negative outcomes)
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with programming languages such as Java, Python, and SQL
Unix / Linux experience
Experience working in field of entity resolution, analytics, data mining or name matching.
Delivering solutions using Amazon Web Services (e.g., AWS EC2, RDS, S3)
Experience with Javascript frameworks like Angular, React and JQuery is a plus
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI)

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,"E3 Federal Solutions
4.4","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
53,Data Warehouse Technical Analyst,"$45k-$130k
(Glassdoor Est.)","IMT Insurance is hiring a Data Warehouse Technical Analyst in our Research and Development department to design, maintain, and provide support for data warehouse systems and other related data marts. This individual will also implement and enforce standards and procedures to ensure data is managed consistently and properly integrated within the warehouse. If you have strong time management and excellent communication skills, this position is for you!

A DAY IN THE LIFE:

Responsible for data warehouse design and configuration.
Ensures the accuracy and quality of warehouse data.
Map data between source systems, data warehouses, and data marts.
Develop data warehouse process models, including sourcing, loading, transformation, and extraction.
Defines user requirements and database design specifications.
Develop diagrams or flow charts of system operation.
Acts as a liaison between users, developers, DBAs and network administrators on data warehouse issues.
Interface with DBAs and security team on security and data masking needs.
Provides technical support and coordination during warehouse design, testing and movement to production.
Develop procedures for data management.
Responsible for coding and documenting procedures, and programming, testing and debugging data warehouses.

WHAT YOU’LL NEED:

Actively listens with strong oral and written communication skills
Ability to effectively manage multiple projects at once and prioritize
Maintain technical expertise and knowledge of current trends and techniques
Experienced with cloud-based solutions
Experienced with a programming or scripting language
Data base user interface and query software including SQL
Experienced with database infrastructure
Must possess the ability to work well with others
A college degree or equivalent needed to perform normal functions plus 5+ years of experience needed to perform the essential functions of the job.

Are you still wondering, ‘Why IMT?’ Well let me tell you more. We’ve been named a top workplace for seven years in a row because of the great people who work here. We also pride ourselves in being a family-orientated company, living true to the work/life balance lifestyle. Our employees benefit from a fun, but professional environment taking part in activities and events throughout the year that provides the perfect blend of social opportunities, personal and career development, and community involvement.

If want to learn more, I suggest you apply today!",4.4,"IMT Insurance
4.4","West Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1884,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
54,Data Integration & Reporting Analyst,"$52k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Credible Behavioral Health Software is a leading Behavioral Health Enterprise Software company based in Rockville, MD and providing an Electronic Health Record (EHR) to the growing US Behavioral Health market. With several years of double-digit growth, Credible is expanding our team in our Rockville, MD office and nationally. Credible’s Mission is paramount and central to our success: Improving the quality of care and lives in behavioral health for clients, families and providers. If you are interested in combining a mission driven position with a fast paced, results oriented culture, please apply today.

Credible is looking for qualified candidates with experience delivering high quality reporting and data integration products to Partners. The Data Analyst will have the responsibility of converting business requirements into technical specifications and ensuring that all configuration, software, and data needs are met to deliver high quality reporting and data integration projects on time. This position is under the leadership of the Senior Manager of Data Integration and Analytics.

Join the Credible Team!

Overall Responsibility for the Data Analyst:
Converting business requirements into technical specification for data integration and reports
Establishing and maintaining professional relationships with various stakeholders (e.g., Partners, technical resources, state officials, etc.)
Configuring the front-end and data-related back-end of Credible interfaces for Partners
Working with software developers and partners to troubleshoot issues
Developing application and data workflow diagrams
Communicating priorities and status to internal stakeholders
Interacting with our partners to understand requirements and issues
Working with technical team to help clarify requirements and ensure that product delivery adheres to requirements
Working with QA on test plans and test cases
Delivering quality work while operating as a team player while valuing Credible’s mission and culture.
Identifying areas for improvement in team processes and contributing to solutions
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent work experience.
Industry knowledge of the healthcare space, especially behavioral health
2+ years working knowledge and experience with data, databases, reporting, or similar
1+ years of experience with industry standard codes and file formats like HL7, ADT, CDA, CCD, CCR, LOINC, SNOMED, ICD 9/10, etc
Agile and Scrum methodology experience
Candidate must have excellent written and verbal communication skills
Excellent interpersonal skills including the ability to work with both internal and external customers
Excellent organizational skills with the ability to handle multiple projects and timelines with minimal supervision
Someone who can drive processes independently
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Knowledge and understanding of Healthcare Informatics
Must be authorized to work lawfully in the United States
Credible will not sponsor any applicants for any type of work visa
The following skills and experience are a plus:
SQL & SSRS experience
Business Intelligence software experience
Data integration with HIEs
Credible is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, disability, military status, national origin or any other characteristic protected under federal, state, or applicable local law.",4.0,"Credible Behavioral Health, Inc.
4.0","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
55,Contract Data Analyst,"$54k-$98k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

Amyx is seeking to hire a Contract Data Analyst located in Rosslyn, VA. The successful candidate must have A 4-year course of study leading to a bachelor's degree with a major in any field, that includes or is supplemented by at least 24 semester hours in any combination of the following fields: accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization. Also, a minimum of 2 years of experience serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities and Skills:

Knowledge of WAWF eBusiness processes.
Knowledge of the federal acquisition process.
Knowledge of contracting principles, laws regulation and procedures.
Knowledge of methods and techniques of fact-finding, analysis, and resolution of complex problems, and the ability to develop concrete action plans to solve problems.
Knowledge and Experience of the WAWF eBusienss Suite, to include: iRAPT, EDA, IUID, CDR, MyInvoice, and Contract Closeout.
Good verbal, analytical and written communication skills.
Good organizational skills in tracking data and actions.
Knowledge and Experience writing professional documents.
Knowledge and Experience in Customer Service.
Skilled in Business Intelligence Reporting.
Proficient in the use of the Microsoft suite of applications including Word, SharePoint, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, and Project as well as with Adobe Acrobat.

Supported Technologies:
Integrative Acquisition Environment
DOD acquisition system

Qualifications:

Required Skills and Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree and preferred majors are accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization.
2 years of experience required in serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst.

Desired Skills and Qualifications:
Knowledge of Federal and DOD acquisition procedures

Amyx is an Equal Opportunity employer. Amyx is committed to providing equal employment opportunity to all job seekers. Every qualified applicant receives focused consideration for employment and no one is discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status. In addition to federal law requirements, Amyx complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Amyx is an E-Verify employer.
Amyx proudly and proactively takes affirmative action to advance employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.
Physical Demands
Employee needs to be able to sit at a workstation for extended periods; use hand(s) to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. Most positions require ability to work on desktop or laptop computer for extended periods of time reading, reviewing/analyzing information, and providing recommendations, summaries and/or reports in written format. Must be able to effectively communicate with others verbally and in writing. Employee may be required to occasionally lift and/or move moderate amounts of weight, typically less than 20 pounds. Regular and predictable attendance is essential.",4.0,"Amyx, Inc.
4.0","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
56,Sr Data Analyst,"$52k-$93k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position location: Lake Mary, FLor Blue Bell, PA

Position Summary
The Senior Data Analyst drives pharma client analytics solutions for United BioSource Corporation (UBC), supporting many of the world’s largest pharmaceutical companies to improve patient lives, support drug safety programs, and help manage new Clinical studies.

Responsibilities

· Build and continually improve Tableau dashboard offerings for business partners.

· Monitor and analyze business performance, providing targeted dashboards and recommendations for operational improvement.

· Serve as Subject Matter Expert (SME) for business data, systems and processes under team’s area of support.

· Write and edit SQL code to ensure data is pulled optimally.

Required Qualifications

· BS in a technical field (BI, Analytics, Data Science, IS, Computer Science, etc).

· Advanced SQL skills.

· Advanced dashboard design skills, including 2+ years of experience with a dashboard toolset (Tableau, Qlik, Domo, Birst, etc).

· 2+ years of data analysis experience.

· Excellent communication and presentation ability.

· Excellent project management skills.

· Highly self-motivated.

Preferred Qualifications

· MS in a Data-related field (BI, Analytics, Data Science, etc).

· Expert-level SQL skills

· Expert-level Tableau skills.

· Advanced R skills.

· Healthcare (ideally pharma) experience.

·Minimal travel is required (",2.5,"United BioSource
2.5","Blue Bell, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2003,Other Organization,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
57,Data Analyst,"$60k-$87k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

A Data Analyst designs, executes and interprets past and real time data to identify trends, reconcile inconsistencies, and make recommendations to improved IT Service Delivery This includes active analysis of the traditional ITSM Event, Incident, Request, Problem, Knowledge, Change, Configuration and Release processes.

What Youll Get to Do:
Monitors and queries the IT Service Delivery platform to analyze demand, usage, and performance
Uses data analytics to provide actionable, timely and accurate reporting to improve service delivery, infrastructure management, and conduct proactive problem and incident management.
Works with the ITSM Process Leads and Customer Engagement teams to identify and monitor process performance and service provider performance
Analyze, define, and report on trends identified in the data
Facilitate Technical Exchange Meeting related to data structure, quality assurance, and reporting
Leverage the various reporting and presentation tools to provide analysis and recommendations
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement data collection solutions, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality of information
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement and Continual Service Improvement (CSI) opportunities
Youll Bring These Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI with Poly required
A bachelor's degree OR equivalent experience/4+ years of IT experience AND 1+ year of data analyst, performance management, and service delivery reporting
ITIL Foundations certification
A good understanding of IT Service Management delivery
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining, and segmentation techniques
Knowledge of statistics and experience with statistical tools to analyze data sets (Excel, SPSS, or SAS)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
Experience with the ServiceNow toolset
Experience with Tableau
Degree in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
ITIL Intermediate Certifications
What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
allspark

BITS3

Job Location

US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI International
3.8","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
58,Data Loss Prevention Analyst,-1,"Bloom faces an unprecedented opportunity to change the world and the way companies utilize energy. We have recently launched a “game changing” solution called “Always on” that will help companies power their primary business operations without disruption with cleaner, more reliable electricity generated on-site with no combustion. We are looking for Information Security Analyst to join our team in one of today’s most exciting technologies!

The Data Loss Prevention (DLP) Analyst is a key resource on the Information Security team and will be primarily responsible for the maintenance and daily monitoring of the enterprise Cloud, Endpoint, and Network Data Loss Prevention (DLP) solutions. The main duties of the person in this role will include proper care and administration of the Data Loss Prevention (DLP) environments and monitoring and responding to the alerts that generate from the tool. This person will interface closely with other Security Engineers, Architects, Managers, and internal customers. This individual is responsible for coordination with functional and technical resources to ensure that the solutions are scalable, reliable, and sustainable.

The Data Loss Prevention (DLP) Analyst will advise on data security best practices and configure, review, and maintain the DLP/CASB solutions. As a member of the Information Security team, the role contributes to the development and execution of a secure data security strategy and ensures its alignment with Bloom Energy business strategy and the delivery of capabilities required to achieve business success.

The Data Loss Prevention (DLP) Analyst must be able to build strong relationships with all levels of the company and interface with internal and external contacts in a professional manner as well as interact with business key stack holders to fulfill the responsibilities and obligation

Responsibilities

Work with vendors to support the DLP technology (deployment, troubleshooting, upgrades, etc.)
Administration of the DLP tools which includes configuring policies, upgrading, and patching, etc.
Monitor alerts generated from the DLP systems and other technologies
Understand and follow the incident response process through event escalations
Respond to escalations by the Incident Response Team
Follow processes to maintain the DLP system
Responsible for implementing best security practices at Bloom Energy
Responsible to implement and maintain the best security standards and policies to protect Information systems architecture that includes Data Center, Network, Servers, Storage, databases Applications, and related access control.
Act as a consultant to all teams on information security best practices.
Mentor and provide relevant training to global team members

Skills and Experience Requirements

3- 5 years of experience in Information Security technologies/operations.
2-3 years of experience in Data Loss Prevention (DLP) Technology support and Event Handling
Information Security concepts related to Governance, Risk & Compliance
Supporting Information Security Technology
Ability to independently research and solve technical issues
Work independently in a highly dynamic environment with the ability to collaborate with an inter-functional team.
Experience in incident handling operations and procedures
Demonstrated integrity in a professional environment
Strong communication skills (written, verbal, and listening)

Educational Requirements

Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or a related field.
Professional security certification such as CompTIA Network+, Security+ will be a plus.

About Bloom Energy
Bloom Energy’s mission is to make clean, reliable, and affordable energy for everyone in the world. The Company’s product, the Bloom Energy Server, delivers highly reliable and resilient, ‘Always-On’ electric power that is clean and sustainable. Bloom’s customers include twenty-five of the Fortune 100 companies and leaders in cloud services and data centers, healthcare, retail, financial services, utilities and many other industries. For more information, visit www.bloomenergy.com

Bloom Energy is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit. We are committed to compliance with all applicable laws providing equal employment opportunities. All qualified applicants, will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, protected veteran status, or on the basis of disability. Bloom Energy makes reasonable accommodations, consistent with applicable laws, for the known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified applicant or employee with a disability, who can perform the essential job functions, unless undue hardship would result.

IND1",3.1,"Bloom Energy
3.1","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
59,Data Analyst,-1,"Celebrating over 30 years in Florida, Maschmeyer Concrete has become one of the leading privately held, family-oriented ready- mix concrete and building materials suppliers in the state of Florida. Maschmeyer takes pride in its people by building strong Customer and Team relationships through the relentless pursuit of our Mission and Core Values. If you are looking for a “Family” environment where our superior work atmosphere is a way of life, then you have found the right Team.

Maschmeyer Concrete Company in our Southeast Region is seeking an experienced, highly-motivated, honest and dedicated Data Analyst for our Lake Park Corporate Office.
Job Specifications include: *
· Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports

· Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality

· Acquire data from primary and secondary data sources, and maintain databases/data systems

· Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets

· Filter and clean data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct problems

· Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Compensation: *
· Competitive rate of pay based on ability & experience

· Generous Benefits Package: Medical, Dental & Vision options

· Paid Life Insurance, Long-Term Disability, Holidays & Paid Time Off (PTO)

· 401K with company match

· Free Financial Planning

· Free EAP Programs

· Professional Training & Certifications

Please apply online or in person at www.maschmeyer.com/careers . We are an EOE and DFWP company.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $45,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business data mining: 1 year (Preferred)
database maintenance: 1 year (Preferred)
productivity, sales & cost analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Associate (Preferred)
Location:
Lake Park, FL 33403 (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.maschmeyer.com/careers
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Maschmeyer Concrete Company of Florida
4.0","Lake Park, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Mining,Mining & Metals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
60,Quality Data Management Analyst (Corporate Quality),"$34k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Quality Data Management Analyst for Corporate Quality will be responsible for conducting various data management responsibilities and help establish a new Data Management organization for the Quality department. This role will collaborate cross functionally with various areas of the organizations to develop a deep understanding of how our Quality Data is managed and governed across the Edwards Quality Management Systems globally. The successful individual must have a combination of analytical skills, data management understanding, and business acumen with an ability to think enterprise-wide. The Analyst would be comfortable with interacting with upper management and enforcing standards.

Key Responsibilities:
Data Management and Preparation: Identify, evaluate, cleanse, and organize disparate data sources. Identify data sources available and collect primary data where necessary. - Understand and assess the value of data sources based on our organizational need. Prepare and structure data within our systems.
Collaboration: Work across functions to understand the nuances of our data from across the organization and external sources. Seek to understand the data and analytical needs of our stakeholders. Work closely with the Quality Data Analytics, business process owners, and IT organizations to manage and maintain data within our systems.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree with 2 years of experience with data analytics; OR Master’s degree in Data/Business Analytics field.
Ability to capture and document Entity Relationship Diagrams for Enterprise Quality Systems across all Quality areas
Be able to develop data dictionaries for Enterprise Quality Systems across all Quality areas
Be able to contribute to data source identification, data mapping, functional design and detail design.
Be able to draft Data Management Plans for Enterprise Quality Systems across all Quality areas
Experience with data visualization/modeling related tools such as: Power BI, Tableau, QlikView.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in the medical device, pharma, biotech, or healthcare related industries
Using reporting tools and querying languages such as: SQL
Utilizing programming languages such as: Python, R
Experience with electronic Quality Management Systems (ETQ Reliance, Pilgrim)
Knowledge and experience with Quality Systems (e.g. CAPAs, NCRs, Complaints)
Good written and verbal communication skills
Results-oriented, positive “can-do” attitude with demonstration of appropriate urgency and initiative
Detail-oriented, producing high quality work
Strong ability to manage and work with different cultures and nationalities
Ability to manage competing and evolving priorities in a fast-paced environment
Ability to adapt to new technologies and rapidly changing environment
Participate in project communications, training materials, and business procedures/documentation
Edwards is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer including protected Veterans and individuals with disabilities.",3.7,"Edwards Lifesciences
3.7","Irvine, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1958,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
61,Senior Scientific Data Analyst (CDC COVID-19 Response Support),"$67k-$118k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Travel Required: None
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT is hiring Senior Scientific Data Analysts to provide support to the Epidemiology Task Force: Ongoing COVID-19 Response Support. Due to the recent events caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the CDC Epidemiology Task Force is responsible for identifying and tracking COVID-19 cases, spread and containment. The COVID-19 Epidemiology Task Force Response is critical to accomplishing the CDC’s mission and goals during the COVID-19 pandemic. This position will give support across several teams within the task force.

A scientific data analyst has the necessary education and work experiences to effectively provide data analysis, data management, and data visualization support to the task force. These roles are supporting enhanced COVID-19 surveillance efforts and epidemiological studies. Successful candidates will be at an intermediate to advanced coding level in SAS or R (both is preferred).

RESPONSIBILITIES (vary with years of relevant experience and education):

Monitor data submissions from research study partners
Provide data cleaning and management support for research studies and surveillance platforms
Ensure the security and confidentiality of analytical data files and provide data file documentation describing the scientific data source.
Manage epidemiological and laboratory data by using SAS or equivalent statistical package (e.g. R)
Familiarity with data management software packages (e.g. R, REDCap, Microsoft Access, Excel, EpiInfo, STATA, etc.)
Conduct analyses including frequencies, longitudinal data analysis, and univariate and multivariate modeling techniques (linear regression, logistic regression, generalized linear models, and survival analysis)
Perform data quality assurance activities, including identifying and resolving any inconsistencies in data flow, data outside legitimate ranges, and illogical data responses
Manage data stored in a variety of file formats such as SAS datasets, Microsoft Access, Microsoft Excel, SQL, and ASCII files
Manipulate and transform data that are stored in a variety of file formats
Explore the use of data visualization platforms (e.g. R, Power BI, mapping software) to quickly summarize study findings
Support data visualization activities (both for hypothesis generation and to share data with the response) in order to develop communication materials such as data sets, slide sets and summary reports
Work on ongoing basis to improve and automate code
Conducts weekly data cleaning and generate weekly error reports
Database management and upkeep as well as complete ad hoc data requests
Determine sampling methodologies to implement if case counts exceed certain thresholds, characterize surveillance back-fill to help with real-time interpretation of data
Compile individual-level data submitted from multiple external partners in diverse data formats and merge with laboratory testing results from CDC or contract laboratories
Track completeness and quality of data over time
Prepare summary tables and descriptive analyses of results on a regular basis
Create and modify SAS (or other) programs used for data management and create documentation for programs describing their functions and associated processes and output
Support the design, development, and implementation of surveillance tools to collect epidemiologic data
Communicate analytic results to internal CDC staff and external partners in a clear, concise and timely manner
Assist researchers in developing analytical programs in SAS or R and assist researchers in determining the appropriate statistical techniques to apply to their analyses

QUALIFICATIONS:

Required Skills and Experience

Bachelor’s degree with 4+ years relevant experience; or Masters degree and 2+ years (preferably a M.S. in statistics or mathematics,, or MPH with a concentration in Epidemiology or Biostatistics)
Capable of high level programming in SAS and/or R for data analysis, data visualizations, and data management

Desired Skills and Experience:

Recent CDC experience
Experience on an outbreak response in any capacity

#GDITpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
62,Data Science Support Analyst,"$72k-$127k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Science Support Analyst to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Support Analyst will partner with the Data Scientists to: support production deployment of models and web applications related to technologies developed by the Data Science team; participates in new development of web applications and restful api’s; gain exposure to production machine learning model pipelines and the design and creation of new models using statistical techniques.

Responsibilities:
Continually check metrics and validate models, compute model performance metrics.
Access, analyze, cleanse, pre-process data.
Retrieve data from multiple stores CSV/Teradata/Oracle/API/.
Train new models per specifications from Data Scientist.
Deploy new models and determine when to replace existing.
Configure Linux server web sites and update code base as needed.
Monitor web application performance and fix issues accordingly.
Configure SQLite/SQL/Mongo databases and stored queries, updating as needed.
Participate in meetings and offer ideas and solutions to present problems.
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Python (numpy/pandas/matplotlib/sklearn/flask)
Version control (git)
SQL and database APIs (cx_oracle, pymysql, sqlalchemy)
Cloud deployment experience (AWS, containerization) and familiarity with AWS services
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum environment
Machine Learning algorithm development experience.
Ability to learn new technologies rapidly and turn around implementations.
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal) with ability to effectively communicate to all levels with varying degrees of technical knowledge
Critical thinking Independent problem resolution
Ability to work in a team and collaborate with others
Bachelor's Degree (Data Science, Analytics, Business, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering or related field)
2-4 years experience (candidates with a relevant Masters degree and less experience will also be considered).",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
63,Member Experience Data Analyst,"$48k-$87k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Start a Rewarding Career with Alliant


What will your day look like?

You will be responsible for breaking down complex data sets into structured analysis and offering “Insights as a Service” to key stakeholders across the organization. This individual will create recurring and ad-hoc reports/dashboards and deliver findings that result in actionable recommendations that positively impact and influence operational efficiencies and the member experience. You will have a passion for problem solving, an intellectual curiosity to dig deep into root causes, along with the ability to think conceptually, analytically and creatively.

Responsibilities


Do you see yourself doing this?
Extract data from multiple complex data sets including internal and external sources.
Build, update and maintain databases.
Verify information integrity, and make recommendations to remediate potential gaps/errors in data.
Understand key stakeholder objectives and the metrics that impact their area of the business.
Prepare and distribute recurring and ad-hoc reports/dashboards comprised of key metrics from across the organization.
Derive actionable insights through critical analysis and data visualizations.
Create innovative visuals using Tableau (or other supported visualization tools) to enable more effective consumption of data.
Apply business analysis skills to complicated business wants/needs and make recommendations for optimal solutions.
Adhere to the enterprise responsibilities and standards of a Business Intelligence lead and support the Enterprise BI Community.
All other duties as assigned by Sr. Mgr. Member Experience Design & Insights.
Qualifications


What makes you a great fit?

You’ll be a great fit if in addition to the completion of a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Information Systems, Data Analytics/Data Science, or a related major, required, and you have:
4+ years of experience in data analysis, interpretation, report preparation and presentation of results, required.
Experience presenting findings to all levels of leadership.
Strong proficiency in Microsoft Excel/PowerPoint/Access, Tableau, SQL and extracting data from various sources.
Experience with relational databases and data warehouses.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Strong proficiency in time management and organizational skills.
High level of detail orientation and analysis.
Experience in customer/member experience analytics.
When you’re happy, we’re happy!

As a thank you for joining our team, you’ll benefit from:

Competitive medical, dental, and free vision benefits
Competitive compensation plan
Contributions towards gym memberships
Generous PTO and banking holidays off
Still not convinced?

We’re on the list of 100 Best Medium Companies to work for, check it out here. For more details you can also visit our Glassdoor and LinkedIn profiles.",3.4,"Alliant Credit Union
3.4","Rolling Meadows, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1935,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
64,Data Analyst,"$44k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Are Hiring

Join our Operations Improvement team as a Performance Improvement Coordinator with a focus on data analysis. This is a full-time position with the availability to work remotely.

Work Schedule: Typically, M-F, day shift hours. Specific hours to be discussed and agreed upon with hiring leader. In addition, there may occasionally be evening and/or weekend hours, based on business needs that arise.

Why Join Ascension?
In Michigan, Ascension operates 16 hospitals and hundreds of related healthcare facilities that together employ over 20,000 associates. Across the state, Ascension Michigan is working together to help bring patients more resources and better care. Ascension Michigan is also committed to its community; it provided over $272 million in community benefit and care of persons living in poverty in FY2018. Ascension Michigan is dedicated to spiritually centered, holistic care which sustains and improves the health of individuals and communities.
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.
Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension-Michigan, you will have the opportunity to organize and coordinate performance improvement program activities and workflow.

Responsibilities:
Collaborates with multidisciplinary team on problem identification and resolution, cost containment issues, implementation of new services and systems/ performance measures.
Researches, develops/acquires and implements improvement systems, methodologies and tools to improve operations.
Collaborates with Leaders to develop and revise screening indicators.
Provides on-site training and follow-up for performance improvement teams.
Performs regulatory documentation preparation, submission, and maintenance. Ensures compliance with regulatory and accreditation requirements.
Assists in policy, procedure and contract review process. Coordinates quality improvement initiatives.
What You Will Need

Education:
Diploma
High school diploma or GED required.
Bachelor's degree preferred in analysis areas (biostatistics, statistics, applied mathematics, epidemiology, etc)
Preferred Experience:
Experience with database setup and administration.
Understand data storage and data sharing methods.
Compile and organize healthcare data.
Analyze data to assist in delivering optimal healthcare management and decision making.
Investigate data to find patterns and trends and make recommendations for quality improvements
Understand healthcare business operations.
Fluent in coding languages, such as R or SQL.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension Michigan is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We provide equal employment opportunities to all associates and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, height, weight, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, veteran status or any other legally protected status in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws. The information requested on this application will not be used for any purpose prohibited by law. If you require assistance or an accommodation to complete this application, please let us know.

For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf
M/F/Disabled/Vet
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf
Reasonable Accommodation
Ascension Michigan provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request in order to express interest in a position by e-mailing: reasonableaccommodations@stjohn.org. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Ascension Michigan will be reviewed at the e-mail address supplied.
Thank you for considering a career with Ascension Michigan.
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension Michigan participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.3,"Ascension
3.3","Warren, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
65,Data Analyst,"$47k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Analyst to join our team based in Falls Church

Requirements:
Must have good interpersonal and communication skills both verbal and written.
Must have strong time management and organizational skills, attention to detail and ability to multitask.
Must have a good understanding of data structure and management.
Must be organized, self-motivated, and self-directed.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Desired Skills:
A fair understanding of SQL, Python and R is a plus.
Experience in developing Pivot Tables/Charts as well as complicated formula is desirable.
BI Dashboards
QLIK OR Tableau
Excel:
V lookup
Data Validation
Data Clean up
Education:
Must have a bachelors degree (in a similar discipline preferred) in any related field.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go tohttps://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,"Nolij Consulting
4.1","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
66,SQL Developer/Data Analyst,"$46k-$102k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Corbins Electric, we believe people are first! Our teammates, our partners, and our customers can expect that we genuinely care to serve them and look out for their best interests. Our culture is built on the cornerstone of our Core Values – Passion, Relationships, Innovation, Development and Excellence! They set our expectation of each and every employee and are integrated in everything we do. As one of the largest electrical contractors in the Southwest and an industry leader in virtual construction, fabrication, electrical construction, and electrical service, we continually look for people who share in our Core Values to better themselves and contribute to our mission of changing the construction industry as empowered thought leaders.
As the SQL Developer/Data Analyst you will be providing cutting edge analysis of financial and construction data. You will work with key stakeholders to design processes and present data in a meaningful way to help drive business decisions. You will design the database structure and basic workflows for reimagined processes while ensuring data integrity. You will get the opportunity to drive the entire process from start to finish: inception to finished product that we put in our users hands.

Build databases and write database transactions
Develop database structures to accurately and efficiently store data from new or existing processes
Develop the front end for basic CRUD apps to map these in a platform called Xalt (rapid app development platform) using the database structures created
Build Basic UI components to display data and processes in Xalt
Develop SQL stored procedures that produce and manipulate data in a useful way
Utilize different data sources to provide connected data analysis
Develop SQL analysis queries to produce insights about the company
Continuously work with key stakeholders to clean up data and streamline data analysis

Advanced skill in T-SQL, stored procedures, and common table expressions (CTE)
Ability to develop appropriate relational database structures given requirements
Ability to work with different data sources and consolidate the information
Understanding of object oriented design concepts
Understanding of programming paradigms and best practices
Basic UX/UI understanding
Passionate to understand business environments and translate business needs into technical requirements to provide technical solutions for the business.
Enjoys working with key stakeholders and business leaders to develop requirements and adept at communicating technical ideas to non-technical audiences”
Ability to handle multiple tasks in a detailed efficient manner
Enjoys working in a team environment
PowerBI or other data visualization experience is preferred, but not required
Education/Certifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field",3.8,"Corbins Electric
3.8","Phoenix, AZ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1975,Company - Private,Construction,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
67,Data Analyst,"$45k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We have an opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Duties & Responsibilities
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Candidate will be reviewing and analyzing non-standard format data and transforming it to a standardized format for ingestion into a Big Data and a Structured data environment.
Conducting full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities and design.
Monitor performance and quality control plans to identify improvements.
Requirements
Knowledge and experience in programming languages (Python)
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (Business Objects etc.), databases (SQL etc.), programming (XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc.)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
Active Secret clearance required
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.2,"NetImpact Strategies
4.2","Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
68,Senior Data Analytics Analyst (Corporate Quality),"$59k-$104k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This Senior Data Analytics Analyst for Corporate Quality will be responsible for collecting and preparing data, managing varied sources of data, and maintaining reports for distribution. This role will collaborate cross functionally with various areas of the organizations to develop a deep understanding of Quality metrics of the Edwards business and will be accountable for architecting and implementing data modeling solutions that improve business processes. The successful individual must have a combination of analytical skills, data management understanding, and business acumen with an ability to think enterprise-wide. The Sr. Analyst would be comfortable with interacting with upper management and enforcing standards.

Key Responsibilities:
Data Management and Preparation: Identify, evaluate, cleanse, and organize disparate data sources. Identify data sources available and collect primary data where necessary. - Understand and assess the value of data sources based on our organizational need. Prepare and structure data within our systems for analysis.
Data Analysis: Administer and maintain our models, dashboards and reporting tools for distribution of analysis. Support and automate the ongoing analysis of trends and key performance metrics. Perform ad hoc analysis as assigned and identify new opportunities for value-add analytics as needed.
Collaboration: Work across functions to understand the nuances of our data from across the organization and external sources. Seek to understand the data and analytical needs of our stakeholders. Work closely with the IT organization to manage and maintain data within our systems.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree with 5 years of experience with data analytics; OR Master’s degree with 3 years of experience with data analytics.
Experience developing queries, analyzing data and developing reports, dashboards and data insights
Experience with data visualization/modeling related tools such as: Power BI, Tableau, Raw, QlikView, Spotfire, etc.
Utilizing programming languages such as: Python, R, C/C++, JAVA, or other similar languages
Using reporting tools and querying languages such as: SQL, SAS, Crystal Reports, SAP Hana, or similar
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in the medical device, pharma, biotech, or healthcare related industries
Experience with electronic Quality Management Systems (ETQ Reliance, Sparta TrackWise, Pilgrim SmartSolve, CATSWeb, etc)
Knowledge and experience with Quality Systems (e.g. CAPAs, NCRs, Complaints, etc)
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Results-oriented, positive “can-do” attitude with demonstration of appropriate urgency and initiative
Detail-oriented, producing high quality work
Ability to influence and build strong relationships is essential
Strong ability to manage and work with different cultures and nationalities
Ability to manage competing and evolving priorities in a fast-paced environment
Ability to adapt to new technologies and rapidly changing environment
Participate in project communications, training materials, and business procedures/documentation
Edwards is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer including protected Veterans and individuals with disabilities.",3.7,"Edwards Lifesciences
3.7","Irvine, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1958,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
69,Safety Data Analyst,"$41k-$74k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview

Support the collection, analysis and audit of safety data and supporting documentation for the department. Ensure safety, reliability, and performance goals for the customers and stations are observed.

Responsibilities

Track and trend SRC (Security, regulatory, and compliance) damage investigations as directed
Track and trend quality control audits at warehouses, ramps, and operations areas.
Produce quality reporting documentation for management review and action as required through:
PowerPoint Presentations
Charts
Graphs
WBAT
Acquire an understanding of ground operations including Loadmaster, Hazardous Materials, deicing, fueling, special loads, catering, security, etc. to obtain and coordinate the collection and analysis of data in each area.
Audit various operational departments in areas such as Training Records, Manual Content/Revision
Comply with all Company procedures as outlined in manuals, bulletins, and memos.
Perform all job duties in a timely and efficient manner.

Qualifications

Bachelor's Degree Required
Excel and/or Tableau experience required
Microsoft Suite experience; including PowerPoint required
Must possess a valid passport.
Must be willing to travel (25%)
Strong oral and written communication required
Self-Starter
Auditing experience a plus
Aviation experience a plus

The Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer. It is our policy to afford equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, citizenship, place of birth, age, disability, protected veteran status, gender identity or any other characteristic or status protected by applicable in accordance with federal, state and local laws.

If you'd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please download the available EEO is the Law document at http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm.

To view our Pay Transparency Statement, please click here: Pay Transparency Statement

#GH19

PI123925562",2.8,"Atlas Air, Inc
2.8","Miami, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Charter Air Travel,Travel & Tourism,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
70,SAP Data Analyst,"$75k-$100k
(Employer Est.)","POSITION PURPOSE:

The Data Analyst will be part of the OWI Analytic team, working closely with our business partners, proactively developing and delivering analytic solutions. The primary deliverables include creating data visualization such as Dashboards, Charts, Histograms and Projective Analysis. This will be accomplished by utilizing OWI data architecture, data workflows from local data sources.

OWI is a fast-paced and dynamic organization. Individuals will be handling multiple activities in a team as well as individual contributor environment.

DUTIES, TASKS AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Experience and expertise creating visualizations that provide business insights for our global customers. Examples: Pie Charts, Dashboards, Cash-flow projections with Histograms– Projections analysis– Financial Analysis – KPI’s Service level Agreements
Expertise in SQL, independently mine data to translate Business data needs into creative visualizations.
Performance tuning specific to Tableau data sets– requires in depth understanding of data.
Assist the Enterprise Data Warehouse team create, design data models that will be published to our Tableau environment.
Assess data quality, design data quality management procedures, clean and correct data quality defects, establish data governance.
Experienced utilizing HANA studio including calculations and analytical views, data base schemas, creating attribute user/role creation.
Assist setting up security, Analytic privileges, user integration services, SQL script, SLT, SDA, SDI and HANA Live solution models.
Demonstrate critical thinking, analytical skills, and employ judgment to offer thoughtful, concise input toward resolutions of problems.
Assist team building the BW4HANA modeler including standard and custom development and deployment of EWD design building BW objects e.g. Composite Providers, Advanced DSO’s, ODS Views, Data Sources, Data Loading using SLT.
Requires the skill set to work with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams and data analysts/scientists to develop data visualizations that provide business insights
Finance/Operations/Sales/Marketing/IT functional leads PTP/PTM/RTR etc.
Projects management capabilities - include requirements gathering, design, deployment, and change request, future enhancements management
Capabilities to build/design prototypes to demo to stakeholders - peer groups, Business partners, and senior leaders.
Training and support peers and stakeholders e.g. Subject Matter Expert (SME) throughout the report creations and support - troubleshooting, analysis of results.
Leadership skills needed to successfully promote ideas, coordinate work activities, and plan deliverables within a project team.


SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITIES:


Advanced expert database handling languages (SQL and variants)
Experience with data analytics, diagrams, data dictionary, data mapping, normalize de-normalize, agile data modeling
Practical skill sets in BI and Data visualization tools
Working knowledge of ETL
Working knowledge of SAP
Basic Project Management and Business Process modeling
Minimum Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering Technology, Computer Science, or closely related field.
A minimum of 3 years’ experience in Tableau, SAP Data Governance, SAP Data Services (Data Extract, Data Profiling, de-duplication)
Advanced competency in Tableau and Alteryx
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with a strong focus on the ability to clearly articulate and discuss technical issues with both technical and business personnel.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, Math or a related IT field or equivalent work experience in an IT field required
Strong analytical skills, able to effectively solve problems in a timely manner",3.1,"Old World Industries
3.1","Northbrook, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
71,SAP Materials Master Data Analyst - Temp,"$58k-$93k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This is a 6 month temporary assignment.

The Mizuho OSI Way

In 1978, we set out to change the way patients undergo surgery. As a Mizuho OSI customer, you can expect our commitment to the following…

We commit to your satisfaction. If you are dissatisfied, we will strive to make it right.

We do things the right way. We commit to hire people with competence, generosity and a caring attitude. We motivate our employees to use their individual strengths to provide creative solutions, changes, and innovations. We anticipate your needs through customer experiences, thus nurturing our relationships.

Collectively, this creates an environment that enables and inspires healthcare professionals to improve the lives of patients.

Dare to go further. Care to do more.

TOP REASONS TO JOIN THE MIZUHO OSI TEAM
Privately held company with a tradition of market leadership and best-in-class innovation
Fast-paced entrepreneurial culture focused on dramatically improving patient outcomes through personal empowerment
Emphasis on continuous improvement and celebration of our values of R.E.S.P.E.C.T. and the Mizuho Way.
Create innovative solutions designed and manufactured at our HQ in Northern California
POSITION OVERVIEW
The ideal candidate will have a minimum of 1 to 2 full life cycle SAP implementations and have participated or have led roles in blueprint activities, creating SOP, work instructions and training users to maintenance and sustain the master data. In addition be a savvy self-directed and capable individual who’s accustomed to delivering time critical work products.
Bachelor's degree in business, and or in systems applications such as SAP Modules or equivalent work experience
Experience with full life cycle SAP implementations
Formal training or experience with ASAP implementation methodology
Excellent written and oral communication skills
We are looking for you, if you have the ability to:
Hold meetings on Material Master and Item Master Data Management.
Assist with refining Business Process Design for Item Material Master including tactical MDM process.
Coordinate with functional disciplines in OPS/SCM and their IT counterparts.
Identify MDM Classifications of data and assist with identifying local data attributes.
Assist with the MDM governance model, including documenting processes with identified data owners, master process owners and SAP module owners.
Assist with identifying KPIs to improve quality and productivity.
Assist with workflows within MDM tool.
Here is what you will do day-to-day
Analyze business process requirements, design a solution approach in close collaboration with business teams
Write functional specifications and advise business teams of feasible solution designs
Work with IT in unit test efforts and with business in regression test efforts
Deliver BPP and solution documentation for implemented solutions
Work with functional teams (SD, MM, PP, FICO, QM)
Application Configuration and Support
Support SAP modules to meet business needs.
Unit test SAP software applications, including customizations and interfaces
Application Analysis and Design
Assist SAP users analyze and identify business process requirements.
Develop SAP functional application designs and specifications, individually or collaboratively.
Work as a member of cross-functional teams and add value by providing a technical perspective.
Guide Application Developers by recommending ways to design and unit-test applications. (SAP - PLM)
Change Management and Support
Provide QA function by reviewing/testing developer’s work.
Guide users in integrated testing, conference room pilot activities and applications startup activities.
Facilitate the process of change by clarifying new procedures and training system users.
Project Management and Control
Manage small projects, with responsibility for the quality and timeliness of project deliverables
Direct project resources and/or recommend and create internal development procedures and methodologies.
Understand scope and planned estimates of undertaken activities and manage actual time relative to the planned estimates.
Problem Solving:
Plays a key role in the Order to Cash team in the full project lifecycle, from the business blueprint of the project to post support.
Works with business analysts, business SMEs and various process owners to analyze their requirements: prepare and participate in workshops, requirement documentation, functional specifications and configuration documentation.
Provides support for Data extraction, data cleansing and loading
Works closely with IT resources for non-standard SAP objects.
Supports the development of test scripts and provide process expertise during test execution.
Assists and supports training document creation.
Finalizes the MDM configuration element s and triggers and support the solution after implementation.
Understand, follow and support Mizuho OSI’s internal Quality System policies, procedures and work instructions including but not limited to applicable external regulations (21 Code of Federal Regulations Part 820 Quality System Regulations and applicable International Standards).
What you will need to be successful in this role:
A minimum of 5 years of SAP process and configuration experience in Sales & Distribution, Materials Management, Production Planning and Quality Management modules and MDM.
Experience in at least 2 full life cycle implementations of SAP.
Experience in supporting all phases of SAP project life cycle including blueprint, design, build, test, deployment and support.
Experience in developing blueprint documentation, functional designs, test plans and scenarios as well as executing the tests.
Experience in and data validations during testing and implementation
Strong knowledge/experience in 1 additional SAP module is a must.
Experience with integration testing and implementation.
Thorough business understanding of Supply Chain processes.
Familiarity with SAP architecture.
Strong verbal and written communications skills, with an ability to express complex business concepts in technical terms.
Strong analytical, problem solving, and conceptual skills.
Strong interpersonal skills; ability to work well on cross functional project teams.
Experience in the construction and distribution industry.
What you need to be prepared for:

The physical demands are representative of those needed to perform the essential functions of the job in an office environment. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

NOTE: This job description in no way states or implies that these are the only duties or functions to be performed by the incumbent. Employees will be required to follow any other job-related instructions and to perform any other job-related duties/functions requested by their supervisor.",3.7,"Mizuho OSI
3.7","Union City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
72,Lead IT Analyst - Data Governance,"$46k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About JLG, an Oshkosh company

JLG began in 1969, when our founder, John L. Grove set out to resolve growing safety concerns in the construction industry. Since then we have been committed to understanding the challenges and delivering innovative solutions to the access market. We partner with customers to provide quality equipment, training opportunities and trusted support within the access industry. We are a global company, and our products—including mobile elevating work platforms, telehandlers, utility vehicles and accessories—can be found all over the world.

JOB SUMMARY:

The Lead IT Analyst - Data Governance will lead the full life-cycle of data governance solutions including, creation of data governance policies and procedures, engaging and training data stewards, creation of quality metrics, and working with users to identify and track personally identifiable and other regulated information. This role will work on simple to complex projects and lead and facilitate governance efforts, including coordinating activities with internal and external resources. These activities will contribute to an environment of reliable, quality data to drive better decisions through analytics and reporting within the business.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:

These duties are not meant to be all-inclusive and other duties may be assigned.

Collaborate with business and information technology partners, and subject matter experts to understand data challenges to put the required processes in place to address those challenges.
Work with the Project Management Office to continuously improve testing methodologies related to projects and other activities.
Work with other Digital Technology teams to implement and update on-going production quality process and validations.
Ensure timely corrective actions taken to resolve identified data quality issues, including future mitigation.
Develop and maintain data governance and data quality strategies and oversight of the activities to enact those strategies.
Provide project updates and report on progress of data governance, data quality and control remediation activities
Perform extensive data profiling across the data portfolio to assess current state data quality.
Work with Data Architecture to implement data standards in response to data quality issues, needs and findings.
Evaluate tools including prototyping new capabilities to stay abreast of the Data Management industry.
Lead continuous improvement activities and promote adherence of current department standards.
Guide, mentor, and assist less experienced team members.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent.
Seven (7) or more years of experience in Data Analysis, Information Technology, or in a related area.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Experience using data governance, data quality, data catalog and data privacy solutions.
Relevant industry training or certifications with data governance tools and other related data management tools.
Ability to translate business and technical requirements into data solutions.
Knowledge of key data management processes.
Experience in project life-cycle management.
Excellent organizational skills and ability to communicate with internal/external entities.
Experience and proficiency with various web-based software applications including Microsoft Office Word, Excel, PowerPoint, SharePoint, etc.

WORKING CONDITIONS:

Physical Demands: Frequent Sitting, Hearing, Talking, Visual, Typing, Manual Dexterity; Seldom Standing, Walking/Running, Reaching, Driving, Bending/Kneeling, Fine Dexterity, Upper Extremity Repetitive Motion, and Lifting/Carrying and Pushing/Pulling up to 40lbs.

#LI-KP1
USA100
Oshkosh is committed to working with and offering reasonable accommodation to job applicants with disabilities. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to disability for any part of the employment process, please contact us at: 920-502-3009 or corporatetalentacquisition@oshkoshcorp.com.

Oshkosh Corporation is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. This company will provide equal opportunity to all individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status. Information collected regarding categories as provided by law will in no way affect the decision regarding an employment application.

Oshkosh Corporation will not discharge or in any manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with Oshkosh Corporation's legal duty to furnish information.

Certain positions with Oshkosh Corporation require access to controlled goods and technologies subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulations or the Export Administration Regulations. Applicants for these positions may need to be ""U.S. Persons,"" as defined in these regulations. Generally, a ""U.S. Person"" is a U.S. citizen, lawful permanent resident, or an individual who has been admitted as a refugee or granted asylum.",4.2,"Oshkosh Corporation
4.2","Hagerstown, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
73,Data and Policy Analyst - Statistical Programmer,"$69k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

At Acumen, LLC / The SPHERE Institute, Data and Policy Analysts provide analytical support for research and consulting projects for government and private clients, primarily in the area of health policy. This position is responsible for managing and analyzing data, researching and interpreting policy, and communicating findings to multiple audiences.

Data and Policy Analysts perform a wide array of functions as part of the research process. Those applicants interested in focusing on statistical programming help create and report descriptive statistic, conduct econometric and statistical analyses of data using statistical software such as SAS and STATA, interpret study specifications, research findings, and quantitative analyses for relevant audiences, develop research files from large confidential datasets, and perform other duties as assigned.

Required Skills

As we review your materials, we are looking for candidates who best exemplify the following qualifications:

Qualifications Required:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative, public policy, or related field or equivalent relevant experience
Good quantitative analytical skills
Good oral and written communication skills
Good organizational skills and strong attention to detail
Familiar with one or more of the following technical competencies: statistics, programming, policy writing, research methods documentation, or project management
Able to demonstrate initiative, critical thinking, and problem-solving
Able to work in a team-oriented environment
Able to prioritize tasks and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment
Demonstrated aptitude and enthusiasm for learning
Qualifications Desired:
Demonstrated interest in health and social policy
Master's degree in a quantitative, public policy, or related field or equivalent relevant experience
Any application without a cover letter will not be considered. Transcripts and coding samples are not required, however highly preferred and may be requested. We ask that you submit an application for only one office location. We are excited to review your application and look forward to seeing how you may best contribute to our work.

Job Location

Washington, District of Columbia, United States

Position Type

Full-Time/Regular",3.4,"Acumen
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
74,Data Analyst,-1,"A top growing company in San Diego in the logistics space is seeking a solid Date Analyst to join their team.This is a salaried position, with the opportunity to bring fresh ideas to help make critical business decisions as we continue our accelerated growth! This company has been recognized as best places to work, exceptional growth and offers so MANY amazing perks and benefits, include nice base comp and upward mobility.

Responsibilities:

Work with cross functional teams to aggregate data and conduct data analysis
Conduct data analysis and develop required information as needed
Manage multiple deliverable, projects & associated team communications
Miscellaneous responsibilities associated with a growing private company.
Complete client invoicing monthly.

Qualifications & Experience:

Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting, Finance, MIS, or quantitative area preferred.
Related experience: 2-4 years of data analysis experience preferred.
Advanced skills in Excel: formulas, Vlookups, and pivot tables.
Some VBA, Tableau and SQL knowledge a plus.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills, must have the ability to analyze data, detect trends and errors and make needed corrections.
Self-starter who can be productive and make progress while working independently and within a team.
Strong desire and willingness to learn and implement modeling techniques.
Transportation Industry knowledge a plus.
Flexibility – be part of a small company.
Support changing objectives, client needs and workload.

#hotjobs",4.7,"Boutique Recruiting
4.7","San Diego, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
75,Quality Assurance Analyst- Data Warehouse,"$24k-$45k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description/Job Summary

Summary/Objective

The QA Analyst is responsible for performing quality assurance duties throughout the data warehouse development life cycle. This position will work closely with our project team: business analysts, subject matter experts, store/manufacturing field leaders, managers, and developers to assist in analysis of data integration and data transformation as well as defined and ad-hoc company reports. They will be a champion of our data and reports, helping to identify and resolve any data discrepancies within the data warehouse or reporting for the company. This position demonstrates and promotes innovation, and proactively seeks out automated solutions to business problems. They should create and built upon reusable test collateral on the knowledge foundation of the reporting solution. They should consult with data/business owners and teammates to identify all facets of an issue to help generate a solution as well as understand the potential impacts to processes and systems across the organization to create test scenarios.

Responsibilities/Duties

Essential Functions

Participate in discovery meetings, provide estimates, analyze and validate project requirements and technical specifications, perform impact analysis and document key issues.
Review requirements and technical design documents with developers / analysts to confirm expected functionality and business needs.
Drive BI testing including Functional Testing, Data Validation, Regression Testing, System Integration Testing, Automated Testing and User Acceptance Testing.
Determine test environment and test data requirements, often in concert with integrated systems owners.
Develop the test strategy and manage the testing effort.
Responsible for writing and executing test cases, mapping test cases to requirements, documentation and tracking defects and issues.
Resolve issues found in testing and develop benchmarks for testing data and provide metrics reporting on test execution and defects.
Troubleshoot job failures with developers, where necessary.
Evaluate data changes and anomalies against previous tends and benchmarks. Provide guidance to resolve variances. Develop strategy for continuous monitoring of data quality.
Communicate with Team regarding project readiness, status and potential risks. Document, quantify, and elevate risks as appropriate.
Development of BI and automated and re-usable reporting testing processes.
Develop trending reports and data quality metrics for reporting.

Required Experience

Competencies
1-3 years of experience in QA or similar technical role.
Knowledge of relational databases with the ability to extract data as necessary.
Knowledge of Software testing processes and automated tools, with an ability to apply software testing methods and techniques in a business intelligence environment.
Ability to deliver assigned work tasks within project timelines.
Able to communicate technical concepts to non-technical people in both written and verbal communication.
Able to speak with business customers to understand and define a problem.
Able to use problem solving skills to indentify alternative solutions and approaches to a problem along with costs and benefits of each (tangible or intangible)
Able to learn new busniness concepts quickly.
Able to estimate task completion time with reasonable accuracy.
Effectivly work in a collaborative environment across functional teams.

Preferred Experience

Experience in writing advanced SQL statements in order to test data loads and reporting.
Past ownership in the development of test planning and execution in a project setting.
Experience with QA automation tools.
Experience developing and documenting software use cases, testing and reporting results.

Preferred Education

Bachelor's degree in related field is preferred along with 3 years of relevant work experience. Data Warehouse/Business Intelligence (MicroStrategy) is a Plus.

Details

Supervisory Responsibility
This position currently has no supervisory responsibility.

84 Lumber reserves the right to assign or reassign duties and responsibilities to this job at any time.",4.1,"84 Lumber Company
4.1","Eighty Four, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1956,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
76,Digital Transformation and Data Analyst (Claims),"$40k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Are You Driven?® We Are.

We are a company of driven, enthusiastic and determined people. We celebrate achievement and success. We foster innovation, determination and recognition. Because of that, our employees feel recognized and rewarded for the contributions they make on a daily basis. At GAINSCO, It is our people that set us apart.

If you are looking for a place where you can make a difference, perceive how your work impacts the company, and be recognized for your efforts and passion, then GAINSCO is the company for you.

Why Join GAINSCO?

By joining GAINSCO, you become part of a dynamic and growing organization that has been recognized as a Top Workplace in both our Dallas and Miami offices.

GAINSCO’s work environment rewards engaged individuals who have a desire to contribute and succeed. That’s because our culture encourages individuals to grow their skills as they build their careers. Come join us and become a champion with GAINSCO.

What does a DIGITAL TRANSFORMATION& DATA ANALYST (CLAIMS) do?
Uncover and communicate performance trends and actionable insights to the business.
Leverage data insights and incorporate these findings to accelerate the digital transformation efforts of the Claims Department.
Complete ad-hoc analysis and offer recommendations based on your findings.
Proactively collaborate with all levels of the Claims organization and offer data-focused support to any relevant business challenges.
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop, implement and maintain business monitoring reports
Perform data validation and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and data quality/accuracy
Work with IT to maintain accessibility to databases/data systems
Additional projects as requested
What is required?

Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Risk Management, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics or Actuarial.
Experience:
1-2 years of working experience as a data analyst preferred
Ability to identify potentially hidden trends and communicate actionable insights based on your findings.
Experience working within an Auto Insurance Claims department is preferred.
Advanced skills in performing mathematical calculations
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Advanced computer skills, specifically in databases and spreadsheets (Excel, SAS, MSSQL preferred, Python, R)
Experience with Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence is preferred.
Excellent written and verbal communication
Excellent organization skills
Other skills and abilities:
A strong desire to be a part of the conversations that result in improving business processes and results.
Ability to communicate and simplify the complex with a wide variety of stakeholders.
Ability to manage own time while prioritizing multiple tasks
Required behaviors for all positions:
Communicate with co-workers, management, customers, vendors, and others in a courteous and professional manner
Conform with and abide by all Company codes, regulations, policies, values, work procedures and instructions
Regular attendance
What else do you need to know?
Competitive Salary based on experience.
Excellent benefits package: medical& dental (Basic plan FREE), vision insurance, life insurance, short term and long term disability insurance.
Parental Leave Policy.
401K + Company Match.
Paid Vacation + Sick days + Floating Holidays + Company determined Holidays.
All offers are contingent upon a background investigation (including employment, education, criminal and DMV verification- when applicable) and a pre-employment drug test with results satisfactory to GAINSCO.",3.7,"GAINSCO
3.7","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
77,"Senior Data Analyst, Marketing","$54k-$96k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Why We Need You

As part of the PEMCO Brand & Communications team, the Senior Data Analyst plays a critical role in making our marketing and communications efforts intelligent, efficient, and competitive. We’re looking for someone who can work with every member of the marketing organization to understand our data and turn raw numbers and research findings into compelling narratives and strategic recommendations.

In this role, you’ll collaborate cross-functionally to identify prospects and customers for targeted campaigns. You’ll conduct competitive research to identify gaps and opportunities in customer experiences, product mix, marketing strategies, and more. And you’ll create and review reports to identify strategic opportunities, monitor our sales funnel and forecast its performance, and own team reports including our comprehensive dashboard.

What You'll Be Doing
Work directly with users to gather requirements, provide status updates, and build relationships
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Identify trends and opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets
Evaluate for efficiency, problems, and inaccuracies, developing and maintaining protocols for handling, processing, and cleaning data
Develop, implement, and maintain analytic systems
Develop source-to-target mappings and information-model specification documents for data sets
Define and implement data acquisition and integration logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools within defined technology stack to ensure optimal scalability and performance of the solution
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources
Work closely with project managers to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Demonstrate behaviors consistent with PEMCO's policies, values, code of ethics, and business conduct
Authentically support the PEMCO Brand and constantly are on the lookout for top talent to join us to achieve our Mission to Worry Less and Live More
Other duties as assigned
What You'll Bring
B.A. or B.S. degree or equivalent work experience (Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, or Statistics) is required
6 years of experience in a data analyst role is required
One (1+) years of experience in working with automated testing tools (Quick Test Professional / Selenium)
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, Access is required
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in MS Visio is required
Excellent written communications skills sufficient to write systems documentation, reports, and business correspondences in an organized and concise fashion is required
Ability to verbally present complex concepts and technical information to a non-technical audience is required
Communicates clearly and informatively, verbally and in writing, with colleagues, customers, and the community in both technical and non-technical professional language is required
Passionate about working with disparate datasets bringing data together to answer business questions
Collaborates to create, manage, and translate data to meaningful insights. Can work with external vendors to integrate data for analysis; knows how to build efficient and scalable infrastructure and data models
Ability to analyze, diagnose and resolve complex unstructured problems quickly, efficiently, and collaboratively
We've Got You Covered
Competitive salary
200% match on your 401(k) up to 6% of your pay
Generous medical, dental, disability and life insurance plans
A friendly, professional work environment
The opportunity to work at a place of integrity, where customer service is emphasized
At PEMCO, we celebrate and support our differences. We know employing a team rich in diverse thoughts, experiences, and opinions allows our employees, our products and our community to flourish. PEMCO is honored to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are dedicated to equal employment opportunities regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation or Veteran status.",4.3,"PEMCO Insurance
4.3","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1949,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
78,Sr. HR Data Analyst,"$59k-$100k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Who is Cenlar? You are.

Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Sr. HR Data Analyst.

Job Summary:

The Sr. HR Data Analyst is responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies related to Human Resources. This role identifies and aggregates complex dataset using a combination of tools, such as, SQL, VBA, PowerShell, and MS Access. This role should have knowledge of statistical models/algorithms using Python as the primary programming language.

Responsibilities:
Identifies, analyzes, and interprets trends or patterns with HR data sets and makes recommendations for business and process improvement
Analyzes processes and data by extracting data from various data warehouse environments
Develops reports and dashboards using various reporting and visualization tools to meet business needs
Understands ongoing requests and translates them into reports for team members and other stakeholders
Ability to design, develop, and execute ETL pipelines to automate ingestion of structured and unstructured data sources using a combination of PowerShell, SQL, Python, VBA, and other programming languages
Solid understanding of REST API architecture to implement interfaces that allow for the seamless data integration between our vendor systems and our internal databases
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Handles complex requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing and trend analysis
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, mathematics, statistical analysis, Human Resources, or related field, Master’s degree preferred with 5+ years of relevant and/or data engineering analytics experience
Working knowledge of SQL skills to perform complex data manipulation using multiple tables, queries, and subqueries in a database environment (i.e., SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL, DB2, MS Access, et al).
Strong background with at least an object-oriented/functional/scripting language (Python, Java, etc.)
Familiarity with CLI (CMD, bash, PowerShell, etc.)
Expertise with various ETL technologies and tools
Strong understanding of business logic for aggregation and analysis services
Experience with HRMS, such as ADP, ETime, Taleo, and Cornerstone, preferred
Ability to develop capabilities and/ or experiences in partnership with more experienced staff
Exceptional organization and time management skills, with the initiative and the desire to own problems from start to finish
Ability to flex and adapt to changing business needs, and use discretion when dealing with confidential information
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills with ability to work on several projects simultaneously
Passion to have an impact; Pro-active self-starter; Demonstrates a strong sense of urgency and responsiveness; Strong organizational and project management skills
Demonstrated track record of developing and successfully driving new initiatives through an organization to achieve business results
Total Rewards :

Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Visit www.cenlar.com for more details.

Please apply online .",2.5,"Cenlar
2.5","Yardley, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
79,Client Experience Data Analyst,"$40k-$74k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Client Experience Data Analyst
Location: Atlanta, GA
Department: Client Support
Type: Full Time
Min. Experience: 4+ years

Our Data Analyst will have a passion for using data to solve complex problems through root cause analysis, trend analysis and other analysis techniques. Their talent will be evident for finding compelling stories in customer, operational and financial data that inform the business with easy to follow conclusions and actionable recommendations. The story told will be objective to inform the business, no matter where the data takes them. This person enjoys the act of strategically thinking through the problem and then executing the analysis hands-on by manipulating large datasets using computer languages and analytics tools.

Our Data Analyst role will support the ongoing success of the OxBlue Client Experience team and support other reporting needs for the OxBlue Operations Team. This individual will provide insight and analysis to promote execution, productivity and the growth of OxBlue. In addition, you will be an advisor to OxBlue leadership through your analytics and reporting, to enhance the client experience and employee experience, with the objective of driving executional excellence throughout OxBlue.

As the Client Experience Data Analyst you would:
Provide reporting and commentary to the Vice President of Client Experience and other OxBlue senior leaders to drive business objectives such as improving client experience, employee engagement and profitable revenue growth
Identify, develop and maintain reporting around key success metrics
Develop self-service data tools
Analyze large amounts of information from multiple sources to discover trends and patterns and uncover solutions to business problems
Create models to forecast results of various enhancements to product, technology or procedural changes
Oversee data transmission and automation development, validation and maintenance from internal and external sources
Other analytical and process improvement projects as needed
You Have:
4+ years of related business, financial or data analytics experience
Strong organizational skills and high attention to detail to meet deadlines
Ability to work independently and with little supervision in a project management-like environment
Strong communication skills
1-3 year experience with a data visual program like PowerBI, Alteryx, Tableau or Qlik
Experience with survey tools
Enjoys researching and generating insights to solve problems
SQL coding proficiency
Bachelors degree (Finance, Math, Statistics, Business Administration, Analytics, IT or related field) preferred or equivalent experience
Bonus Points For:
Experience with the following survey tools: Satmetrix, Qualtrics, Medallia or Survey Monkey
Experience with using both customer experience and operations experience data to make recommendations for continuous improvement projects preferred
Our Perks:
Health insurance paid 100% for employee and 50% for family
Dental insurance paid 100% for employee
401k with company match
A fun work environment: casual dress, free snacks, complimentary massages and great parties
Investment in your professional development with internal promotions, continuing education, and tuition reimbursement
Paid sabbatical program: 4 weeks every 5 years
An award-winning culture recognized for its high level of employee satisfaction
Long-term disability paid 100% for employee
Life/AD&D
Paid Parental leave
The above summary of benefits is subject to change, is for informational purposes only and does not create any contract rights to benefits.

If you have what it takes and are looking for a company committed to the success of its clients and its people, we want to hear from you.

Diversity and Inclusion are important to OxBlue. We value the diversity of thought that comes from working with people from varied backgrounds. Our continuous improvement and ability to serve our customers depend on creating a workplace that brings out the best in everyone. Thats why we are committed to continuing to create an atmosphere of positivity, happiness and inclusion.",4.4,"OxBlue Corporation
4.4","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
80,Associate Analyst Data Warehouse,"$43k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Location 18101 SE 6th Way, Vancouver, Washington Job Type Full-time regular

Summary and Qualifications:

The primary purpose and function of the Associate Analyst Data Warehouse is to participate in Tier 1 Data Warehouse and Analytic production support including as a liaison between end users and the data warehouse team and management of the support intake site. The position will also assist with validating acceptance criteria, performing data quality tests as well as performance testing.

Essential Responsibilities and Tasks:

Live and exemplify the Five Principles of Mars, Inc. within self and team.
Provide Tier 1 support to business users using the following skills: data mining/SQL skills, strong analytic skills to work backwards from problem to solution, ability to read and interpret PL/SQL.
Build and maintain strong collaboration with our upstream and downstream partners.
Manage Data Warehouse Team support intake site and backlog.
Administer technical debt backlog to ensure forward progress.
Partner with architects and developers to translate business requirements into technical specifications.
Assist with validating acceptance criteria and service level agreements are being met by solutions provided by data engineers.
Perform system diagnostics, troubleshooting and performance testing.
Test the usability of data (speed and ease of querying, readability of our documentation, etc.) to provide optimal user experience and decrease support needs.
Develop/maintain reporting for data warehouse performance metrics.
Other job duties as assigned.

Special Working Conditions:

Ability to work at a computer for long periods of time.
Project timelines and work volume / deadlines may often require more than 40 hours per week to complete essential duties of this job.
Must have mental processes for reasoning, remembering, mathematics and language ability (reading, writing, and speaking the English language) to perform the duties proficiently.
Ability to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral, or diagram form and to solve problems involving several variables.
Ability to stand, walk, stoop, kneel, crouch, and climb as well as manipulate (lift, carry, move) up to 50 pounds.
Requires good hand-eye coordination, arm-hand-finger dexterity with the ability to grasp, and visual acuity to use a keyboard and operate necessary equipment.
The noise level in the work environment is normally moderate.
Environment where pets are present.

Experience, Education and/or Training:

Bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Business or related field is required, or the equivalent combination of education, training and experience that provides the required knowledge, skills, and abilities.
Experience using data warehouse or analytics tools for business purposes is required.
Oracle SQL or SQL Server is required.
Exposure to Microsoft Power BI or other analytics tools, Oracle PL/SQL, experience collaborating across multiple business functions is preferred.

WE ARE A DRUG-FREE, SMOKE-FREE, EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER.

Banfield Pet Hospital® strongly supports and values the uniqueness of all individuals and promotes a work environment where diversity is embraced. Banfield Pet Hospital is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, genetic information, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability. Banfield Pet Hospital complies with all applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every Banfield location.",3.1,"Banfield Pet Hospital
3.1","Vancouver, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1955,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
81,Data Analyst,"$43k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Summary:

Develop, implement, and maintain leading-edge analytic systems, taking complicated problems and building simple frameworks
Identify trends and opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets
Evaluate organizational methods and provide source-to-target mappings and information-model specification documents for data sets
Create best-practice reports based on data mining, analysis, and visualization
Evaluate internal systems for efficiency, problems, and inaccuracies, developing and maintaining protocols for handling, processing, and cleaning data
Work directly with management and users to gather requirements, provide status updates, and build relationships
Work closely with project managers to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources
Define and implement data and integration logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools within defined technology stack to ensure optimal scalability and performance of the solution
Develop and maintain databases by acquiring data from primary and secondary sources, and build scripts that will make our data evaluation process more flexible or scalable across data sets (1.) Suggest design solutions (2.) To participate and facilitate the walkthrough’ to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements. (3.) To prepare the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and storage. (4.) To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (5.) To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.

Required Education and Experience:

Bachelor's degree in a related field and 2 years’ experience in Business Intelligence (BI) or Data Warehouses and 2 years’ experience working with SQL and Access. Four additional years of related experience will be considered in lieu of a Bachelor's degree.
5 years experience in quantitative analysis and statistical modeling (regression, correlation, clustering, etc.).
4 year of experience consulting or experience in a similar field requiring client collaboration, presentation, and delivery.
3 years experience using analytics tools and languages R, Python, SAS, Oracle and SQL etc.
3 years experience combining data sets, extracting key variables, and creating new variables to enhance modeling.
3 years experience performing basic ETL functions and understanding of data quality steps/measures.
US Citizen; no dual citizenship.
Minimum of a Secret Interim clearance to start (Day 1 requirement).
CompTIA Security+ certification required to start (Day 1 requirement).
Adept at using Access, Excel, Power Point and Word.
General Data Warehouse / Business Intelligence knowledge including data modeling and Key Performance Indicators (PKIs) preferably in the SAP Business Objects environment.
AWS experience highly desired

#ind#

CDO is an Equal Opportunity Employer",3.3,"CDO Technologies Inc
3.3","San Antonio, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
82,Senior Data Analyst,"$40k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Senior Data Analyst*
Responsibilities will focus on providing detailed financial and operational reporting as well as enhancing, creating and analysis of key performance indications via push reporting form a data warehouse.

DUTIES
Maintain the data warehouse, the data warehouse infrastructure, ETL pipelines from enterprise systems to the data warehouse, and the integrity of the data therein.
Hands-on experience working with MS SQL Server (MySQL, Hive and SSIS are a plus)
Building SQL reports and dashboards that interpret data to expose patterns and trends.
Automating the collection of data from available sources while identifying new opportunities for automation.
Assist in developing and tracking relevant business metrics that help drive business success, as well as the periodic communications of those metrics to key stakeholders.
Help with in-depth periodic analysis of business metrics and variance analysis.
Ensure all data warehouse reporting reconciles to existing management systems.
Aid in the preparation and development of detailed budgets and forecasts, including P&L, cash flow, and balance sheet projections on a monthly, quarterly and annual basis.
Complete ad hoc analysis as needed.
Provide input to the management team as needed.
QUALIFICATIONS
Degree in accounting, finance or quantitative discipline preferred.
Minimum of 3 years’ experience in FP&A, Business Analytics or Corporate Strategy
STARTING SALARY RANGE: $75,000

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Analytics, Strategy or FP&A: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.hmespecialists.com
Work Remotely:
No",3.2,"HME SPECIALISTS, LLC
3.2","Albuquerque, NM",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
83,"Data & Reporting Analyst, Finance (San Francisco, CA)","$64k-$118k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Earnest empowers people with the financial capital they need to live better lives.

We're an accomplished team of technology, finance, and design geeks who believe consumer lending can be radically improved and are doing something about it. We are disrupting the trillion dollar student loan industry by redefining what it means to be creditworthy. We created a company that combines data science, streamlined design, and technology to:
Build products that simplify the lending process
Personalize loans to suit the needs of our customers
Engage with our customers through more human experiences
Our culture is one that values transparency and blameless problem solving. Earnest has a strong track record of employee growth and career progression. Earnies are empathetic, product-focused, proactive, and curious.

As the Data and Reporting Analyst on the Finance team, you will report to the Portfolio Reporting Manager. You will work with the Finance, Product, Operations, Legal and Analytics teams to analyze and help steward the information that drives the visibility of key financial metrics and initiatives at Earnest.

What You'll Do:
Operationalize Finance team and partner data processes by developing self-service reporting tools that guide management reporting, financial reporting, and compliance reporting
Automate processes through development/integration of custom data management and reporting solutions using programming languages such as Python or R
Generate SQL scripts, database objects, stored procedures and other forms of database automation to improve efficiency of the financial and management reporting functions
Provide quantitative and data-driven support to ad-hoc reporting requests
Build interactive dashboards using BI reporting tools like Tableau, R Studio, and Looker
Work with Earnest product and infrastructure teams, plus third-party service providers to ensure the accuracy of data used for financial reporting
Perform data integrity and data quality validations on source data sets to assess completeness and conformity
Ideal background and expertise:
BA/BS in Accounting, Finance, Economics, Computer Science or a related field
4+ years of analytical experience in financial services or financial technology preferred, which would include
2+ years of experience in financial services, e.g. fintech, commercial banking, investment banking, or mortgage banking
Advanced Knowledge of Microsoft excel (can perform complex functions)
2+ years of experience in database management and SQL in a standard relational database context, e.g. querying, creating, editing, dropping database objects
1+ years of experience using Python in a data management use case
Working knowledge of tools such as R Studio, Tableau, and Looker
Earnest Perks &Benefits:
Health, Dental, & Vision benefits plus savings plans
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
401(k) plan to help you save for retirement plus a company match
Tuition reimbursement program
$1000 flight on each Earnie-versary to anywhere in the world and 25 days of annual PTO
Great culture with an awesome team
Earnest provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. Qualified applicants with criminal histories will be considered for the position in a manner consistent with the Fair Chance Ordinance.

#LI-MR1",3.8,"Earnest
3.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
84,Data Analyst,"$38k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Big Huge Games is looking for a qualified Data Analyst to help provide data insights to our games teams and upcoming BHG titles to assist them in making successful strategic and game direction decisions. This role works closely with our Product and Design teams to structure quantitative questions, gather player data, employ statistical methodology in analysis of the data, and construct insightful reporting and visualizations to communicate those results to the wider team.

Responsibilities
Provide reports and monitoring tools to assist team in daily game health assessment
Perform in-depth analysis of game metrics to inform and support both short and long-term product direction decisions
Communicate the results of analyses to the product team, game studio, and outside partners through data visualization and presentations
Qualifications
3-5 years experience with querying large complex data sets with SQL on relational databases
Several years experience performing quantitative analysis preferably with a games, web, or technology focus
High level of proficiency in data visualization tools such as Tableau, Excel, or equivalent
Passion for problem solving, from generating insightful questions to research, through presentation of results and follow-on steps
Track record of success working in fast-paced environments with shifting priorities and deadlines
Ability to work in both individual and team settings
Excellent organizational, communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, or another quantitative field
------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

About Big Huge Games:

Big Huge Games is a small, passionate team led by experienced game development veterans, proudly located just north of Baltimore, MD, who are excited about the rise of touchscreen platforms. We believe in hiring talented team members who enjoy working in a fun and positive environment.

The company was founded in March of 2013 by Brian Reynolds (Civilization II, Rise of Nations, FrontierVille) and a group of longtime collaborators. Big Huge Games is dedicated to ""Finding The Fun"" through rapid prototyping and a focus on great user experience.

In July 2015 we launched our first game, DomiNations, which was awarded “Editors Choice” in the app store and continues to be successful with audiences across the globe. In 2016 we were acquired by our publisher, Nexon, and now operate as a wholly-owned subsidiary, allowing us the stability of a larger studio but the feel of a smaller, indie game team.

Our goals are simple: Make great games, strive to always be improving, and live up to the motto you gotta have fun to make fun.

This a full-time position onsite at our studio in Timonium, MD.
Due to the circumstances surrounding COVID19 positions will begin remote before transitioning to onsite.

Applicants should download DomiNations on iOS or Android and be prepared to discuss the game.",4.9,"Big Huge Games
4.9","Timonium, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
85,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Senior Data Analyst*
ABOUT US*
For more than 20 years, WINFertility has been managing family-building benefits that are delivered with care and support by the highest quality providers. WIN is the largest, most experienced fertility benefit management company in the country. It offers inclusive family-building solutions to employers, health plans and individual patients. From integrated fertility management, including medical treatment, pharmacy and reproductive genetics, to surrogacy and adoption, WIN’s mission is to help build families by providing access to the best network doctors, technology and emotional support at the lowest cost.

WIN’s managed fertility programs include an integrated medical and pharmaceutical model that is unique to the industry. Its dedicated nurse care managers, all with experience in reproductive endocrinology clinics, guide employees through every step of their fertility journey, and are available 24/7.
POSITION SUMMARY*
This analytical position will develop data solutions to assist in the advancement of initiatives needed to support our business growth and operations across key customer segments. It includes the creation of analytical solutions used to manage operational programs and mentoring other data analytics resources on how to best provide value to the organization. The position will require building dashboards and visualizations through BI software to support business analytics and reporting.

The position will also serve as a proactive change agent within the business by understanding the long-term functions of the Data and Analytics Team and developing systems, databases, and other critical analytic tools needed to support the growing and complex nature of customer relationships.

The position is responsible for working closely with various internal teams to understand, define, and produce program related reports and analysis. Responsibilities include interpreting data, creating ad hoc reports, modifying and updating standard reports when applicable, perform statistical analysis, analyze data to forecast trends and conduct predictability outcomes. They will also participate in operations meetings, strategy sessions, and business reviews. He/she must possess knowledge and experience necessary to offer recommendations and propose solutions for complex business problems and/or systems enhancements.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES*
Responsible for creating business value for company by understanding data environment, designing data strategies, performing extract, transform, and load activities, and operationalizing models. Work closely with the team members and business partners to interpret the data and develop implement solutions that create visibility for internal management and operations across all customer programs. This position will require collaboration across the business to develop and implement data-driven solutions.
Support the development of customer-level metrics needed to manage operations with Clients. Manage the compilation, analysis, and reporting of data to forecast trends, apply various analytical techniques to support operational efficiency and productivity.
5+ years RDBMS experience (MySQL, PostgreSQL, SQL Server, Oracle, etc.); must have the ability to write complex, optimized queries across large volumes of data
5+ years of experience analyzing and manipulating data from a variety of production systems and data platforms required
Experience in query tuning and database engine optimization
Knowledge of ETL and data warehouse concepts and processes
Demonstrated ability to identify data quality issues and recommend the best course of action to address them
Experience translating data extractions and analyses into formats and outputs that other departments and clients can understand
Experience in Data Visualization tools like (e.g. Tableau, Business Objects, Cognos, Power BI, etc…) or other related tools
Problem solver with high attention to detail and superior organization and documentation skills
Design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and requests utilizing Business Objects, and other data visualization tools.
Document and understand project requirements, reporting data mapping and data warehouse repositories for assigned programs.
Complete full documentation of reports developed utilizing Business Requirement Documents
Receive and respond to data requests to ensure projects in queue are accurately prioritized, designed, estimated and delivered to all shareholders
Ensure reports are scheduled, audited and delivered according to agreed upon expectations and established Service Level Agreements (SLAs).
Develop and execute acceptance test plans (UAT) to ensure data warehouse structures, universes, and associated data accurately meet business requirements.
Other responsibilities and projects, as directed.
QUALIFICATIONS*
Minimum Requirements*
5+ years of healthcare data management experience or 2+ years of advanced healthcare analytics experience
Critical Skills*
3+ years' experience in analytics or data related fields.
Strong knowledge of SQL and statistical packages (SAS, SPSS, STATA etc.).
Ability to design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and delivered according to client expectations and established SLAs.
Knowledge of healthcare industry with the ability to review all program data, perform analysis, notice trends, research and suggest solutions.
Significant data mining, analysis, and reporting experience, and demonstrated experience with IT and/or operations project management.
Experience in predictive modeling and machine learning.
Ability to lead and conduct customer meetings and understand business needs.
Advanced Microsoft Office experience (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, MS Project), Visio, SharePoint, and Business Objects.
Additional Knowledge & Skills*
Healthcare reporting experience, highly desired
Excellent written and verbal communication, and presentation skills
Exercise excellent judgment within defined standards and guidelines to manage conflict resolution and/or ambiguous situations
Experience developing partnerships with the technical, business, teams, and Clients utilizing strong communication and team building skills
Track record of strategic thinking and independent problem solving
Attention to detail and a high level of understanding of how to produce accurate and meaningful metrics to deliver high quality, actionable, efficient, and interactive reporting and insights to drive business and financial KPIs.
EDUCATION*
BA or BS degree or equivalent experience required.
WIN BENEFITS AND PERKS*
WIN *offers our employees competitive and comprehensive benefits to include but not limited to:
Paid vacation, sick and holiday time
Medical
Dental
Vision
Life Insurance (company paid and supplemental)
Disability Insurance
Health Savings Account (HSA) with a per month company contribution
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Transit Account
401k plus company match
Pet Insurance
WIN Perks and Plum Benefits*
Employee Assistance Program
Free access to Fitness Center at our main office location
Free indoor parking at our main office location
Transit Account
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SQL and Statistical Packages: 3 years (Required)
Design, create and implement Reports: 3 years (Required)
Healthcare Data Management: 5 years (Required)
Advanced Healthcare Analytics: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Greenwich, CT (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"WINFertility
3.3","Greenwich, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
86,Data Analyst Quality - Quality Outcomes Managment,"$36k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Our quality data analyst will be responsible to perform high level analyses in support of institution-wide clinical quality improvement activities. The analyst will facilitate the development and maintenance of data collection, leveraging existing data to identify gaps in care and recommend areas of focus for quality improvement activities.

An integral role to ensure that the organization exceeds its goals, the quality analyst will work collaboratively with Decision Support & Quality Services to determine resources needed to improve identified gaps in care and to develop recommendations for quality improvement based on findings.

The individual selected for this role will be engaging with a strong ability to present complex information to stakeholders in a compelling and accessible manner. This is an excellent opportunity for an experienced analyst who understands common quality benchmarks and thrives in a high-autonomy environment.

A creative role with strong flexibility, the analyst will be exposed to, and lead high-impact projects as a partner to executive and clinical leaders.

Penn State Health offers exceptional benefits including healthcare starting day one. Our employees enjoy a robust paid time off program that enables them to realize strong life/work balance.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, Computer Science or a related field required.

3 years data analysis experience in either finance, clinical, or research required.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Project management skills preferred.

Experience with statistics preferred.

Experience with Vizient, Cerner or Midas would be helpful.

If chosen for this position, you may be required to pass a Post Offer Employment Physical Exam in accordance with the measurements listed in the Work Task Analysis (WTA) report. This job description is a general outline of duties performed and is not to be misconstrued as encompassing all duties performed within the position. All individuals (including current employees) selected for a position will undergo a background check appropriate for the position's responsibilities.

Penn State Health is an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer, and is committed to providing employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, disability or protected veteran status. If you are unable to use our online application process due to an impairment or disability, please call 717-531-8440 between the hours of 8:30 AM and 4:30 PM, Eastern Standard Time, Monday – Friday, email hrsolutions@pennstatehealth.psu.edu or download our Accommodation Instructions for Job Applicants PDF for more detailed steps for assistance.

Union: Non Bargained

IND123

#LI-TB1",3.6,"Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center
3.6","Hershey, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
87,Business Analyst I (Data Exchange),"$43k-$79k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Specialist, Business Analysis (a.k.a. Business Analyst I) is an entry-level position and crucial role in fostering the strategic partnership between business and technology. The incumbent is responsible for developing requirements and related business rules for existing and new software solutions in the market. This position is a subject matter expert for one service line and works closely with a business partner and other subject matter experts in the definition, development, testing, training, implementation, and support of functional requirements. Our solution delivery follows the Agile Scrum process.

The Specialist provides cross organizational support, as needed. Additionally, in this exciting role they are responsible to run multiple projects at once, and uses creative and innovative methods for analysis, design, documentation, and tool selection. The ideal incumbent understands and documents integration points and dependencies with other systems and will utilize simple queries to check the status of a service line.

How You Contribute:
Contribute to the successful on time, on budget and in scope delivery of business initiatives.
Accurately represent the needs of the business owner(s) to software IT development teams and vice versa.
Lead grooming meetings to solicit, review, document, and refine requirements via interviews, workshops, group meetings, and/or existing systems documentation or procedures with Product Owner, Business Stakeholders and IT.
Define wireframes, sequence diagrams, and data flow diagrams.
Understand and effectively communicate to project teams and business owner all the data elements utilized by the service.
Derive business requirements from use cases in an agile environment.
Create, revise, validate, and maintain business flow maps, business requirements, business rules, user stories, user flows, and acceptance criteria.
Produce“as-is” and“to-be” process flow diagrams.
Define conceptual technical and/or non-functional requirement documents to translate business requirements into technical information that developers can use.
Document and maintain traceability of requirements.
Work with users and QA to lead the development of test cases based on documented requirements and perform user acceptance testing during sprints and as part of formal testing activities.
Collaborate with other business analysts to identify all cross-system interfaces, dependencies and requirements.
Be able to analyze the impact of new business requirements/user stories on the current application from both a business and technical perspective.
Participate in daily stand-up meetings with both Technology and other business partners to facilitate the understanding, clarification, and implementation of requirements in an Agile development environment.
Accountable for presenting timely, accurate project and product information.
Work with business owner to drive consensus across multiple stakeholders.
Demonstrate NSC’s competencies, which align with our corporate value
Core Competencies include: Customer Focus, Optimizes Work Processes, Collaborates, Communicates Effectively, and Be Open and Authentic
Manager will provide more detail to candidates as needed.
Position may be required to perform other duties as required. These essential functions are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the job. Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform these essential functions.

What You Bring to the Table:
Bachelor’s degree in IT, business, or related field, or a combination of education and experience, including through military service will also be considered.
1-3 years of directly related experience in soliciting and defining requirements for mission critical business applications across technology, business and finance, or knowledge of Clearinghouse services and applications typically gained by at least 1 year of Clearinghouse work experience.
Demonstrated experience in successfully performing in a leadership role, and effectively working independently as well as on a team and across organizational boundaries.
Experience in analyzing data for composing targeted and concise reports.
Ability to solicit, define and write business requirements from research, customers and internal feedback into user stories that have to become part of a solution.
Demonstrated proficiency:
Working with Agile principles and processes and Merit-based feature/product evaluation driving decision making.
Communicating effectively and confidently with internal stakeholders to represent the product, department, and company.
Working with Microsoft Office Suite and other collaboration tools.Excellent written, verbal, and interpersonal communication and presentation skills.
Live within a commutable distance of Herndon, VA.
Additional Desired Requirements:
Knowledge of Clearinghouse services and applications.
Experience with:
Software development management tools (Rally, Jira, Confluence).
Student Information Systems such as Ellucian, Peoplesoft, Jenzabar, Workday.
SQL, XML, EDI and/or ETL frameworks.
Certification: Certified Scrum Product Owner (CSPO), or an equivalent certification, strongly preferred.
Strong technical writing skills particularly user story acceptance criteria, user guides and API implementation guides.
Physical Demands:

Use of a computer for 8 or more hours a day.
Use of a copy machine and telephone.
Frequently required to sit for 7 or more hours per day in close proximity to others in an open office environment.
Occasionally required to use hands and fingers to operate, handle, and reach.
Vision abilities include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Travel via car, train, and airplane when needed.",3.0,"National Student Clearinghouse
3.0","Herndon, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Nonprofit Organization,Colleges & Universities,Education,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
88,Sr Data Science Analyst,"$61k-$107k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Summary
The Sr. Data Science Analyst operates as an internal consultant, finding solutions to the most critical organizational challenges in a fast-paced health care environment, leading to improved patient outcomes and performance for our business partners. The challenges that are complex from a methodology or business perspective are frequently the types of projects that this role tackles.
Reponsibilities
Successfully guide Data Science projects from concept to completion as a combination of Data Science subject matter expert, project manager, and business analyst.
Perform Research and Development to generate new products and/or ways to use our data to improve patient outcomes.
Translate identified business challenges or opportunities into actionable project efforts with defined scope and goals.
Create visual concepts/mockups that foster a shared understanding of business challenges or opportunities.
Coalescing stakeholders toward reasonable project objectives that address the most pressing challenges of our business.
Collaborate and coordinate with clinical, business, IT and engineering partners in the design and development of products that address key business challenges using internal and/or external data.
Effectively communicate the practical nature of the results of various analyses to business stakeholders using illustrations and practical language.
Pilot a proposed solution to demonstrate its effectiveness and/or suggest improvements.
Create reports documenting key findings, observations, outcomes, and/or recommendations clearly.
Develop, document and maintain code in a clear and reproducible manner.
Perform other duties and responsibilities as required, assigned, or requested.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Business Information Systems, Mathematics, Economics, Statistics or related technical field required; advanced degree preferred
5+ years of experience in analytics role
3+ years of experience with SQL; fluent in basic operators, joins, date and character functions;
3+ years of experience with R or Python, particularly with ggplot/matplotlib, statistics and analytics packages
3+ years of experience addressing practical business challenges in a Data Science/Analytics role
Professional experience as a project/program manager and/or business analyst preferred
Certifications in Data Science, Health Information Technology, Lean, Six Sigma, project management and/or business analysis a plus
Experience with RegEx, RShiny, R Markdown, Atlassian suite (Jira, Bitbucket, Concurrence), MS Excel (particularly pivot tables) and MS Access (VBA) preferred
Results-oriented mentality, capable of fluidly moving between roles and projects.
Team-first orientation, thriving in a collaborative, team-based work environment.
Self-starter mindset with desire to learn on an ongoing basis.
Problem-solver mentality – one who finds creative solutions instead of accepting obstacles as fixed.
Prioritization skills that allow one to cope well with ambiguity, changing requirements, dynamic scope, competing objectives and changes in direction
Willingness to lead the charge to change assumptions, risks and issues into reasonable project direction
Inquisitive nature and reasonable degree of comfort in asking tough questions when needed
Ability to accept and internalize coaching guidance
Willingness to adapt to approaches that meet stakeholder needs
Solid facilitator skillset – one who can align a room full of stakeholders with competing interests toward a narrow set of key objectives
Ability to tell stories through pictures and whiteboarding, often off-the-cuff
Ability to alter communication styles effectively for stakeholders varying from Specialists to C-Suite
Ability to serve as a liaison between business, clinical and IT professionals
Willingness to unearth, track and resolve the detail-level challenges that frequently derail project efforts
Conceptual understanding of Big Data methods
Ability to identify trends or correlations between factors and responses using methods such as trend analysis, regression modeling, clustering, principal components analysis and various feature engineering methods
Ability to conduct designed experiments to establish cause-effect relationships, as well as optimization experiments
Honesty, integrity, and emotional intelligence
Working knowledge of classical statistical / hypothesis testing techniques.
Experience with geospatial analytics platforms, particularly Esri, a plus
Experience with visualization tools, including Tableau, a plus
Experience with prototype development and/or UI/UX Design a plus
Experience with other programming languages and data exchange formats (Java, C#, XML, JSON) a plus
Experience with deep learning (particularly Tensorflow or other GPU-based) a plus
Experience with Natural Language Processing a plus
Experience with automated machine learning (H20, DataRobot) a plus
Experience with big data environments and methodologies (NoSQL, MongoDB, Spark, Hadoop) a plus",3.6,"naviHealth, Inc.
3.6","Brentwood, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
89,Data Science Analyst,"$50k-$90k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description

Job Description:

We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Science Support Analyst to support a client’s requirements in a challenging, dynamic setting located in the Washington Metropolitan Area. The position is for the Pathfinder contract. This Analyst will be responsible for constructing scripts and configuration controls to facilitate analysts performing repeatable complex database queries in multiple databases. This Analyst will be responsible for creating automated-scripting to assist analysts with data discovery. The Analyst will be required to work both independently and collaboratively with teams to create solutions in support of the customer.

Requirements:

• 3 to 10 years of experience is required

BA/BS degree is required. However, 6 years of work experience may be substituted

for a Bachelor's degree

Knowledge of IC mission, organizations, policies, procedures, and requirements

• Experience in IC related data science research and analysis

Experience supporting complex data science and analytic projects
Experience/knowledge of computer science concepts including programming, statistics, data architecture, and data analytics
Skill and experience in programming, statistics, and/or data architecture
Experience with quantitative and qualitative content analytics
Experience constructing and performing complex database search queries across multiple databases
TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance is required

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Software Development

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,"Leidos
3.6","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
90,Data Analyst (Underwriting & Lending Industry),-1,"Do you find yourself searching for a truly unique working environment? Do you have a go-getter attitude? Well, are you ready to take on a new challenge? We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst (Underwriting & Lending) to join Dot818’s growing team!

We’re looking for a special kind of candidate – someone who appreciates challenging projects, is comfortable working with a supportive team, and hungers for the freedom to think outside of the box. We also want you to care about our core values too. We have a deep commitment to success, we build strong relationships through tenacious effort, and we keep a firm focus on our client’s needs. If this sounds like your dream job, take the first step toward joining our team and apply now with your resume.

The Data Analyst is expected to thoroughly understand the credit/lending risk domain, and frequently use industry specific risk analysis best practices when operating and building predictive models. The ideal candidate would be able to design new models, frameworks, dashboards, and other tools.
Job Requirements*
You should be able to:
Develop and implement underwriting and credit risk assessment data models
Track various data metrics within the lending industry
Close interaction with IT Team to design/improve data architecture
Identify optimization opportunities using predictive modeling
Develop and implement advanced custom models and algorithms
Develop tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Investigate new data sets and identify strategic opportunities for improving servicing for our customers
Build out new data flows as our product changes, and produce high-value, timely analytics relevant to the lending and underwriting industry
Qualifications*
Master’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or any other quantitative discipline
At least 3 years’ experience in the Fintech industry working with financial underwriting models, variables, and risk assessment models.
Knowledge of R, Python, SQL
Rigorous statistical intuition, deep understanding of core statistical principles, and extensive experience with core methods
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms
Skills*
You are highly organized with the ability to multi-task and prioritize in a fast-paced culture
You are a critical thinker and able to problem solve
You have strong verbal communication skills
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms
What We Offer*
Competitive compensation package
Casual Fridays and major holidays off
Flexible work environment with a close-knit family feel
Paid time off, company-sponsored 401k, and employee health and wellness benefits
Company luncheons, outings, after-hour events, and team building festivities
Workplace perks such as healthy snacks, fresh brewed organic coffee, and employee discounts
Company sponsored gym membership
Company provided parking
Last, but not least, you will get to work with an amazing group of people!
If you have the experience, drive to succeed and have a can-do attitude then we are looking for you. Click apply and come join a fast-growing technology company!*
Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Data Analyst: 3 years (Required)
Underwriting and Lending analysis: 1 year (Required)
Location:
Glendale, CA (Required)",5.0,"Dot818, LLC.
5.0","Glendale, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
91,Data Governance Analyst 1 - Contract,"$41k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Posting Dates: 09/16/2020 - No Closing Date

Job Family: Information Technology

Department: Information and Communication Services Department

PURPOSES

This is a contract position that facilitates the flow of data throughout the organization by gathering and presenting requirements for data sharing requests to those in authority to approve the requests. This position requires someone with the ability to effectively communicate with both IT and non-IT partners. Keeps pace with data governance trends.

This individual works with divine guidance to provide or support technology that furthers the mission of the Church and reflects the eternal impact of the gospel.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Interviews system owners to understand the flow of data between systems

Documents the flow of data between systems

Presents and explains requests for data to approvers who are normally outside of the IT organization

Fosters understanding between teams and departments

QUALIFICATIONS

Education:

Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent professional experience

Work Experience:

6+ years of relevant professional experience

Demonstrated Skills & Abilities:

Working knowledge and application of these competencies and expert in at least two:

Business Analysis

Enterprise Analysis

Requirements Elicitation/Analysis

Requirements Management

Proficient in requirements elicitation and requirements-driven process and best practice

Proficient experience and understanding of technical and operational application functionality

Broad business acumen with transferrable skill sets across industries/portfolios

Strong technological/architectural to functional skill sets

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

This job operates in a professional office environment

To successfully perform the essential functions of the job there may be physical requirements which need to be met such as sitting for long periods of time and using computer monitors/equipment

WORTHINESS QUALIFICATION

Must be a member of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints and currently temple worthy.

POSTING NOTICE/MORE INFO.

Please Note: All positions are subject to close without notice. (tech123)",4.1,"The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints
4.1","Riverton, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Religious Organizations,Non-Profit,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
92,Employee Benefits - Data Analyst,"$45k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Thank you for your interest in a position with Equitable.

• Support new bonus programs for Employee Benefits. Run quarterly and annual bonus programs in excel and create comp statements for brokers.

• Create SQL queries to support bonus programs and audit payments.
Work closely with the sales organization to support the manual set-up and maintenance of compensation arrangements.
• Ad hoc technology support and training for strategic partners with compensation access
• Conduct quality control on commission payments and audit compensation plans to ensure commissions and bonus payments are accurate
• Broker Commission inquiries related to invoice administration and reconciliation
• Data Validation and support testing of new commission features
• Special Projects for licensing and commissions as assigned by management
• Perform analysis on new broker and GA setup for commissions, new payment scale setup, new commission hierarchy setup and inforce management.
Minimum Qualifications:
• 2+ years experience with Data Analysis and quality control on compensation/commission payments.
• Relationship Management experience with demonstrated proficiency in responding to customer requests, problem solving and processing administrative transactions.
• Strong MS Excel skills (pivot tables, Vlookup)
• Strong SQL skills to run reports and create queries for commission programs.
• Strong and effective verbal, written and analytical skills
• Knowledge of Employee / Group Benefits products is required.

Preferred Qualifications:
• Ability to operate in a challenging and fast-paced team environment.
• Experience performing Employee Benefits Commissions.
About Equitable
We have been providing stability and reliability to our clients since 1859 to help them live their lives with confidence, to give them peace of mind, and enable them to realize their dreams for their loved ones and their legacy.
As an employer, Equitable is committed to creating an environment where everyone feels completely comfortable bringing their true selves to work every day. Equitable has been recognized and certified as a great place to work by the Great Place to Work Institute.
We provide our employees opportunities to move within our organization so they can grow their career and skills without ever having to leave Equitable. Almost 40% of our open jobs are filled with current employees.
In addition to competitive compensation and an outstanding benefits package including 401(k) and medical programs, we offer the opportunity for continued professional development in a congenial corporate environment.
Equitable is committed to providing equal employment opportunities to our employees, applicants and candidates based on individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity and expression, age, national origin, mental or physical disabilities, sexual orientation, veteran status, genetic information or any other class protected by federal, state and local laws.
NOTE: Equitable participates in the E-Verify program.
If reasonable accommodation is needed to participate in the job application or interview process or to perform the essential job functions of this position, please contact Human Resources at (212) 314-6368 or email us at TalentAcquisition@equitable.com.",3.7,"Equitable
3.7","Jersey City, NJ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1859,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
93,Data Analyst,"$56k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst

PCG is searching for proven Data Analysts to define data requirements and functional specifications that will drive improved environment and analysis that align to business objectives.
Compensation: $80,000 to $120,000 Annually
Benefits Offered: Medical, Dental, Life, 401K
Employment Type: Full-Time
IDEAL CANDIDATE
3+ years’ experience in, data cleanup, report definition and development and backend database transactions
Skilled with several of the following: Access, Excel, SQL, Dynamics SL, Dynamics, Epicor, and IQMS, Oracle, MatLab, Tablean, and Queries
Solid analytical, quantitative and problem-solving skills, with the ability to use statistical analysis and modeling
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILTIES
Take data in existing access database and clean and update the data
Determine functionality of current system and business processes for both current and future state
Assess current situation of the state of the information in the access database, solidify requirements, provide a resolution, and execute solution
Take multiple opinions and guide teams to a common ground
Code reviews and feedback
Requirements definition/ documentation
Lead requirements gathering sessions using multiple techniques
Implement new technologies
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
BS or AA in computer science or equivalent related work experience
Demonstrated excellence in data manipulation and data visualization skills
Excellent communication, time management, and teamwork skills
Experience with data cleansing, data conversion and ETL initiatives
Proficient with multiple scripting languages, version-control systems
Data validation, testing, and impact analysis experience
Experience with security and related issues, solutions and technologies
Excellent system-level thinking and the ability to move up and down the stack",4.5,"Project Consulting Group
4.5","Minneapolis, MN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
94,Data Analyst - Case Specialist,"$45k-$84k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Join a fast growing company that is transforming its industry! Financial Recovery Technologies has become a trusted partner to the world's top institutional investors, and our best-in-class people and technology have made FRT a market leader. As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will work with case and client data to ensure we deliver accurate, high-quality damages and eligibility information to our clients, providing the information they need in order to make decisions about whether and how to pursue recovery opportunities after portfolio losses.

The Role: As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will:
Own and master case (lawsuit) information, as well as client data as it relates to specific cases
Dig deeply into clients’ transactions and holdings data to perform reconciliation, identify data gaps, and find potential solutions
Ensure the accuracy and quality of data relating to clients' eligibility to recover funds in connection with the settlement of lawsuits and enforcement actions
Bridge the gap between the technical and the nontechnical
Translate between our legal and technical teams, ensuring an accurate interpretation of legal and financial language in legal documents and an appropriate application of that language to the data at hand
Understand corporate actions and their impact on clients' trading history
Communicate results of client data analysis to non-technical client service professionals to facilitate client decision-making
Ask questions and test assumptions made in the handoff of information between our legal, case, and data operations teams
Build strong relationships with peers across corporate functions, including:
Client service professionals, who you’ll work with to provide clients with complex eligibility analyses
Operations professionals, who will rely on your analysis skills in filing claims, remediating deficiencies, and remitting payments
Product and technology teams, who will count on you to serve as a resource as they develop technology to support operational requirements
Our ideal candidate has:
Deep analytical experience, including hands-on work processing information and testing assumptions - a minimum of 3 years' overall professional experience is necessary;
Solid experience in financial services (experience in trading or with derivatives would be a plus!), as well as strong SQL skills;
Top candidates will be able to recognize and understand the relevant features of various financial instruments in client-provided data and incorporate that understanding into high-quality loss analytics;
Experience evaluating existing processes and developing effective process improvements;
An ability to multitask, prioritize, and balance varied tasks on a daily basis;
Strong verbal communication skills;
Self-confidence sufficient to execute on tasks independently, trust his/her judgment, and yet know when to ask questions;
An intellectually curious personality and a demonstrated commitment to continuous improvement; and
Of course, a desire to join a growing company with a vibrant, entrepreneurial culture.
What benefits does FRT offer?
Health, dental, vision
401k (with company match)
Income protection plans (life, accidental death and dismemberment, short- and long-term disability) and access to a suite of voluntary benefits
Close to public transit (walking distance to Wellington T on Orange Line)
Free drinks and snacks
Free parking onsite
Free access to onsite gym
Fun, smart, diverse colleagues
THIS IS AN ASSOCIATE LEVEL POSITION (3-5 YEARS EXPERIENCE).

This position is based in our Medford, MA, headquarters. LOCAL CANDIDATES ONLY, PLEASE.

AGENCIES: WE ARE NOT WORKING WITH AGENCIES ON THIS REQUISITION, SO PLEASE DO NOT SUBMIT YOUR CANDIDATES FOR THIS ROLE.",4.4,"Financial Recovery Technologies
4.4","Medford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
95,Data Analyst,"$59k-$73k
(Employer Est.)","Who is Comprehensive Healthcare?
Comprehensive Healthcare provides innovative behavioral health and integrated healthcare services to clients of all ages. We take pride in our creative and collaborative work environment and in delivering clinically excellent, trauma-informed, recovery-oriented services.

What are we looking for in a Data Analyst?
As a member of the Information Services department, the Data Analyst supports Comprehensive’s technology and business initiatives by coordinating the collection, storage, and utilization of essential data. This position will work closely with leadership and other staff to determine data needs for specific projects or ad hoc requests, and then gather, interpret, and present the information to the team. The work of the Data Analyst will impact day-to-day clinic operations as well as business decisions, so a high degree of accuracy, thoroughness, and timeliness are essential. Previous experience performing data analytics in the healthcare field is required. The Data Analyst will work on-site in our Yakima office.

Data Analyst duties may include:

integrating data from internal & external sources and performing extract, transform, and load operations to data in various applications
analyzing data to identify and interpret patterns or trends in data sets
performing data audits to identify problem areas & implementing strategies to optimize data integrity and process improvements
assisting with the design & implementation of database warehouse structure and developing standards for the design of data elements
supporting the implementation, testing, and validation of data & software systems
assisting with ongoing data architecture processes & governance
providing Tier II technical support to employees
documenting all work as it is completed

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, data analytics, or related field
Three years of experience with data analysis within the healthcare industry

What Comprehensive Healthcare Can Offer You
Training and Development

A variety of career opportunities in a wide range of settings with room for mobility and promotion
Regular training opportunities including support, supervision, and consultation in implementing evidence-based services and programs

Innovative Program & Services

A strong reputation for providing quality, evidence-based services within a collaborative multi-disciplinary team environment
Innovative, forward-looking leadership that seeks to thrive in an ever-changing healthcare environment
Joint Commission-accredited organization committed to continuous quality improvement
Established partnerships with major research universities and other community and healthcare providers to implement cutting-edge treatment programs and services

Excellent Benefits

Competitive salaries within our communities and industry
Healthcare coverage for employee and qualified family members
Generous vacation, paid holiday and sick leave policies
Access to Employee Assistance Program services
Agency-funded retirement plan with contributions equal to 5% of compensation
Additional retirement investment opportunities with a 50% investment match of up to 4% of compensation
Agency-funded life and disability insurance program

Comprehensive Healthcare is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, sex, age, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other basis prohibited by federal, state, or local law. We value the diverse perspectives and strengths that our employees bring to the workplace and we encourage individuals from underrepresented groups to apply for our positions. The Human Resources department offers accommodations and assistance for the application and interview process; please contact us at (509) 575-4084 to make arrangements.",3.3,"Comprehensive Healthcare
3.3","Yakima, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
96,"Data Analyst, Payments","$68k-$125k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Build out rigorous observability and optimizations across the Stripe Payments Stack

About our Team:


Payments are the core of Stripe's business, and the groups and teams within Payments Infrastructure are broadly responsible for processing and moving these funds at a huge scale.

From the outside, a customer's credit card is charged and the merchant receives a payout to their bank account. On the inside, we have a network of teams that build infrastructure for charging the credit cards (or other payment methods, like bank transfers or Alipay), integrations with our banking partners to send transfers to our users across the globe, systems that collect Stripe's revenue, and more. Collectively, this group powers all payments products at Stripe, and we're looking for talented analysts to come help us organize and understand the data surrounding these complex processes.

You will:
Work closely with product and engineering teams to identify important questions around how to define key metrics
Conduct analyses and opportunity sizing to define addressable markets and operational opportunities for improvement
Develop compelling dashboards and automated reporting related to key performance metrics
Communicate results and influence key decision makers, including engineering, and business leaders
You'd ideally have:


3+ years experience in product analytics
Extensive experience and passion for metrics and dashboards visualizations
Highly skilled at writing SQL to query relational databases; knowledge of R or Python is a plus
Strong communication and presentation skills
Degree in a quantitative field (e.g., Statistics, Economics, Math, Sciences, Engineering)
You should include these in your application:
A resume and LinkedIn profile
A dashboard sample
What's it like to work at Stripe?


Stripe is helping the internet fulfill its potential as a platform for economic progress by building software tools that accelerate global economic access and technological development. Stripe makes it easy to start, run and scale an internet business from anywhere in the world.

We look at Stripe as a constant work in progress and the same is true of our people; for all of us, we believe the best is yet to come. We're here to support each other in our curiosity and creativity – which we pursue through thoughtful discussion and knowledge-sharing among a diverse set of peers and colleagues.

We want to work in a company of warm, inclusive people who treat their colleagues exceptionally well. The kind of people who are committed to going out of their way to help other Stripes in the short-term and pushing them to improve over the long-term (by helping them to get better at what they do).

We're a highly cross-functional organization and view that as part of the fun: we design our space to encourage as much collaboration as possible. We have long tables in the kitchen for a reason (to enable everyone to meet new people and learn from them). We also have a culture of transparency that we carry through to email communication, ensuring that Stripes all around the world have the information they need to make good local decisions.

In both our products and our people, we aim to reflect, represent and advocate for all of our users, globally. Our users transcend geography, culture and language; what we share, collectively, is a drive to create a fairer, more economically interconnected world.",4.1,"Stripe
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
97,Data Analyst/Data Scientist,"$39k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Swiss Re

Swiss Re is one of the world’s leading providers of reinsurance, insurance and other forms of insurance-based risk transfer, working to make the world more resilient. We anticipate and manage a wide variety of risks, from natural catastrophes and climate change to cybercrime.

At Swiss Re we combine experience with creative thinking and cutting-edge expertise to create new opportunities and solutions for our clients. This is possible thanks to the collaboration of our 15,000 employees across the world.

We offer a flexible working environment where curious and adaptable people thrive. Are you interested in joining us?

About the Role:

The position will be in a newly created unit to develop tools for use in the business management area of the Life and Health Americas unit of Swiss Re.

In this role, you will develop, enhance and utilize tools that manage large amounts of data to provide insight on the performance of Swiss Re's business. You will be collaborating with subject matter experts from Administration, Claims, Portfolio Management, Data Management, Products, Client Markets, Valuation, Finance and other Business Management functions. In addition, collaboration with Global teams representing other regions will be expected.

Key Business Responsibilities

Develop tools leveraging a ""big-data"" platform in Swiss Re to measure and attribute performance.
Coding and building data analytics tools in an efficient way to demonstrate the applicability of the technology to solve the business challenges that are presented.
Develop insights via financial history, projections, experience studies, current balance sheet & earnings, and quality of data, assumptions & models.
Interact with other business units to understand their data and their needs for tools to manage their tasks and goals through effective data integration.
Analyse data for trends and patterns, and Interpret data with a clear objective in mind
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Interact with the Information Technology areas of Swiss Re to ensure that prototype models are moved into a production state.
Own the release and end-user training of the developed application.
Develop presentation and/or communication materials for internal stakeholders.
Maintain current knowledge of business practices, data science trends, and technology.
Develop innovative solutions as the business and insurance industry changes.
Contribute ideas to gain efficiencies or reduce operational expenses.

About the Team:

This is a new function within Business Management Americas formed in 2020. It is responsible for development of tools that will allow Swiss Re to quickly prototype big-data models to assess the impact on the business before migrating to formal business applications. The tools will deliver the self-service analytics using Swiss Re's significant data repositories to end users.

About You:

University degree in mathematics, statistics or actuarial science, OR two to five years of relevant experience in the data science field
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SLQ, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Strong background in data mining, data transformation and modelling skills
Strong verbal/written communication skills
Ability to work independently and in a team (including cross functional teams) to contribute to the successful delivery of time-sensitive projects
Experience in data mining algorithms, and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, decision trees, neural networks, anomaly detection, sequential pattern discovery and text mining.

Swiss Re is an equal opportunity employer. It is our practice to recruit, hire and promote without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, disability, age, pregnancy, sexual orientations, marital status, military status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Decisions on employment are solely based on an individual's qualifications for the position being filled.

During the recruitment process, reasonable accommodations for disabilities are available upon request. If contacted for an interview, please inform the Recruiter/HR Professional of the accommodation needed.",3.9,"Swiss Re
3.9","Fort Wayne, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,1863,Company - Public,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
98,Clinical Data Programmer/Analyst,-1,"Clinical Data Programmer/Analyst supports clinical trial data management and programming tasks associated with creating, verifying, and documenting analyses and reporting while adhering to study protocols, analysis plans and industry standards.
GENERAL DUTIES AND ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: *
Plan and manage programming activities across multiple trials to deliver all data analysis outputs to agreed timelines and quality, (e.g., analysis datasets, tables, figures and listings for regulatory submissions and publications).
Assist in deploying process changes and user adoption of EDC platform, reporting platforms, CTMS, LIMS, eTMS and other Clinical applications across the enterprise.
Proficiency in developing reports requested by stakeholders using ANSI SQL and other scripting languages
Support data migration activities including data cleaning and adjudication processes.
Implement data standards within a function, or therapeutic area in accordance with industry standards
Experience creating status reports, including building KPIs, dashboards and data visualization capabilities for use in study teams is desirable
Responsible for programming and QC across a trial/asset including submission activities adhering to relevant SOPs / policies.
Participate in the design of other trialdelivery components (e.g. case report forms, trial databases).
Review and input into key study documents (e.g. SAP, CRFs, Data Management Plans etc).
Develop broader technical knowledge and expertise (e.g. UNIX scripting, computing environments).
Provide technical advice, mentoring and training as relevant.
Identify recurring problems and work with colleagues to initiate process improvement
Possesses the analytical ability to define problems and interpret the information
Oversee outsourced tasks to third party vendors to meet the agreed timelines, quality and budget requirements established for the project or study.
Understanding of US regulations and guidelines applicable to clinical trials, inspection readiness and system validation
Skills/Competencies

Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in engineering, Biotechnology, Computer Applications or related disciplines
Proficient in writing fine-tuned SQL queries, stored procedures (eg. PL/SQL code) and working with data in relational databases like Postgres, SQL Server, MySQL, Oracle etc.
More than 2 years’ experience in SQL and/or programming for clinical trial databases
Database design/administration experience (Design, implementation, modification) for clinical trial databases
Ability to recognize and resolve system related problems; work independently and make necessary decisions throughout the systems process within department guidelines.
Effective written and verbal communication skills.
Preferred qualifications:
Knowledge of non-SAS programming packages/languages (e.g. Tableau, Spotfire, S-Plus, R)
Familiarity with Object Data Model (ODM) and xpath form development
Working knowledge of CDISC data standards, primarily the creation and use of ADaM datasets
Experience of interacting with clinical study team members
Ability to manage conflicting demands and priorities
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
relevant: 2 years (Required)
Application Question:
Demonstrated knowledge of FDA and GCP guidelines and regulations covering clinical trials, statistics, and data management
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.quantumleaphealth.org/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible",1.7,"Quantum Leap Healthcare
1.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
99,Data Analyst,"$29k-$53k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Summary: The Information Technology Data Analyst is responsible for the organization's data, making sure that the data repositories produce consistent, reusable quality data. The IT Data Analyst develops analysis and reporting capabilities across the organization, with an emphasis on fundraising (approximately 65%), and monitors performance and quality control plans to identify improvements. This position works collaboratively with management and key stakeholders, to identify business needs and to develop a plan that will assist the organization with meeting or exceeding its objectives.
Responsibilities
Develop, implement and maintain databases, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality; locate and correct coding issues
Acquire and maintain data from secondary data sources
Create visualizations from views using BI reporting tools
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in data sets using statistical techniques
Develop policies and procedures for the collection and analysis of data
Review and validate departmental customer data as it is collected
Filter and clean data by reviewing reports and performance indicators
Identify and define new process improvement opportunities
Provide basic BI software training for end-users
Serve as a member of the Data Governance team
Qualifications
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages, databases, and programming, such as SQL Server, and ETL frameworks
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at writing queries and reports; presenting findings
Ability to work well under pressure, managing changing timelines and conflicting demands
BS in Information Management, Statistics or related field
3+ years’ experience with Salesforce
3+ years’ experience with BI tools, such as Power BI (preferred)
Strong understanding of fundraising processes and reporting needs (preferred)
Change management skills; ability to organize and execute required system changes
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to understand requirements and explain technical issues to non-technical staff
Ability to work with people from all levels inside and outside of the organization
Salary Range: $50,181 - $57,708
Competitive Benefits
PLEASE FOLLOW DIRECTIONS BELOW.
How To Apply:
Interested applicants should send a resume and cover letter to: humanresources@girlsinc.org no later than September 30, 2020. No phone calls, please.
GIRLS INC. IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER.",3.6,"Girls Inc
3.6","Indianapolis, IN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1945,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
100,Finance Data Analyst Internship - Paid,"$65k-$79k
(Employer Est.)","Finance Data Analyst Internship
Paid Internship - Summer 2021
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uline seeks summer 2021 Finance Data Analyst Interns at its Corporate Headquarters in Pleasant Prairie, WI.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Design, develop, implement and maintain various dashboards and tools.
Utilize SQL and VBA to create tools to increase efficiency in financial processes.
Support the finance department with SQL queries (querying data) and ad hoc analytical tasks.
Gain exposure to multiple business units including Corporate Finance, Accounting, Credit Research / Analysis, Tax, Operations and Corporate Audit.
Enhance technical and financial skills through on-the-job experience and training.

Minimum Requirements
Candidates must be pursuing a Bachelor's degree related to Finance, IT, or Analytics.
SQL or relevant programming experience preferred.
Demonstrate strong problem solving, analytical, leadership and communication skills.
Ability to work on tasks independently.
Microsoft Excel skills required, Access skills a plus.

Benefits of a Uline Internship
Gain professional work experience in an area related to your degree.
Work in a positive, well-balanced environment.
Learn about the industry from all levels of Uline management.
Potential opportunity, upon graduation, for full-time employment with a successful, fast-growing company!
Housing available for those who live more than 50 miles away.

Intern Perks
On-site café with meals and dinner-to-go options prepared by executive chefs.
First-class fitness center with sauna and complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Outings throughout the summer with interns across all departments.
Intern specific Lunch and Learns.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a privately held, family-owned company known for incredible service and quality products. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products found in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Our quality products, huge inventory and ongoing expansion fuel our incredible growth. This is a great time to join Uline!

Apply online today to join us in 2021!

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Northbrook, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
101,Data Governance Analyst,"$41k-$74k
(Glassdoor Est.)","JOB TITLE: Data Governance Analyst

JOB CLASSIFICATION: Exempt

REPORTS TO: Data Governance Director

JOB PURPOSE: The Data Governance Analyst will support the Data Governance activities at Argo Group. This position will support the company’s Data Governance and Data Management program throughout the organization.

DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Support data governance initiatives
Support the system of record as a “single-source of truth” for each data element; resolve multiple sources of truth issues with key stakeholders via clear definitions of elements.
Support management, manipulation and capture of data.
Liaise with multiple business units and support teams across the global enterprise on complex data governance projects.
Support the Data Governance Roadmap, including enterprise wide Data Quality Framework and an Information Model
Facilitate bi-directional communication of strategies, priorities and issues
Works with the business units to ensure data ownership and quality, and with Argo’s Data Protection Officer’s team to ensure data security
Champion organizational behavior change as it relates to the use of data; realizing vision of data managed as an asset
Work with Data Architects to ensure facilitation of consistent data quality control and optimization in EDW at enterprise level
Perform other duties as assigned
QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelor's degree in Information Technology or Business Administration or 3+ yrs. related field experience
2+ years working in a Data Governance Role
1+ years experience with Master Data Management
3+ years working in the Insurance or Financial Services
Credible across both business and IT
Understanding of operational processes, data, systems landscape
Experience with one or more data governance tools
REQUIRED COMPETENCIES:

Problem Solving
Demonstrates strong problem solving capabilities
Willing and able to overcome challenges and roadblocks to enable the business to meets it goals
Communication
Communicate effectively in both verbal (i.e. day-to-day discussions, team meetings) and written (requirements and design specifications) form, as well as have an overall ability to be clear and concise in all communications.
Comfortable communicating with all audiences from highly technical engineers to non-technical executives in both written and verbal channels
Actively listens to customers and teams
Builds good relationships with peers, executives and other departments
Ownership
Cares about the quality of the product systems and the success of the organization
Expresses opinion on solutions and does not allow bad solutions
High sense of urgency to meet commitments
Will go outside of primary role if needed to help drive success
PLEASE NOTE: At this time, Argo Group will not sponsor an applicant for employment authorization for this position.

If you have a disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act or a similar law and you wish to discuss potential accommodations related to applying for employment at Argo Group, please contact our Benefits Department at 210-321-8400.

To all recruitment agencies: Unless you have been requested to work on this position, or other positions with Argo Group, please do not forward any resumes to Argo Group employees. Argo Group is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of age, ancestry, color, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information, marital status, national origin or citizenship (including language use restrictions), denial of family and medical care leave, disability (mental and physical) , including HIV and AIDS, medical condition (including cancer and genetic characteristics), race, religious creed (including religious dress and grooming practices), sex (including pregnancy, child birth, breastfeeding, and medical conditions related to pregnancy, child birth or breastfeeding), sexual orientation, military or veteran status, or other status protected by federal, state and/or local laws.

Applicants: For the most convenient application experience, please use the “Apply with LinkedIn” button. If manually entering, only include your most recent or relevant job information needed for this role. For either method, please attach your most current resume. Additional job history may be obtained if selected for the interview process.",3.7,"Argo Group US
3.7","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1948,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
102,Data Analyst,-1,"Neighborhood Health Association (NHA), a Federally Qualified Health Center (FQHC), is the largest community health center system in Northwest Ohio with partnerships that include ProMedica, Mercy Health, and University of Toledo Medical Center. NHA has grown from a single location in 1969 to 12 medical and dental clinics throughout Lucas County. Today we operate multiple health centers including pediatrics, adult medicine, dental services, health care for the homeless, women’s health center, senior centers and a full service pharmacy with lab services on site.

For more than 50 years, NHA has placed a strong focus on prevention and empowering individual responsibility in managing their health care and overall well-being. Our services are acutely responsive to the needs of everyone throughout the communities we serve, providing excellent care and the best health practices.

We are currently seeking a full-time Data Analyst position to join our Quality team.

Job Duties

This position requires high proficiency in Excel utilizing such as graphs, pivot tables and report writing tools.

Proficient at accessing data and presenting in formats for analysis and presentation to departmental leadership.

Develops queries, writes reports, and presents findings; translates report requirements in specifications and use the reporting tool to generate data extract that can be rendered into identified output format

Filters, cleans data and validates reports by reviewing reports and performance indicators to locate and correct reporting problems

Extracts and analyzes data to support the organization’s decision making processes

Provides recommendations to management and QI Director based on professional expertise, data analytics, and insights regarding the improvement of care and organizational systems

Coordinates with clinical employees regarding data reporting, including data pulls from queries specific to UDS, MU, PCMH and FTCA

Coordinates with internal and external points of contact for resolution of data or system errors or problems.

Three (3) years of clinical Quality and Performance Improvement; and Reporting preferred

Minimum of six (6) months experience using an electronic health record system

Knowledge of QI and/or Total Quality Management theory and practices preferred

Must have exceptional analytical skills

Ability to operate a PC/laptop computer with the ability to effectively enter and retrieve information from a computer

Effective communication skills at all levels in the organization, with strong oral, written and persuasive skills. Must be able to work independently and with little or no supervision

Well organized, self-motivated, and able to work well with others

Valid OH Driver License & reliable transportation due to travel to clinic locations in the Toledo area

Strong ethics and a high level of personal and professional integrity

Fluency in Microsoft Office, proficiency in Excel, experience with relational databases, statistical software (SAS, SPSS, etc.) is strongly desired.

Monday through Friday schedule, no nights, weekends or holidays.

Benefits include health, dental, vision, life & retirement plan.

Competitive salary, PTO and 10 paid holidays

We are a drug free workplace and equal opportunity employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
www.nhainc.org
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",2.1,"Neighborhood Health Association
2.1","Toledo, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
103,Data Analyst,"$38k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst

Classification:

Exempt

Reports to:

Manager of Data Analytics & Reporting

JOB DESCRIPTION

General Summary: Fusion Medical Staffing works to provide top healthcare professional talent to our clients nationwide. Our thriving culture, both internally and externally, allows us to focus on our core values and improve the lives of those we touch. Fusion Medical Staffing is an equal opportunity employer.

Essential Functions:

Understanding of the ETL process, data warehousing and associated activities to implement the best programs to use in managing the data
Mine data, analyze data, and assist in the build out of internal analytical tools to improve decision making and support for the analytics team and reporting to cross functional teams.
Assist in the Design, development, and automation of metrics-based internal reporting, including visuals and Ad-Hoc reporting packages
Gather requirements and define scope for reporting needs, meeting to ensure specific data needed on a project basis.
Ability to manage multiple data sources and systems with logic to ensure proper data file creation.
Ensure a high level of communication and liaison duties with IT/Technology and Operational departments.
Work closely with the Finance Team and financial data on performance and variance analytics.
Ensure a high degree of data quality and accuracy in all results and reporting
Special projects, as requested

Competencies:

Strong written and verbal skills
Exceptional attention to detail
Excellent critical thinking skills
Team Player
Humble
Positive
Driven

Work Environment:

This job operates in an office environment and routinely uses standard office equipment.

Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.

Employee is regularly required to talk or hear
Is frequently required to sit; stand; walk; use hands to fingers, handle or feel;

Position Type/Expected hours worked:

This is a full-time, permanent position. Hours of work and days are Monday through Friday, in between the hours of 8:00am and 5:00pm (there may be some flexibility with start/end times). Regular, consistent and punctual attendance is required.

Required Education and Experience:

3+ Years Relevant Experience in the following focus areas:

BA/BS Business Science or Business Administration, MIS, analytics, statistics, Economics or related field
Experience with Business Intelligence (BI) tools such as Tableau
Strong experience with Tableau
Advanced proficiency in Excel, as well as MS office suites and including MS SQL
Experience in data extraction, data manipulation, synthesis and creating presentations
Experience with analytical initiatives with demonstrated ability to problem solve and think critically; ability to recognize key trends and evaluate results of analysis.
Proficient knowledge of financial and accounting practices and techniques.

Preferred Education and Experience:

Proficiency with SQL and VBA coding
Experience in recognizing, analyzing and communicating descriptive and predictive data for reporting and statistical methodologies.

Other Duties:

This job description is not a comprehensive list of all activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job and is subject to change at any time with or without notice.",4.6,"Fusion Medical Staffing
4.6","Omaha, NE",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
104,Project Coordinator - Data Analyst,"$35k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Project Coordinator - Data Analyst
Location


Hauppauge, NY

Company Order Number

2123

# of openings

1

Apply Now

Custom Computer Specialists, Inc. is one of the largest Technical Consultants on Long Island, celebrating over 40 years in business! We continue to successfully provide network integration, support services, products solutions, and applications services to our valued clients in the northeast. Our focus is simple...our goal is to make technology easy and to help our clients use it as effectively as possible.

Position Title: Project Coordinator

Division: MSP

Reports to: James Szwed, Manager

OVERVIEW

This individual will provide project support and coordination for our healthcare sector. We are looking for a person who wants to challenge him/herself that will take ownership and assist with daily project production. Requirements include having technical and analytical capabilities, knowledge of office suite, an understanding of technical concepts, ability to plan and manage multiple tasks, outstanding written and verbal communication skills.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Responsibilities of this position include:
Creating and closing request tickets for each device
Communicating with teams to ensure timely completion of tasks
Responsible for managing inbound support tickets
Updating assets in the database with corresponding tickets
Assisting other coordinators with scheduling work to technicians
Updating assignment of new assets with client’s ITAM system
Providing operational support of physical inventory in Custom’s warehouse for old and new assets
Covering for other team members when on leave
QUALIFICATIONS

The right candidate will have:
Minimum of 6 months’ experience working as an administrative assistant or project coordinator
Capable of working with Microsoft word, excel, and power point
Professional verbal communication, customer service, organizational skills and professional manner required
Candidates must be customer oriented, self-motivated, ambitious and dedicated team players
Custom Computer Specialists Offers:


Competitive salaries
Comprehensive benefits including:
Medical and dental plans
Company Paid Vision and Short and long term disability plans
Flexible spending programs including Healthcare, Dependent Care, Transit and Parking
401K with employer match
Tuition reimbursement
Onsite Fitness Center (or gym membership reimbursement for client or satellite based employees)
Company paid life Insurance
Paid holidays and vacation
Technical certification gift card rewards program
Come experience our unique culture and see how our “right people, right results” philosophy has led to our outstanding success! We are great place to start your IT career!

EEO Statement:


Custom Computer Specialists is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other protected characteristic.",2.4,"Custom Computer Specialists
2.4","Hauppauge, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1979,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
105,Data Analyst,"$34k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Onsite work only - Franklin, Tennessee

Are you looking for a career with a purpose? Do you want the opportunity to be part of a company that’s changing millions of lives for the better? Well, you’ve come to the right place. Ramsey Solutions exists to provide biblically based, commonsense education and empowerment that give HOPE to everyone in every walk of life. Our mission to change the world isn’t easy. We face resistance every day because what we believe is absolutely countercultural. We’re weird. We hate debt. And we actually cut up our credit cards . . . like, for real. We don’t use them in our entire business. Bottom line: We don’t use debt—period. Some of us are still fighting our way out of it, but we aren’t going back in.

Our Analytics and Insights Team has been one of the fastest-growing technology teams at Ramsey Solutions—they’re rocking it! They partner with our 15 digital product areas to help create data-driven solutions for our business problems so we can keep doing work that matters to change more lives. Performing mathematical analysis and using technology to put it into action, this team helps all of us at Ramsey perform at our highest level.

This is where you come in. We need your help to generate data-driven solutions to our business problems. We need a hardcore math nerd—someone who understands mathematical analysis and knows how to use technology to implement it. You’re someone who’s always itching to solve the problem, complete the puzzle, and answer the question. You’re never satisfied with a fluffy answer. You want the facts. You always back up your position with data.

Our data tells a story, and we need you to help us read it. You’ll help us pull back the curtain, notice trends, and apply data to drive change in our business models so we can help more people. If that sounds exciting to you, keep reading.

Skills Needed to Win:
3+ years of experience driving analytics initiatives to impact a business
Solid mathematical or statistics background
Experience with SQL (you’ll use it every day to get the data you need)
Experience with scripting languages like Python and R
Experience building and maintaining dashboards and reporting systems
Ability to translate data into actionable insights
Supporting business decisions through ad hoc analysis
Extraordinary passion to solve problems (you’re not satisfied until it’s solved and backed by data)
Nice-to-Haves:
Experience with data visualization tools like Tableau
Experience utilizing web analytics and Google Analytics tool set
Experience with optimization testing
About Ramsey Solutions:
We’re a debt-free company that was founded in 1992 by Dave Ramsey.
We have over 900 team members who are 100% dedicated to our mission.
We believe collaboration, innovation and a shared sense of mission come from being present with each other. That’s why all of our team members work together under one roof at our headquarters in Franklin, Tennessee.
Ramsey Solutions was recognized by Inc. Magazine as a Best Workplace in the nation for 2020.
And by the way, we're not stuffy or corporate around here. Here are some of the perks and benefits at Ramsey Solutions:
A 401(k) match of 4% after one year as a team member (you can still contribute in the first year)
Health insurance on day one with a $500 HSA match every year
One fully paid workweek of ministry time after one year to volunteer for your favorite charity or nonprofit
Generous PTO and paid sick time off
We prioritize work-life balance and rarely exceed a 40-hour work week
Weekly devotionals with world-renowned speakers, pastors and authors
$300/year to put toward achieving your fitness goals
Casual dress and work environment
It’s a calling, and we’re on a mission to change lives. Join the crusade! Apply now.

EEO/M/F/Veteran/Disabled",3.3,"Ramsey Solutions
3.3","Franklin, TN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
106,Data Analyst,"$53k-$102k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Nexon, a world leader in online games, is building a workplace based on mutual respect, good humor, and the pursuit of excellence because we believe that great games can only be built by amazing people. Our vision is to create high quality, innovative online games that create unforgettable experiences for players around the world.

Nexon has an ever-expanding worldwide team of over 6,000 employees and boasts a diverse global portfolio that includes titles like MapleStory, Dungeon Fighter Online, KartRider and many more. If you want to be part of building an exciting game company and help chart the course of online gaming, let's talk!

Job Description

The Data Analyst is responsible for providing in-depth data mining and data analyses to multiple departments, with a focus on understanding our customers and identifying ways to improve the user experience within our games.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Identify, design, prioritize and develop data analyses to create unique business insights; perform detailed data exploration and validation to understand customers
Identify key analytic metrics; build reports and present key insights to ensure that data drives actions to improve the business; examine and analyze available information to determine patterns and gaps at a strategic level and recommend a course of action to support internal and external users
Research and analyze web and game usage data and recommend solutions; analyze user experience and business processes in order to identify opportunities for improvement
Document business needs, prioritize requested functionality, and validate requirements against strategic goals and project objectives
Provide reporting and performance monitoring by using data drawn from diverse sources
Other duties as assigned
Type of Decisions made by this position?
Analyze game data and make recommendations for improvement
Prioritize data requests
Documentation of the department's business needs
Work Experience
3+ years of experience in data analytics or a related field
2+ years of experience with analytics software such as Google Analytics
2+ years' experience with Marketing Intelligence Platforms such as Singular
Experience with data extraction and manipulation tools and Data Mining tools
Online gaming experience preferred
Education, Professional Training, Technical Training or Certification
Master's Degree preferred or Bachelor's degree with equivalent experience
Knowledge/Skills
Excellent knowledge of statistical analysis
Ability to extract data by writing your own SQL queries
Experience using Tableau or similar BI tools
Programming for data analysis (R or Python) preferred
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Able to manage shifting priorities in a fast-paced environment
Exceptional Excel and PowerPoint skills
Excellent time and project management skills
Management has the right to add or change duties and job requirements at any time.

Nexon's benefits and perks:

We offer medical, dental and vision plans for you, your spouse or domestic partner, and your children. Employees who enroll in the high deductible health plan receive an annual employer contribution to a health savings account and company paid hospital indemnity benefits. We also provide company-paid life, AD&D, short-term and long-term disability benefits as well as access to voluntary life and AD&D for yourself and your dependents, flexible spending accounts, a 401(k) savings plan with a company match, and pet insurance. Nexies are encouraged to take advantage of our monthly wellness credit, participate in lunchtime yoga, and enroll in language classes. We host bi-monthly catered lunches, monthly happy hours, and maintain a well-stocked snack bar. To help you maintain a good work-life balance, we offer paid time off, sick days, company holidays, and a year-end break.

Nexon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

]]>",2.6,"Nexon America Inc
2.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1
107,Data Analyst - Outreach (DC Medicaid),"$35k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Resp & Qualifications

PURPOSE:
The Health Care Data Analyst/List Coordinator has primary responsibility for fully supporting the companys ongoing health care business objectives for Marketing, Outreach and Health Promotion related to strategic goals and objectives. The incumbent will be responsible for the design and production of reports required by local and federal regulators, as well as internal operational report specification. The role will provide analyses related to measuring performance and status of programs, initiatives, processes and partners. The role will also provide analytical interpretation of data for evaluation of clinical practices to support the development of financial and contractual modeling. Finally, the analyst will have skills in SharePoint to organize, maintain and update files and develop job request intake systems as needed.

PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTABILITIES:
Supports the health plan by developing business processes and systems to ensure integrity of the health plan data.
Works with various operational business teams to identify report criteria that will translate to functional specifications that will turn into meaningful reports, and economic outcome metrics for measurement and reporting.
Works with staff in designing, conducting and analyzing data pertaining to Wellness Navigator enrollee information to assess gap-in-care clinical outcomes.
Works to ensure that reports for all jurisdictions are completed in a timely and accurate manner.
Preforms quality reviews on state-required and/or departmental reports related to health care Quality improvement initiatives including HEDIS and disease management programs.
Develops financial outcomes methodologies and metrics related to the company's clinical improvement products and services.
Conducts health data economic analysis for Marketing, Outreach and Health Promotion Departments.
Analyzes provider financial and clinical data to develop and produce performance reports.
Assists with preparation of state-required and/or departmental reports related to health care quality improvement initiatives including HEDIS and disease management programs.
Manages multiple data related projects to completion across multiple departments.
Works with the Information Systems department to further develop data access tools and analyze the functionality of external products.
Assists with development and supports new business applications and assists Senior healthcare analyst with implementation of a technical quality assurance process that ensures that all software development is properly specified, documented, tested, implemented, and feedback received for improvements.
Report to Senior Director, Marketing, Outreach and Health Promotion.

SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITY: This job has no supervisory responsibilities.

NECESSARY QUALIFICATIONS:

Required Experience/Skills/Abilities:
Computer proficiency with statistical analysis, spreadsheets, database and basic SQL.
Experience with organizing, developing, maintaining and updating SharePoint, especially developing workflows to create automated emails and job request intake sites.
Good Informatics skills in data/information presentation.
Good oral communication, written presentation and interpersonal skills
Mid-level report creation skills.
Clear understanding of health plan operations, workflows and reporting
Experience in data exploration and preparation with large datasets, and in study design and execution required.
Research experience with quantitative models.
Good analytical skills and multi-tasking capabilities.
Knowledge of Microsoft Access, Microsoft Excel, Crystal Reports and SQL.
Ability to work independently on complex projects and issues and interaction with other departments.
Knowledge of Health Plan data and an understanding of the linkages between data, knowledge and decision support necessary to report outcomes.
Five years of health care quantitative analysis and the application of advanced statistical techniques experience.
Experience with HEDIS and Medicaid reporting preferred.

Preferred:
Advanced degree and/or certifications
Note: The incumbent is required to immediately disclose any debarment, exclusion, or other event that makes him/her ineligible to perform work directly or indirectly on Federal health care programs.
SCHEDULE
Full time: 40 hours per week

TRAVEL
No travel required

COMPETENCIES
To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
Analytical | Collects and researches data; Uses intuition and experience to complement data.
Problem Solving | Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gathers and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions; Works well in group problem solving situations; Uses reason even when dealing with emotional topics.
Project Management | Communicates changes and progress; Completes projects on time and budget.
Technical Skills | Assesses own strengths and weaknesses; Pursues training and development opportunities; Strives to continuously build knowledge and skills; Shares expertise with others.
Customer Service | Manages difficult or emotional customer situations; Responds promptly to customer needs; Solicits customer feedback to improve service; Responds to requests for service and assistance; Meets commitments.
Interpersonal Skills | Focuses on solving conflict, not blaming; Maintains confidentiality; Listens to others without interrupting; Keeps emotions under control; Remains open to others' ideas and tries new things.
Oral Communication | Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; listens and gets clarification; Responds well to questions; Demonstrates group presentation skills; Participates in meetings.
Written Communication | Writes clearly and informatively; Edits work for spelling and grammar; Varies writing style to meet needs; Able to read and interpret written information.
Quality Management | Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.
Diversity | Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; promotes a harassment-free environment.
Ethics | Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values.
Organizational Support | Follows policies and procedures; Completes administrative tasks correctly and on time; supports organization's goals and values; Supports affirmative action and respects diversity.
Strategic Thinking | Develops strategies to achieve organizational goals; Understands organization's strengths & weaknesses; Analyzes market and competition; Adapts strategy to changing conditions.
Judgment | Displays willingness to make decisions; Includes appropriate people in decision-making process; makes timely decisions.
Motivation | Sets and achieves challenging goals; Demonstrates persistence and overcomes obstacles.
Planning/Organizing | Prioritizes and plans work activities; Uses time efficiently; Plans for additional resources.
Professionalism | Approaches others in a tactful manner; Reacts well under pressure; Treats others with respect and consideration regardless of their status or position; Accepts responsibility for own actions; Follows through on commitments.
Quality | Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness; Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Applies feedback to improve performance; Monitors own work to ensure quality.
Adaptability | Adapts to changes in the work environment; Manages competing demands; Changes approach or method to best fit the situation; Able to deal with frequent change, delays, or unexpected events.
Attendance/Punctuality | Is consistently at work and on time; Ensures work responsibilities are covered when absent; Arrives at meetings and appointments on time.
Dependability | Follows instructions, responds to management direction; Takes responsibility for own actions; Keeps commitments; Commits to long hours of work when necessary to reach goals; Completes tasks on time or notifies appropriate person with an alternate plan.
Initiative | Volunteers readily; Undertakes self-development activities; Seeks increased responsibilities; Looks for and takes advantage of opportunities; Asks for and offers help when needed.

OTHER SKILLS
LANGUAGE SKILLS | Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures, or governmental regulations. Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals. Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the public.

MATHEMATICAL SKILLS | Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs.

REASONING ABILITY | Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists. Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form.

COMPUTER SKILLS | To perform this job successfully, an individual should have basic computer skills and knowledge of electronic equipment, hardware, software, including applications and data entry.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS | The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; climb or balance; stoop, kneel or crouch.

Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT | The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.

Equal Employment Opportunity

CareFirst BlueCross BlueShield is an Equal Opportunity (EEO) employer. It is the policy of the Company to provide equal employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information.

Hire Range Disclaimer

Actual salary will be based on relevant job experience and work history.

Where To Apply

Please visit our website to apply: www.carefirst.com/careers

Closing Date

Please apply before: 9/20/2020

Federal Disc/Physical Demand

Note: The incumbent is required to immediately disclose any debarment, exclusion, or other event that makes him/her ineligible to perform work directly or indirectly on Federal health care programs.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS:

The associate is primarily seated while performing the duties of the position. Occasional walking or standing is required. The hands are regularly used to write, type, key and handle or feel small controls and objects. The associate must frequently talk and hear. Weights up to 25 pounds are occasionally lifted.

Sponsorship in US

Must be eligible to work in the U.S. without Sponsorship

]]>",3.8,"CareFirst BlueCross BlueShield
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1942,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
108,Quantitative Data Analyst,"$60k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Cogo Labs, we build startup companies from scratch. We are looking for entry level analysts to join our team as Quantitative Data Analysts.

We're not venture capitalists we're a collaborative, ambitious, and passionate team of engineers, analysts, and entrepreneurs using innovative tools, big data, and intellectual curiosity to build a platform that spins up successful online businesses, fast.

As a Cogo Labs Quantitative Data Analyst, you'll run and grow business lines within our incubator. You'll design and implement marketing programs, analyze performance metrics, and use the insights you gain to drive growth in audience engagement and revenue. Your expertise, ideas, and hard work will have a direct and immediate impact on the success of your project.

A little bit about us:
Near obsessive use of data to inform business decisions. We believe that efficient growth happens when we make every decision based on a solid, well-directed analysis.
Unmatched opportunity. We believe in mentoring people to grow as quickly as they can. Today's new grad hires are tomorrow's leaders.
Flexibility and novelty. Your role will define itself over time, as you identify the problems that you are uniquely capable of solving.
A fun, inclusive, and supportive culture. Happy employees are the most successful. We are empathetic and take care of each other, and not just because it's good business.

What we expect from you:
A bachelor's degree in a field that requires deep analytical thinking and problem solving. Many of us have Math, Econ, Engineering, or Comp Sci backgrounds, but applications from all quantitative fields are welcome.
0-2 years of experience in an analytics focused role.
Flexibility and self-motivation. We value the willingness and excitement to wear many hats and the commitment to work on a wide variety of analytical and business problems.
The ability and desire to make a strong data-driven case when presenting findings and recommendations, while remaining curious and receptive to feedback.
An effective communicator, articulate in stating project missions, updates, decisions, and rationales verbally and in writing.
Proactive in developing new ideas and initiating growth opportunities.
Demonstrated ability to work effectively as part of a team, and dedication to being supportive in helping your teammates learn.
Familiarity with technical tools such as SQL and Python.
Bonus points if you've previously been responsible for a business unit's bottom line.
If you're reading this and questioning whether you should apply, apply! There's no such thing as a perfect candidate, and we don't expect you to check every box. We're inspired by the uniqueness that people like you bring to the table. The companies that we incubate are only as innovative as the breadth of lived experiences shared by the teams building them. We can't wait to read your application!

Cogo Labs is an equal opportunity employer and individuals seeking employment with us are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.6,"Cogo Labs
3.6","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
109,Data Analytics Engineer-Business Intelligence Analyst,"$43k-$84k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Analytics Engineer-Clinical Services
Summa Health System
Full-time, w/benefits

Summa Health System is recognized as one of the region’s top employers by a number of third party organizations, including NorthCoast 99. Exceptional candidates gravitate to Summa because of its culture, passion for delivering excellent service to our patients and families commitment to our philosophy of servant leadership, collegial working relationships at every level of the organization and competitive pay and benefits.
Summary:
Works with a team of technologists (Data Engineers and Visualization Engineers) to deliver insights across various aspects of Summa Health’s operational, financial, and clinical activities with the goal of leveraging data to drive and realize the full potential of the organization’s programs.

Minimum Qualifications:
Formal Education Required:
-Bachelor’s degree in computer science, applied mathematics, statistics, or related discipline
Experience & Training Required:
-Five (5) years of experience in a previous analytics role in healthcare domain involving healthcare data analysis to optimize business operations
-Knowledgeable about the workings of integrated healthcare systems, health plan, research, and community programs
-Experience in analyzing healthcare data using statistical methods to optimize business operations and communicating their findings using data visualization and detailed reports

Other Skills, Competencies and Qualifications:
-Analytical mindset with good problem-solving skills
-Excellent written and verbal communication skills
-Acumen for analytics needs of an integrated health system how to use data to achieve those needs.
-Ability to effectively interact with populations of patients/customers with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Ability to summarize results and develop effective business presentations.
-Ability to interact with populations both technical and non-technical, with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Strong, critical thinker with ability to extend knowledge of information systems and applications to business processes and to cross team collaboration. Ability to explain complex, technical concepts to lay audiences and non-IT staff.
-Basic knowledge of data warehousing, data marts
-Experience with one or more Summa application platforms is desirable including Soarian Financials, DSS, HQ/HI, Epic/CarePATH and tools (RWB, Clarity, Caboodle, Radar, SlicerDicer, Registries), CostFlex, e-ClinicalWorks, GE Centricity, Lawson, Pentaho, SAS, Tableau.

1. Work with senior leaders within a line of business and across the enterprise to establish a measurement plan focused on outcomes
2. Work as a data strategist to identify and integrate datasets, data components, and attributes from various information systems to leverage information for business programs and objectives
3. Communicate, advise senior leaders about utilizing all relevant data, including clinical, operational, exposome, social determinate, economic and financial, to drive programmatic growth and achieve strategic outcomes
4. Gather baseline data information to understand current state and improvement opportunity
5. Identify data requirements based on analytical processes to measure the outcomes
6. Conduct descriptive/statistical analysis of the data set to validate hypothesis
7. Define the business requirements / specifications and user interface (Wireframes and Mockups)
8. Work with other members of CoE to develop mission control dashboards that measures the timely performance to outcome
9. Validate, deploy mission control dashboards
10. Educate Mission end users and advocate adoption of analytical tools
11. Support rolling out new insights, which are a result of discovery and exploratory exercises conducted, by citizen data analysts / scientists.
12. Ensuring that mission control insights remain relevant to achieving the desired outcome
13. Confirming that stakeholders are utilizing mission control in pursuit of that outcome
14. Surfacing new insights to drive continuous improvement
15. Communicate findings to stakeholders; implement improvement efforts as needed.

Level of Physical Demands:
Light: Exerts up to 20 pounds of force occasionally and/or up to ten pounds of force frequently, and/or a negligible amount of force continuously.
#LI-AV1",3.6,"Summa Health System
3.6","Akron, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1926,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
110,Data Analyst,-1,"This position is responsible for collecting and cleansing data, conducting data analysis and performing software support including the testing of software as well as building software documentation for multiple internal and hosted applications at the ELCHC. These applications and data sets support families, assists in evaluating program performance and drives other key process improvement functions to support contractual obligations. The Data Analyst collaborates with key business users to ensure requirements are met and report specifications are delivered accurately and completely.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES*
· Evaluate business requirements to build data sets from multiple sources for business reporting purposes

· Create daily, weekly and monthly reports on children, providers, assessors, enrollments and terminations

· Ensure the accuracy of reporting

· Manage and update provider changes on multiple systems as needed

· Migrate data between multiple database applications

· Develop and maintain internal and external business applications and corresponding reports

· Perform software testing and document errors and processes for improvement

· Provide departmental support in developing and standardizing processes for coalition operations using data sets

· Perform first-line user support, technical assistance and troubleshooting for business applications and reporting, both for internal and external users.

· Create and manage user accounts and permissions for all applications

· Perform additional responsibilities as required

· Support other special projects as needed
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES*
None
QUALIFICATIONS*
Associates degree from an accredited institution in business administration, Information Technology or other closely related field; a combination of education and previous experience may be considered
Minimum 2 years experience in data management and/or data analytics; Early Learning Coalition database experience preferred
2+ years of experience using Tableau
1+ years of experience using or reporting from MIP Fund Accounting Software
2+ years of experience with SQL Server Reporting Services or other relational database reporting tool
Experience using and managing service desk software such as Zendesk
Ability to interpret and draw conclusions from data sets
Intermediate skills in Microsoft Office and Teams is essential
Experience with Agile, SDLC, project management and/or process improvement (Six Sigma) will be given preference
This position requires successful completion of the level 2 background screening standards as set forth in s. 435.04, F.S.
Physical Activity/ Work Conditions*
· *Work Environment: *This job operates in a general office setting. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, copiers/fax machines. While performing the duties of this job, the employee frequently interacts with staff, vendors, and the general public in person and via telephone and email.

· *Physical Demands: *While performing the duties of this job, the employee will be required to sit for prolonged periods of time, at a desk, utilizing a computer and reviewing online and paper documents. The employee will also be required to lift and move up to 25 pounds and occasionally lift and move up to 50 pounds.

· *Position Type and Expected Hours of Work: *This is a full time position. Standard hours are Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 4:30 p.m. Evening and weekend hours may be required.

_The statements in this Job Description are intended to describe the general nature and minimum level of work required. The content should not be construed as a complete list of all duties, responsibilities and skills required to meet the criteria for this position. Upon request, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. __Early Learning Coalition of Hillsborough County does not discriminate against employees or clients based on race, color, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, marital status, familial status or any other characteristic protected by Federal and State law. The coalition will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as Amended (ADAAA). We recruit, employ, train, compensate, and promote without regard to race, religion, creed, color, national origin, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable federal, state or local law._

Job Types: Full-time, Commission

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data management or data analytics: 2 years (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.elchc.org
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"EARLY LEARNING COALITION OF HILLSBOROUGH COUNTY
4.0","Tampa, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
111,"Lead Data Analyst, Consumer Experience","$66k-$117k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About the role

As a Lead Analyst, you will be responsible for the success of multiple work streams across our consumer product, focusing on the Move Money product experience. You will act as a mentor and manager to your fellow teammates and lead the standardization of our analytical processes and project delivery methods. You'll use data to develop insights, run experiments, and guide decision making to build consumer experiences and features to delight and solve our members' issues.

In this role, you can expect to
Define key metrics used to measure the success of our consumer banking experiences and products and develop dashboards to surface insights to drive decision making
Build a deeper understanding of our members needs and use predictive analytics to develop strategic product and business opportunities for Chime
Closely partner with product, engineering, and operations to translate your data insights into product features or recommendations; you will partner with product to drive roadmap development.
Oversee and help to define the work of other members of the team to ensure consistent delivery of high-quality outputs
Lead experimentation by providing guidance on the experiments that should be run, how they should be run, and evaluating the impact on our key metrics
Foster a data-driven, test-and-learn culture with your passion for telling stories with data
To thrive in this role, you have
A quantitative degree in a field like Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Operations Research, or Engineering. Advanced degrees preferred
7+ years in analytics. B2C product analytics and FinTech experience preferred
2+ years direct or indirect management experience overseeing the work of 2-4 team members
Advanced SQL skills - familiarity with window functions and query optimization
A high level of comfort delivering reporting and insights within a data visualization platform (eg Looker, Tableau)
Exposure to a scripting language like Python or R and relevant data science packages
Proven experience with data science, experimentation, and statistical analysis used to guide decision making.
Excellent communication skills, a record of working cross-functionally to achieve results.
A little about us

We created Chime because we believe everyone deserves financial peace of mind. By eliminating unnecessary fees and helping people grow their savings automatically, we've empowered millions of Americans to take control of their finances.

Chime is the largest and fastest-growing U.S. player in the challenger-banking space. Through our banking partners, we offer access to bank accounts with fee-free overdraft, provide members the chance to receive early access to their paychecks, help them improve their credit, and more!

We've built one of the most experienced leadership teams in Fintech and were recently valued at over $14.5B. We've raised over $1B in funding from leading investors including DST, Coatue, Tiger Global, General Atlantic, Iconiq, Dragoneer, Menlo, Whale Rock, Access, Forerunner, Crosslink, Cathay, aCrew, and others.

What we offer
Competitive salary based on experience
401k match plus the usual medical, dental, vision, life, and disability benefits
Quarterly stipend to spruce up your home office
Generous vacation policy and company-wide Take Care of Yourself Days
Virtual events to connect with your fellow Chimers- think cooking classes, music festivals, mixology classes, paint nights, etc., and delicious snack boxes, too!
A challenging and fulfilling opportunity to join one of the most experienced teams in FinTech and help create a completely new kind of banking service
We know that great work comes from great and inclusive teams. At Chime, we specifically look for individuals of varying strengths, skills, backgrounds, and ideas. We believe this gives us a competitive advantage to better serve our members and helps us all grow as Chimers and individuals.

We hire candidates of any race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital or family status, disability, Veteran status, and any other status. Chime is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know. To learn more about how Chime collects and uses your personal information during the application process, please see the Chime Applicant Privacy Notice.",4.8,"Chime
4.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
112,Clinical Data Analyst,"$52k-$93k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Overview:
The Clinical Data Analyst is responsible for assisting in the development and execution of the clinical strategy for new indications. The Clinical Data Analyst will analyze data from clinical publications and TrakStar and develop statistical models to support new indication submissions. The Clinical Data Analyst will also work with Marketing, Sales Operations and other cross-functional teams to provide TrakStar data analytics to support cross-functional department needs.

Essential Duties/Responsibilities:
• Use enterprise level analysis tools to gather and sort through data from TrakStar.
• Provide data tables and reports as requested by various departments.
• Perform a wide range of technical analysis on various data sets.
• Work with marketing to gather patient demographic data.
• Work with Sales Operations to gather MT, utilization and other data.
• Gather post market surveillance data to support regulatory filing requirements.

Education and Experience:
• Technical/Science or related Degree.
• Strong analysis skills; able to sort large amounts of information for significant data.
• Self-directed, resourceful, and able to get work done without significant input.
• Good organizational skills, attentive to details, and able to multitask.
• Strong problem-solving skills and ability to deal with changing priorities.

Preferred Skills:
• Experience with statistical methods used for clinical trials.
• Experience in medical research and/or development.

Physical Requirements
• Must be able to remain in a stationary position 50%-75%
• Walking/Bending/Stooping 50%-75% to access file cabinets, office equipment, etc.
• Light to moderate lifting (up to 50lbs)
• Some light travel maybe required by air, rail or auto within the United States",3.1,"Neuronetics
3.1","Malvern, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
113,"Intelligence Data Analyst, Senior","$77k-$104k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Intelligence Data Analyst, Sr

Job Description: Provides support to the Department of the Army

Intelligence Information Services (DAIIS). Responsible for delivering world

class organizational messaging for the Army intelligence enterprise through

the Multimedia Messenger Manager (M3). Provides data management functions

in the form of data governance, data architecture, data warehousing, data

quality management, metadata management, data security management, data

development management, data operations management, data refinement,

integrated data services, data transformation services, data discovery

services, data tradecraft services, advanced data analytics, and technology

pursuit. Serves as an enterprise access manager/validator for Army

intelligence users to access intelligence community PKI-enabled databases or

communities of interest (COI) on JWICS such as NCTC Online and JEMS.

o Required Skills: Power Business Intelligence (BI), ability to

manipulate data, experience with training

o Desirable Skills: Python coding experience is a plus",4.3,"The Buffalo Group
4.3","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
114,Quality Data Analyst,"$41k-$73k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Jubilant HollisterStier LLC provides a complete range of services to support the pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical industries. The Allergy business is a worldwide leader in the manufacture of allergenic extracts, targeted primarily at treating allergies and asthma. Jubilant HollisterStier is also a nationally recognized contract manufacturer of sterile injectable vials, and lyophilized products. Jubilant HollisterStier is owned by Jubilant Life Sciences.

Reporting to the Director of QA Operations, The Quality Data Analyst is responsible for data collection, statistical analysis, and investigative reporting functions for all Jubilant Pharma facilities. Essential responsibilities include but are not limited to:

Collect, analyze, trend, and manage quality-related data, and communicate results to upper management.
Prepare and distribute monthly Quality dashboard.
Prepare and distribute monthly Effeciency Matrix.
Perform Quality System Trending (to include metrics) related to: Incidents, CAPAs, Customer Complaints, Change Controls, EDRs, CERs, Internal Audits, etc.
Develop and maintain a pharmaceutical Quality By Design (QbD) policy and program to collect and evaluate critical process parameters from each product line as it matures through its life cycle.
Develop and prepare common, practical, and relevant metrics from across the Jubilant Pharma facilities in order to identify the most efficient and effective utilization of capital and human resources.

Qualifications:

Bachelor of Arts or Science required. Preferred majors are any hard sciences, mathematics, or statistics.
Minimum of 5 years related experience.
Must have 3 years pharmaceutical experience.
FDA Regulated Industry experience is required.
Must have solid understanding and proven performance utilizing statistical analysis.
Proficient in Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint is required.
Physical Requirements: Prolonged sitting.

Jubilant HollisterStier is a great place to grow!

If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today!

http://www.jubilantcareer.jubl.com

Jubilant HollisterStier is an EEO/AA Employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

If you require assistance applying for a position, please contact our HR Department at:

HResources@jhs.jubl.com",3.0,"Jubilant HollisterStier Spokane
3.0","Spokane, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
115,HCM Data Analyst,"$55k-$94k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Any qualified individual with a disability who is having difficulty in completing an application because of incompatible technology or other disability-related application issues may contact us at the following phone number for assistance: 251-445-1932.

Austal shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR §§ 60-1.4(a), 60-300.5(a) and 60-741.5(a). These regulations prohibit discrimination against qualified individuals based on their status as protected veterans or individuals with disabilities, and prohibit discrimination against all individuals based on their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin. Moreover, these regulations require that covered prime contractors and subcontractors take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status or disability. Austal’s commitment to equal employment opportunity applies at all levels of employment, in all job titles, including the executive level, and to all employment actions, including but not limited to decisions concerning recruitment, hiring, training, and promotion.

REPORTS TO: HCM Coordinator

SUPERVISES: N/A

AUTHORITIES / RESPONSIBILITIES:

The HCM data analyst plays a crucial role in collecting, structuring, analyzing, and reporting on HR processes and data. Supports business with key HR insights reporting (manning levels, hires; retention, turnover), talent metrics (promotion reporting; learning and development tracking; performance management insights), benefits reporting (billing invoices, participation census) as well as ad hoc reporting and data analysis as needed.

Job Description

Utilizes Workday systems and analytical tools to develop, analyze and interpret HR workforce data.
Partners with stakeholders across business units to build and implement reporting and analytic solutions that provide leaders with information necessary to achieve business goals and objectives.
Develop and maintain standardized dashboards and other related metrics reports for organization-wide and HR department evaluation.
Maintains common HR data repository
Monitors effectiveness of reporting and analytics products to ensure optimal value to the business, modifying or operationalizing new metrics and dashboard products as needed.
Creates scheduled reports and respond to ad-hoc queries from senior management and other areas of the company.
Leverages data extraction tools and approaches to perform complex data analysis and formulate new meaningful insights.
Reviews new reporting requests to be sure the request is consistent with HR systems and data strategies.
Creates, maintains, and ensures quality assurance of human resources data sets, reports, and metrics.
Recommends process and system improvements, follow up on recommendations.
Assist in the identification of data integrity problems and recommend solutions.
Other special projects, as needed.
Other duties as assigned;

QUALIFICATIONS / KNOWLEDGE / EXPERIENCE:

Bachelors degree or equivalent.
3-5 Business Analyst experience documenting Business Requirements and conducting data analysis.
Workday experience preferred in one or more modules: HCM, Benefits, Talent/Performance, Security, or Advanced Compensation.
Strong written and verbal communication skills to effectively communicate processes and procedures with managers and employees.
Highly developed ability to provide clear, concise verbal and written explanations for complex concepts so that others see the value add in recommendations and solutions.
Strong computer proficiency and technical aptitude to utilize MSOffice. Expert-level proficiency in Microsoft Excel (PowerPoint a plus).
Strong process orientation, analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent service orientation skill set, ability to build strong relationships with fellow HR team members.
Must work with a sense of urgency and have the ability to handle confidential information in a professional manner. Can handle demands from multiple customers and has the ability to prioritize.
Ability to work collaboratively with multiple teams/organizations with attention to detail and strong organizational skills.
Flexible and has the capability to deliver results in a fast-paced, and high volume environment.

TOOLS: Not applicable

DIRECTION EXERCISED: Works within established guidelines. Works autonomously and escalates issues to HCM Coordinator as appropriate.

DISCRETION EXERCISED: A degree of creativity and latitude is expected. Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.

LIAISES WITH:

Employees, Department Managers, HR / Benefit Staff, Finance staff and external consultants as assigned.

ADDITIONAL GUIDELINES:

The ability to obtain and maintain a DoD clearance may be required if deemed necessary in the scope of your position responsibilities.
Candidates must meet the following employment eligibility guidelines to be eligible for employment with Austal USA:
18 years or older at time of application
Able to provide proof of US Person status (permanent resident or citizen)
No felony convictions of theft/deception or violent crimes within seven years from disposition date
No felony convictions of drug crimes within three years from disposition date
Willing to submit to a drug screen
Willing to submit to a background check",3.2,"Austal USA
3.2","Mobile, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
116,Data Analyst,"$40k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
We are seeking a strong, highly-motivated, results-oriented Data Analyst to help conduct in-depth analyses and derive relevant insights. You will be an integral part of a newly-formed central analytics team and your work will influence business operations and strategy throughout the company.
Responsibilities:
Partner closely with stakeholders from a variety of teams, including the executive team, curriculum, brand marketing, partnerships, strategy and customer success, to surface insights and learnings that solve key business challenges
Create, report and interpret key metrics to assess performance, measure the impact of strategic initiatives, and identify ways to grow revenue and reduce costs
Support A/B and multivariate testing of user behavior to inform media tactics, audience acquisition and targeting, churn, lifetime value, product and content recommendations and personalized experiences
Create beautiful and informative automated/real-time dashboards and visualizations
Identify actionable insights that positively affect both company revenue and learning outcomes for children
Drive data capture and data integrity requirements while partnering with other teams so that the right data is captured
Maintain vigilant eye on data quality
Communicate results to technical and non-technical stakeholders
Required Qualifications:
At least 2 years in an analytical/product focused role, preferably from a digital environment
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field; or two to four years related experience and/or training
Must be able to understand and analyze data, synthesizing large volumes of data and complex questions into clear analyses and actionable findings.
Strong analytical reporting skills and visualization skills
Knowledge of statistic, including hypothesis testing, distributions and correlation and regression analysis
Proficient in SQL and at least one visualization tool, preferably Tableau
Collaborative problem-solving skills with an entrepreneurial attitude and results-oriented mind set
Ability to identify edge cases and solve practical problems
Hard-working, curious, motivated team-payer who is passionate about data
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with testing and optimization a plus, ideally in a digital environment
Experience in games or education a plus
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.1,"Age of Learning
3.1","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
117,Product Development Data Analyst,"$38k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Summary:

The Product Development Data Analyst will support Global Product Development project portfolio analytics and reporting within Fortune Brands Global Plumbing Group (GPG). They will assist with the design, implementation, administration, and continuous improvement of Product Development analytics capability required to reach the new product portion of GPG growth targets.

The scope of work includes expanding analytic capabilities within Global Product Development across project management and product engineering functions. This consists of enabling data-driven decision making by supporting the development and optimization of dashboard reporting for executive management, as well as communicating conclusions from aforementioned analytical solutions to a varied audience.

Job Description:

Responsibilities

Act as a point of contact for engineering reports, dashboards and other analytics that will help the global project management and engineering organizations make insightful decisions about the people, processes and products.
Under the direction of the Senior Project Portfolio Systems Manager, assume project/deliverable ownership for the full lifecycle (cradle to grave) for all relevant dashboards and reports.
Support the strategic decision-making processes by defining, monitoring and reporting key metrics; Continue to evolve key metrics as business strategies and objectives evolve.
Track, analyze and report on critical KPI’s on a regular cadence; Use data visualization (i.e. create dashboards, graphics and reports) to assist critical decision-makers in effectively interpreting data to arrive at insights.
Play a key role in generating solutions to complex product development problems by mining data and reports to yield relevant, actionable insights into improving product engineering processes and systems.
Provide technical subject-matter-expertise in evaluating technology changes that may advance capability.
Work with stakeholders in determining what analytical improvements are required to drive the achievement of their strategic and business objectives.
Identify the impact of potential changes, integrate new initiatives with existing processes, and ensure that all processes are consistent and fit together.
Work with IT and other stakeholders to communicate, test and deploy necessary configuration changes to software (upgrades).
Support ad hoc analysis requirements based on product development business priority

Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Mathematics, Data Science or an equivalent technical degree is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related analytics experience to include experience in the design and development of insightful portfolio dashboards and analytics.
Experience in the design and development of insightful portfolio dashboards and analytics; in depth knowledge of product engineering project ROI financial metric relationships and interdependencies required.
Proficient in the use of Microsoft Office Suite. Intermediate to Advanced Excel skills are preferred.
The following qualifications are preferred:
Experience developing reports using reporting tools and dashboards, such as BW Query Design, QlikView or Tableau
Experience with Product Development and Stage-Gate methodology
Experience with QlikView
Experience with SharePoint 2013
Experience with SAP R3 software
Experience in merging data from SAP R3 ERP platform with MS Project Server/SQL Server data, and Excel based financial models within QlikView analytics software required.
Demonstrated sense of urgency and ability to persevere to reach objectives for challenging problems.
Strong communication skills with experience presenting and translating data into decision-ready insights is preferred.
Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to collaborate in a team environment.
Demonstrated passion for learning, adoption of new technology, and independent decision making.
Must possess excellent organizational skills and be able to deal with fluctuating priorities; be a self-starter and work with minimum supervision
Ability to travel ~ 10%.",3.7,"Moen
3.7","Cleveland, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Wholesale,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
118,Data Analyst,"$39k-$70k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst, St. Louis or multiple locations

St. Louis preferred, but will consider: Arlington, WI Evansville, IN Huxley, IA Williamsburg, IA Lubbock, TX Monmouth, IL Ankeny, IA
*No C2C or sponsorship, must be our W2**
4-6 Years of experience working with one or more of the following tools: SAS, Spotfire, J-Review, R, SAS, JavaScript, Python, or Perl
Thorough understanding of data standards
ilter, tag, join, parse, and normalize data sets for use in analytical models.
Create reports and dashboards from a variety of data.
Work with data manager or steward to resolve data quality issues and with data scientists to understand their workflows and requirements. Manage model degradation and ensure models remain predictive.
Good data wrangling, some statistics & linear algebra skills.
Create operative business insights for business stakeholders, and use the outputs of the Data Scientists in operative business. Decomposition of complex problems, expert knowledge in data, tools, and methods, storytelling and communication, business acumen.",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
119,Intern - Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

2021 Paid Summer Internship

Zions
Bancorporation’s Enterprise Technology and Operations (ETO) team is
transforming what it means to work for a financial institution. We operate in a
fast-paced, information-driven environment, which means we need people who
bring diverse experiences, perspectives, and expertise to meet the
ever-changing demands of a technology-driven world. We are grounded in the
belief that “improving the work is the work” as we drive to create simple,
easy, and fast solutions for our customers. Your ability to adapt, learn, and
innovate helps increase revenue, reduce operational costs, and mitigates risk.

ETO
provides opportunities for you to own your career growth through Diversity,
Equity, and Inclusion, Women in Technology, and Workforce of the Future
initiatives that allow you to network across the organization, volunteer in our
community, and build your technical and soft skills. Together we are building a
culture that values diversity and creates a space of belonging for all our team
members. We believe that investing in your success is an investment in our
customers and our business. Our people are what sets us apart and make us
great.

Zions Technology Strategy &
Programs Division of ETO is looking for a Data
Analyst Intern.

The intern will assist technology
support functions in integrating large data sets, analyzing the data, deriving
key findings and trends, and developing reporting. Projects will range from supporting areas
like IT Risk Management to IT Services Management (Incident, Problem, Change
and Release Management).

The position will
involve using a broad set of tools to query, analyze, and summarize information
quickly. Candidates should have both an
analytical mindset and ability to graphically depict the data for providing
both historical information as well as future predictions.

The intern will have
both rotational opportunities to gain background in horizontal technology
support functions and specific project work to apply learnings. Project results will be presented with an
emphasis on covering the approach taken and findings/results.

Please include a cover letter
listing your degree and describing your skills and experience in the data
analysis space, noting relevant school projects or business applications of
your skills.
Qualifications:

Working on a Bachelor's degree or Master’s degree in
mathematics, statistics, science, accounting, finance, business, computer
science, economics, or a related field;
Enjoy analyzing and building models using large sets of
data;
Strong analytical and organizational skills;
Strong written, verbal, and presentation skills;
Strong attention to detail;
Experience creating reports and dashboards using tools
like ClickView or Tableau;
Experience with MS Excel, Word, and PowerPoint;
Experience with database management tools such as SQL
and MS Access.",3.3,"Zions Bancorporation
3.3","West Valley City, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
120,Product and Data Analyst,"$46k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Canal Insurance

Canal Insurance Company specializes in insurance for commercial trucking and specialty transportation operations. Canal was founded in 1939 and is located in Greenville, South Carolina. At Canal, we recognize that our success would not be possible without the hard work and dedication of our employees. We know that happiness and productivity go hand in hand, and to that end, we consciously cultivate a culture that enables us to recruit and retain the very best talent in the business.

Product& Data Analyst:

** Must be willing to relocate to Greenville, South Carolina **

The Product and Data Analyst position is responsible for providing analytical support to Product Managers within a designated region, group of states, or function and for maintaining regularly generated reports, answering ad hoc data questions and distributing these results to all levels of management. The analyst will also support the companies modeling efforts by monitoring the results of models as well as refreshing existing models.

Major Accountabilities:
Complete recommendations for pricing adequacy and participate in strategies that consider multiple business dimensions for profit, growth and expense for specific states and regions.
Accurately and concisely communicate findings of analysis. Proactively solicit input from business leaders on rate plans and progress.
Monitor incoming business and communicate results to product managers, business units and marketing staff.
Query data from multiple sources, check for completeness and accuracy, and produce regularly scheduled as well as ad hoc reports.
Collaborate with IT in the research and solution of data issues within source systems and downstream applications.
Monitor existing models to see that they continue to be effective, or to suggest improvements.
Refresh and reparametrize existing predictive models.
Perform other duties as assigned by Management.
Qualifications

Education/Training Requirements: Bachelor’s degree required with a concentration in Business, Finance, Economics, Mathematics or Computer Science preferred.

Experience/Specialized Skills: Minimum three years of experience analyzing data identification of data anomalies required. Basic technical knowledge and intermediate operational knowledge in underwriting preferred. Intermediate knowledge of database functionality required. Advanced querying skills (PowerPivot, SQL, R, or SAS) preferred. At least three years of experience analyzing data with a critical eye towards reasonability and identification of data anomalies. Prior experience developing or using results from regression models or decision trees is strongly preferred. Insurance industry experience preferred, but not required. Advanced computer skills (word processing, spreadsheets, databases, Internet, e-mail) required.

Special Considerations

Physical Requirements: Constant use of vision, hearing, and communication (oral and written in person and via telephone). Frequent concentration, standing, walking, handling, reaching, and grasping. Occasional bending, kneeling and lifting (up to 25 lbs.). Heavy use of computer and office equipment.

Additional Requirements: Occasional travel may be required. Periodic work outside of standard business hours or on weekends may be required.",3.8,"Canal Insurance
3.8","Greenville, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1939,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
121,Data Analyst I,"$35k-$62k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst I

Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
Ontario - Washington, DC, DC
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
4 Year Degree
Travel Percentage
None
Job Shift
Day
Job Category
Health Care
Description
Mary's Center is committed to promoting diversity, equity and inclusion (DEI) within our organization and the communities we serve. We embrace diversity of experiences, ideas, and individuals, and seek to bring diverse candidates to the table.

The Data Analyst I with work with other Data Management and Health Analytics (DMHA) team members to run and prepare reports for all Mary’s Center Initiatives to include other departmental requests, grant applications and standard reporting and ad hoc reporting. The Data Analyst I is responsible for running routine quality and outcomes reports, responding to requests for data as well as grant reporting. This position requires proficient command of SQL coding and advanced Microsoft Excel skills, including creating and using complex formulas and manipulating large datasets.

Reportability

This position will report directly to the Director of Quality & Outcomes.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
Build complex queries in SQL Server
Build Tableau Dashboards
Analyze large datasets and be able to strategize methods of data collection
Assist other team members with their duties
Run routine quality and outcomes reports by scheduled due dates, validates and analyzes data, sends data to staff responsible for programs.
Prepare patient panels for chronic disease management and group care
Manage health maintenance reminder messages
Qualifications
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Education and/or Experience – Undergraduate degree in social science research and evaluation field and/or two to three years’ experience working in a research/evaluation setting. Extensive experience with Microsoft Excel, including creating and using complex formulas and large datasets. Knowledge of Word, and PowerPoint is essential, knowledge of SQL, SPSS, preferred, as well as a thorough understanding and working knowledge of patient/client confidentiality issues and HIPAA compliance/regulations. Knowledge of SQL and integration of SQL queries in Tableau. Understanding of data flow. Individual must be detail-oriented and able to coordinate multiple tasks at once.

Physical Demands – Regularly required to sit; frequently required to reach with hands and arms, walk, stoop, kneel, crouch, talk or hear; must be able to lift objects up to twenty-five (25) pounds.

Work Environment – Mostly in a typical office and/or home setting with a quiet to moderate noise level. May be exposed to extreme cold, heat, and humidity due to outside weather conditions.",3.3,"Marys Center For Maternal and Child Care
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1988,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
122,Intern - Data Analyst or Business Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst or Business
Analyst Intern
2021 Paid Summer Intern

Zions
Bancorporation’s Enterprise Technology and Operations (ETO) team is transforming
what it means to work for a financial institution. We operate in a fast-paced,
information-driven environment, which means we need people who bring diverse
experiences, perspectives, and expertise to meet the ever-changing demands of a
technology-driven world. We are grounded in the belief that “improving the work
is the work” as we drive to create simple, easy, and fast solutions for our
customers. Your ability to adapt, learn, and innovate helps increase revenue,
reduce operational costs, and mitigates risk.

ETO
provides opportunities for you to own your career growth through Diversity,
Equity, and Inclusion, Women in Technology, and Workforce of the Future
initiatives that allow you to network across the organization, volunteer in our
community, and build your technical and soft skills. Together we are building a
culture that values diversity and creates a space of belonging for all our team
members. We believe that investing in your success is an investment in our
customers and our business. Our people are what sets us apart and make us
great.

Members of the FutureCore team
are building the next generation of banking technology at Zions Bancorporation.
By joining our team, you can make a difference in the lives of our customers
and help us develop innovative banking solutions for them.

We are currently seeking a
highly-motivated Data Analyst or Business Analyst Intern to join our team. In
this exciting role, you will work with a team of dedicated individuals
committed to deliver results and support program objectives. You’ll also have
opportunities to collaborate with others to develop creative solutions for
challenges.

You will be an excellent fit
for this position if you have the desire, skills, and experience to:
Review,
analyze, and evaluate functional aspects and data requirements of an
application or system to develop solutions for system interfaces.
Actively
participate in requirements, design, development, and quality assurance (QA)
processes of the project.
Perform
data analysis and research activities.
Assist
in producing project documentation and specifications.
Identify
opportunities for process automation and implement solutions.
Track
project performance against key performance metrics
Create
and distribute status reports and other project communications.
Qualifications:

Must
be working toward Bachelor's (taking upper division courses) or Masters degree
in Information Systems, Data Analytics or other related field.
Strong
analytical, organizational, and problem-solving skills.
Well-developed
communication skills (both written and verbal).
Ability
to work and contribute in a collaborative team environment.
Strong
interpersonal skills and the ability to work with management, peers, and
technical staff.
Adapts
well to change and is comfortable with the dynamics of a fast-paced environment
Ability
to take initiative and ownership to see assignments and projects through to completion
High-level
of proficiency using Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio and SQL.
Experience
using scripted languages to develop automated solutions is desired
Analysis
skills to use data to make recommendations",3.3,"Zions Bancorporation
3.3","West Valley City, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
123,Data Analyst,"$44k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Are Hiring

Join our Operations Improvement team as a Performance Improvement Coordinator with a focus on data analysis. This is a full-time position with the availability to work remotely.

Work Schedule: Typically, M-F, day shift hours. Specific hours to be discussed and agreed upon with hiring leader. In addition, there may occasionally be evening and/or weekend hours, based on business needs that arise.

Why Join Ascension?
In Michigan, Ascension operates 16 hospitals and hundreds of related healthcare facilities that together employ over 20,000 associates. Across the state, Ascension Michigan is working together to help bring patients more resources and better care. Ascension Michigan is also committed to its community; it provided over $272 million in community benefit and care of persons living in poverty in FY2018. Ascension Michigan is dedicated to spiritually centered, holistic care which sustains and improves the health of individuals and communities.
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.
Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension-Michigan, you will have the opportunity to organize and coordinate performance improvement program activities and workflow.

Responsibilities:
Collaborates with multidisciplinary team on problem identification and resolution, cost containment issues, implementation of new services and systems/ performance measures.
Researches, develops/acquires and implements improvement systems, methodologies and tools to improve operations.
Collaborates with Leaders to develop and revise screening indicators.
Provides on-site training and follow-up for performance improvement teams.
Performs regulatory documentation preparation, submission, and maintenance. Ensures compliance with regulatory and accreditation requirements.
Assists in policy, procedure and contract review process. Coordinates quality improvement initiatives.
What You Will Need

Education:
Diploma
High school diploma or GED required.
Bachelor's degree preferred in analysis areas (biostatistics, statistics, applied mathematics, epidemiology, etc)
Preferred Experience:
Experience with database setup and administration.
Understand data storage and data sharing methods.
Compile and organize healthcare data.
Analyze data to assist in delivering optimal healthcare management and decision making.
Investigate data to find patterns and trends and make recommendations for quality improvements
Understand healthcare business operations.
Fluent in coding languages, such as R or SQL.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension Michigan is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We provide equal employment opportunities to all associates and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, height, weight, genetic information, marital status, amnesty, veteran status or any other legally protected status in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws. The information requested on this application will not be used for any purpose prohibited by law. If you require assistance or an accommodation to complete this application, please let us know.

For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf
M/F/Disabled/Vet
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf
Reasonable Accommodation
Ascension Michigan provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request in order to express interest in a position by e-mailing: reasonableaccommodations@stjohn.org. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Ascension Michigan will be reviewed at the e-mail address supplied.
Thank you for considering a career with Ascension Michigan.
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension Michigan participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.3,"Ascension
3.3","Warren, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
124,DATA MGMT ANALYST RADIOLOGY,"$30k-$62k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Ensures customers satisfaction through the provision and maintenance of easily accessible, high quality and uninterrupted information services, and systems within the division of Imaging Services. Analyzes, trouble shoots and resolves imaging service network, systems, and related component problems at both northlake and southlake campuses, as well as other offsite facilities.
PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES(*Essential Functions)


Ensures the integrity and reliability of all imaging systems by assessing and resolving hardware and software problems, encompassing the hospital infrastructure, client-servers, and stand-alone systems.

Special emphasis to calls arising on evenings, nights, and/or weekends, in order to minimize any system downtime and maintain needed system utilization.

Evaluates and recommends system hardware and software replacements and upgrades, both on an assigned project as well as on ""as observed"" basis.

Maintains accurate and adequate inventory levels of supplies and parts, including all necessary and related record keeping of usage, orders, and replacements.

Maintains an up-to-date understanding of the overall structure, interrelatedness, and operations of the hospital infrastructure, remote users, LANS, stand-alone systems and personal computers.

This is essential in order to provide complete and timely services to customers, especially in critical off-hours.

Maintains complete and accurate records, in accordance with the imaging service's policies and procedures, of all requests for assistance and all other project completions.

Provides emergency, routine, and preventive maintenance to all system hardware components.

Immediate efforts to emergency or unexpected breakdowns that present a system (or key component thereof) slowdown or halt.

Repairs imaging services system hardware including personal computers, printers, data communication equipment, related wiring and peripherals.

Represents imaging services both within and outside the hospital for all system related activities as assigned by the Director.

Assists in establishing continuing education on all system functions for imaging services and other hospital personnel as needed.


JOB SPECIFICATIONS(Minimum Requirements)



KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES

Local area networking experience, specifically, or 4-5 years relevant work experience or equivalent combination of education and relevant work experience.

Experience including Imaging Services operations including reporting schedules, office procedures, processing and reporting workflow.

Excellent computer skills, experience with interfacing and programming preferred.

A high degree of independent action and exercise of correct judgment is a must, along with creativity, initiative and professionalism.

Developed verbal and written communication skills are required.

Strong interpersonal and organizational skills, and a high degree of fine motor skills and visual accuracy required.

Ability to organize and prioritize work in order to complete assignments within designated time frames.

Ability to work with little or no supervision and to professionally handle stressful situations.

Must be professional, courteous, a self-starter, and must have a positive attitude.



EDUCATION


Bachelors Electronics Preferred

Bachelors Computer Science Preferred

Associates Radiology Required

Including reporting schedules, office procedures, processing and reporting workflow.

4 Information Technology Required

5 Healthcare/Medical - Radiology (Imaging and Therapy) Required



STANDARDS OF BEHAVIOR

Meets the Standards of Behavior as outlined in Personnel Policy and Procedure #1, Employee Relations Code.


CONFIDENTIALITY/HIPAA/CORPORATE COMPLIANCE

Demonstrates knowledge of procedures for protecting and maintaining security, confidentiality and integrity of employee, patient, family, organizational and other medical information. Understands and supports the commitment of Methodist Hospitals in adhering to federal, state and local laws, rules and regulations governing ethical business practices for healthcare providers.


DISCLAIMER - The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. The statements are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required.",3.2,"The Methodist Hospitals
3.2","Merrillville, IN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1941,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
125,Data Analyst,-1,"The Sports Medicine Research and Testing Laboratory (SMRTL) is a small, independent non-profit corporation dedicated to the fight against doping in sport. SMRTL analyzes biological specimens from athletes competing at all levels of sport; we analyze over 50,000 samples annually performing over 90,000 different analytical tests on those samples. We are one of only two laboratories in the United States accredited by the World Anti-Doping Agency (WADA) to test for performance-enhancing substances.

SMRTL also performs clinical analysis for the novel coronavirus which causes COVID-19 through its subsidiary Sports Drug Testing Laboratory (SDTL). SDTL provides COVID-19 testing services for sport agencies such as MLB and local healthcare providers.

We are seeking a highly skilled IT professional for a Data Analyst position. This role requires someone with technical knowledge and experience with Oracle database systems and demonstrated expertise writing queries in Structured Query Language (SQL). Experience in Data Extract, Transfer and Load (ETL) are a must. Experience with Linux OS and Python are preferred

.

Candidates must have at least 3 years of previous IT experience; possess strong troubleshooting and critical thinking skills; can prioritize and multitask; and be deadline and detail oriented.
Responsibilities: *
Maintain, update, and enhance the LIMS system running on an Oracle Database.
Design and implement LIMS system integration with other operational and business systems (lab instrument data, accounting, client FTP sites, shipping/receiving, etc.).
Conduct reporting and business intelligence activities from the LIMS via online dashboards, Actuate Report Designer, web portals and other automated reporting system
Identify information system needs
Establish priorities for system maintenance and upgrades
Skills Required: *
Oracle Database Administration and Reporting
Scripting/Programming (PL/SQL, PowerShell, etc.)
Base knowledge of Networks, Windows 10 Operating Systems and MS Office Software tools
Experience with LIMS software
Communication with non-IT personnel, including SMRTL/SDTL lab technicians and external clients
Skills Preferred: *
Horizon LIMS experience
Experience working for an analytical laboratory and familiarity with the process flow involved in sample testing
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $35.00 - $43.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Weekends
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.smrtl.org
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.2,"Sports Medicine Research and Testing Laboratory
4.2","South Jordan, UT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
126,Business Analyst - Data Science,"$37k-$68k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Meet MedPro Group. We’re an industry-leading Berkshire Hathaway insurance company with a passion for our clients and our team. We are hundreds of professionals with varied backgrounds and experience levels who came together to achieve one goal: protecting those who have made it their mission to serve and care for others. Never considered the insurance industry before? We think you should.

In this role you will…

Translate business needs, processes and procedures into a workable system, and articulate on specific data science requirements by communicating about these requirements with technology experts.
Participate in developing functional requirements, testing, training and implementing data science solutions. Develop detailed system requirements based on business needs, utilizing standard documentation guidelines and coordinating with technical resources throughout project cycle.
Participate in reviewing, analyzing, and evaluating Underwriting and Claims' user needs.
Participate in project meetings, project tracking, analysis, and reporting. Provide reporting analysis on key projects and delivery outcomes with the business clients.
Develop documents for Data Science applications, system specifications and test plans, according to existing standards and methodologies.
Support implementation of high impact, cross-functional projects aligned with strategic business initiatives under the direction of a Project Manager or Data Scientist.
Support small to medium size projects including project planning, requirements definition and documentation, test case definition, execution of testing, and project implementation.
Assist in handling post-production issues until project has been approved for release to the business.
Perform other duties as assigned.

We are looking for candidates with…

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent project/insurance experience.
3 or more years of related project or insurance experience.
Strong analytical skills.
Ability to resolve problematic issues in an efficient manner.
Excellent organizational and communication skills, demonstrated ability to work across technical and non-technical resources.
Understanding of systems and technical design.
Strong PC skills including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Visio.
Demonstrated ability to work independently and as a team member.
Ability to handle multiple, changing priorities, and deadlines in a very fast paced working environment.

Why MedPro?

MedPro Group’s mission is built on a century-old legacy of protecting those who protect others. From our roots in our hometown of Fort Wayne, Indiana, we've worked diligently to become the nation's premier healthcare liability coverage provider, currently insuring more than 250,000 customers. With that growth, we've built a significant presence in all 50 states. Our team works across the country to provide the best strategies to mitigate risk and preserve the reputations of those who have entrusted their good name to us. That passion – built on a foundation of a culture that values uncompromised integrity, obsessive client focus, great teamwork, and a long-term mindset – makes MedPro a preferred employer that many call their career home.

General:

MedPro Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.2,"MedPro Group
3.2","Fort Wayne, IN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1899,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
127,"Data Analyst, Law Enforcement Analytics & Programs","$85k-$155k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

The Law Enforcement Analytics & Programs (LEAP) team is looking for a seasoned and talented Data Analyst with an almost obsessive focus on data analysis, hygiene, and delivery systems. We are seeking a talented analyst with an almost obsessive focus on data collection and metrics and who thrives working with data, operations, policy partners. They will enjoy delivering metrics, building tools, dashboards, and cataloging and visualizing large quantities of data for structured and often ad-hoc executive level reporting. This analyst will be expected to work independently and should be comfortable living at the intersection of tech, legal, community standards and law enforcement matters.

Support multiple specialist teams across the Security, Investigations and Integrity Organization
Serve as an escalation point for frontline difficulties where the next step to resolution is missing or ambiguous
Leverage data to identify, understand, troubleshoot, and report on areas of opportunity in Facebook SI2 across multiple specialist Teams within the Security, Investigations and Integrity Organization
Monitor key metrics to forecast and explain the root causes of changes in internal and external conditions that drive those metrics
Analyze large data sets to identify trends and patterns that require deeper analysis or policy changes
Use data and analysis to provide strategic direction to the broader SI2 teams and their Leaders
Receive and respond to requests for data requests
Receive and respond to requests for ad-hoc reporting
Convert ad-hoc reporting to normalized/automated reports when the need arises
Retrofit outdated/cumbersome existing reports

B.S. in a technical discipline (e.g. Math, Physics, Statistics, Computer Science, or equivalent)
4+ years of experience in business strategy, finance, engineering, or analytics
4+ years of quantitative or statistical analysis experience
4+ years of experience in technology focused projects management
Experience working within sensitive data systems (e.g. banking, medical, government restricted, etc.)
Experience processing and analyzing complex data sets, and interpret them for making business decisions
Adept at creating ad hoc queries to answer unique questions from a diverse set of stakeholders
Demonstrated data visualization skills with an intuitive knowledge of data storytelling
Demonstrated communication skills
Experience working as part of a team and collaborating with cross-functional partner

Experience with Python and R
5+ years professional experience
Experience working in a fast paced, tech focused, web/internet start-up environment
Experience in identifying and leading engagements with internal legal stakeholders as well as external cross-functional workstream leads, stakeholders and engineering partners

Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Menlo Park, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
128,Data Analyst,"$30k-$54k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Warren Averett Staffing and Recruiting is seeking a Public Sector Data Consultant for a national organization!! We have an audit readiness/business process improvement contract with one of the largest Commands on Redstone arsenal They are growing a team in Huntsville, AL, during the COVID pandemic. This position is based out of Huntsville, Alabama.
Qualifications*
• Three (3) or more years of experience working financial management systems and leading data analytics support functions, required
• Two (2) or more years of experience supporting DoD clients, required
• Experience with SAP-based ERP platforms, preferred
• Experience with DoD financial statement audit, internal control testing or analysis, and coordinating with external, auditors, preferred
• Bachelor’s degree, required; Business Administration, Accounting, Finance, Management Information Systems, preferred
• License/Certifications: Active DoD SECRET Clearance, required
• Language: Proficiency in one or more foreign languages, preferred

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Required)",3.7,"Warren Averett Staffing & Recruiting
3.7","Huntsville, AL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1972,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
129,Data Analyst,-1,"Software powers the world, and LaunchDarkly empowers all teams to deliver and control the best software. We serve hundreds of billions of feature flags daily, to help teams ship better software, faster and eliminate risk for companies big and small.

We're based in downtown Oakland and growing quickly. You'll help us tackle some of the most challenging engineering problems around, like how can we deliver feature flags to hundreds of millions of users in milliseconds without breaking the bank.

About the role:
We are looking for an experienced Data Analyst to join our team at LaunchDarkly. We are growing rapidly, and need reliable and efficient answers for questions that are key to our future. You'll help develop the data, process and insights to power our next stage of growth.

We are searching for a talented Analyst to help us understand business critical data and leverage it across the entire organization. If you are data curious, excited about digging deeply into business data, and motivated by having an impact on the whole company, we want to hear from you.
Responsibilities:
Help create a data practice for the entire company.
Help ensure a data pipeline that is trustworthy and reliable.
Work with stakeholders around the business to understand their needs.
Help stakeholders ask good questions and get valuable insights.
Help answer the business' most pressing questions in repeatable, reliable ways.
Build tools and teach people how to find answers to their own questions
Qualifications:
2 or more years of experience in a hands-on Data Analytics role
Experience conducting data intensive analysis.
A visceral need to dive into data inconsistencies to pinpoint issues.
Product- and market-awareness to jump in and quickly understand LaunchDarkly's position and goals.
Expertise in SQL and proficiency in another data programming language (Python, R, etc.).
You may also know (bonus skills):
Experience in both enterprise and consumer environments.
LaunchDarkly is a Feature Management Platform that serves hundreds of billions of feature flags daily to help software teams build better software, faster. Feature flagging is an industry standard methodology of wrapping a new or risky section of code or infrastructure change with a flag. Each flag can easily be turned off independent of code deployment (aka ""dark launching""). LaunchDarkly has SDKs for all major web and mobile platforms. We are building a diverse team so that we can offer robust products and services. Our team culture is dynamic, friendly, and supportive. Our headquarters are in Oakland.

At LaunchDarkly, we believe in the power of teams. We're building a team that is humble, open, collaborative, respectful and kind. We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

LaunchDarkly offers:
Full Medical, Dental & Vision insurance
Unlimited vacation
Flexible schedule & work environment
Conference & meetups as an opportunity for everyone
A yearly education stipend for conferences and classes on your own
A budget to personalize your work station",5.0,"LaunchDarkly
5.0","Oakland, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
130,Program Data Analyst,"$42k-$77k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Description:

XLA is looking for a Program Data Analyst to work onsite at the DHS ICE ODCR (Office of Diversity and Civil Rights) in Washington D.C. and be heavily responsible for both program data analytics and strong technical writing within designated program offices. The ideal candidate should be an independent individual while working alongside a team of other data specialists and technical writers to support ICE Senior Leadership. Primary duties may include, but are not limited to, the following:

Examine existing data sets and work to improve current governmental programs by performing research on specific topics or projects, extrapolating and manipulating data, and presenting findings in clear and concise technical writing documents to ultimately serve as consultant for the management of those projects.
Support ICE Senior Leadership to identify opportunities for continual improvement; creating reports for internal teams, collaborating with individuals to collect and analyze data; show graphs or other methods to present written findings and visualize data.
Structure large data sets to find usable information for process improvement; create presentations and reports based on best practices and recommendations.
Provide senior management with detailed reports, evaluated information, budgetary proposals and similar products for effective direction of program operations.
Independently researches programmatic activities; Reviews information, reconciles conflicting data, and devises new and modified methods to analyze findings.
Advises management of unique conditions and issues that affect program activities and recommends strategies to improve implementation and evaluation of programs.
Develops and maintains communications with team and stakeholders by providing verbal and written communication in support of programmatic activities
Support various ODCR programs and initiatives, including reasonable accommodation, equal employment opportunity, alternative dispute resolution, organizational climate assessments, special emphasis, model workplace, anti-harassment, and civil liberties.
Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree
Prior experience in a professional environment providing data analysis, reporting, and technical writing functions
Ability to independently conduct research to gather information in support of work-related projects
Excellent attention to detail and strong written communication skills
Skilled in proactively identifying problems and making recommendations to management
Researching and interpreting regulations; Identifying and relaying recommendations for project success
Prior records management experience, including organizing electronic files, maintaining file plans, and ensuring compliance with privacy regulations
Prior experience with Microsoft Office software, including Outlook, Microsoft Word and Excel, as well as, other analytics software including SharePoint a plus
The ability to obtain and maintain a DHS ICE Public Trust",3.4,"XLA Associates
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Private Practice / Firm,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
131,Cost Analyst (data mining) with a Secret Clearance,"$44k-$84k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Location: Arlington, VA*
Must have an Active Secret Clearance*
INTRODUCTION*
The Program Development, Coordination, and Support Directorate is responsible for the design, coordination, and management of OBO's construction and renovation programs.

The Department of State (DOS), Bureau of Overseas Buildings Operations, Directorate of Project Development, Coordination and Support, Office of Cost Management (OBO/PDCS/COST), requires data analytical services to complete the task requirements stated below.

The Data Analyst assists with Excel, SharePoint, Power Bi and other software applications and their integration into office operations to support more effective operations.
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES*
The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes. In furtherance of these skills and responsibilities, the contractor performs tasks and assignments that include the following:
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging data to drive business solutions.
Mine and analyze data from databases to drive optimization and improvement of business process.
Coordinate with different functional teams to gather data, conduct analysis, provide recommendations, and monitor outcomes.
Use cost estimating tools specifically Sage / Navigator / Cortex to generate representational solutions, trends, and forecasting costs.
Develop Excel models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze Sage model performance and data accuracy.
And other duties as assigned.
KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS: *
· Bachelor's Degree in business or in a technology discipline.
Minimum of 3 years of experience manipulating data sets and building Excel models.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using advanced Excel and Power Bi.
Knowledge of building industry preferable
Ability to understand construction cost estimating
Strong problem solving skills
Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Experience querying databases
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers e.g. A/E contractors
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
MicroSystems Automation Group (MSAG) is a Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Business (SDVOB) providing subject matter expertise and technology solutions for government and commercial clients since 1988. We have a rich history of working with clients to understand their business problems and leverage our technical expertise and knowledge to deliver solutions that improve their business performance.

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
cost estimation: 3 years (Required)
Tableau/Power BI: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative",4.4,"MSAG
4.4","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
132,Lending and Mortgage Data Analyst,"$46k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Why Provident

Provident Credit Union is member-owned, trusted, financially sound, technologically advanced, and provides ""world class"" value, convenience, products and services to all members. We are headquartered in Redwood Shores, CA and have 21 branches located throughout California, in the San Francisco Bay Area, and Folsom.

Job Summary:
Responsible for maintaining the effective day-to-day operations of all Lending Operating Systems (LOS).
Coordinate the installation of new software releases, system upgrades, patches and resolution of software related problems.
Perform a variety of tasks to assist in the development, integration and implementation of new application software to support Real Estate Lending, Consumer Lending, Accounting and Loan Servicing.
Enable control and maintenance of lending system records to support effective management analysis and safeguarding of information required to service loans.
Develop and maintain a coordinated working relationship with our Information and Technology (IT) department and outside vendors as required.
Coordinate the lending information needs of all departments and assist with training efforts as they relate to LOS.
This position will participate in real estate and consumer lending portfolio analysis, design and implement of budget forecasting models as well as improving process efficiency and system optimization


Specific Job Duties:
Be able to create basic business rules and conditions using Encompass 360 (GUI) and write more complex queries
Support the Lending Department through knowledge of the mortgage process (Encompass expert preferred)
Maintain and test system updates, and provide report writing (Tableau preferred).
Responsible for managing the accomplishment of the Credit Union's long-term objectives, strategies and policies, relevant to all lending systems in the Consumer, Collection, and Real Estate Lending areas.
Ensure compliance with up-time benchmarks as defined by each department.
Manage relationship between all vendors and internal customers, including the Information Technology department, working with all parties to ensure lending systems remain functional, up-to-date, and useful to users throughout the lending division.
Develops, in partnership with users, workflow processes, business rules, controls, reports, and interfaces with vendors, documents, and other tools to maximize efficiency and establish standards for high loan quality.
Ensure that our systems are secure, by providing timely access and restricting access, as instructed by department managers.
Actively participate in the development of the vision of the lending systems and their enhancements.
Create functional specifications for new or modified systems or processes. Recommend system improvements.
Gather and document business requirements, formulate use cases, track requirements, provide status, and ensure quality of solution throughout a project.
Develop test plans and pre-UAT testing, documenting and tracking issues, and ensure timely issue resolution, liaising between users and vendor support on rollout of new releases and enhancements.
Participate in the process of re-engineering systems and work flow in lending operational areas in order to ensure efficiencies whenever and wherever possible.
Make changes to systems as instructed by superiors. This includes the maintenance of documents, workflows, and processes.
Prioritize tasks to ensure that tasks affecting loan production are the top priority.
Participate in the design and implementation of analytical tools that improve the effectiveness of data used for making decisions. Contribute to the design and implementation of budget forecasting tools using statistical modeling and other techniques that result in less variability and higher accuracy in the budgeting process.
Participate in the design and implementation of portfolio management tools that improve pre-payment speed analysis, loss analysis, and credit granting criteria and processes.
Responsible for preparation and compliance with Change Management documentation and protocol.


Job Knowledge/Experience:
Knowledge of commonly used concepts, practices, procedures within Real Estate and Consumer Lending.
2 years of experience as an Analyst/Administrator working with Encompass 360 Loan Origination System preferred
Experience creating and editing custom input and output forms
Well versed in using Microsoft Access, Excel, and Word
Demonstrated project-management skills.
Oral and written communication skills.
Demonstrated research and analytical skills.


Education/Training and Preferred Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Knowledge of Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Possess thorough knowledge of Real Estate Lending including documentation, compliance, forms and related system configurations and processes.
Complete required BSA & OFAC training annually.
Understand and adhere to BSA & OFAC policies and procedures, including reporting suspicious activity.
Working knowledge of:
Federal Lending Requirements
California Credit Union Law and Rules and Regulations
Provident Board Policies
NCUA Rules and Regulations
Department's policies and procedures
Ability to communicate clearly and with fortitude of purpose.
The position demands maturity, flexibility and someone ready to contribute at a high leveland enjoy the rewards come with it:
Fully paid health insurance premiums
Quality medical, dental and vision care coverage
401(k) retirement plan with matching employer contributions
Strong commitment to investing in your career and educational advancement by offering up to 100% tuition reimbursement for approved
Incentive plan
Generous paid time off and paid holidays
Flexible spending accounts
Short and long-term disability coverage
Life and AD&D insurance
Provident membership
Rate discount on home and auto loans
In-house training
And much more!
Provident is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are a winner of the Bay Area News Group Top Workplace in 2017, 2018 & 2019. Check us out on Glassdoor",3.9,"Provident Credit Union
3.9","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1950,Nonprofit Organization,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
133,Data Analyst (Data Mining/Oracle/Cloud),"$77k-$134k
(Glassdoor Est.)","JOIN THE CYBERCORE TECHNOLOGIES TEAM.

We are GROWING ! Bring your Technical Capabilities, Enthusiasm, and Team Focus.

CyberCore Technologies has a New Opportunity for a Data Analyst (Oracle/Cloud) – Top Secret – Quantico, VA.

CyberCore Technologies provides Services for Government and Commercial Clients. We have procured, integrated, and delivered over $2.6B in Information Technology products. CyberCore provides a wide range of professional services and solutions with specific strengths in Cyber Security, Networking, Engineering/Operations, and Software Development.

At CyberCore, Our Goal is to Maintain a Healthy Work-Life Balance and Provide Interesting Work Supporting Our Nation’s Security. CyberCore is Proud to Offer: Competitive Salaries; Corporate PTO Plan; Education Reimbursement and Bonuses for Completing Certifications; Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance for Team Members and Families; Social and Philanthropic Events Celebrating Our Team and Giving Back to Our Community. For more information on CyberCore Technologies, go to www.cybercoretech.com

Job Responsibilities:

Supports DoD Cyber Crime Center and Air Force Office of Special Investigations. The Data Analyst will work with the Enterprise Resource Directorate and be part of the new Data Analytics Team. The incumbent will be responsible for the analysis of current data holdings, document data systems related to capabilities and gaps, and will provide analytical products based on that data.

Responsibilities:

Mining data from primary and secondary sources, then reorganizing data in a format easily read by human or machine.

Use statistical tools to interpret data sets, paying particular attention to trends and patterns that may be valuable for Mission Managers. Demonstrate the significance of the analysis in the context of local, national, and global law enforcement trends that impact OSI. Prepare reports for executive leadership that communicate trends, patterns, and predictions using relevant data. Collaborate with programmers, engineers, and organizational leaders to identify opportunities for process improvements, recommend system modifications, and develop policies for data governance. Create appropriate documentation for stakeholders to understand steps of data analysis process and duplicate/replicate analysis if required.

Required Candidate Qualifications:
Active Top Secret Clearance
Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited college in a related discipline and 5 years of professional experience; Masters Degree and 3 years of professional experience; or related PhD and no experience. 13 years of professional experience without a Degree.
Demonstrated Experience with Data Science, performing design/engineering/mining/visualization.
Demonstrated Experience with descriptive and predictive analysis.
Demonstrated experience with data analysis/visualization tools.
Demonstrated experience developing, standardizing, and documenting processes and policies.
Demonstrated experience developing and standardizing processes, tools, templates, graphics/illustrations, and metrics.
Ability to learn Local, National and Global law enforcement trends and impact to OSI.
Desired:
Experience collaborating with programmers and engineers.
Experience supporting a LE/CI Mission.
Experience creating process and standards on a new team and/or initiative.
Law Enforcement Investigation Experience and Understanding of Search and Seizure.
CyberCore Technologies is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.9,"CyberCore Technologies
3.9","Quantico, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Security Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
134,Temporary Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Key Responsibilities include:

Integrate and transform data from different sources for reporting or analytical purposes
Support the design, development and automation of data pipelines to support routine BI reports and analytical workstreams
Develop and migrate data into impactful data visuals leveraging business intelligence tools
Collaborate with stakeholders such as business leaders and project managers to gather data requirements and deliver projects on time
Support ad-hoc data requests from business or senior management
Partner with the data team and Infrastructure Cloud teams to optimize data pipelines and ensure data quality
Analyze and visualize data and present business insights to business partners
Minimum Qualifications:

BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical fields.
5+ years of experience working in Business Intelligence or Data analytics within the investment and asset management industry
Very strong in SQL
Experience in Microsoft`s Azure Cloud technologies
Experience in data visualization tools such as Power BI
Proficient in Python and familiarity / experience in the following python Libraries (Pandas, Numpy, Matplotlib and and/or SkLearn)
Strong communication capabilities
Preferred Qualifications:

Experience in manipulating or analyzing investment management data sources (Market Metrics, DST Walletshare)
Experience developing data pipelines in Azure and familiar with cloud technologies (Data Factory, Data Bricks and Machine Learning Service etc.)
Experience in statistical modeling
Advanced knowledge of statistics assumptions and can interpret statistical analysis into business language
Experience in partnering with business owners to understand requirements, develop project timelines and deliver data sets or analysis on time",3.7,"Calamos Investments
3.7",Illinois,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
135,"Analyst, Enterprise Data Office","$38k-$68k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description Summary

The HarbourVest Enterprise Data Office acts as a facilitator and coordinator of data governance, data acquisition, and data strategy across the organization. The Analyst will be responsible for measuring data quality, performing root cause analysis, building data remediation plans, implementing data controls, reviewing and maintaining data quality standards, as well as other activities oriented towards improving data management across the organization.

Job Skills & Abilities
Experience doing data analysis is required
Strong analytical capabilities
Comfortable working with large datasets and multiple data sources
Good communication and persuasion skills
Demonstrated understanding of data quality principles and measurement
Project team experience is a plus
Highly proactive and self-motivated with the ability to meet objectives under minimal supervision
Strong presentation abilities
Experience working in an enterprise or cross-functional role is a plus
Private Equity industry knowledge is a plus
Excellent organization skills
Good time management capabilities
Strong affinity for data and attention to detail
Experience using data management tools is a plus
Responsibilities

Data Quality Monitoring and Reporting: 75%
Monitor and report on data quality across the organization, particularly for designated Critical Data Elements
Create and update data quality dashboards for respective data domains on a regular (monthly) basis
Design and develop data quality monitoring, including the development of data quality rules, thresholds and metrics for key investment management data concepts
Prepare materials for regular routines with business and IT stakeholders
Participate in data quality issue root cause analysis and assist in designing action plans for remediation
Partner with domain data stewards to deep dive into data quality issues
Stay current with industry trends on data quality evaluation strategies, automation techniques and data visualization tools
Data Strategy and Standards: 25%
Maintain Enterprise Data Office SharePoint site, including the business glossary
Assist in creating data policies and procedures and ensure teams adhere to these standards
Define and measure cross-domain performance against data quality standards
Education

BS/BA or equivalent

Work Experience

2-5 years of relevant experience",3.9,"Harbourvest
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
136,Sr. Programmer Analyst - Meter Data Management,-1,"OUC – The Reliable One, an industry leader as the second largest municipal utility in
Florida, is looking for qualified individuals to be part of our growing team. We are looking for self-motivated, creative professional who can assist with achieving our vision of being recognized as the best utility in the nation.
Job Purpose: *
Responsible for providing product expertise and product understanding for all core application modules in the CRM area for the Meter Data Management (MDM) application. The Sr. Programmer Analyst serves as a resource for applications requiring structured system methodologies and information technology. Provide first line resolution/analysis assistance as Subject Matter Expert (SME) for responsibilities of system health, maintenance, and continuous improvements of corporate applications. Responsible for developing programmatic solution, testing solution for accuracy with defined test plan, coordinate the implementation and completion of recommended specification for all new systems, system changes, and problem correction. Work with internal IT and vendor representatives to deliver completely implemented solutions to end-user community by leveraging best practices of the core applications.
Primary Functions: *
 Developing application extensions, batch jobs, common routines in Java/Groovy for Oracle CC&B and MDM;

 Developing scrips using Oracle Utilities Application Framework OUAF;
 Java, J2EE development with WebLogic, Oracle SOA and Oracle Service Bus;
 Configuration and support for Oracle Utilities CC&B and MDM;
 SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate;
 JDeveloper Toolset; Eclipse IDE toolset; Blueprinting; Bundling; Junit; OUAF

FAVA SDK; BPEL; Enterprise Manager; Soap UI;
 Investigate and analyze how the system processed transactions to determine system functionality is configured correctly and providing accurate results;
 Provide application analysis for Information Technology and client base, and serve as a contact for IT business application analysts requiring in-depth understanding/results;

 Evaluate business impact of errors and provide recommendation for solution through collaboration with analysts and business experts;

 Evaluate existing and new system functionality; determine any requirements not met by the specific system and develop action plans to correct deficiencies. This includes system nonfunctional requirements for data management;

 Define and document system scope, current logical view, general technical requirements and proposed logical view using structured design and analysis techniques;

 Provide comprehensive data queries and results, to analyze the system output and functional execution of key transactions;

 Monitor and track system updates/access to ensure successful auditing;

 Ensure appropriate monitoring, logging, and audit is in place to trace events, review results and make recommendations;

 Review application interfaces to determine if functionality is configured correctly and providing accurate results;

 Work on complex business scenarios to ensure system processes transactions accurately;

 Guide and participate with the Business Application Analysts in understanding business needs and assist translation for detailed technical and program specifications;

 Prepare necessary end-user reports, extracts, and queries; Develop and maintain documentation regarding system functionality, performance benchmarks, and system integration;

 Document all issues and their resolution;
 Develops, researches and evaluates feasibility of alternatives to meet project/solution objectives and recommends optimal alternative;
 Design and execute test plans for unit and integration tests;
 Participate on technology services and vendor application upgrades, patching, testing, as well as production implementations;
 Work on small, medium, and large scale projects as needed by OUC;
 Follow triage, Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC), change management, and other IT processes in place to promote new/revised objects to all environments;

 Develops documentation for new system functions and/or updates to existing system documentation;

 Collaborate with technical teams to identify solutions and lead design sessions with functional users, business analysts, and developers to define and document technical interface requirements;

 Analyze, diagnose and troubleshoot system issues to identify root-cause and implement solutions to minimize or prevent occurrences;

 Contact software vendors to report, track, and resolve problems with their software products;

 Research, evaluates and corrects system malfunctions. Works with Business
Analysts to resolve application issues in a timely manner;

 Plan, document and test disaster recovery procedures;
 Handle scheduled on-call rotation responsibilities;
 Effectively communicate technical information with non-IT personnel;
 Perform other duties as assigned.
Requirements: *
 Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology/Management
Information Systems (or equivalent) from an accredited college or university;
 Minimum seven (7) years software development experience (in multiple environments) employing formal software development methodologies;
 Minimum of three (3) years of in-depth core applications work experience in
Utility Customer Information Systems (CIS).

Working knowledge of many of the following, but not limited to:

SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate; JDeveloper Toolset; Eclipse IDE toolset;
Blueprinting; Bundling; Junit; OUAF FAVA SDK; BPEL; Enterprise Manager; Soap
UI - preferred o Software Applications - Oracle Utilities MDM and/or CC&B, Oracle Utilities

Applications Framework (OUAF), a Utility enterprise scale Customer Information
System (CIS); o Developing structured test scenarios, test cases, and perform accurate testing with documented results; o Developing complex structured queries for accurate results; o Best practices for presenting system output to end-users; o Preparing system technical documentation; o Data analysis; o Administration and troubleshooting of operating systems (OS) to include Windows

Servers, Linux, and HP-Unix; o System performance metrics and benchmarking techniques; o Researching and introducing new versions of Operating Systems, Databases, and applications (i.e. Java); o Network architectures, relational databases (Oracle and SQL Server) and client/server environment; o Web Services; o Release management and code deployments; o Quality assurance methodologies; o Data warehouse and data-mart techniques desired.

 Developing application extensions, Batch Jobs, Common routines in Java/Groovy for
Oracle CC&B and MDM;
 Developing scripts using Oracle Utilities Application Framework OUAF);
 Java, J2EE development with WebLogic, Oracle SOA and Oracle Service Bus;
 Configuration and support for Oracle Utilities CC&B and MDM
 SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate;
 JDeveloper Toolset;
 Eclipse IDE toolset;
 Blueprinting;
 Bundling;
 Junit;
 OUAF JAVA SDK;
 BPEL;
 Enterprise Manager;
 Soap UI; o System performance metrics and benchmarking techniques; o Software Version Control (Subversion - SVN); o Equipment (i.e. Virtual servers, SAN storage); o Network routing, firewalls, and load balancers; o Related industry, organizational and departmental regulatory guidelines, best practices, and procedures.

 Ability to:

o Research and introduce new versions of operating systems, databases, and application software; o Take on new system assignments; o Learn, obtain structured and ad hoc training on vendor products/releases; o Integrate/share/publish timely data to third party systems needing access to application data (real-time, or batch); o Adapt to changing technology by acquiring new skills (i.e. by attending continuing educational courses/trainings); o Create logical and physical data models and design user interfaces; o Lead technical design through application system testing; o Write optimized, well-structured SQL statements; o Develop complex structured queries for accurate results; o Develop structured test scenarios, test cases, and perform accurate testing with documented results; o Use productivity tools for analysis, data behavior, and data mining; o Work independently on tasks and projects of varying complexity; o Provide training and guidance on technologies to others; o Take the lead on technical projects; o Use Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Outlook, etc.) and standard office equipment (telephone, computer, copier, etc.); o Manage time effectively and meet deadlines; o Make presentations to both technical and non-technical audiences.

OUC–The Reliable One is an Equal Opportunity Employer who is committed through responsible management policies to recruit, hire, promote, train, transfer, compensate, and administer all other personnel actions without regard to race, color, ethnicity, national origin, age, religion, disability, marital status, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information and any other factor prohibited under applicable federal, state, and local civil rights laws, rules and regulations.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,400.00 - $118,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Signing bonus
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,OUC - The Reliable One,"Orlando, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
137,Sr. Programmer Analyst - Meter Data Management,-1,"OUC – The Reliable One, an industry leader as the second largest municipal utility in
Florida, is looking for qualified individuals to be part of our growing team. We are looking for self-motivated, creative professional who can assist with achieving our vision of being recognized as the best utility in the nation.
Job Purpose: *
Responsible for providing product expertise and product understanding for all core application modules in the CRM area for the Meter Data Management (MDM) application. The Sr. Programmer Analyst serves as a resource for applications requiring structured system methodologies and information technology. Provide first line resolution/analysis assistance as Subject Matter Expert (SME) for responsibilities of system health, maintenance, and continuous improvements of corporate applications. Responsible for developing programmatic solution, testing solution for accuracy with defined test plan, coordinate the implementation and completion of recommended specification for all new systems, system changes, and problem correction. Work with internal IT and vendor representatives to deliver completely implemented solutions to end-user community by leveraging best practices of the core applications.
Primary Functions: *
 Developing application extensions, batch jobs, common routines in Java/Groovy for Oracle CC&B and MDM;

 Developing scrips using Oracle Utilities Application Framework OUAF;
 Java, J2EE development with WebLogic, Oracle SOA and Oracle Service Bus;
 Configuration and support for Oracle Utilities CC&B and MDM;
 SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate;
 JDeveloper Toolset; Eclipse IDE toolset; Blueprinting; Bundling; Junit; OUAF

FAVA SDK; BPEL; Enterprise Manager; Soap UI;
 Investigate and analyze how the system processed transactions to determine system functionality is configured correctly and providing accurate results;
 Provide application analysis for Information Technology and client base, and serve as a contact for IT business application analysts requiring in-depth understanding/results;

 Evaluate business impact of errors and provide recommendation for solution through collaboration with analysts and business experts;

 Evaluate existing and new system functionality; determine any requirements not met by the specific system and develop action plans to correct deficiencies. This includes system nonfunctional requirements for data management;

 Define and document system scope, current logical view, general technical requirements and proposed logical view using structured design and analysis techniques;

 Provide comprehensive data queries and results, to analyze the system output and functional execution of key transactions;

 Monitor and track system updates/access to ensure successful auditing;

 Ensure appropriate monitoring, logging, and audit is in place to trace events, review results and make recommendations;

 Review application interfaces to determine if functionality is configured correctly and providing accurate results;

 Work on complex business scenarios to ensure system processes transactions accurately;

 Guide and participate with the Business Application Analysts in understanding business needs and assist translation for detailed technical and program specifications;

 Prepare necessary end-user reports, extracts, and queries; Develop and maintain documentation regarding system functionality, performance benchmarks, and system integration;

 Document all issues and their resolution;
 Develops, researches and evaluates feasibility of alternatives to meet project/solution objectives and recommends optimal alternative;
 Design and execute test plans for unit and integration tests;
 Participate on technology services and vendor application upgrades, patching, testing, as well as production implementations;
 Work on small, medium, and large scale projects as needed by OUC;
 Follow triage, Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC), change management, and other IT processes in place to promote new/revised objects to all environments;

 Develops documentation for new system functions and/or updates to existing system documentation;

 Collaborate with technical teams to identify solutions and lead design sessions with functional users, business analysts, and developers to define and document technical interface requirements;

 Analyze, diagnose and troubleshoot system issues to identify root-cause and implement solutions to minimize or prevent occurrences;

 Contact software vendors to report, track, and resolve problems with their software products;

 Research, evaluates and corrects system malfunctions. Works with Business
Analysts to resolve application issues in a timely manner;

 Plan, document and test disaster recovery procedures;
 Handle scheduled on-call rotation responsibilities;
 Effectively communicate technical information with non-IT personnel;
 Perform other duties as assigned.
Requirements: *
 Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology/Management
Information Systems (or equivalent) from an accredited college or university;
 Minimum seven (7) years software development experience (in multiple environments) employing formal software development methodologies;
 Minimum of three (3) years of in-depth core applications work experience in
Utility Customer Information Systems (CIS).

Working knowledge of many of the following, but not limited to:

SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate; JDeveloper Toolset; Eclipse IDE toolset;
Blueprinting; Bundling; Junit; OUAF FAVA SDK; BPEL; Enterprise Manager; Soap
UI - preferred o Software Applications - Oracle Utilities MDM and/or CC&B, Oracle Utilities

Applications Framework (OUAF), a Utility enterprise scale Customer Information
System (CIS); o Developing structured test scenarios, test cases, and perform accurate testing with documented results; o Developing complex structured queries for accurate results; o Best practices for presenting system output to end-users; o Preparing system technical documentation; o Data analysis; o Administration and troubleshooting of operating systems (OS) to include Windows

Servers, Linux, and HP-Unix; o System performance metrics and benchmarking techniques; o Researching and introducing new versions of Operating Systems, Databases, and applications (i.e. Java); o Network architectures, relational databases (Oracle and SQL Server) and client/server environment; o Web Services; o Release management and code deployments; o Quality assurance methodologies; o Data warehouse and data-mart techniques desired.

 Developing application extensions, Batch Jobs, Common routines in Java/Groovy for
Oracle CC&B and MDM;
 Developing scripts using Oracle Utilities Application Framework OUAF);
 Java, J2EE development with WebLogic, Oracle SOA and Oracle Service Bus;
 Configuration and support for Oracle Utilities CC&B and MDM
 SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate;
 JDeveloper Toolset;
 Eclipse IDE toolset;
 Blueprinting;
 Bundling;
 Junit;
 OUAF JAVA SDK;
 BPEL;
 Enterprise Manager;
 Soap UI; o System performance metrics and benchmarking techniques; o Software Version Control (Subversion - SVN); o Equipment (i.e. Virtual servers, SAN storage); o Network routing, firewalls, and load balancers; o Related industry, organizational and departmental regulatory guidelines, best practices, and procedures.

 Ability to:

o Research and introduce new versions of operating systems, databases, and application software; o Take on new system assignments; o Learn, obtain structured and ad hoc training on vendor products/releases; o Integrate/share/publish timely data to third party systems needing access to application data (real-time, or batch); o Adapt to changing technology by acquiring new skills (i.e. by attending continuing educational courses/trainings); o Create logical and physical data models and design user interfaces; o Lead technical design through application system testing; o Write optimized, well-structured SQL statements; o Develop complex structured queries for accurate results; o Develop structured test scenarios, test cases, and perform accurate testing with documented results; o Use productivity tools for analysis, data behavior, and data mining; o Work independently on tasks and projects of varying complexity; o Provide training and guidance on technologies to others; o Take the lead on technical projects; o Use Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Outlook, etc.) and standard office equipment (telephone, computer, copier, etc.); o Manage time effectively and meet deadlines; o Make presentations to both technical and non-technical audiences.

OUC–The Reliable One is an Equal Opportunity Employer who is committed through responsible management policies to recruit, hire, promote, train, transfer, compensate, and administer all other personnel actions without regard to race, color, ethnicity, national origin, age, religion, disability, marital status, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information and any other factor prohibited under applicable federal, state, and local civil rights laws, rules and regulations.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,400.00 - $118,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Signing bonus
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,OUC - The Reliable One,"Orlando, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
138,Sr. Programmer Analyst - Meter Data Management,-1,"OUC – The Reliable One, an industry leader as the second largest municipal utility in
Florida, is looking for qualified individuals to be part of our growing team. We are looking for self-motivated, creative professional who can assist with achieving our vision of being recognized as the best utility in the nation.
Job Purpose: *
Responsible for providing product expertise and product understanding for all core application modules in the CRM area for the Meter Data Management (MDM) application. The Sr. Programmer Analyst serves as a resource for applications requiring structured system methodologies and information technology. Provide first line resolution/analysis assistance as Subject Matter Expert (SME) for responsibilities of system health, maintenance, and continuous improvements of corporate applications. Responsible for developing programmatic solution, testing solution for accuracy with defined test plan, coordinate the implementation and completion of recommended specification for all new systems, system changes, and problem correction. Work with internal IT and vendor representatives to deliver completely implemented solutions to end-user community by leveraging best practices of the core applications.
Primary Functions: *
 Developing application extensions, batch jobs, common routines in Java/Groovy for Oracle CC&B and MDM;

 Developing scrips using Oracle Utilities Application Framework OUAF;
 Java, J2EE development with WebLogic, Oracle SOA and Oracle Service Bus;
 Configuration and support for Oracle Utilities CC&B and MDM;
 SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate;
 JDeveloper Toolset; Eclipse IDE toolset; Blueprinting; Bundling; Junit; OUAF

FAVA SDK; BPEL; Enterprise Manager; Soap UI;
 Investigate and analyze how the system processed transactions to determine system functionality is configured correctly and providing accurate results;
 Provide application analysis for Information Technology and client base, and serve as a contact for IT business application analysts requiring in-depth understanding/results;

 Evaluate business impact of errors and provide recommendation for solution through collaboration with analysts and business experts;

 Evaluate existing and new system functionality; determine any requirements not met by the specific system and develop action plans to correct deficiencies. This includes system nonfunctional requirements for data management;

 Define and document system scope, current logical view, general technical requirements and proposed logical view using structured design and analysis techniques;

 Provide comprehensive data queries and results, to analyze the system output and functional execution of key transactions;

 Monitor and track system updates/access to ensure successful auditing;

 Ensure appropriate monitoring, logging, and audit is in place to trace events, review results and make recommendations;

 Review application interfaces to determine if functionality is configured correctly and providing accurate results;

 Work on complex business scenarios to ensure system processes transactions accurately;

 Guide and participate with the Business Application Analysts in understanding business needs and assist translation for detailed technical and program specifications;

 Prepare necessary end-user reports, extracts, and queries; Develop and maintain documentation regarding system functionality, performance benchmarks, and system integration;

 Document all issues and their resolution;
 Develops, researches and evaluates feasibility of alternatives to meet project/solution objectives and recommends optimal alternative;
 Design and execute test plans for unit and integration tests;
 Participate on technology services and vendor application upgrades, patching, testing, as well as production implementations;
 Work on small, medium, and large scale projects as needed by OUC;
 Follow triage, Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC), change management, and other IT processes in place to promote new/revised objects to all environments;

 Develops documentation for new system functions and/or updates to existing system documentation;

 Collaborate with technical teams to identify solutions and lead design sessions with functional users, business analysts, and developers to define and document technical interface requirements;

 Analyze, diagnose and troubleshoot system issues to identify root-cause and implement solutions to minimize or prevent occurrences;

 Contact software vendors to report, track, and resolve problems with their software products;

 Research, evaluates and corrects system malfunctions. Works with Business
Analysts to resolve application issues in a timely manner;

 Plan, document and test disaster recovery procedures;
 Handle scheduled on-call rotation responsibilities;
 Effectively communicate technical information with non-IT personnel;
 Perform other duties as assigned.
Requirements: *
 Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology/Management
Information Systems (or equivalent) from an accredited college or university;
 Minimum seven (7) years software development experience (in multiple environments) employing formal software development methodologies;
 Minimum of three (3) years of in-depth core applications work experience in
Utility Customer Information Systems (CIS).

Working knowledge of many of the following, but not limited to:

SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate; JDeveloper Toolset; Eclipse IDE toolset;
Blueprinting; Bundling; Junit; OUAF FAVA SDK; BPEL; Enterprise Manager; Soap
UI - preferred o Software Applications - Oracle Utilities MDM and/or CC&B, Oracle Utilities

Applications Framework (OUAF), a Utility enterprise scale Customer Information
System (CIS); o Developing structured test scenarios, test cases, and perform accurate testing with documented results; o Developing complex structured queries for accurate results; o Best practices for presenting system output to end-users; o Preparing system technical documentation; o Data analysis; o Administration and troubleshooting of operating systems (OS) to include Windows

Servers, Linux, and HP-Unix; o System performance metrics and benchmarking techniques; o Researching and introducing new versions of Operating Systems, Databases, and applications (i.e. Java); o Network architectures, relational databases (Oracle and SQL Server) and client/server environment; o Web Services; o Release management and code deployments; o Quality assurance methodologies; o Data warehouse and data-mart techniques desired.

 Developing application extensions, Batch Jobs, Common routines in Java/Groovy for
Oracle CC&B and MDM;
 Developing scripts using Oracle Utilities Application Framework OUAF);
 Java, J2EE development with WebLogic, Oracle SOA and Oracle Service Bus;
 Configuration and support for Oracle Utilities CC&B and MDM
 SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate;
 JDeveloper Toolset;
 Eclipse IDE toolset;
 Blueprinting;
 Bundling;
 Junit;
 OUAF JAVA SDK;
 BPEL;
 Enterprise Manager;
 Soap UI; o System performance metrics and benchmarking techniques; o Software Version Control (Subversion - SVN); o Equipment (i.e. Virtual servers, SAN storage); o Network routing, firewalls, and load balancers; o Related industry, organizational and departmental regulatory guidelines, best practices, and procedures.

 Ability to:

o Research and introduce new versions of operating systems, databases, and application software; o Take on new system assignments; o Learn, obtain structured and ad hoc training on vendor products/releases; o Integrate/share/publish timely data to third party systems needing access to application data (real-time, or batch); o Adapt to changing technology by acquiring new skills (i.e. by attending continuing educational courses/trainings); o Create logical and physical data models and design user interfaces; o Lead technical design through application system testing; o Write optimized, well-structured SQL statements; o Develop complex structured queries for accurate results; o Develop structured test scenarios, test cases, and perform accurate testing with documented results; o Use productivity tools for analysis, data behavior, and data mining; o Work independently on tasks and projects of varying complexity; o Provide training and guidance on technologies to others; o Take the lead on technical projects; o Use Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Outlook, etc.) and standard office equipment (telephone, computer, copier, etc.); o Manage time effectively and meet deadlines; o Make presentations to both technical and non-technical audiences.

OUC–The Reliable One is an Equal Opportunity Employer who is committed through responsible management policies to recruit, hire, promote, train, transfer, compensate, and administer all other personnel actions without regard to race, color, ethnicity, national origin, age, religion, disability, marital status, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information and any other factor prohibited under applicable federal, state, and local civil rights laws, rules and regulations.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,400.00 - $118,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Signing bonus
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,OUC - The Reliable One,"Orlando, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
139,Sr. Programmer Analyst - Meter Data Management,-1,"OUC – The Reliable One, an industry leader as the second largest municipal utility in
Florida, is looking for qualified individuals to be part of our growing team. We are looking for self-motivated, creative professional who can assist with achieving our vision of being recognized as the best utility in the nation.
Job Purpose: *
Responsible for providing product expertise and product understanding for all core application modules in the CRM area for the Meter Data Management (MDM) application. The Sr. Programmer Analyst serves as a resource for applications requiring structured system methodologies and information technology. Provide first line resolution/analysis assistance as Subject Matter Expert (SME) for responsibilities of system health, maintenance, and continuous improvements of corporate applications. Responsible for developing programmatic solution, testing solution for accuracy with defined test plan, coordinate the implementation and completion of recommended specification for all new systems, system changes, and problem correction. Work with internal IT and vendor representatives to deliver completely implemented solutions to end-user community by leveraging best practices of the core applications.
Primary Functions: *
 Developing application extensions, batch jobs, common routines in Java/Groovy for Oracle CC&B and MDM;

 Developing scrips using Oracle Utilities Application Framework OUAF;
 Java, J2EE development with WebLogic, Oracle SOA and Oracle Service Bus;
 Configuration and support for Oracle Utilities CC&B and MDM;
 SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate;
 JDeveloper Toolset; Eclipse IDE toolset; Blueprinting; Bundling; Junit; OUAF

FAVA SDK; BPEL; Enterprise Manager; Soap UI;
 Investigate and analyze how the system processed transactions to determine system functionality is configured correctly and providing accurate results;
 Provide application analysis for Information Technology and client base, and serve as a contact for IT business application analysts requiring in-depth understanding/results;

 Evaluate business impact of errors and provide recommendation for solution through collaboration with analysts and business experts;

 Evaluate existing and new system functionality; determine any requirements not met by the specific system and develop action plans to correct deficiencies. This includes system nonfunctional requirements for data management;

 Define and document system scope, current logical view, general technical requirements and proposed logical view using structured design and analysis techniques;

 Provide comprehensive data queries and results, to analyze the system output and functional execution of key transactions;

 Monitor and track system updates/access to ensure successful auditing;

 Ensure appropriate monitoring, logging, and audit is in place to trace events, review results and make recommendations;

 Review application interfaces to determine if functionality is configured correctly and providing accurate results;

 Work on complex business scenarios to ensure system processes transactions accurately;

 Guide and participate with the Business Application Analysts in understanding business needs and assist translation for detailed technical and program specifications;

 Prepare necessary end-user reports, extracts, and queries; Develop and maintain documentation regarding system functionality, performance benchmarks, and system integration;

 Document all issues and their resolution;
 Develops, researches and evaluates feasibility of alternatives to meet project/solution objectives and recommends optimal alternative;
 Design and execute test plans for unit and integration tests;
 Participate on technology services and vendor application upgrades, patching, testing, as well as production implementations;
 Work on small, medium, and large scale projects as needed by OUC;
 Follow triage, Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC), change management, and other IT processes in place to promote new/revised objects to all environments;

 Develops documentation for new system functions and/or updates to existing system documentation;

 Collaborate with technical teams to identify solutions and lead design sessions with functional users, business analysts, and developers to define and document technical interface requirements;

 Analyze, diagnose and troubleshoot system issues to identify root-cause and implement solutions to minimize or prevent occurrences;

 Contact software vendors to report, track, and resolve problems with their software products;

 Research, evaluates and corrects system malfunctions. Works with Business
Analysts to resolve application issues in a timely manner;

 Plan, document and test disaster recovery procedures;
 Handle scheduled on-call rotation responsibilities;
 Effectively communicate technical information with non-IT personnel;
 Perform other duties as assigned.
Requirements: *
 Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology/Management
Information Systems (or equivalent) from an accredited college or university;
 Minimum seven (7) years software development experience (in multiple environments) employing formal software development methodologies;
 Minimum of three (3) years of in-depth core applications work experience in
Utility Customer Information Systems (CIS).

Working knowledge of many of the following, but not limited to:

SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate; JDeveloper Toolset; Eclipse IDE toolset;
Blueprinting; Bundling; Junit; OUAF FAVA SDK; BPEL; Enterprise Manager; Soap
UI - preferred o Software Applications - Oracle Utilities MDM and/or CC&B, Oracle Utilities

Applications Framework (OUAF), a Utility enterprise scale Customer Information
System (CIS); o Developing structured test scenarios, test cases, and perform accurate testing with documented results; o Developing complex structured queries for accurate results; o Best practices for presenting system output to end-users; o Preparing system technical documentation; o Data analysis; o Administration and troubleshooting of operating systems (OS) to include Windows

Servers, Linux, and HP-Unix; o System performance metrics and benchmarking techniques; o Researching and introducing new versions of Operating Systems, Databases, and applications (i.e. Java); o Network architectures, relational databases (Oracle and SQL Server) and client/server environment; o Web Services; o Release management and code deployments; o Quality assurance methodologies; o Data warehouse and data-mart techniques desired.

 Developing application extensions, Batch Jobs, Common routines in Java/Groovy for
Oracle CC&B and MDM;
 Developing scripts using Oracle Utilities Application Framework OUAF);
 Java, J2EE development with WebLogic, Oracle SOA and Oracle Service Bus;
 Configuration and support for Oracle Utilities CC&B and MDM
 SQL, PL-SQL, XML, XSLT and Hibernate;
 JDeveloper Toolset;
 Eclipse IDE toolset;
 Blueprinting;
 Bundling;
 Junit;
 OUAF JAVA SDK;
 BPEL;
 Enterprise Manager;
 Soap UI; o System performance metrics and benchmarking techniques; o Software Version Control (Subversion - SVN); o Equipment (i.e. Virtual servers, SAN storage); o Network routing, firewalls, and load balancers; o Related industry, organizational and departmental regulatory guidelines, best practices, and procedures.

 Ability to:

o Research and introduce new versions of operating systems, databases, and application software; o Take on new system assignments; o Learn, obtain structured and ad hoc training on vendor products/releases; o Integrate/share/publish timely data to third party systems needing access to application data (real-time, or batch); o Adapt to changing technology by acquiring new skills (i.e. by attending continuing educational courses/trainings); o Create logical and physical data models and design user interfaces; o Lead technical design through application system testing; o Write optimized, well-structured SQL statements; o Develop complex structured queries for accurate results; o Develop structured test scenarios, test cases, and perform accurate testing with documented results; o Use productivity tools for analysis, data behavior, and data mining; o Work independently on tasks and projects of varying complexity; o Provide training and guidance on technologies to others; o Take the lead on technical projects; o Use Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Outlook, etc.) and standard office equipment (telephone, computer, copier, etc.); o Manage time effectively and meet deadlines; o Make presentations to both technical and non-technical audiences.

OUC–The Reliable One is an Equal Opportunity Employer who is committed through responsible management policies to recruit, hire, promote, train, transfer, compensate, and administer all other personnel actions without regard to race, color, ethnicity, national origin, age, religion, disability, marital status, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information and any other factor prohibited under applicable federal, state, and local civil rights laws, rules and regulations.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,400.00 - $118,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Signing bonus
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,OUC - The Reliable One,"Orlando, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
140,Senior Data Analyst,"$59k-$109k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Role

This individual is responsible for data mining, data cleansing, data analysis, and visualization for advanced reporting needs. Having experience with SQL and data visualization tools, this individual will assist in creating processes for automating client requests as well as internal projects, while also being a resource for guiding junior team members.

You Will Be
Making large and/or complex data more accessible, understandable and usable
Transforming, improving and integrating data, depending on the business requirements
Combining the data result sets across multiple sources
Delivering the data in a useful and appealing way to users giving the user the ability to interact with the data
Create and present presentations that communicate a succinct and compelling business story, driving decisions through research results
Automate data gathering, blending, and transformation of data
Work across various departments to understand client needs
You Must Have
Experience within the Digital Marketing space
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Ability to work with large amounts of information and see the bigger picture
Comfortable with juggling facts, figures, and number crunching
Communication skills, both written and oral
Critical thinking: able to look at numbers, trends, and data and come to new conclusions based on the findings
Attention to detail
Excellent math skills
Experience with Data Visualization tools such as Domo, Tableau, Data Studio
Experience with SQL programming
Experience with Analytics software such as Google Analytics and Adobe Analytics
Experience with Media Advertising Platforms such as Google Ads, Bing Ads, Yahoo Gemini
Experience with Campaign Management tools such as Doubleclick, SearchForce, Marin
Powered by JazzHR",4.3,"Wpromote
4.3","El Segundo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
141,Data Analyst,"$43k-$79k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*Job Title: DW – BI Developer*

*Full-time *

*Remote work available*

*Comprehensive Benefits *

*Must be authorized to work in US for any employer*

*Requirements *

Acer America Corporation is seeking an experienced Microsoft Analyst to join our IT department. The successful candidate will be able to transform business requirements in order to add functionality to business tools utilized by multiple groups throughout Acer. The ideal candidate is a team player with good communication skills.

*Responsibility*

• Maintain data integrity and ongoing quality of delivered solutions

• Analyze, design and build solutions using Microsoft BI Stack (SSIS, SSRS, SSAS)

• Identify data quality issues and work with appropriate teams to resolve them.

• Create relational and dimensional models for BI related projects.

• Develop ETL routines using SSIS to populate a data warehouse.

• Support users on Power BI reporting

• Support ad hoc reporting as necessary.

*Qualification*

o At least 3 years’ experience as application developer/BI developer

o Experience in designing and developing BI application / Data integration

o Experience in Microsoft MSBI, SSIS, SSRS, SSAS for BI reporting

o Proficient in Power BI

o Good data Analysis and strong SQL Skill

o Crafting and executing queries upon request for data

o Presenting information through reports and visualization

o Ability to program in multiple programming languages, VB, C++, etc.

o In-depth knowledge of programming for diverse operating systems and platforms using development tools.

o Excellent understanding of software design and programming principles.

o A good team player with excellent communication skills

o Analytical thinking and problem-solving capability

o Quick learner

o Great attention to detail and time-management skills

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) Matching
* Dental Insurance
* Disability Insurance
* Employee Assistance Program
* Employee Discount
* Flexible Spending Account
* Health Insurance
* Life Insurance
* Paid Time Off
* Referral Program
* Tuition Reimbursement
* Vision Insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
* Bonus Pay

COVID-19 considerations:
Currently employees are working remote.",4.3,"Acer Service Corporation
4.3","San Jose, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
142,Data Analyst / PowerBI Developer,"$36k-$70k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

Knowledge Services is seeking a The Data Analyst / PowerBI Developer for a 12 month contract (potential for extension) supporting the State of Nevada Division of Public and Behavioral Health. This role will require work onsite in Carson City with some flexibility to work remotely from home. Resource must be based in the Carson City surrounding areas.

Responsibilities:

The Data Analyst / PowerBI Developer Responsibilities:

• Work with Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), CMS vendor and state staff to build, test, and verify that the custom Application Programming Interface (API) script(s) inform the PowerBI retooled Bureau’s reports. Prominent issues to address include vendor restriction of maximum 500 records per data fetch, and reliable, simple input of often reset report creator validated keys.
• Coordinate work with HCQC biostatistician, HCQC Program Staff, and IT staff as necessary to implement project.
• Provides training and consultation to staff on the use of PBI, as needed.
• Documents table key relationships and appropriateness of content in the new iQIES relational database schema, and how they relate to the previous RDMS schema as found in ASPEN. Provide the schema in format viewable by staff. Assists staff in understanding the differences and how to apply when creating reports.
• Design, build and test PBI M language scripts to extract data from iQIES, transform data into Aithent format and load in to Aithent (State’s facility license database). This is to replace the current system that uses an intermediary step involving an SFTP server that will be retired. Recognize and solve any limitations.
• Recreate all existing reports (Crystal Reports, front end reports from a federal database, licensing reports from SQL licensing database, EXCEL, and any other applicable data sources) and create new custom reports, as required, in the PowerBI platform. Ensure that appropriate staff can run reports. Ensure that the technical design document for each report captures all necessary information to allow others to recreate if needed, such as, but not limited to, tables, key relationships, filters, audience, and any other critical information. Create several base templates of mixed data source PBI files. Templates would address common data views/lakes addressing issues such as easy tracking of federal inspection work, exporting of large data sets (> 500k records), and ease of data access for the all PBI output options.
• Assisting staff in creating reports and training them how to use PBI to run reports, including all aspects of data presentation, DAX based data manipulation, and any other tools as needed.
• Creating all associated documentation for the process to be independent of any one person, allowing for smooth utilization once this position concludes the scope of requirements. This represents the technical design documentation (TDD), tracking and change logs. The report master list will have links to each reports TDD, the reports base script file, and any other appropriate resource, as needed.
• Create any necessary HCQC data related policies and procedures.
• Identifying any gaps in our data process to fully utilize PowerBI and help fill those gaps.
• Provide recommendations for implementation and maintenance procedures for the use of PowerBI to ensure robust, reliable, valid reports that can address and recover from any point of failure.
• Test and assist with implementation of PowerBI into the Bureau of Health Quality and Compliance in a manner that will allow HCQC to produce reports that meet the needs of all stakeholders, federal, state, vendors and public. Addresses regulatory compliance, data validity and ease of use.

Qualifications:

The Data Analyst / PowerBI Developer Skills Required:

• 3 to 5 years of experience utilizing PowerBI to create complex reports, dashboards, workbooks, datasets, getting data from various data sources, including those that require writing of a query using the blank query function, writing Power Query M formula language, using measures in creating reports, and publishing to an Excel document in a manner that allows continued manipulation of data.

• Intermediate level user of Crystal Reports – recreate current Crystal Reports into PowerBI.

Physical Requirements:

Job frequently requires sitting, handling objects with hands.
Job occasionally requires standing, walking, reaching, talking, hearing, and lifting up to 25 pounds.
Vision requirements: Ability to see information in print and/or electronically.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin or disability.

INDIT

ISDPD",3.5,"Knowledge Services
3.5","Carson City, NV",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
143,Product Data Analyst,"$55k-$103k
(Glassdoor Est.)","OVERVIEW:

As the Company expands its product offerings, there are rapidly growing needs to use both external and internal data sources to ensure optimal financial and operational performance. The Product Data Analyst is a highly skilled and proficient in their discipline which adds value to the organization. The role will focus on internal data sources, ensuring we have access to the required data and are using effective reports to monitor and interpret this data.

TEAM OVERVIEW:

The Product Strategy Group works to ensure the Company offers competitive products that provide growth and profitability. The group performs a wide range of analytics and uses both internal and external data sources to achieve these ends. We interact and provide guidance primarily to Product, Marketing & Finance.

COMPANY PERKS:

Competitive pay, 401k with company match, Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance, Employee Stock Purchase Plan, Educational Reimbursement, Commuter benefits, Discount programs, Inventor patent bonuses

COMPANY OVERVIEW:

Stamps.com (NASDAQ: STMP) is the leading provider of postage online and shipping software solutions to customers including consumers, small businesses, e-commerce shippers, enterprises, and high volume shippers. Stamps.com offers solutions that help businesses run their shipping operations more smoothly and function more successfully under the brand names Stamps.com, Endicia®, ShipStation®, ShipEngine®, ShippingEasy®, ShipWorks®, GlobalPost and MetaPack™. Stamps.com’s family of brands provides seamless access to mailing and shipping services through integrations with more than 500 unique partner applications.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

Primary Objectives:
Ensure Product, Operations and Product Strategy groups have timely access to reliable data to make critical, real-time business decisions
Develop a strong working relationship with the Company’s Business Intelligence group; serve as the primarily liaison between the above-mentioned groups and BI
Drive the data reporting strategy for these groups; develop reports to the specifications of these teams; and evaluate appropriate software tools to most efficiently meet team needs
Essential Position Duties:
Acquire, clean, and structure data from multiple sources; analyze data to discover and interpret trends, patterns, and relationships. Working across departments, help us ensure data quality and present data in a way that makes it easy to communicate among different groups.
Master large data sets with SQL and Tableau
Build dashboards and reports, presenting key insights and ensuring data driven actions to improve the business
Seek out improvements in current internal reporting and performance monitoring to drive more accuracy, better insights, and more streamlined processes
Perform other duties as assigned
Additional Job Duties:
Sit for prolonged periods of time
Utilize wrist and hands for a prolonged period of time
Walk short distances
Stand for short periods
Speaking and conversing with others
Lift up to 25 lbs without assistance up to chest height
QUALIFICATIONS:

Education and/or Experience:
Bachelor degree, preferably in a quantitative/analytical field.
Four or more (4+) years of relevant experience.
Skills and Knowledge:
Excellent analytical and fact-based problem solving skills, including ability to analyze large amounts of data and be able to make recommendations based on identification of trend and gaps along with creating forecasts based on historical data.
Excellent analytical and fact-based problem solving skills, with strong attention to detail.
Must be a self-starter and ready to work in an intense but fun environment with our existing team of marketing professionals.
Strong communication and relationship-building skills.
Self-motivated individual who is able to prioritize and multi-task.
Works well under pressure and able to meet tight deadlines.
Ability to conduct complex work under minimal supervision and with wide latitude for independent judgement.
Computer/Software/Application Proficiency:
Advanced Excel user, with strong SQL knowledge
Experience with visualization software such as Tableau required
Travel Requirements:
None anticipated
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

If you are based in California, we encourage you to read this important information about the Stamps.com Privacy Policy for California residents linked here.

#LI-KD1",3.9,"Stamps.com
3.9","El Segundo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
144,SQL Data Analyst,"Employer Provided Salary:
$45k-$53k","Job Description
Company: Palm Beach Accountable Care Organization
Job Title: SQL Data Analyst
Department: Information Technology
Reports To: CIO
FLSA Status: Exempt
Prepared Date: 1/2/2020
DISCLAIMER:
Job descriptions are not meant to be all-inclusive and/or the job itself is subject to change. Nothing in this job description restricts management's right to assign or reassign duties

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Perform ETL duties to move data from raw format for use by multiple departments
Apply knowledge of data, data structure and analytical tools to research or identify trends, expenditures, and utilization of healthcare providers/practices.
Respond to requests for data by determining user’s needs, collecting, organizing, and analyzing data, and providing accurate and complete reports and information.
Assist other analysts to perform financial analysis of facilities, practices, provider services, and utilization.
Work with other analysts to perform a variety of ad-hoc analysis and assessments or initiatives as requested.
Identify, develop and implement methods for improving reporting efficiency for department.
Perform checks and audits of various data sources to ensure data adheres to data governance and maintenance policies.
Maintain and apply knowledge of current trends, practices and developments in health care.
Educate and assist in problem solving to promote the implementation of the health care initiatives and research.
Knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, procedures, and programs within technology field.
Contributes in the data integrity, governance, and data structure standards and policies.
Collects, compiles and analyzes data to measure and report on provider and program performance.
Must abide to all HIPAA, Confidentiality and Privacy laws.
Other duties as assigned within the scope of responsibilities and requirements of the job; not limited by this job description.
Supervisory Responsibilities:
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.
Competencies: To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
Analytical and advanced problem solving strategies.
Working knowledge of industry coding (revenue codes, ICD9/ICD10/ICD11 classifications, CPT codes)
of data, data objects, data structure, and industry standards.
Minimum level computer skills in a Microsoft Office environment: Advanced.
Strong skills in SQL, Microsoft Excel, or other comparable software tools.
Programming languages preferred, notably C#
Experience with ETL process management and data engineering
Strong internet research capabilities.
Bi- or Multi- lingual skills (written and verbal): A Plus.
High attention to detail
SQL Server / SSRS / Other Analytics Software
Report Writing
Problem Solving
Systems/Workflows/General IT
People Skills
Assertive / Reliable
Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; listens and gets clarification; responds well to questions.
Safety and Security - Uses equipment and materials properly.
Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time.
Knowledge of legal and ethical consideration related to patient information.
Qualifications:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Education and/or Experience:
Required: Bachelor's degree in statistics, engineering, computer science and 1-3 years of experience in the field or in a related area.
Preferred: Master’s degree in a related area
Language Skills:
Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, correspondence, and memos. Ability to write simple correspondence. Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one situations to visitors, clients, and other employees of the organization.
Reasoning Ability:
Ability to think critically and objectively and unbiased. Quickly learn/adapt to healthcare industry standards, codes, data, and business practices.
Computer Skills:
MS Office Productivity Tools (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint), Internet, SQL & Data Objects, various report writing tools. Programming skills preferred in C# or other related languages.
Other Skills and Abilities:
High accuracy and extreme confidentiality a MUST. Highly detail-oriented and must possess a very high degree of organization.
Physical Demands:
While performing the duties of this Job, the employee will have a combination of standing, sitting, bending and reaching. May work at a computer monitors for prolonged periods. The employee may lift and/or move up to 10 pounds.",3.8,"Palm Beach ACO, LLC
3.8","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
145,Salesforce Data Analyst,"$33k-$57k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Overview

The Salesforce Data Analyst will be responsible for the fidelity and accuracy of the data in the Salesforce system as well as the maintenance of data, processes, profiles and architecture of our Salesforce.com solution. The analyst will work closely with other CRM Team members and business subject matter experts to process data hygiene requests, update requirements and business processes specifications, and aid in large projects. The analyst will also work closely with IT development teams on projects intended to improve user experience and operational functionality; they must also work closely with SME’s to reconcile sales data between CRM and corporate systems of record. In addition, the analyst may assist in developing proposals for new policies and procedures, metrics, and for documenting process flows.

Responsibilities:

Specialize in collecting, organizing, and analyzing data from various systems
Develop an in-depth understanding of the interrelationships of data and multiple data domains
Create and maintain thorough documentation artifacts
Identify and document data migration paths and processes
Demonstrate commitment to providing customer-focused quality service
Develop and perform standard queries to ensure data quality, identify data inconsistencies, and missing data then resolve as needed
Perform data extraction, storage, manipulation, processing, and analysis
Collect, profile, collate, and map appropriate data for usage in new or existing solutions as well as for ongoing data analysis activities
Interpret customers’ functional and information needs and turn them into functional or data requirements, process models, etc.
Perform other duties as deemed relevant based upon experience

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent with 2-3 or more years of experience related to this position
3 plus years of demonstrated experience in data analysis, data manipulation, and decision support
Knowledge and application of relational database concepts
Experience or exposure to Extract/Transform/Load (ETL) and/or Business Intelligence
Greater than 1 year working in SQL
Experience completing technical design via iterative mockups
Several years’ experience using MS Office Suite (esp. Word and Excel)

Preferred Qualifications:

High-level knowledge of enterprise IT organizational, business, and technical environments
High aptitude in analytical and logical thinking
Demonstrated experience with data models and data mapping
Ability to perform ad-hoc analysis and maintain clear and comprehensive documentation of decision-making, data preparation, and processes
Openness to learning new skills and software as necessary
Demonstrated ability to manage simultaneous work flows while maintaining quality output and meeting deadlines
Strong verbal and written communication skills with demonstrated ability to communicate at different levels of the organization
Demonstrated ability to produce highly detailed, comprehensive documentation artifacts
Client-focused attitude
Ability to analyze processes and recommend improvements as needed",2.7,"SBM Management
2.7","Saint Louis, MO",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
146,Data Analyst II,"$41k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We know why you are reading about this opportunity. You are driven to achieve goals. You are looking to make a direct impact. You want to work in a culture where your co-workers work as part of a diverse team, communicate across departments, and have a positive attitude. If we had to guess, you are innovative with great ideas, want to bring efficiencies to processes, and are looking to grow your career. Are we right? If so, let’s talk about who we are.

Who We Are

Greenphire is a leading provider of clinical payment and communication solutions. We provide software as a service (SaaS) to reduce costs, increase participant retention, and produce quantifiable results for our clients in the clinical trial industry. Our vibrant culture focuses on four key values: All In, As a Team, For a Purpose, Solving Problems.

We are a multi-year recipient of the Philadelphia Business Journal’s Best Places to Work award, and love to give shout-outs and awards to our employees. Our For A Purpose committee champions philanthropic activities throughout the year so employees can give back to our community. We have a diversity committee that focuses on breaking down barriers, recognizing that our uniqueness is what makes us so successful!

To Join Our Team

You must love numbers and manipulating large sets of data. You also must be analytical with experience extracting and uploading data into a system - paying special attention to detail and taking pride in accuracy. At the same time, you have to be able to excel in a fast-paced environment and love ever-changing and advancing work. If automating and making things efficient is your thing, look no further!

How You Will Contribute
Build internal relationships and deliver data science solutions to meet their needs
Extract and manipulate large amounts of data using SQL, Excel and visualization analytics software
Present analytics and data visualizations for stakeholders, with actionable insights
Provide ad hoc queries, and develop reports that provide insights and access to key performance metrics
Integrate data from multiple sources into reports for internal and external sources
Conduct quality control and auditing to ensure accuracy and appropriateness of data and configurations
Work cross-functionally with Operations and Technology to improve data quality and reporting
For Consideration You Will Have
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, data science, finance or equivalent work experience
SQL and advanced Excel experience
Prior coding experience (a plus)
Proficiency with visual analytics software; MS Power BI, MS SQL Server Analysis is a plus!
Proven analytical, evaluative, and problem-solving abilities
Passion for sharing your skills and data knowledge with others
Demonstration of high degree of productivity while handling multiple tasks simultaneously, and easily adaptable to urgent matters when required
Strong written and verbal communication, and research skills
Strong relationship building skills for collaboration",3.6,"Greenphire
3.6","King of Prussia, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
147,"Data Analyst ""Insurance Experience Required""",-1,"Client is seeking to add a Database Design Analyst with Data Warehouse and Business Analyst experience to staff the Enterprise Data Services team reporting to the AVP Enterprise Data Services at our office in Chicago, Illinois.

This position is responsible for the development and maintenance of data warehouse and analytical environments to support financial, management and statutory reporting requirements along with enhancing and facilitating corporate decision-making capabilities.
Position Responsibilities: *
Independently work with business customers and members of the EDS team to create solutions that support reporting, analytic and warehouse needs using the appropriate platforms and tools.
Analyze business requirements and work with client areas to produce functional specifications for use as reference in creation of reporting and analytical solutions.
Perform the first level of testing for a new and/or enhanced functionality and provide support for user acceptance testing.
Analyze source data to understand relationships and determine business rules.
Assist in designing the data warehouse and assure that data is stored and maintained in consistent formats.
Create source to target mapping documents to transform the source data into the target warehouse and test final transformations.
Develop and/or maintain relationships with business customers to identify and acquire additional data sources to incorporate into the warehouse.
Train and assist users with retrieving data from the warehouse.
Provide guidance in the creation of reporting and analytical solutions.
Position Qualifications: *
Requires a bachelor's degree or equivalent certifications in technical system design.
Insurance industry experience.
4+ years of experience developing data warehouse solutions preferably within the insurance industry.
Sound understanding of data warehouse best practices, relational data structures and dimensional data modeling.
Strong knowledge of current relational database and big data software and query concepts
Advanced SQL skills
Experience supporting large scale Enterprise Data Warehouses
Business Analyst experience.
Ability to analyze and solve complex problems and to work independently on multiple tasks
Must be able to communicate effectively verbally and in writing with technical and non-technical associates
Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: Up to $1.00 per hour

Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SQL: 6 years (Required)
Databases: 8 years (Required)
Data warehouse: 8 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.3,"Peterson Technology Partners
4.3","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Contract,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
148,Health Data Analyst II,"$51k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Health Data Analyst II is a key member of the Finance management team with responsibility for developing and maintaining analyses to support finance staff and the CFO in meeting corporate objectives.

Key Functions/Responsibilities:

Leads the development and analysis of medical expense and utilization trend report to inform key strategic initiatives to support corporate goals.
Supports the development of effective medical management programs/initiatives through analyzing, monitoring, and reporting the effectiveness of these programs.
Responsible for adhoc analytics including modeling of benefit scenarios. Utilizes statistical applications as necessary.
Supports Finance department on data warehouse redesign requests and works with IT to establish priorities.
Supports corporate initiatives/projects that require analysis of health plan data.
Conducts medical budget to actual analysis.

Qualifications:

Education:

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Finance, Statistics, Business, Public Health, or other related quantitative field.

Experience:

2 or more years’ of progressively responsible experience in data modeling, informatics and analysis.
A background in managed healthcare, insurance operations preferred.

Competencies, Skills, and Attributes:

The Analyst II is an experienced user of claims data.
Proficient in SAS, SQL or other statistical software. Must be proficient in Microsoft Excel.
Ability to meet deadlines, multi-task, problem solve and use appropriate technology to analyze business problems. Project management skills a plus.
Strong communications skills, both verbal and written, are required.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.
Required Skills

Required Experience",2.7,"BMC HealthNet Plan
2.7","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1997,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
149,Data Analyst,-1,"Please do not apply through Indeed.*
The only way you will be considered is if you follow the link at the bottom of the page and take a very short quiz.*
What are we looking for?*
We are looking for a technically savvy database-oriented Analyst with *good people skills* and the ability to pick up new business concepts and technologies.
The ideal candidate will possess: *
At least 4 years of experience.
A strong to very strong working knowledge of SQL and Python.
An ability to write and troubleshoot complex SQL procedures.
The desire to understand business events through data.
An understanding of Data Warehousing and ETL techniques.
High level understanding in at least one scripting language such as Ruby, Shell, Python.
An interest in learning large data set processing with MapReduce/Hadoop/Pig/etc.
Linux skills are a plus.
Good client relations skills strongly preferred.
Who are we?*
Raybeam, Inc. is a software engineering and consulting company focused on strategic consulting, business intelligence, and online/database marketing for the past fifteen years. We have offices near Boston and San Francisco and support a strong list of clients including Google, Facebook, Microsoft, eBay, Disney, One Kings Lane, Beachbody and Hilton Worldwide.
What do we do?*
We provide technology solutions by architecting and developing enterprise systems using a variety of programming languages, tools and platforms. This can range from building data warehouses, to web applications to implementing reporting platforms. We work in small teams, own the projects that we work on, and have direct input into the business decisions of our clients.
What do you get from working for Raybeam?*
A fun, supportive work environment that promotes camaraderie and growth.
The chance to travel and network with important figures in the industry.
The chance to have input into business decisions of our clients.
The opportunity to learn technologies that you've always wanted but never had the chance.
If you are interested in applying for the position please click on the link below to take a short quiz.*
http://careerseval.raybeam.com/sign\_in

Please note that Raybeam, Inc. is currently unable to provide sponsorship and we will only consider local candidates.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
Due to COVID, all employees are currently working remotely. When it is safe to do so, we will return to the office.

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
analyst: 3 years (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.raybeam.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/RaybeamInc/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.7,"Raybeam, Inc.
4.7","Newburyport, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
150,Insight & Analytics Data Analyst,"$36k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Insight & Analytics Data Analyst will support our Sr. Analysts and Directors who are managing clients and project work. The position entails measuring business objectives against client KPIs and requires strong technical skills with data analysis and visualization, as well as the ability to craft key insights and findings and present work when required. The Data Analyst will also play a role in various research projects that require an understanding of earned media analysis, and social and web analytics, with a tool-agnostic approach. Multi-tasking and working on several projects at once will be part of the job experience.

Job Functions:
Develops strategy insights that are compelling, actionable, and statistically rigorous, identifying trends and anomalies, and triangulating data gaps
Understanding of project management elements and what role they play, meet deadlines and apply critical thinking to ask questions and help problem solve when needed.
Data visualization expertise and the ability to translate data from multiple data sources into a compelling story.
Has a collaborative mindset, is willing to work with others and take direction.
Applies sophisticated analysis to datasets to discern and identify patterns and recommend relatable actions.
Ability to multi-task and manage competing priorities in a time-sensitive environment.
Ability to ask the right questions to understand business problems and identify measurement or research objectives.
Other duties as assigned.

Minimum/Preferred Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative discipline (Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Data Science) or marking/communications (Strategic Communications, Marketing Communications, Market Research), or the equivalent combination of education and experience
2-3 years of data analysis, data visualization, and/or market research experience is required.
Proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Power BI
Has passion and ability to learn new technologies, tools and platforms. Experience with social analytics platforms such as Talkwalker, Audiense, Netbase, Sprinklr or similar platforms is a plus.
Additional Requirements:
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate actively and work in a team environment.
Solid organizational and project management skills.
Self-motivated and able to adapt quickly to changing priorities and tight deadlines.
Strong presentation and consulting skills along with the ability to read, write and speak English
Experience working remotely or with colleagues in multiple locations
Must be able to work more than 40 hours per week on occasion
Travel: may on occasion need to travel, up to 10%

Equal Opportunity: WE provides equal employment opportunity and does not discriminate against an employee or applicant because of age, race, color, religion, gender, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, or other legally protected class status.
Diversity and Inclusion: WE values a diverse and inclusive workforce and is committed to creating a workplace where everyone thrives. We promote an atmosphere in which diversity of people and ideas are welcomed and valued. Diversity includes differences in race, religion, gender, age, lifestyle, ethnic background and sexual orientation as well as differences in experiences and ideas.
*LI-TQ1
WAG123",3.7,"WE Communications
3.7","Portland, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
151,Data Analyst,"$42k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Sapphire Digital seeks a dynamic and driven mid-level Data Analyst/QA to join our growing New Jersey team with experience in the healthcare domain. This role will perform in-depth analysis of our internal data management systems to identify, analyze, and interpret trends and/or patterns in order to provide actionable recommendations for data integrity. The Data Analyst/QA will work closely with multiple internal teams to collaborate on different stages of the data lifecycle and assist in developing data quality processes.
In this position, you'll be responsible for:
Preparing and conducting analyses and studies, needs assessment, and requirements analysis to align systems and solutions
Overseing data QA functions to ensure data integrity and accuracy
Monitoring all production data processes and validation systems
Performing data investigations, root cause analysis, data profiling, and data lineage activities
Performing research and provides recommendations for data processes and updates
Reviewing and analyzes specific data elements for accuracy and quality assurance
Driving the resolution of the identified data quality problems
Maintaining documentation as required
Partnering with BI in the development of reports and presentations
Maintaining data quality rules, data standards and data governance policies
Supporting special project work as assigned by the data managers
Collaborating effectively with cross functional teams including Data, Business Intelligence, Business Applications, and Engineering

You might be a good fit if you have:
Bachelor's degree (B. A. / B. S.) from four-year college or university; 4+ years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience
5+ years of experience as a data analyst or in a related field
Expertise with query languages (SQL) required
Experience working with large complex datasets including healthcare data such as medical claims, clinical information, demographic data and program activity results
Exposure with one or more of the following programming languages: SAS, Python, R
Prior experience working with Healthcare data, or in the Healthcare field preferred
Experience with data visualization tools and methodologies (Excel and PowerBI)
Demonstrated experience in analyzing large data sets and relational databases
Ability to manage time and priorities of multiple projects/tasks
Displays professionalism and ability to learn quickly
Extremely detail oriented
Strong oral and written communication skills
Ability to collaborate closely with multiple teams across with a wide range of technical backgrounds",3.4,"Sapphire Digital
3.4","Lyndhurst, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
152,Senior Finance Data Analyst,"$81k-$142k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Qualys is seeking a Senior Finance Data Analyst with a strong experience in data management and financial reporting and systems. Responsibilities include establishing and maintaining Master Data standards and items within the Qualys systems and monitoring and validating the integrity of data as well as supporting corrective actions related to variances to standard. He/she will also help maintain systems and manage information used for financial administration and key financial metrics and reporting and assist in setting up automated reporting and financial analysis.

Responsibilities include:
Implement, optimize, and maintain financial systems and augment it with a separate data warehouse as needed
Create, maintain, monitor, and analyze all master data in ERP & CRM and integrated solutions
Ensure and enhance data quality and train users to ensure continuity of results
Provide creative yet logical approaches to solving data problems
Perform various levels of data validation across multiple systems
Create and manage the data dictionary to support change management efforts
Draft and maintain policies, procedures, and other documentation to ensure uniform, accurate, and consistent data are present
Provide testing support for upgrades and releases, including integration testing from various sources to target systems
Assist in setting up hierarchies and maintain consistency across different systems
Assist with data and analysis requests, providing detailed backups and explanations as needed
Build and support complex planning and forecasting models using the Anaplan platform
Build Anaplan Visualizations
Set up and automate reporting and charting and analyze trends and patterns
Perform other ad hoc responsibilities as necessary
You are:
A strong team player with a positive, service-oriented attitude who drives process improvements to increase effectiveness of the team and minimize room for errors
Hands-on, detail-oriented, and organized; prior experience having gathered, structured, monitored, and validated data to ensure data integrity and detailed documentation; has developed a habit of checking the accuracy of data and analysis several times over before submitting for review
A self-starter and high-achiever with a focus on doing a great job
A superior problem solver, possessing the initiative to look into the details and interpret the impact of key business drivers
Excellent multi-tasker who has strong time and project management skills and understands the importance of planning in advance to meet deadlines that include multiple review points and iterations
Strong communicator, both written & verbal; reliable and responsive to email and phone communications
Highest level of integrity and good judgment with the ability to effectively deal with highly sensitive, confidential information
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Accounting/Finance/Business or related field
Minimum of combined 4 years of hands on experience building Anaplan models and/or master data management in an ERP or CRM system
Experience querying data from a native source (ERP, CRM or database). Understanding of backend data and database structures
Experience partnering with FP&A and to deliver insightful information
Hands on experience with NetSuite, Salesforce, and Admin is a plus
High proficiency with Excel is a must, including ability to build automated Excel models from scratch (e.g., vlookup, sumif, iferror, etc.); VBA, SQL and ODBC knowledge preferred
Data organization and management skills. Technical expertise with data models, data import methodologies, database design development, and data mining; preferred experience with a BI tool",3.1,"Qualys
3.1","Foster City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
153,Data Analyst,"$51k-$93k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst
10744
Menlo Park, CA
6/2/2020 2:54:00 PM

Learning
Contractor - W2

Job Description
Responsibilities

Primary
Query data and provide reports/query results to stakeholders
Manage requests and priorities independently
Provide documentation of queries/inbound requests for future use in improving GBM’s data infrastructure
Create new or improve existing dashboards by adding new metrics to support Business Education and other teams within the company

Secondary
Communicate with internal stakeholders about dashboards, and provide support about which metrics are available and from where
Understand existing data policy restrictions and determine if queries are possible to run/share
Skills

Minimum Qualifications

· 4+ years of experience in analytics or similar field

· Advanced proficiency in SQL

· Experience problem solving and providing business insights and recommendations from data

· Ability to manage multiple concurrent projects and drive initiatives in a cross-functional environment

· Ability to communicate complex data issues to audiences of different levels of technical expertise

Preferred Qualifications

· Experience building out large data sets and pipelines

· Python or similar scripting experience

Education

Minimum Qualifications

· Bachelor’s degree in a technical focus area

Preferred Qualifications

· MBA or graduate degree in a quantitative field

Job Requirements",3.8,"IntraEdge
3.8","Menlo Park, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
154,Data Advancement Analyst,-1,"A dynamic and diverse role requiring analytical and business skills applied across a variety of data types. Responsible for data analysis, reporting, and technology implementations using industry-leading principles, methodologies, and programs. These analytic activities are typically product or solution based designed to serve many clients or a single client who requires custom development to tackle a specific business problem. The Analyst is a thought leader who is innovative, logical, and able to participate and contribute to all facets of the data life cycle either independently or as part of a team. This role can be home-based/remote in the US.
What You Will Do:
Perform data mining to include crosstabs, frequencies, correlations, and data summarizations.
Use predictive modeling and machine learning to improve and optimize client usage, adoption, and benefit of data.
Collaborate with partners to identify and support the development of analytic solutions based on company data products.
Utilize statistical techniques to perform predictions, analyze patterns, and uncover hidden stories told through data.
Prepare analysis datasets by appending data, deduping, loading data to analysis application, and merging with other datasets.
Research and implement new analytic techniques or methodologies as needed for specific projects.
Use a variety of statistical analysis tools (SAS, R, Python) to facilitate analytic discovery.
What You Will Need:
Knowledge of supervised and unsupervised statistical and data mining techniques
Knowledge of advanced predictive analytics (GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting Trees)
Experience with a variety of programming languages (SAS, R, Python)
Experience with automating tools and processes
Ability to effectively communicate results and findings
Intellectual and business curiosity
Required:
Bachelor’s Degree in a quantitative field (Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics) or related degree programs and 3+ years of relevant work experience.
Master’s Degree in a quantitative field (Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics) or related degree programs and 1+ years of relevant work experience.
Knowledge of various statistical software programming languages (SAS, R, Python).
Experience with data mining and statistical/machine learning techniques.
Ability to interpret business problems and identify optimal solutions.
Preferred:
Knowledge of data visualization tools (Microsoft BI, Tableau)
Experience with automating processes using a variety of tools and platforms
Experience working with global data
Experience working with agencies
Travel: 10-20%

#GD17

Primary Location City/State:

Homebased - Conway, Arkansas

Additional Locations (if applicable):

Acxiom is an affirmative action and equal opportunity employer (AA/EOE/W/M/Vet/Disabled) and does not discriminate in recruiting, hiring, training, promotion or other employment of associates or the awarding of subcontracts because of a person's race, color, sex, age, religion, national origin, protected veteran, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetics or other protected status.",3.9,"Acxiom
3.9",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1969,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
155,Sr. Programmer/Analyst - Data Analytics,"$44k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Technology is the tool, data the medium, and insights the art.

Sound a little pretentious? Maybe, but as a data analytics professional you know that providing data-driven insights can make an impact. That’s why you got into this field! Now, you’d like to do it not just for one company, but for many. Read on to find out how!

Resource Data has been in the business of providing custom software and data-driven business applications for over 30 years. We’ve built a reputation of being trustworthy, competent, and dependable. Clients rely on us to help them effectively use technology to improve their business. We don’t just give them buzzwords and jargon; we provide practical advice based on our technical expertise and inside knowledge of their business. Data analysis tools and insight are a growing part of our services.

Intrigued? Let’s look at what a successful career at Resource Data might look like.

After three months here…

You jumped right in. After a period of acclimation with your new teammates, you started work on an existing data analytics project, helping the team complete key objectives on time.
You’ve had a role in several other projects building ETL processes and expanding data warehouse capabilities. This has allowed you to build connections across the Resource Data offices.
You’ve started working with the business users to understand what they’re after and how you can help.
You’ve identified datasets that look intriguing. You’re comfortable working directly with the client and have started discussing how they might use them for better insights.
Three months in and you’re a bona fide member of the Resource Data team. The client sees Resource Data as their data analytics experts.

At six months you’re developing opportunities.

You’ve started working with the client on a new initiative. You’re leading the research and developing a proof-of-concept to validate the idea and turn it into a full project.
You have identified work that could be handed off to someone more junior. We’ve started hiring for a new position.
You’ve continued to build your network at Resource Data and leverage expertise from across the company. You appreciate the depth of technical knowledge and the diversity of skills available to assist on specific problems.
You’ve led an internal discussion about common tools used in data analytics and the problem sets they are applied to. This has led to requests from other branches to support developing data analytics practice areas.

After one year, you’re building Resource Data and have a vision of a data analytics team.

You’ve identified several other clients in the local area in need of data analytics services. You have worked with the proposal team to develop technical estimates and present proposals. New clients are coming on board.
You’re able to market the breadth of services Resource Data can offer and are expanding our presence with clients outside of data analytics.
You’re working with the hiring team to identify colleges and programs that provide the right mix of technical and analytical education so you can help hire the best candidates for a growing practice.

This is just year one. Imagine what you can accomplish after that!

We expect you’ve got a few years’ experience in a business setting applying your statistical and machine learning background using tools like R and Python. In addition to data manipulation and modeling, you should have some exposure to software development and technical projects. Ultimately, we’re more interested in what you’ve done than years of experience, so please feel free to highlight your accomplishments.

We often say Resource Data is consulting done right. We work hard to provide stability and flexibility so that our employees can grow and experience long-term successful careers here. We take our commitment to clients seriously and strive to do our best work for them while also having a rewarding personal life.

If this sounds like the right place for you to continue you’re career journey, send us an application. We’d love to talk more about this opportunity and what Resource Data can offer.

Starting in Alaska over 30 years ago, Resource Data has grown to over 180 professionals across 5 offices. We’re ready and eager to demonstrate high value results to local clients through our commitment to people, technology, and results.

Resource Data is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Unfortunately, we are not able to provide any visa sponsorship or transfers for this position.",4.2,"Resource Data
4.2","Boise, ID",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
156,Data Analyst,-1,"Apparel Wholesaler/ Importer Seeks: *
*Analyze apparel sales & inventory for Merchandising & **Purchasing*
*Query and extract data from data system*
*Familiarly with Excel a must*
*Ability to problem solve and produce creative solutions*
*Strong attention to detail and analytical skills*
*Strong written and verbal communication skills*
*Strong organizational skills*
*Comfortable working with large sets of data*
*Hands-on data analysis and data manipulation*
Medical Benefits Available
Career position*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $17.00 per hour

Benefits:
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
production analytics: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Santa Ana, CA 92705 (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
kidsblanks.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Kidsblanks by Zoe,"Santa Ana, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
157,Data Exploitation Analyst,"$50k-$90k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description

Job Description:

We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Exploitation Analyst to support a client’s requirements in a challenging, dynamic setting located in the Washington Metropolitan Area. The position is for the Pathfinder contract. The Data Exploitation Analyst will be responsible for improving the completeness of data in TIDE by using a variety of methodological tools and approaches to enrich terrorist identity information, including social media networking. The Analyst will require to complying with customer policies and strategies. The Analyst will use techniques, procedures, and mechanisms to reveal the true identity of individuals, personas, or groups by analyzing and exploiting data related to sets of specific identity attributes to build a comprehensive terrorist identity record.

Requirements:

• 4 to 10 years of experience is required

BA/BS degree is required. However, 6 years of work experience may be substituted

for a Bachelor's degree

Knowledge of IC mission, organizations, policies, procedures, and requirements

• Experience in IC related data science research and analysis

• Experience with data science analytic tools including data correlation technologies

• Experience with all-source intelligence sources

• TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Intelligence

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,"Leidos
3.6","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
158,Development Data Analyst,"$38k-$68k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Link Logistics Real Estate (“Link”) is an industrial real estate operating platform owned by The Blackstone Group Inc. Link currently manages a national portfolio of high-quality, well-located industrial assets totaling over 400 million square feet throughout the U.S.
The Development Team is responsible for overseeing Link Logistics $1.5b development pipeline that includes ground up construction, build to suits and major redevelopments of existing assets. The Development Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting the Development Team with the administrative oversight of all development-related reporting, data management, and project monitoring. This position will be exposed to all facets of commercial real estate.

Establish and monitor project budgets and schedules in Yardi for all developments through the project life cycle
Project future revenue by entering and maintaining market lease assumption for speculative buildings in Forecast Manager
Manage project documentation in Yardi and confirm proper records are maintained for all developments
Work with the Development teams on accurate cashflow projections and update as budget and schedules evolve
Coordinate the “Close Out” process of completed developments and ensure all documentation is received and financial records are finalized
Work with Yardi consultants to improve reporting capabilities and data management
Ensure timely payments of development expenses and accurate coding
Assist in ad-hoc reporting and new development initiatives
Support all phases of the Development from acquisition through lease-up
Assist in preparation of the monthly Development Executive reporting and quarterly Board Book

BA or BS in relevant field of study (Finance, Accounting, Real Estate, Business Management or similar)
Must be a team player
1-2 years’ experience in the development or real estate industry preferred
Strong proficiency with Microsoft Outlook, Excel, Word, PowerPoint; familiarity with Yardi also a plus
Detail-oriented
Ability to multi-task effectively in a fast-paced work environment
Excellent oral and written communication skills
EEO Statement
Our company is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. Our employment decisions are based on individual qualifications, job requirements and business needs without regard to race, color, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, age, religion, disability, citizenship status, national origin, pregnancy, veteran status and or any other legally protected characteristics. We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations, if you need an accommodation to complete the application process, please email employment@liprop.com
#LI=MB1",3.4,"Revantage Corporate Services
3.4","Fort Washington, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
159,Data Analyst-HR,"$41k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Our client provides growth services and capital in the form of investments and consulting for innovative companies. Based in Austin, TX, they work with portfolio companies in the live entertainment, biosciences, technology service start-ups and real estate spaces. They use a venture studio model to add value, support founders in overcoming typical challenges, and grow smarter and faster.
The Role: *
As the Analyst your responsibilities will be to perform research, gather and interpret data, and create and analyze financial models. This is a full-time role based in Austin, TX Headquarters located in downtown Austin. They currently have a COVID-19 remote working policy.
Responsibilities: *
· Candidates will help with gathering information for and generating ongoing financial reports, assisting with budget, cost and variance analyses, and supporting senior staff with special projects.

· Ability to analyze large datasets, identify patterns and trends in datasets and the ability to comprehensively report and communicate findings to the relevant members of the business

· Building and maintaining valuation models and model cash flows and participating in assessment of new applications. The candidate will maintain client relationships and interact with key decision-makers.

· Candidates must understand, demonstrate, and apply investment concepts and principles to a broad range of investment opportunities. Participates in researching and reviewing investment processes, quantitative and qualitative information and providing insightful direction for senior management.

· Ensure the appropriate maintenance of files, databases and record keeping. Developing and maintaining an infrastructure that ensures the financial integrity of the organization.
Qualifications: *
· Bachelor's Degree. Accounting, Finance and Data Science backgrounds preferred.

· Strong work ethic, attention to detail, pride and ownership of work product, strength of conviction and desire to succeed.

· Sound ethics and integrity.

· Good oral and written communication skills.

· Ability to travel up to 10%
Preferred Experience*
· Experience in financial analysis, data analysis and project management is preferred.

· Strong knowledge of the investment management industry and an understanding of market environments, asset classes and apply investment concepts and principles.

· Candidates will have solid technology skills, including proficiency with Microsoft Excel, Microsoft Powerpoint, database applications and ERP/CRM systems.

· Ability to effectively communicate across all levels of the organization. This role will interact daily with executive management, project team leaders, sales managers and financial professionals.
Compensation and Benefits Package: *
· Competitive salary based on experience

· Medical, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.2,"The HT Group
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
160,Sr. Marketing Data Analyst,-1,"\*REMOTE OPPORTUNITY AVAILABLE\**
Summary: *
The Senior Marketing Analyst reports directly to the VP of Marketing Business Analytics and is responsible for gathering the necessary information and data to provide analysis for marketing needs. The Senior Analyst is responsible for developing complex reporting with an understanding of current business processes and metrics as they relate to the mortgage industry.
Essential Job Functions: *
Analyze & report on the performance of key marketing metrics to gauge trends, benchmarks, and performance of Marketing Campaigns
Derive value by analyzing customer data and identifying marketing opportunities
Partner with internal customers including Call Center and finance colleagues in developing marketing analysis and reports
Execute recurring / Ad hoc direct marketing analysis and dashboards
Creates and maintains documentation regarding all analysis and reporting
Plays a key role in educating the Business on reporting and analytics solutions
Manages and maintains current report catalog including automating manual reports as well as improvements to existing reports.
Manages reporting for additions, modifications or deletions to data and the reporting environment.
Other duties may be assigned
Other Related Duties: *
Performs other related duties as assigned. Supervisory Responsibilities: This position has no supervisory responsibilities.
Qualifications: *
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required.
Strong working knowledge of SAS, SQL and Oracle (or similar) relational databases
Experience with marketing analytics and database • Proven analytical skills in data mining, data manipulation, report development and visualization
5+ years of Marketing Analytics or similar practical experience in financial services industry – preferably mortgage or credit card
Proficiency in initiating, establishing and maintaining relationships with the business community
Experience with BI report development tools such as Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS), Tableau, Business Objects, or other data visualization tools
Ability to transform data into a story
Attention to details, ability to QC your own work
Desired but not necessary: *
Prior project management experience
Knowledge of the mortgage industry
Education and/or Experience: *
Bachelor’s degree or higher in Economics, Finance, Computer Science or related analytical fields
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Proven ability to think creatively in complex situations
Proficiency with Microsoft Office tools (Excel, PowerPoint, etc.)
Must be flexible and comfortable in a fast paced environment with shifting priorities, projects and timelines
Language Skills: *
Strong written skill desired. Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures, or government regulations. Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals. Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public.
Reasoning Ability: *
Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists. Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form.

Founded in Mount Laurel, NJ in 1990, Freedom Mortgage has since grown into one of the largest and fastest-growing privately owned full-service residential lenders in the USA. Licensed in all 50 states, Washington D.C., Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands, Freedom Mortgage has over 5000 employees nationwide, proudly servicing $225.6 billion, and is still growing.

Our mission is to foster homeownership in America. Freedom is a leader in VA mortgage lending and is one of the mortgage industry’s largest philanthropic supporters of the USO and military families through its Team Freedom Cares philanthropic arm.

Locations include suburban Philadelphia and Fishers, IN, two regions where we were named Top Workplaces. We also have large operating centers countrywide, including these desirable markets: Beaverton , OR; Boca Raton, FL; Columbia, MD; Jacksonville, FL; Melville, NY; Plano, TX; San Dimas, CA; Tempe, AZ; Troy, MI and Woodbridge, VA.

If you seek a sense of community, top training, opportunity for advancement, a comprehensive benefits package and reward and recognition program, look no further.
Freedom Mortgage Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity. Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to age, race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, or their status as a protected veteran or an individual with disabilities. Local applicants encouraged to apply. Employment contingent upon successful completion of background investigation. Smoke-free workplace. Drug-free work environment. Excellent benefits package including medical, dental, vision and 401(k). All resumes are held in confidence. Only candidates whose profiles closely match requirements will be contacted during this search.

LENDER NMLS ID: 2767
Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data analytics: 5 years (Required)
data mining: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 5 years (Required)
marketing: 5 years (Required)
SAS Enterprise Guide: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Application Question:
What is your primary email address?",4.4,"Freedom Mortgage
4.4",Rhode Island,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1990,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
161,Senior Data Analyst,"$81k-$142k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About the Company:
Industrious is the largest premium workplace provider in the U.S. with nearly 100 locations in more than 50 U.S. cities. Its Workplace Experience platform, which pairs thoughtfully-designed spaces with hospitality-driven services and amenities, has reshaped the concept of coworking into a scalable solution for companies of all sizes and stages. Since its founding in 2013, Industrious has helped thousands of companies scale their businesses while maintaining the highest NPS scores in the industry. For more information, visit www.industriousoffice.com.
As we shape the future of workplace experience, we're looking for motivated, thoughtful, and collaborative people who are excited to join a high-growth, warm, and welcoming team. For more information, please visit www.industriousoffice.com/careers.

About the Role:
As the Data Analyst at Industrious, you are responsible for building the data-models that underpin our analytics and reporting. You have a flexible skillset: someone who is adept with SQL code, is experienced in ad-hoc data-modeling, and can partner with an engineer to build our data-warehouse.

This is an amazing role for a curious, analytical mind who is excited to touch all elements of the business and lay the foundation for analytics and insights.

You are a great fit for this role if:
You are eager to sit at the intersection of technology and analysis
You are an independent operator who can build from the ground up
Data engineering? Data analysis? Data science? You want to work with all three pieces of the analytics cycle
Responsibilities:
Partner with an engineer to build our data-warehouse
Develop the Redshift/Snowflake models that underpin our analytics and reporting
Serve as the bridge between our Analytics and Technology teams
Requirements:
Very strong SQL skills (preferably Postgresql)
Experience creating ad-hoc databases (e.g., using DBT or equivalent)
Experience transforming and analyzing large datasets
Demonstrated ability to learn new technologies and techniques
Bachelors or Masters degree in Computer Science, Mathematics or similarly quantitative/technical field
Experience in analytics or a technical field
Preferred qualifications:
Experience with Data Lakes (e.g., (Redshift/Snowflake preferred) and proven ability to produce scalable solutions
Experience with connectors (e.g., FiveTran, Stitch)
Experience with visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Looker)
Experience working in a cloud-based environment (e.g., AWS, Azure, Google-Cloud)

Perks:

In addition to our incredible team, there are lots of other fun reasons to work with us.
Daily breakfast, snacks, coffee, tea, and drinks at all Industrious locations
Health care, including vision and dental
401K plan
Generous vacation time
Paid parental leave
Industrious in the News:
Industrious CEO Sees Company as Less Risky Than WeWork
Industrious' Jamie Hodari on the Return to Work
Coworking Spaces Prepare To Welcome People Back, Expect the Industry To Grow
Industrious is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. Industrious believes that diversity is critical to our success in delivering great workplace experiences and is committed to creating an inclusive, mutually respectful environment which celebrates diversity of our people. We seek to hire on the basis of merit, competence, performance, and business needs.

#LI-LC1",3.7,"Industrious
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Membership Organizations,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
162,"Analyst and Data Communication Strategist, Marketing","$41k-$79k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Argo Group, through its operating subsidiaries, offers high-quality Commercial Property and Casualty (P&C) insurance products and services tailored to the needs of businesses and public entities.

We are looking for a highly capable Analyst and Data Communication Strategist - Marketing to join our team and work from any of our US offices or as a home based employee. This position is responsible for leveraging data reporting and analysis related to Marketing and Argo businesses’ short and long term initiatives.

The primary duties and responsibilities of the role are:
Extract and manipulate data to develop defensible insights that inform decision-making and overall performance
Understand the unique drivers of the business and the specialty insurance industry.
Works closely with internal data teams and actuary, staying current on the latest data structure changes, reporting, visualization tools and strategies.
Troubleshoots data reporting issues and works to modify existing processes or recommends process change to alleviate problems.
Uses system data, reporting and visualization tools to proactively identify opportunities and trends working in conjunction with the AVP Producer Management Analytics.
Manages and executes adhoc data requests within the Marketing group and for the AVP Producer Management Analytics.
Uses data to identify opportunities for growth and communication with client partners.
Acts as main point of contact for all producer reporting; involved in digital report design and data integrated with CRM and Sales Enablement platforms.
Manages all monthly producer reporting for Marketing SVP and Marketing Managers.
Continually builds communication skills and expands network of business leaders, actuarial, digital and data teams.
Active member of data and digital collaboration teams.
Core qualifications and requirements for this position include:
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university or equivalent work experience.
Minimum 3 years’ experience in data mining, cleansing and compilation from multiple sources using strong SQL skills.
Ability and willingness to learn analytic and visualization tools.
Experience with Postgres and/or Snowflake a plus.
Minimum 5 years’ experience working in Microsoft Excel, including development of linked workbooks, pivot tables, queries, reports and graphs, as well as advanced knowledge of Excel formulas and applications
Experience in the insurance industry preferred.
Passion for finding streamlined and less complex solutions to data gathering, analysis and reporting.
Willingness to develop strong and productive relationships with various departments including underwriting, actuarial, IT and marketing.
Excellent analytical and computer skills.
Advanced knowledge of computer programs, Excel, Access, data base query tools and PowerPoint.
Experience with Microsoft Power BI, Salesforce or Seismic a plus.
Strong organizational skills and attention to detail.
Proactive work style with an ability to work independently and in a team environment.
In addition, you’ll want to make sure you embody our core values as they are how we get the job done:
The entrepreneurial spirit
Doing the right thing
Collaborating
Respecting each other
We offer our employees:
An attractive Total Rewards package that includes:
Base pay and profit sharing.
Comprehensive benefits designed to protect and enhance your life and your dependents’ lives by way of health and wellness plans, life insurance, a matching 401(k) Plan, generous PTO, Paid Caregiver Leave, Paid Parental Leave (up to 12 weeks), and an opportunity to become a shareholder at a 15% discount.
Argo Academy, a digital and instructor-led platform that helps us focus on continuous learning and which got us named in Training magazine as one of the Training Top 125 Companies.
Opportunities to support your local community though various outreach programs or by matching your gift to charitable causes by 150%.
A lucrative Employee Referral program that resulted in 30% of all new hires last year.
Flexible Work Arrangements that include Compressed Hours, Flex time, Job-Sharing, Part-Time and Remote or Home Working, Sabbatical Leave and Summer Hours that give our employees the balance they need to excel at their jobs.
About Argo Group
We have a very flat organizational structure, enabling our employees have more interaction with our senior management team, especially when it relates to reviewing large losses.
We believe in building an inclusive and diverse team, and we strive to make our office a welcoming space for everyone. We encourage talented people from all backgrounds to apply.
PLEASE NOTE: At this time, Argo Group will not sponsor an applicant for employment authorization for this position.

If you have a disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act or a similar law and you wish to discuss potential accommodations related to applying for employment at Argo Group, please contact our Benefits Department at 210-321-8400.

To all recruitment agencies: Unless you have been requested to work on this position, or other positions with Argo Group, please do not forward any resumes to Argo Group employees. Argo Group is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of age, ancestry, color, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information, marital status, national origin or citizenship (including language use restrictions), denial of family and medical care leave, disability (mental and physical) , including HIV and AIDS, medical condition (including cancer and genetic characteristics), race, religious creed (including religious dress and grooming practices), sex (including pregnancy, child birth, breastfeeding, and medical conditions related to pregnancy, child birth or breastfeeding), sexual orientation, military or veteran status, or other status protected by federal, state and/or local laws.

Applicants: For the most convenient application experience, please use the “Apply with LinkedIn” button. If manually entering, only include your most recent or relevant job information needed for this role. For either method, please attach your most current resume. Additional job history may be obtained if selected for the interview process.",3.7,"Argo Group US
3.7","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1948,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
163,Data Analyst (Entry),"$32k-$58k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Nursery Coordinator

No corp to corp or sponsorship

Responsibilities

- Assist in the design, creation and management of nursery trials;

- Submit capacity and assay requests to partner labs and teams through enterprise IT systems

- Work with large, complex datasets and computer systems to provide insights for data- driven decisions;

- Work with stakeholders across site functions to track KPIs;

- Assist with in-depth and ad-hoc analysis of information from multiple data sources;

- Increase data accessibility within the organization by enabling scheduled reporting and monitoring in non-graphic or graphic form;

- Use forecasts to help manage greenhouse capacity;

- Accurately forecast, create and analyze molecular assay projects to advance elite genetics while ensuring trait quality;

- Be able to work extended hours during peak seasons;

Required Skills / Experience

- BS in data science, life sciences, engineering, statistics or related field PLUS at least one year of work experience with reporting, data management, or data analytics

OR

- An equivalent combination of related experience/education

ALSO

- Experience with large data sets

- Excellent Excel skills

- Ability quickly understand a number of processes with consistency and attention to data quality and accuracy

Desired Skills and Experience

- Experience with visualization software (Tibco SpotFire, Tableau, Power BI, etc.)",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Tucson, AZ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
164,Data Analyst,"$52k-$96k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Laulima Government Solutions, LLC is looking for a qualified Data Analyst to support the U.S. Army Institute of Surgical Research (USAISR) at Fort Sam Houston, TX.

JOB DESCRIPTION:
Provides reporting capability and data analysis utilizing data from the Extremity Trauma and Amputation Center of Excellence-Registry (EACE-R) and Department of Defense Trauma Registry/Military Orthopaedic Trauma Registry (DoDTR/MOTR).
Run queries on the EACE-Registry data. Produce standard weekly and monthly reports on the EACE’s population of interest. Respond to ad hoc data requests for information as approved by the EACE Director.
Extract, manipulate, analyze and array data for easy understanding.
Develop, modify, or provide input to data analytics project plans, and implements project plans to meet or exceed objectives.
Run periodic integrity checks and analyze results to identify areas to address which serves to ensure data is accurate.
Identify gaps in data comparisons between the databases.
Provide presentations or briefings on all aspects of the data analysis
Maintain analytics project SharePoint libraries providing versioning and historical background on project-related documents.
Implement or maintain quality control processes with the goal of maintaining high fidelity data in the databases.
Make improvements, solve problems, or take corrective action when problems arise.
Adhere to applicable data information and data release standard operating procedures.
Provide analytic support and coaching with clinical community customers to more completely identify the appropriate data elements to answer the research question or performance improvement queries.
Manage all access requests and coordinate with leadership for approval.
REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:
Must have at least 4 years of experience.
Possess current familiarization in Microsoft C# application and SQL.
Demonstrate proficiency in highly advanced MS Excel skills and be an expert in constructing and manipulating pivot tables to collate and array data.
Must Be a US Citizen.
DESIRED SKILLS:
Health data analytics experience is a plus.
DEGREE/EDUCATION/CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENT:
BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related field.
CITIZENSHIP/SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Currently have a NACI background investigation or able to obtain and maintain.
Laulima Government Solutions, LLC is a fast-growing government service provider. Employees enjoy competitive salaries; a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid time off; and 10 paid holidays. Laulima Government Solutions, LLC is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Experience:
Excel: 5 years (Required)
Data Analysis Skills: 4 years (Required)
Health Data Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
SQL: 1 year (Required)
C#: 1 year (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.alakainafoundation.com",3.7,"Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies
3.7","Fort Sam Houston, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Government,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
165,US Data Analyst - MB,"$60k-$103k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Summary:

At Martin Brower we are on a Journey to change our culture to be more data driven. The Data Analyst will be a key resource on the Data and Analytics team, working on critical Data Analytics efforts. This role is responsible for supporting the development of interactive and actionable dashboards, analyses and reporting through partnership with senior level staff on the Data Analytics team.

Position Responsibilities may include, but not limited to:

Develop, update and maintain the BI dashboards we provided to our brand customers and internal user stakeholders
Help perform ad-hoc data analysis that supports strategic growth and leadership initiatives
Obtain and integrate data from new sources to help expand the breadth and depth of our analyses and resulting insights
Have fun and work with a scrappy, optimistic, energetic new team
Use state-of-the-art technology and programming tools
Collaborate on the roll-out of internal solutions, prioritizing automation
Be encouraging, supportive, kind, fun, sensitive, honest, a great teacher, and above all, a great student
Any other duties as assigned.

Required Skills and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in relevant field
Strong business orientation with experience deriving value from data.
Knowledge of Business Intelligence tools including, but not limited to, Cognos and Microsoft Power BI.
Experience creating data models, working with Data Warehouse/Data Lake, creating ETL pipelines
At least 3 years of experience in a BI or Data Analytics role, in which the following occurred:
Demonstrated capabilities in building reports and dashboards to meet business needs.
Worked successfully in Customer- and Business-facing roles.
Experience gathering business requirements while influencing decisions to drive change and modernization.
Proven ability to collaborate with IT and business teams.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to communicate technical subjects to non-technical audiences.
Strong teamwork and interpersonal skills.
This position must pass a post-offer background and drug test.

Preferred Skills and Experience:

Experience as BI or Data Analyst.
Experience within the distribution or Food Service industry.
Familiarity with data science concepts like machine learning and forecasting models with an ability to explain them to non-technical audiences.
Experience creating moderately complex to advanced SQL queries to explore data.
Experience with the following tools and technology – Snowflake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Data Lake, Azure Bricks, Power BI

Physical Demands and Work Environment:

Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Due to the nature of our business in regard to such things as delivery schedules, order inputs, selection, and Department of Transportation Hours of Service, overtime,
attendance and punctuality are essential job functions. Should an individual in this classification not be able to adhere to this requirement due to a disability, they should contact their Human Resources department to see what, if any, reasonable accommodation may be made.

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, Reyes Holdings companies will recruit and select applicants for employment solely on the basis of their qualifications. Our Practices and Procedures, including those relating to wages, benefits, transfers, promotions, terminations and self-development opportunities, will be administered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation and gender identity, age, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status and all other classes protected by the Federal and State Government. Drug Free Employer.",3.4,"Martin Brower
3.4","Rosemont, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Wholesale,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
166,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description: *
Data Analyst job is to gather, organize data, identify trends, generate deeper customer insight and formulate recommendations to the Executive Team. This role requires knowledge of accounting, inventory tracking and data management that is used to assess sales trends, feedback, and market movement. Responsible for creating the metrics to evaluate sales efficiency and productivity via dashboards and reports.
Key Responsibilities: *
Data Analytics:

· Collaborate with the accounting and operations teams in measuring and analyzing product category performance, revenue forecasting and budgeting.

· Define and build dashboards and reports for different departments to help monitor KPIs and to help the Executive Team make well-informed decisions.

· Create graphs, infographics, and other methods to visualize data.

· Create presentations and reports based on recommendations and findings.

· Perform ongoing analysis to understand user behavior and provide actionable recommendations in different areas of the product.

· Assist in the identification and analysis of “slow-moving” and obsolete inventory positions and the financial and operational impact related to those positions.

· Assists in the investigation and audits cycle inventory counting variances. Aids in the resolution of issues.

Accounting:

· Monitor expenses and their adherence to budget. Perform ongoing analysis regarding budget to actuals.

· Aids in the preparation of budgets and forecasts.

· Analyze monthly cost and variance reports and prepare financial commentaries on various operating areas.

· Performs month-end and year-end closing duties including journal entries, accrual entries, and reconciliations.

· Provides other departments with ad-hoc reports based upon data outputs, as required.

· Maintains monthly Balance Sheet account reconciliations and analysis.

· Answers accounting and financial questions by researching and interpreting data.

· Ensures that all costs in the ERP system are updated. Assists with any cost verification or revaluation.

Operations:

· Provide and present detailed analysis of inventory utilization by all Sales Agents throughout the country

· Present Data Point Analysis of each Novastep product category as it expands and contracts at each existing level while providing PAR level forecasting to internal and external team members

· Track and analyze all field consigned inventory as it relates to tray utilization, implant kitting, expiration date and sales volume

· Provide present different data points to aid in implementing a structured process for managing short dated inventory in the field to limit product expiration

· Provide monthly presentation on profitability of product category as it is directly related to volume of inventory dispatched throughout different sales territories versus operational and marketing costs spent in each individual territory thus determining territory value to Novastep

· Find and present patterns in sales as to determine possible volume discounting and up-front purchase of implants and/or instrument trays

· Discover new ways to utilize and become the expert on our inventory management platform known as Enhatch
Qualifications (Education, Skills, and Experience; Required): *
· *Education: * Bachelor’s degree in Accounting, Economics, Stats/Mathematics, or Computer Science is required.

· *Experience: *

o At least 3 years of experience working on data integration, data analytics, data science projects.

o 3 plus years’ experience performing advanced analytics using large structured and unstructured data.

o 3-5 years in an analytical position with accounting experience.

· *Technical: * Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Excel is required (Pivot Tables, V-Lookups, Macros) and Microsoft PowerPoint.
Other: *
· Requires a strategic and tactical viewpoint, strong problem-solving skills, and a deep sense of curiosity.

· Solid conceptual understanding of methods in analytics and data science. Understanding of common roadblocks and technical challenges.

· Advanced multi-tasking and prioritization skills.

· Must maintain a high level of confidentiality.

· Flexibility on scheduling to complete month-end and year-end is required.

· ERP experience.

· Working Knowledge of foot medical device industry or medical industry is a plus.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $38.00 - $48.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"GLW, Inc
5.0","Orangeburg, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
167,Data Analyst (ONE YEAR GRANT FUNDED POSITION),-1,"Reports To: *Gleaners Community Food Bank Link2Feed Program Lead, with oversight by Chief Operating Officers of Forgotten Harvest and Gleaners Community Food Bank (FH/GCFB)
Description*
Lead/facilitate implementation of business intelligence system for client data management – bridging data from Link2Feed and other agency systems; creation of data analytics/visualization for FH/GCFB management to turn data into actionable insights; educate/train FH/GCFB staff.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities*
Implementation
Learn and maintain expertise in the business intelligence software used by the food banks
Support food banks in the use of business intelligence software
Reporting
Coordinate and communicate between food banks, other data owners, and the business intelligence software organization
Build and maintain tabular and/or visualization reports for regular and/or automated reporting and analysis
Support the food banks with ad hoc reporting
Analysis
Work alongside teams within the food banks to understand operational and strategic needs
Work with a variety of data sources - extracting knowledge and actionable information
Identify patterns and trends in data sets
Administration
Help form data management and governance processes
Build processes to catch data integrity issues
Identify opportunities to improve data and food bank processes
Define new data collection and analysis processes
Document processes
Perform data validation/quality assurance analysis
Train food bank personnel on the skills needed to maintain data analytic processes
Required Experience and Qualifications*
BA or BS in information management, statistics, math, computer science, physics or other technical related field
Minimum of two years supporting business operations in an analytics capacity
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Comfort in a complex data environment and understanding of data structures
Experience with SQL and Excel
Experience with data visualization
Familiarity with data warehouse environments
Strong ability to troubleshoot and resolve data issues
Excellent verbal and written communication and interpersonal skills
Job Types: Full-time, Temporary

Pay: Up to $55,000.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
analytics: 2 years (Required)
data warehouse: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Company's website:
www.gcfb.org
Work Remotely:
No",4.4,"Gleaners Community Food Bank
4.4","Detroit, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
168,"Senior Analyst, Data Analytics & Reporting","$91k-$153k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Overview

Outset is a medical technology company pioneering a first-of-its-kind technology to reduce the cost and complexity of dialysis. The Tablo Hemodialysis System, FDA cleared for use from the hospital to the home, represents a significant technological advancement that transforms the dialysis experience for patients and operationally simplifies it for providers. Tablo serves as a single enterprise solution that can be utilized across the continuum of care, allowing dialysis to be delivered anytime, anywhere and by anyone. The integration of water purification and on-demand dialysate production enables Tablo to serve as a dialysis clinic on wheels, with 2-way wireless data transmission and a proprietary data analytics platform powering a new holistic approach to dialysis care.

Position Overview

The Sr Analyst, Data Analytics & Reporting will address needs related to strategic & ad hoc analysis requests, standard reporting & presentations as well as assigned projects that many span multiple functional areas. Analytics reports will be ad hoc as well as strategic based and will focus on such areas as: sales productivity & strategies, territory utilization & design, customer activation and marketing campaign measurement. Standard reports & presentations are analytically driven and are to be produced in an accurate, timely and reliable manner. Assigned projects and associated role will vary based on needs of the organization,

Essential Job Functions and Responsibilities
Perform strategic and ad hoc analysis:
Leverages data analytics tools to create new dashboards, reports, and any additional ad-hoc requests.
Executes existing reporting and analytical responsibilities.
Ensures the quality of work output by displaying a keen attention to detail.
Presents findings in easily understood ways, focuses on how the data analytics fits into the bigger picture.
Develop and execute on standard management reports and presentations
Design, prepare, analyze and distribute standard management reports & presentations that are facilitate business discussions via insightful, accurate, comprehensive and timely presentation of relevant data.
Enhance and streamline management reporting process by adopting best-in-class modern intelligence tools and improving data quality in partnership with stakeholders in risk management, technology and business teams.
Proactively identify areas of improvement and make recommendations for new programs and process improvements.
Provide project management and develop business requirements for assigned projects.
Lead or coordinate on projects that encompass cross-functional teams and disciplines.
Build relationships across the organization such that skills & experience can be applied in new ways to further success of the organization.
Develop business requirements that can be used by other teams to perform necessary development activities.
Requirements/Qualifications
Education and Experience (List degree requirements, years of experience, certifications, etc.).
S. in Computer Science, Math, Engineering, Finance, or related quantitative field
5+ years work experience with MS Excel, MS Access, SQL Server, Tableau or comparable database systems.
Proven ability to work across all levels of the organization.
Skills and Abilities - (List required skills and abilities).
Strategic entrepreneurial thinker, able to translate business strategy to support function
Deadline-driven, organized, detailed and able to multi-task with the willingness to adapt to the rapid business and organizational demands
Good analytical, communication (both verbal and written) and presentation skills
Desire to understand the ""why"" behind the numbers",4.5,"Outset Medical
4.5","San Jose, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
169,Data Analyst,"$30k-$54k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Warren Averett Staffing and Recruiting is seeking a Public Sector Data Consultant for a national organization!! We have an audit readiness/business process improvement contract with one of the largest Commands on Redstone arsenal They are growing a team in Huntsville, AL, during the COVID pandemic. This position is based out of Huntsville, Alabama.
Qualifications*
• Three (3) or more years of experience working financial management systems and leading data analytics support functions, required
• Two (2) or more years of experience supporting DoD clients, required
• Experience with SAP-based ERP platforms, preferred
• Experience with DoD financial statement audit, internal control testing or analysis, and coordinating with external, auditors, preferred
• Bachelor’s degree, required; Business Administration, Accounting, Finance, Management Information Systems, preferred
• License/Certifications: Active DoD SECRET Clearance, required
• Language: Proficiency in one or more foreign languages, preferred

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Required)",3.7,"Warren Averett Staffing & Recruiting
3.7","Huntsville, AL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1972,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
170,Data Analyst,-1,"Company Summary:

An established Biotech/Pharma firm based in the Greater Los Angeles area is currently seeking a driven Data Analyst with familiarity with cGMPs, SOPs and data migration activities. You will be working with a driven team that oversees their facilities as they make a transition to a new CMMS. They are looking to bring someone on to grow within their teams and seeking to start this with an initial 6 month contract with opportunity to hire.

Responsibilities:

-Maintains, both in physical and digital formats, preventative maintenance, calibration and reactive & corrective maintenance records using documentation practices

-Assisting in drafting new and revisions of existing SOPs, associated fillable forms and Equipment Specifications

-Resolves data management and integrity issues

-Assists in drafting new and revision of existing SOPs, equipment specs

Skills:

-College degree equivalent or High School diploma plus at least 2-3 years of relevant experience

-Knowledge of cGMPS, FDA, ISO and similar requirements

-Ability to maintain high level & compliance-oriented documentation for equipment

-Experience working with biotech/medical devices/pharma or a similar industry

They are looking to bring someone on the team for an initial 6 months with a high possibility of converting to permanent depending on the quality of work! If you are interested in the Data Analyst role, then please don't wait to apply!",-1,EPM Scientific,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
171,Senior Marketing Data Analyst,-1,"Membership Marketing Partners (MMP) is an innovative and fast-growing marketing agency that serves conservative non-profits and non-partisan non-profits in the DC metro and New York markets. We’re looking to hire a mid-senior level Marketing Data Analyst to handle in depth marketing analysis. Candidates should be analytical thinkers, who are comfortable working with large data sets and doing complex analysis, and most importantly converting results into actionable business decisions. Candidates will also need strong communication skills to explain their analysis and win over stakeholder support for their recommendations.

Here are the required qualifications:

· Proven work experience as a Data Analyst

· Strong knowledge of statistical methods and concepts

· 3-5+ years job experience with either political advocacy groups, campaigns, or a marketing agency

· BA/BS degree

· Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel

· Ability to effectively multi-task in a deadline driven atmosphere

· Extremely detail-oriented and organized

· Good attitude and work ethic with high personal and professional standards

· Effective Communication skills

Preferred Qualifications:

· Experience with Salesforce CRM or with a membership-based CRM

· Experience with Google Analytics 360

Job Responsibilities:

· Designed and distribute executive dashboards, and campaign performance tracking reports using Excel

· Documenting data structures for input from/outputs to outside data sources.

· Manage the coordination of data collection, analytics, reporting, and insights across all digital marketing channels.

· Develop SQL scripts for analysis and reporting

· Ensure data quality across a variety of reports and monitor incoming data into the platform for accuracy

· Develop customer and prospect profiles, identify new marketing segments and relevant upsell opportunities

· Create actionable data insights for a variety of marketing campaigns

Show us you have what it takes, and we’ll pay you a competitive salary, vacation days, sick days, and health benefits. Please send your resume and cover letter to. Salary commensurate with experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $85,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Due to the current pandemic, the option to work remotely can be discussed.

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.MemberPartners.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.0,"Membership Marketing Partners, LLC
2.0","Alexandria, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
172,Principal Data Analyst,"$64k-$114k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Principal Data Analyst
Job Code

4018

Location


US - Carson, CA Corporate HQ

Position Type


Regular Full-Time

Apply Now

Dermalogica is looking for a talented PRINCIPAL DATA ANALYST

The Principal Data Analyst, through research and analysis of data from different functional systems, will develop data integration/aggregation solutions to support data analytics and visualization tools. The ideal candidate will partner with executive stakeholders, finance/operations/sales subject matter experts and functional leaders in creating robust and scalable data analytics solutions for business insight. The data analyst must possess a collaborative attitude, strong oral/written presentation skills, excellent problem-solving skills, and solid analytical/critical thinking skills.

Essential Duties:
Design and implement a flexible data access platform for operational data stores/islands, data warehouses, data marts and data lakes using standard practices as well as documenting the systems of record, data dictionaries and data flow diagrams for strategic data management
Using logical data models, help build data marts for analysis to determine trends and significant data relationships across different functional areas
Translate business needs into data modeling and reporting initiatives
Work with business stakeholders to interpret data to identify trends to go across future data sets
Adapt standard or develop novel applications of classification, forecasting, simulation, optimization, and summarization techniques
Create compelling interactive visualizations and presentations to enhance decision making capabilities throughout the company
Develop extracts, transforms, and loads with SQL
Drive AWS/Azure cloud data platform architectural decisions and development standards
Actively contribute towards data migration tasks from on-premises to cloud
Multi-task across several ongoing projects and daily duties of varying priorities as required
Ability to make good judgments, decisions, negotiate and drive problem resolutions
Create detailed technical specifications and release documentation for assigned ETL and reporting projects
Qualifications

Education and/or Experience:
Experience with Data Warehousing methodologies and concepts
Experience working with large data sets.
Expert knowledge of analytical tools and scripting languages
Extensive experience with BI/DW lifecycle including source data analysis, ETL, data marts, reporting, dashboards, and analytics
8+ years of experience working with MS SQL Server database. Mastery of SQL, specifically MS SQL Server 2012 and higher.
8+ years of experience developing ETL processes with large scale data warehouses required
2+ years working in DevOps, automating, and deploying packages between different environments
5+ years working in Alteryx, Power BI
Specific Skills/Knowledge:
High proficiency in dimensional modeling techniques and their applications including star schemas
Familiarity with Data Governance and Master Data Management principles
Ability to work with structured and unstructured source data
Apply now and become a team member for a company that provides competitive salaries, outstanding benefits including Health Benefits, Monthly Product Allowances, Profit Sharing, Annual Fitness Reimbursement, Domestic Partner Benefits, 401(k) Matching, not to mention a host of other perks!

To be considered for this role, please click on ""Apply Now"" to complete the online application. Please know that all applications are reviewed for consideration. A member of the Human Resources team will contact you if your experience and skills are a match for the position.

Dermalogica is an equal opportunity employer that embraces diversity.",3.9,"Dermalogica
3.9","Carson, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
173,Media Marketing Data Analyst,"$37k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This is an exciting opportunity to join an established company located in DTLA. We are a tight-knit group and are looking for our next team player. If you like a dynamic, fast-paced working environment, this position is a perfect fit for you. We are looking for someone who wants to grow and develop, as our business is ramping up.
Ideal candidate CAN -*
Flourishes on large data and media analytics
Complete in-depth attribution and data analysis, including web analytics and Partner with relevant departments, including IT and Sales to develop strategic reporting and dashboards
Perform web analytics tracking initiatives using Google Analytics
SQL knowledge required*
Knowledgeable in media/marketing business analytics
Preferable experience with marketing technologies, including Logics/Salesforce CRM, Invoca, Tableau, Domo, Python, digital ads, PPC
Able to handle large data sets, including advanced Excel experience including pivot tables and charts
Oversees database development and modification efforts.
Maintains current and accurate knowledge of data storage and management best practices.
Safeguards projects are completed on time with accuracy
Gathers, organizes, and interprets statistical data from the database to provide reports to and answer questions from, upper management.
Performs other related duties as assigned.
Ideal candidate MUST -*
Be a vital asset to the marketing team
Work extremely well under pressure, adhere to deadlines.
Be organized and detail oriented.
Possess excellent English written and oral communication skills.
Have strong research and analytical skills.
Be able to perform with little supervision (Self Motivator).
Positive attitude, work ethic, and ability to multitask across a multitude of projects and tasks.
Agency experience, plus.
Desired qualifications:
_Qualifications -_*
_Bachelor’s degree or relevant work experience._
_Some experience in website development/optimization_
_3+ years in the media/advertising/marketing field_
_Analytical/Marketing background._
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Media/Advertising/Marketing: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",3.7,"American Tax Solutions
3.7","Los Angeles, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
174,Clinical Data Analyst,"$37k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Are Hiring

Clinical Data Analyst - Indpls Infectious Disease Care - Full-Time,Day - Infectious Disease of Indiana - Carmel,IN

Work Schedule: 8am to 5pm Sunday through Saturday. Must be free to cover occasional weekends.

Why Join Ascension?
In Indiana, St. Vincent operates 24 hospitals in addition to a comprehensive network of affiliated joint ventures, medical practices, and clinics. St. Vincent's more than 15,000 associates and 3,000 providers offer expertise in a wide range of services including acute/long-term acute care, bariatrics, cancer care, cardiovascular services, emergency/trauma services, neuroscience, orthopedics, pediatric services, primary care, urgent/immediate care, women's health and more. St. Vincent has been serving central and southern Indiana for 145 years.

Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As a Clinical Data Analyst Associate with St. Vincent Health-IN, you will have the opportunity to collect and analyze clinical data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
Oversees provision of ad hoc management reports.
Reviews information for accuracy and reconciles data on a regular basis.
What You Will Need

Licenses/Certifications/Registration:
Preferred Credential(s):
Minimum Qualification: None Required
Education:
Diploma
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required
Work Experience:
None required.
Equal Employment Opportunity
St.Vincent is an EEO/AA Employer M/F/Disability/Vet. Please click the link below for more information.
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

This employer participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify links below for more information.

eVerify

Right to Work",3.3,"Ascension
3.3","Carmel, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
175,Data Quality Control Analyst - Tier II,"$67k-$115k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Quality Control Analysts to work on customization and optimization of Publicly Available Information (PAI) data ingestion. The analyst will work closely with technical teams to execute on client expectations concerning evolving technical requirements, breadth and depth of collection, and accuracy of content. The selected candidates will perform testing on collected media content that has been processed using natural language processing and machine learning to provide feedback to the Machine Learning Team. In addition, they will coordinate and customize human analyst workflow.

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree required
Strong quantitative reasoning and writing skills are a must as well as the ability to work well with teams or individually with minimal supervision
Technical proficiency with web-based applications
Apply filters and parse data sets
Demonstrated competency analyzing geopolitical affairs and world event
Conduct quality control analysis of geopolitical content and provide feedback to technical development team
Prior experience in Html, CSS, Python, and Javascript (including DOM load/execute for web page scraping)
Experience web scraping (e.g. Phantomjs, Selenium, Beautiful Soup, etc...)
Prior usage of 3rd party APIs to include but not limited to: Azure Translate, Google Translate, and Crawlbot with Diffbot API
Prior experience using GIT for version control and Kubernetes for automated testing
Desired Skills:
Prior experience utilizing traditional intelligence collection and analysis tools
Prior experience conducting manual testing on intelligence related products
Experience integrating multiple data sources to produce analytics and reports
Capability to apply principles of data science and data management to identify trends and patterns in unstructured news media content
Academic-quality research and writing skills
Capability to rapidly master and apply specialized software suites to daily workflow
Foreign language proficiency (Russian, Mandarin, or Farsi) preferred
Security Clearance:
Candidates must be eligible for a security clearance, ACTIVE Secret clearance is preferred.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","McLean, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
176,SAP Data Analyst,"$70k-$121k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Description:
The SAP Data Analyst is responsible for analyzing data and the ERP architecture to support business intelligence. In collaboration with subject matter experts and data stewards, defines and implements data strategy, policies and controls to ensure enterprise data is accurate, complete, secure and reliable. The SAP Data Analyst will oversee data structures, design the ERP reporting strategy and provide system training. The SAP Data Analyst will ensure master data integrity in key systems as well as maintaining the process to support the data quality. The analyst must be proficient with SAP reporting tools and willing to keep up with industry trends for continuous improvement.

Position Requirements:
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
• Define reporting requirements and analyze data for business intelligence and systems integration.
• Establish enterprise master data requirements and troubleshoot issues with cross-functional teams.
• Consults with users to develop an understanding of business needs and support those needs using application and tools.
• Manage production support activities for all user requests using Exelixis’ ticketing system.
• Utilizes Exelixis IT department policies, methodologies, standards and guidelines with regard to systems development and/or software package selection.
• Manages business and technical subject matter experts to implement and maintain systems.
• Conducts research and analysis into the nature, effect and results of system problems.
• Maintain current and create new system documentation as needed; coordinates with Finance Systems Analyst to perform testing of system modifications.
• Develops or coordinates system training including educational tools and materials.
• Maintains regulated systems and audit IT general controls for compliance (SOX, 21 CFR Part 11).
• Generates and maintains computer system’s validation documentation, if required.
• Project management of system upgrades and implementations.

SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:
• None

EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE/SKILLS:
Education:
• BS/BA degree in Computer Science and/or business-related discipline and seven years of related experience;
• MA/MS degree in Computer Science and/or business-related discipline and five years of related experience;
• Equivalent combination of education ad SAP reporting experience in an active support role.

Experience:
• Financial background is strongly encouraged as this position will need to have a good understanding of financial concepts and reporting requirements.
• Seven years working experience with SAP Analytics Cloud and SAP BW. Experience in report design and analyzing data structures is required.
• S/4 HANA, SAP Analytics for Office and other add-in reporting experience, such as Tableau, is strongly desired.
• Experience authoring and/or executing functional specification documents.
• Experience participating in audits for GxP or SOX compliance preferred
• Experience with GxP Validated Computer Systems is preferred.
• Experience in drug discovery, pharmaceutical or related industry is preferred.

Knowledge/Skills/Abilities:
• Applies solid analytical and business communication skills.
• Strong financial reporting background and knowledge of other related disciplines.
• Identifies and implements methods and procedures to achieve results.
• Ability to lead the work of other by providing guidance to teams based on organizational goals and company policy, with responsibility for results, including costs and methods.
• Complete understanding and wide application of technical principles (SDLC), theories, concepts and techniques.
• Performs a variety of complicated tasks with a wide degree of creativity and latitude.

JOB COMPLEXITY:
• Works on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of various factors.
• Exercises judgment within broadly defined practices and policies in selecting methods, techniques and evaluation of criteria for obtaining results.
• Uses professional concepts and company policies and procedures to solve a wide range of difficult problems in imaginative and practical ways.
• Networks with key contacts outside own area of expertise.

DISCLAIMER
The preceding job description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required of employees assigned to the job.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.2,"Exelixis
3.2","Alameda, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
177,Data Integration Analyst,-1,"About Us


Riskified is the AI platform powering the eCommerce revolution. We use cutting-edge technology, machine-learning algorithms, and behavioral analytics to identify legitimate customers and keep them moving toward checkout. Merchants use Riskified to increase revenue, prevent fraud, and eliminate customer friction. Riskified has reviewed hundreds of millions of transactions and approved billions of dollars of revenue for merchants across virtually all industries, including a number of Fortune 500 companies.

About the Role


As a Data Integration Analyst at Riskified, you will be using technical skills, analytical insights and business perspective to ensure we have the most accurate and complete data set from each client. You will be responsible for helping new and existing customers to ensure they are receiving the best performance possible and leading the change on processing the data of the largest eCommerce merchants in the world. Riskified's clients come in many different sizes and industries, use different technical platforms, and each one has their own unique data concerns and order flows that have to be uniquely assessed. Our team is the one to fully capture these aspects and recommend the best implementation as well as point out any possible issues.

What You'll Be Doing


Supporting the onboarding of new customers by completing the following:
Working with some of the largest companies in the world to perform comprehensive analysis of their data
Perform due diligence of business models and flows
Data modeling as part of the integration architecture
Combining the technical, business and analytical objectives to come up with tailored solutions for onboarding merchants
Data wrangling & sanitization
Prioritize, track, and communicate data issues internally and externally
Become the subject matter expert of riskified product and technology
Work closely with analysts, research and data science teams to accommodate changes in industry data
Monitoring and resolving data irregularities of existing customers by completing the following:
Monitor key health indicators and automated alerts
Identify, research, and offer system-wide solutions for common issues
Work closely with Account Management to engage customers
Qualifications


Candidates must be eligible to work in the U.S. for other than practical training, without any Visa sponsorship (including OPT Visas)
3+ years of experience in a data-centric industry role (ETL, DBA, etc.)
2+ years with SQL or NoSQL databases
2+ years experience with data wrangling (R, Python for data processing)
2+ years with optimizing technical processes
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Eagerness to learn new technical concepts
Strong analytical skills and attention to detail
Life at Riskified


We are a fast-growing and dynamic startup with 500+ team members between our offices in Tel Aviv and New York City. We value collaboration and innovative thinking. We're looking for bright, driven, and passionate people to grow with us.

Some NYC Benefits & Perks:
Fully-covered medical, dental, and vision insurance from your first day
Stock options for all employees, 401(k) + matching, commuter benefits
Catered lunch, team events, healthy snacks, yoga, pilates, soccer league, and more
In The News


Fortune Magazine: 25 Best Workplaces in New York

Announcing Riskified's $165M Funding Round

Inc Magazine: Best Workplaces

Built In NYC: 100 Best Workplaces

Crain's: Best Places to Work in New York City

TechCrunch: Riskified Prevents Fraud on Your Favorite eCommerce Site

Calcalist: Riskified is the Most Promising Startup in 2019

Riskified is deeply committed to the principle of equal opportunity for all individuals. We do not discriminate based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",4.5,"Riskified
4.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
178,Data Analyst,-1,"Our client, a high-growth investment management company located Downtown Chicago, is looking to add a Data Analyst to their team! The company has more than doubled their asset portfolio in less than 2 years due to acquisitions. This is a newly-created role due to the rapid growth!

They utilized data from proprietary sources that is both structured and unstructured. The Data Analyst will work closely with the technologists and data scientists and be responsible for the day to day data management operations of the firm.

Job Description:
Sourcing and management of data sets to support strategy and segmentation function.
Segmentation, ad hoc analytics, and test design to support decisioning within collections and recovery.
Support through interpretation of monthly performance results across collections portfolios including shifts in customer risk profile as well as strategy performance.
Drive profitability assessment of strategies through risk / return analysis using financial modelling.
The ideal candidate will have:
Bachelors Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Computer Science, Economics, Finance, or other quantitative fields.
Masters Degree preferred
Financial services experience preferred
2+ years of experience in analytics (ideally scorecard development / monitoring, customer segmentation, strategy development in Credit Risk, Marketing or Collection). Graduate Degree with 1+ years of experience will also be considered.
Working knowledge of SQL
Proficiency in scripting languages R, Python, etc
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Management: 2 years (Preferred)
Data Warehouse: 2 years (Preferred)
Data Mining: 2 years (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,International Financial Group (IFG),"Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
179,Market Data Analyst Team Lead,"$39k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","[Job purpose]

KT&G USA is headquartered in Plano, Texas. We currently ship our products to 45+ States through 550+ distributor partners and are ranked as the 5th largest tobacco manufacturer in the U.S.A. We stand behind our products, value our people and strive to offer all our customers and business partners, best in class service.

[Duties and responsibilities]

The Lead of Market Data Analysis Team will work within the Marketing department at KT&G USA headquarters in Plano, TX. Reporting directly to the Marketing director. The position will focus on managing all sorts of sales and marketing-related data and generate reports in a timely manner from a variety of data sources such as MSAi, GW-MIS, Salesforce, Maps & Track and so on.

We are currently seeking a talented Market Data Analysis Team Lead to support our organization with data analyzing function.

The function includes business intelligence and operational reporting and analytics solutions that drive achievement of business goals, process improvement and control initiatives. The candidate must have a strategic thought process in leading development of business intelligence and data solutions to solve complex business problems. An ideal candidate would also have progressive advancement in leadership and proven track record of data-related projects that have resulted in improved performance, controls, and profitability.

This position will serve as a primary contact for the various lines of business for the workflow management and document retention system managed by Information Technology.

Analyze complex business problems and issues using data from internal and external sources to provide insight to analysts and decision makers.
Identify and interpret trends and patterns in datasets to locate influences
Create specifications for reports and analysis based on business needs and required or available data elements
Conduct evaluations, designs systems and procedures, conduct work simplifications and measurement studies, and prepare operations and procedures manuals to assist management in operating more efficiently and effectively
Participate in consultation to users and in cross functional teams to address business issue
Prototype solutions for displaying information based on business needs
Utilize an intermediate understanding of multiple data structures and sources to lead the development and implementation of business intelligence solutions, which may include data visualization, data transformation, or data collection.
Apply data visualization best practices - often selecting the right data tool for the job - to identify and interpret trends or patterns while following standard Enterprise branding
Understand what data says to be able to draw conclusions from it will be reporting on statistics and metrics
Maintain and change business processes and understands the business processes of assigned partners and how they relate to our functional areas
Develop and recommend changes to business processes.
Build, develop, and maintain data models, reporting systems, data automation systems, dashboards and performance metrics support that support key business decisions.
Ensure accuracy of data and deliverables of reporting employees with comprehensive policies and processes.
Lead cross-functional projects using advanced data modeling and analysis techniques to discover insights that will guide strategic decisions and uncover optimization opportunities.
Work with executives and other business leaders to identify opportunities for improvement.
Create reports for internal team and other departments and/or external requests.
Use graphs, tables, and other methods to visualize data and/or information.
Structure large data sets to find usable information.
Create presentations and reports based on facts, recommendations, and findings.
Prepare for training or explanation materials for employees, users of data, executives or related persons.
Collect business data and sales information from various internal sources, analyze them regularly or occasionally at the request of the management or related departments in a timely manner.
Oversee the design and delivery of reports and insights that analyze business functions and key operations and performance metrics.
Manage and optimize processes for data intake, validation, mining, and engineering as well as modeling, visualization, and communication deliverables.
Oversee the data/report requests process: tracking requests submitted, prioritization, approval, etc.
Keep safely all the business data, information, reports, and files in accordance with internal policies or instructions.
Manage confidentiality of all the data and control security access to data by setting up data access level according to internal hierarchy.
Develop and implements quality controls and departmental standards to ensure quality standards, organizational expectations, and regulatory requirements.
Be responsible for team projects, leads the team, support subordinates, evaluates team staff’s performance.
Anticipate future demands of initiatives related to people, technology, budget and business within your department and design/implement solutions to meet these needs.
Examine, interpret, and report results of analytical initiatives to stakeholders in leadership, technology, sales, marketing, and related teams.
Organize and drive successful completion of data insight initiatives through effective management of analyst and data employees and effective collaboration with stakeholders.
Recruit, train, develop, and supervise analyst-level employees.
Establish KPIs to measure the effectiveness of business decisions.
Collaborate with team and other colleagues of other departments, works with other staff to process information.
Design and build technical processes to address business issues.
Communicate results and business impacts of insight initiatives to stakeholders within and outside of the company.
Communicate clearly with user of data in the company.
Other Duties as assigned

[Sales Strategy & Planning management]

Sales goal setting (annual, semi-annual, quarterly, monthly) and monitor progress
Monitor wholesaler's PSI trend, suggest appropriate strategy/promotion idea
Forecast competitor price increase
Merge internal and external data (MIS, MSAi, ArcGIS) find opportunity and risk
Market Intelligence & Data Project management
Implement and manage all sorts of data projects (T.I.S.R. etc.)
Analyze industry trends, market segments and total available market
Evaluate market opportunity and penetration
Monitor the competition (marketing share/price/channel coverage etc.)
Create potential wholesaler list through market sources (Nielson, Retail, existing W/S, regional union etc.)
Wholesaler inventory status analysis
Retail List update/distributing
Monitor Periodic Price Increase factors (tax increase/international currency/distribution margin etc.) & utilize local resource (Legal Firm, Consulting Firm) if necessary
Collect competitor's promotion & activity (Competitor status analysis)
Establish price research plan

[Sales Analysis]

Develop and maintain daily, weekly, monthly, and ad hoc reporting tools.
New Wholesalers update and oversee repeat order
Analysis promotion effectiveness and seasonality
Demand planning based on sales forecast

[Qualifications]

Highly detail oriented
Able to interpret the data generated and present the findings in a concise manner.
Expert in MS Office, particularly must be proficient in Excel, VBA/macros, Power Point
Prior experience using Sales Force or other CRM platforms
Previous experience in a marketing-related role or job position
Experience developing business deliverables that leverage business intelligence platforms, data management platforms, or SQL-based languages
Demonstrated ability to embed intuitive story telling within business intelligence solutions.
Demonstrated advanced communication skills with the ability to deliver presentations to all levels of management.
Needs to be able to show critical thinking
Fast learning capacity and ability to work in a fast-paced development environment
Experience identifying and implementing innovative approaches to address business problems and solutions.
Well understood for KT&G USA sales strategy, especially marketing promotion system
Self-motivated with ability to work with minimal direction to prioritize and execute tasks.
Ability to sit for extended periods of time in front of a computer screen
Salesforce Admin experience preferred.

Education

Bachelor’s degree (preferred) or equivalent experience

Benefits

Enjoy a competitive salary commensurate with the experience and responsibility requirements. Excellent employee environment with a competitive benefits package including:

Annual Merit Increase
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid Time Off",2.5,"KT&G USA Corporation
2.5","Plano, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
180,Operations Strategic Data Analyst - Healthcare,"$54k-$92k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Operations Strategic Data Analyst embraces complex, disparate data sets and leading technologies – including Amazon Web Services, Redshift, Alteryx, and Tableau – to design data models, craft scoring methodologies and develop algorithms that inform the leaders of our business on our performance. This individual will be working directly on Healthfirst strategic initiatives to identify solutions that have visibility at the highest levels of the company.

Duties & Responsibilities:

Operate with intellectual curiosity and critically assess existing processes and procedures to identify opportunities for improvement
Develop complex analyses requiring the integration of multiple data sources, evaluation of data quality, and standardization of data to consistent format/structure
Create advanced queries and reports that extract data to support business teams’ needs, including working with nesting tables and temp tables and writing multiple conditions against varying data sets)
Summarize and present data outcomes, recommendations, and methodology to analytics leadership, department leadership, and enterprise stakeholders
Learn, adopt and leverage leading analytical tools and technologies to further the maturity of departmental analytics at-large which may include the development of procedures in Amazon Redshift, workflows in Alteryx, or other solutions as required
Hold oneself accountable for the accuracy, completeness, quality, and relevance of deliverables in order to own responsibility for work product and consider these factors in the end-to-end analytical process, from data gathering to analysis to formatting and presentation
Employ best practices in documentation, coding style and comments to facilitate persistence, re-usability, and scalability of your solutions
Document and escalate data issues as appropriate
Exhibit collaborative attitude, willingness to work with others on data projects that included working team(s) made of cross departmental/interdisciplinary users
Additional duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution or equivalent relevant work experience
Working experience exhibiting strong critical thinking and analytical skills
Advanced MS Excel skills that include creating pivot tables, macros, utilizing v/h lookups and/or VBA
Familiarity with writing SQL (and/or SAS) queries for analyzing data and establishing business rules and requirements
Familiarity with relational database structures, theories, principles and practices
Familiarity with data models and/or data modelling
Ability to understand the data life-cycle within the organization and its impact on the business
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment
Ability to communicate effectively verbally and in writing while demonstrating good grammar, spelling and punctuation skills
Work experience requiring meticulous attention to detail

Preferred Qualifications:

Degree in Mathematics, Computer Science, Data Sciences, Engineering, Business Analytics, Informatics, or similar concentration
Experience working with SQL in a professional environment
Experience with Alteryx, Tableau, Amazon Redshift, QlikView, or other similar tools/platforms
Familiarity with statistical principles, such as standard deviations, normal distributions, and regressions
Familiarity with Python and/or R
Familiarity with healthcare data
Balances working independently with an understanding of when to escalate with questions/issues
Ability to work effectively with both business and technical stakeholders

Compliance & Regulatory Responsibilities: N/A

License/Certification: N/A

WE ARE AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER. Applicants and employees are considered for positions and are evaluated without regard to mental or physical disability, race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, genetic information, military or veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status or any other protected Federal, State/Province or Local status unrelated to the performance of the work involved.

If you have a disability under the Americans with Disability Act or a similar law, and want a reasonable accommodation to assist with your job search or application for employment, please contact us by sending an email to careers@Healthfirst.org or calling 212-519-1798 . In your email please include a description of the accommodation you are requesting and a description of the position for which you are applying. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a position within Healthfirst Management Services will be reviewed at the e-mail address and phone number supplied. Thank you for considering a career with Healthfirst Management Services.

EEO Law Poster and Supplement",3.2,"Healthfirst
3.2","Lake Mary, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
181,Product Data Analyst - Identity Verification,"$55k-$102k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Remitly, we help immigrant communities around the world send $6 billion a year to their loved ones. Sending money is faster, easier, and costs less with our all-digital money transfer platform. We want to transform the lives of immigrants and their families by providing the most trusted financial service products on the planet. At Remitly, your work has a direct and positive impact on people around the globe. Your work matters, every day.

The Role:

The Identity Verification Program is a component of Remitly's AML Compliance Program. Anything less than an exceptional product experience for Identity Verification can be a barrier for our customers. As a Product Analyst on this team, you will work with product managers, engineers, and UX designers to help us develop instant verification experiences that strengthen our relationships with our customers so they can send what they need safely, securely and quickly. The quantitative insights you bring will have an out-sized impact on our customers. You will report directly to our Director of Product Analytics.

What You'll Do:
You will develop an understanding of the customer experience and bring it to life in a visual way.
You will uncover customers insights in our compliance experience, with the goal of increasing customer trust through recommendations on the product roadmap.
You ask, ""Why?"" and question the status quo. You view unexpected data results as a puzzle to be solved, a challenge that you accept.
You can explain the methods behind your analyses and validate your results. Once you have data to support your ideas, you're willing to advocate for and move your recommendations forward.
Who You Are:
Bachelor's degree in a technical, business, or quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or related field).
Minimum three years of relevant experience in a product or customer analytics role.
Experience designing and analyzing A/B experiments and are comfortable with basic statistical techniques
Experience working at startups or large consumer internet/technology companies
Experience with technical skills (e.g. SQL, R, Python) and data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau)
Who we are:

Remitly is a group of passionate people working to make international payments easier and more transparent on both the web and mobile devices. We are seeking team members to join us that want to make a difference and change an industry. We pride ourselves on aiming high and delivering results, data being at the heart of everything we do, and encouraging our team to own business decisions and outcomes. Sound like the place for you? Join us.

Our Benefits:
Unlimited paid time off
Health, dental, and vision benefits + 401k plan with company matching
Company contributions to your HSA or FSA plan, if you choose one
Continuing education and corridor travel benefits
Scholars program
Remitly is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Equal employment opportunity has been, and will continue to be, a fundamental principle at Remitly. We are committed to nondiscrimination across our global organization and in all of our business operations. Employment is determined based upon personal capabilities and qualifications without discrimination on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex, gender identification and expression, marital status, military status or status as an honorably discharge/veteran, pregnancy (including a woman's potential to get pregnant, pregnancy-related conditions, and childbearing), sexual orientation, age (40 and over), national origin, ancestry, citizenship or immigration status, physical, mental, or sensory disability (including the use of a trained dog guide or service animal), HIV/AIDS or hepatitis C status, genetic information, status as an actual or perceived victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or any other protected class as established by law.

Remitly is an E-Verify Employer",4.4,"Remitly
4.4","Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
182,Data Analyst,"$45k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position: *Data Analyst *

Location: *Austin, TX *
Position Summary: * The Data Analyst will utilize 5+ years mortgage servicing experience along with 3+ years’ MSP experience to assist business users daily to create and understand our customers need for data. The role will work closely with customers, team members, and management to gather and translate business requirements into to technical table requirements. Requirement documents will be used by developers and/or data engineers for table creation and ETL development.
Responsibilities**: *
· Translate business requirements into technical documentation by collaborating with management and/or business users

· Manage and update new and outstanding table request tickets, master table inventory, lookup tables, and data dictionaries

· Understand and communicate the

· Help identify keys, constraints, indexes, data dictionaries, raw data files and create table requirements document

· Test tables prior to release to production including but not limited to data analysis, validation, and balancing

· Act as first responder and point of contact for any table outages both internally and externally along with documenting each occurrence

· Create and execute resolution plans for table outages such as updating or creating new balancing processes to mitigate future issues

· Research issues with existing data tables through data analysis, data mapping, validation, and balancing efforts

· Participate in meetings with team members or business users to document prioritization of table requests

· Review processes and procedures and recommend improvements to management and other departments within the company to increase productivity and quality

· Assist with creating procedures and documentation of processes
Desired Competencies**: *
5+ years demonstrated experience in the Mortgage Servicing industry, developing and implementing technology solutions and performing process redesign and workflow analysis, defining and documenting business requirements, systems support, systems administration.
3+ years’ experience with Black Knight’s business environment and the Mortgage Servicing Platform (MSP) application development environment
Experience or familiarity with Microsoft SQL, Access databases, ETL, and VBA a plus
Experience with relational databases, diagrams, data dictionaries a must
Strong prioritization and organizational skills, including the ability to maintain several concurrent activities while managing user expectations
Able to work independently
Excellent verbal and written communication with ability to adjust according to audience
Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced environment without daily oversight
BKFS Passport experience a plus
Desired Education/Experience**: *The ideal candidate should be a highly successful mortgage servicing professional with at least 3 years of experience in the Mortgage Technology or Servicing Sector. The candidate should bring the following:
Bachelor's Degree in Business, Computer Science, or related fields or comparable experience and training
Current or prior experience documenting requirements, procedures, or policies
Work Authorization**: * Must be able to verify identity and employment eligibility to work in the U.S.
Other Duties**: *This job profile is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of job duties and responsibilities, as one may perform additional related duties as assigned in order to meet the needs of the organization.
Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Must be able to lift to ten pounds. Primary functions require sufficient physical ability and mobility to work in an office setting; to stand or sit for prolonged periods of time; to occasionally stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, reach, and twist; to lift, carry, push, and/or pull light to moderate amounts of weight; to operate office equipment requiring repetitive hand movement and fine coordination including use of a keyboard; and to verbally communicate to exchange information. VISION: See in the normal visual range with or without correction. HEARING: Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.

[EOE/M/F/D/V. Drug-free workplace.]

#Ll-RM1

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Ability to Commute/Relocate:
Austin, TX 78717 (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
SQL: 1 year (Required)
Mortgage servicing industry: 5 years (Required)
Black Knights business environment: 3 years (Required)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment
Work Remotely:
No",3.5,"New American Funding
3.5","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
183,Data Analyst,"$47k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As a Data Analyst, you’ll be responsible for accurate reporting and advanced analytics of Patient & Provider data out of enterprise solutions for state and federal government, private healthcare systems, and health information exchanges.

We are a highly motivated small team and need someone who can complement our entrepreneurial spirit. We would need someone who is also a self-starter and can work independently to produce high quality work.
What you’ll do:
Detailed Analysis & Profiling of Patient & Provider data to generate insights, and KPIs
Build SQL tables, metrics, reports, and dashboards that help us understand the health of Patient & Provider data in MDM, and other applications
Identify patterns of data in MDM (like Twins, Recently Married, Father-Son etc.)
Monitor and maintain data quality, stability, and trustworthiness of reports
Conduct exploratory analyses of Patient & Provider data for improvement opportunities in applications, not actively monitored by stakeholders
Communicate the interesting and hard-to-find insights into a compelling, concise data story to engineering, product and executive team
Manage multiple job duties through efficient task management
What you’ll need:
4+ years working experience performing data analysis against multiple data sources
Experience working with Python or R for conducting advanced data analysis
Experience working with analytics tools such as Tableau
Database experience in at least one RDBMS
A track record of conducting high impact analyses and building useful data tools with demonstrable business results
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering, or related field
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills (written and verbal)
Preferred skills & experience:
Experience in analysis of patient & provider Master/Identity data (False Positives, False Negatives, Probabilistic Matching)
AHIMA RHIA or RHIT certification preferred
Experience in a healthcare preferred
Experience with IBM Infosphere Master Data Management Standard Edition (or Initiate)
Database experience in Oracle, DB2 and Microsoft SQL Server
Experience using Linux
Experience doing data analysis by using AWS services
Familiarity with HL7 messaging standard (version 2.x and CDA) & IHE profiles (PIX, PDQ, & XCPD)
Experience with ETL products
What Makes You a Great Fit for Audacious Inquiry:
You are a lifelong learner and passionate about learning new things, taking on new challenges, and continually improving.
You thrive in a challenging and collaborative environment.
You are solution-driven with an ability to understand the big picture
You have great analytical and problem-solving skills.
You have strong communication skills and an ability to synthesize information.
Highly organized, detail oriented, and able to work autonomously with minimal direction.
What Audacious Inquiry Offers:
Working with and learning from the top talent in the healthcare IT industry in the US – we are thought leaders in health information technology and policy. Our team is passionate about making healthcare more connected and we love to share our knowledge and learn from each other.
Making a real difference in the healthcare industry on a large scale and improving healthcare outcomes for individual patients – you’ll get to work on really cool projects and feel good about the work you’re doing. Check out the case studies on our website for examples!
Performance bonuses – we ask for high performance from our team and we make sure to recognize and reward high performance with competitive compensation and annual bonuses.
Growth and professional development – we’re invested in every Ai team member and we encourage our team to pursue opportunities to grow their skills, and make sure you have a path for growth at Ai that you’re excited about.
Benefits and perks – we cover the full cost of health insurance for employees and most of the cost for dependents, along with a full suite of benefits, including 401k matching, monthly wellness bonuses, cell phone reimbursement, paid time off, and a lot more.
Our culture – this is one of the best things about working with Audacious Inquiry, and one of the things we’re most proud of. We’re inclusive, we’re collaborative, we’re supportive, and it’s fun here! Check out our careers page and our social media for some recent examples.

The Data Analyst position may include access to protected health information (PHI) and confidential information. The successful candidate will be required to complete training and must handle all PHI appropriately according to Ai policies, and all applicable laws and regulations.

Ai is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer.
Audacious Inquiry is deeply committed to the principles of equity, diversity, and inclusiveness. We seek to create a pluralistic community for all team members, and we are proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity employer. We encourage all people to apply.",4.4,"Audacious Inquiry
4.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
184,Data Conversion Systems Analyst,-1,"Fidelity TalentSource is your destination for discovering your next temporary role at Fidelity Investments. We are currently sourcing for a Data Conversion Systems Analyst to work in Fidelity’s Workplace Investing Group in Smithfield, RI.

Position Description

The Data Conversion Systems Analyst is tasked with supporting data conversion solutions by improving the conversion process in partnership with internal IT and external business partners. The Systems Analyst is the primary advocate and liaison for the on-shore and off-shore developers for who they support during the conversion process. The Analyst will primarily be supporting data conversions under mentorship of Senior Associates; however will be 100% accountable for their work.

This resource will be supporting the conversion of retirement, 401(k) and define contribution funds and participants from clients to our platform, which means there will be a high level of scrutiny and pressure. The candidate will be working with resources which include business-facing teams, other systems analysts, as well as on-shore and off-shore developers – and therefore must be a phenomenal teammate able to work with a variety of organizations.

The Data Conversion Systems Analyst is responsible for the receipt of inbound data records, the creation of the technical conversion specifications to “map” these external records to the internal Fidelity specs, participate in the creation of the conversion strategy document by providing technical details to augment the business requirements, offer mentorship and support when it comes to the accurate creation and loading of the data to our systems and provide systems support to the project team. Works on multiple projects concurrently and contributes to timely and on-budget project goals.

Responsibilities:

Architecture

Aligns with data conversion and implementation standards.
Understands data conversion standard methodologies.
Develops original and creative solutions to on-going data conversion efforts.
Analyze client/vendor source data.
Design
Performs independent and complex functional data analysis for multiple projects supporting several data conversions at one time.
Designs/improves conversion technical specifications (known as the Data Element Listing) to support the data conversion effort. Documents detailed instructions for data conversion.
Performs functional analysis for projects to support the creation of other project documentation (such as the Conversion Strategy Document).
Participates in data conversion design and accuracy review.
Development / Execution
Plans and coordinates project schedules and coordinates with senior associates, external vendors and internal contacts for project assignments.
Receives data from external record keepers and posts those records to the mainframe environment for programmer use.
Reviews external records for file layout consistency, adjusting requirements where needed.
Interacts with external record keepers to understand and decipher file layouts in order to convert them to Fidelity layouts.
Establishes partnerships across multiple businesses and functions.
Testing
Performs conversion testing by reviewing conversion reports.
Supports conversion testing corrections for any conversion problems.
Assists in the planning and conducting of client/user review of conversion results (reports and implementation of corrections)
Supports and performs all phases of testing leading to the data conversion of implementation
Deployment
Responsible for supporting implementation of moderate-scope to major data conversions.
Responsible for post-installation testing and correction of any conversion problems.
Documentation
Develops comprehensive documentation for all data conversions
Responsible for post-installation testing correction of any conversion problems.
Assists data conversion team working with associates across various functions.
Raises data conversion project issues to senior associates and managers.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree preferred.
2+ year’s experience - demonstrable understanding of the data conversion implementation processes including analysis, design, problem resolution and planning.
Experience in Financial Services, Banking, 401(k), Define Contribution, Mixed Election, Retirement funds is highly preferred.
Solid grasp of Investment industry is needed.
Must be a “specialist” in Microsoft Excel, with a solid grasp of Microsoft Word and Microsoft Access.
Experience in data transmission protocols (such as SFPT, TSO, etc) is highly preferred.

Company Overview

Fidelity TalentSource, formerly Veritude, is the in-house temporary staffing provider for Fidelity Investments, one of the largest and most diversified global financial services firms in the industry. We recruit individuals from a variety of backgrounds, including technology and customer service, to fill assignments across Fidelity’s U.S.-based regional and investor center locations. If you would like to experience Fidelity’s diverse and inclusive workplace while expanding your skill set and developing your professional network, consider a role with Fidelity TalentSource. For information about working at Fidelity TalentSource, visit FTSJobs.com.

Information about Fidelity Investments

At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and nurturing a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates. We are proud of our diverse and inclusive workplace where we respect and value our associates for their unique perspectives and experiences. For information about working at Fidelity, visit FidelityCareers.com.

Fidelity Investments and Fidelity TalentSource are equal opportunity employers.",3.9,"Fidelity TalentSource
3.9","Smithfield, RI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
185,Data Quality Control Analyst,-1,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Quality Control Analysts to work on customization and optimization of Publicly Available Information (PAI) data ingestion. The analyst will work closely with technical teams to execute on client expectations concerning evolving technical requirements, breadth and depth of collection, and accuracy of content. The selected candidates will perform testing on collected media content that has been processed using natural language processing and machine learning to provide feedback to the Machine Learning Team. In addition, they will coordinate and customize human analyst workflow.

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree required
Strong quantitative reasoning and writing skills are a must as well as the ability to work well with teams or individually with minimal supervision
Technical proficiency with web-based applications
Apply filters and parse data sets
Demonstrated competency analyzing geopolitical affairs and world event
Conduct quality control analysis of geopolitical content and provide feedback to technical development team
Desired Skills:
Prior experience utilizing traditional intelligence collection and analysis tools
Prior experience conducting manual testing on intelligence related products
Experience integrating multiple data sources to produce analytics and reports
Capability to apply principles of data science and data management to identify trends and patterns in unstructured news media content
Academic-quality research and writing skills
Capability to rapidly master and apply specialized software suites to daily workflow
Foreign language proficiency (Russian, Mandarin, or Farsi) preferred
Security Clearance:
Candidates must be eligible for a security clearance, ACTIVE Secret clearance is preferred.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
186,"Analyst, Data Science, Solaria Labs","$53k-$94k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Advance your career at Liberty Mutual - A Fortune 100 Company! The economy is transforming, and to adapt, Liberty Mutual has established Solaria Labs (https://www.solarialabs.com): a global team that builds disruptive new products around emerging consumer trends like micro-mobility and the sharing economy. We have already launched a few products and one company since we started — for examples, see https://www.getcertainly.com, https://www.trydwellbeing.com/, and https://www.totalhomescore.com.

THE ROLE

As a Data Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer in Solaria Labs, you will be part of a team working on most challenging Data Science and Machine Learning problems from computer vision to natural language understanding

Responsibilities Include

Translate product ideas into well-posed data science challenges, and solve them
Design, develop, and deploy Machine Learning (ML) systems backing our products, including computer vision, NLP, and others
Translate and champion our ML capabilities for non-technical audiences
Participate in the broader ML community to stay current with the latest techniques and software

The actual internal level/grade for this role will depend on the candidate’s overall experience and skill level.

Qualifications:
Competencies typically acquired through a Master’s degree (in Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, or other scientific field of study) and 0-1 years of experience, or may be acquired through a Bachelor’s degree (scientific field of study) and 3+ years of relevant experience

Experience analyzing data and a broad understanding of core statistical and ML techniques

Expertise with Python, along with standard machine learning libraries

Proven track record of rapid prototyping and development, leveraging open source or commercial frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Hadoop, AWS) is a plus

Ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment with significant uncertainty

Possession of strong analytical, decision-making and problem-solving skills

Benefits:

We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/BenefitsOverview:At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
187,Data Analyst/ Senior Data Analyst,-1,"You will be a crucial member of the team tasked with capturing data workflows and use cases across EQRx and turn them into reproducible, democratizable tools on a modern data tech stack, enabling faster and more successful drug development. You will map how data is used to understand the complex web of interrelationships in taking drugs from a pharmaceutical company to a patient. You will translate and harden these workflows to a modern data tech stack in collaboration with data scientists and engineers.
You will understand how clinical scientists and staff capture, maintain, and use data and use these insights to organize data across EHR (Electronic Health Record), clinical trial, and other data sources. You will integrate data across sources and use cases (e.g. pricing, claims, and clinical) to enable end users to see across EQRx’s data asset to improve our program design, operations, opportunity targeting, pricing, and access. You will assist in building a digital-native life sciences company, identifying and prioritizing areas to pursue, where data tools could inform decision making throughout EQRx.
The Impact You'll Have
You will enable experts across EQRx to look across datasets to identify key opportunities to dramatically reduce prices and expand access to novel drugs, connecting information across market data, patient claims and adherence, and clinical datasets to enable experts to pinpoint the most salient opportunities for developing novel, more accessible medicines. This person will speed the development and trialing of novel medicines by bringing a digital and data native technology stack to drug development, powering a modern, and radically new paradigm in drug development.
Your Superpowers
You have a Bachelors or Masters degree in a quantitative scientific, or social scientific field, e.g. biology, engineering, economics, etc.
You have 3+ years of experience in industry (Life sciences/healthcare background a major plus).
You are skilled at building insightful visualizations in a modern dashboarding tool (e.g. Mode, Looker, Spotfire); experience with D3.js a plus.
You are fluent in SQL and comfortable in a scripting language such as python.
You have worked with modern cloud data warehousing tools (e.g. BigQuery, Snowflake) and ETL tools (e.g. Stitch, Fivetran, DBT).
You are an excellent communicator, empathetic with end users and internal customers. You can translate a problem from a description of a business process to organization of data and pipelines.
You have a quick, flexible mind; always looking for clever ways to connect data and transform processes to a modern, digital and data native architecture.
You possess strong communication, organizational and presentation skills.
You can participate and work effectively on multiple cross-functional teams.
You play well in the sandbox. You understand relationships are key and have strong interpersonal skills.
Teams love working with you and learning from you.
You can thrive in a smaller company environment and love the pace of a true startup.
You’re a team player who is willing to roll-up your sleeves and get the job done.
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,"EQRx
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
188,Intern - Information Analyst/Engineer - Big Data,-1,"Intern - Information Analyst/Engineer - Big Data

Summer 2021 Paid Internship

Zions
Bancorporation’s Enterprise Technology and Operations (ETO) team is
transforming what it means to work for a financial institution. We operate in a
fast-paced, information-driven environment, which means we need people who
bring diverse experiences, perspectives, and expertise to meet the
ever-changing demands of a technology-driven world. We are grounded in the
belief that “improving the work is the work” as we drive to create simple,
easy, and fast solutions for our customers. Your ability to adapt, learn, and
innovate helps increase revenue, reduce operational costs, and mitigates risk.

ETO provides
opportunities for you to own your career growth through Diversity, Equity, and
Inclusion, Women in Technology, and Workforce of the Future initiatives that
allow you to network across the organization, volunteer in our community, and
build your technical and soft skills. Together we are building a culture that
values diversity and creates a space of belonging for all our team members. We
believe that investing in your success is an investment in our customers and
our business. Our people are what sets us apart and make us great.

As an Information
Analyst/Engineer, you
will help Enterprise Data & Analytics team to acquire data from operational
systems and position it to support analytics and reporting. You are expected to
learn banking processes to help convert data into meaningful insights in
partnership with the Operational Analysts and our team.
Things you do:
Work within a SAFe Agile team to
develop, build and maintain a Continuous Delivery Pipeline that delivers
new functionality to users
Analyze, map, and integrate system
data into operational data stores, an integrated data warehouse or big
data platform to meet reporting and analytical business needs
Extensive data profiling on the
existing source and integrated data to ensure thorough understanding of
the business needs and the current platforms
Test and validate data attributes
based both on source data and results from other systems to assure the
data accurately reflects the source system and business needs
Work with source system Operational
Analysts to understand system nuances and resolve issues
Work with reporting teams to
explain the data to report writers and communicate the scope and impact of
changes
Take ownership of the SDLC process
and manage work quality and quantity through frequent releases, closely
coordinating with data engineers, modelers, product owners, and other
information analysts
Active participation in the product
teams’ agile ceremonies which facilitate a close-knit team environment and
high productivity
Create and maintain clear,
detailed, and accurate metadata documentation and knowledge transfer
material
Lead small projects and teams to
develop solutions for our customers working with the modeling and
architecture team and business analysts across multiple departments
Handle other duties as assigned
Qualifications

Must
be working toward Bachelor's (taking upper division courses) or Master’s degree
in Finance, IT, or Analytics related degrees
Strong
analytical, organizational and problem-solving skills
Skilled
in programming and scripting languages (SQL, Python, DataStage, or other ETL
tools…)
Strong
testing skills (ideally experience with Azure DevOps)
Experience
using SDLC process
Ability
to estimate scope and schedule required and commit to deadlines
Effective
presentation and communication skills interpersonal skills
Ability
to work with management, peers, and technical staff
Ideally
some knowledge of the banking industry, loan and deposit systems, regulatory
reporting requirements, or data warehouse experience
Experience
in business analysis, operations support, software development, project
management, or other directly related experience",3.3,"Zions Bancorporation
3.3","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
189,Senior Data Analyst,"$60k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Known

Known is a modern marketing company engineered for the unprecedented challenges and opportunities facing marketers today. Known pairs PhD data scientists with award-winning creatives, expert research teams and strategists. Known is anchored by two decades of groundbreaking market research and data science capabilities, which uniquely empower our marketing strategy and acclaimed creative groups, who produce some of the most innovative, cutting-edge creative work in culture. The result? Marketing that is predisposed to succeed and be persistently optimized, directly impacting clients' bottom lines. Our clients span the leading brands in finance, technology, media, CPG, real estate and many other categories. Known has over 200 employees in 6 US cities including Seattle, San Francisco, Los Angeles, Austin, Boston and New York. Our teams have won multiple Emmys, Clios, Effies, Cannes Lions Awards and ProMax Agency of the Year three times.

Known's Media Science team uses advanced analytics, machine learning, statistics, and algorithms to plan and optimize advertising dollars. We partner with our clients to translate their business goals into meaningful metrics, and buy media across all channels to drive those target outcomes. We are looking for a Senior Data Analyst to join the team and work alongside other data analysts, data scientists, and software engineers.

The ideal candidate will have:
A BS/BA degree from a well-regarded college or university. STEM degrees are preferred.
2-5 years experience in analytics, advertising, ad tech, or media. Experience utilizing Python (or similar language) and SQL regularly
Proficiency in Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint)
A desire to work on advertising challenges that require flexibility in approach -- everything from on-the-fly analytics to statistics, big data, machine learning, and mathematical algorithms (but not alone!)
A willingness to learn foundational knowledge and skills rapidly
Superb communication and presentation skills
Ability to think strategically, analytically, and proactively about diverse business problems
Passion for managing the quality & accuracy of analytics, including checking your and others' work
Experience multi-tasking in a fast-paced environment is a plus
Experience working directly with clients is a plus
Experience with media buying is a plus
Experience with predictive analytics / data science is a plus
Your responsibilities would include:
Driving performance for our media campaigns and amazing our clients
Day-to-day monitoring, management, optimization, and development of assigned campaigns
Creating and validating data analyses
Building stories and slides for client reports
Developing new approaches (algorithms, models, and automation) to optimize KPIs and improve Known IP
Operating existing software infrastructure to traffic, evaluate performance, and analyze media
Interfacing directly with clients to communicate results",3.5,"Known
3.5","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
190,Senior Data Analyst,"$85k-$115k
(Employer Est.)","About Sysco Labs

Sysco LABS is a technology-focused division within Sysco, dedicated to reimagining foodservice through innovation. An extension of Sysco’s commitment to deliver exceptional products and services to the foodservice industry, Sysco LABS uses customer and market intelligence, data-driven insights and agile technology development to rethink the entire foodservice ecosystem.
Our innovation will improve everything from the ordering process, inventory, pricing and automation to the in-restaurant customer experience. Operating with the mindset of a startup and backed by the authoritative expertise of an industry leader, Sysco LABS’ mission is to improve the Sysco customer experience and consistently deliver cost savings and new innovations through technology.

About the Role

As a Senior Data Analyst at Sysco Labs, you will be responsible for driving strategies and tactics to optimize Sysco products using quantitative data, find answers to broad questions, identify patterns and trends, and make informed decisions to influence product strategy and direction.

Responsibilities
Utilize a combination of exploratory and descriptive analytics to inform product strategy and roadmap, and provide ad-hoc analyses that uncover root cause of recent business trends.
Understand data infrastructure and coordinate with Data Engineering to deliver data models and structures to meet business demands.
Design relevant data models, including outlining dimensions and measures needed, for answering business questions.
Establish and implement product data standards and best practices in order to optimize the data collection, fidelity and accuracy. Develop product measurement plans and dashboards to monitor metrics and KPIs.
Ensure optimization and validations initiatives are implemented, tracked and reviewed postproduction.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools.
Maintain a presence in the broader data and analytics community.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools, such as Tableau and Redash.
Other duties as assigned.
About You

Minimum Qualifications:
6 years’ experience in using data and analytics to drive decisions and insights.
Experience with SQL.
Experience with MixPanel or Google Analytics.
Experience with digital marketing tools such as Google Search Console, Adwords, Marin, Google DoubleClick stack, Tealium, or similar.
Experience with Tableau
Experience with JavaScript tag management.
Experience with Python Analytics/Viz packages.
Experience with R-Studio.
Experience with Data Mining tools such as RapidMiner, Opera, ProM, or similar.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science or related field.
Experience with programmatic media.
Experience with structured and semi-structured data.
Perks at Sysco LABS:
Competitive base & bonus packages
Fun, casual, fast-paced work environment filled with talented colleagues
Brand-new high-tech office space located in the heart of East 6th St, (walking distance to the MetroRail)
Generous PTO policy
Flexible work environment that encourages work/life balance
Fully stocked break room & weekly catered lunch
Excellent medical, dental and vision benefits and company 401(k) program
At Sysco LABS you will be part of a team that values trust, learning, and working together to solve problems. Your efforts will help to build groundbreaking experiences for our customers. Come join us!
We embrace diversity and equal opportunity in a serious way. We are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be.",4.1,"Sysco Labs
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
191,Data Analyst IV (World's Largest Social Media Company!),"$58k-$103k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst IV (5413)

Tailored Management is seeking a Data Analyst to work for our client’s Menlo Park, CA campus on a contract basis. This is an excellent opportunity to join the world’s largest social media network who enables over a billion users to openly connect with friends and family, share content, and explore the world.
Location: Menlo Park, CA (Temporarily Remote Due to COVID-19)*
Contract Length: 6+ Months *
Pay Rate: Based On Experience *
Duties: *
This position is in the Payments Org. The mission of the Payments org is to empower everyone to participate in the digital economy. We are looking for a person who can dive into our payments & operations data, and clearly articulate what is working, and what can be improved. The job is to be the ""data eyes and ears"" guiding product and operations teams.
Skills: *
Good analysis skills.
Proficient in SQL & Excel/Tableau, with good quantitative logic
Ability to work with multiple teams to drive real world impact
Good verbal & written communication
Ability to work in a fast paced environment
Attention to details is a must
Experience working with Payments a plus
Education BA/BS/Masters in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field.

#IND1

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: $58.00 - $78.00 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
Data Analytics: 3 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
Payments: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Application Question:
Are you authorized to work directly for Tailored Management on a W2 status? Please note: We are unable to hire C2C or F1 STEM visas.
Contract Length:
Varies
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.6,"Tailored Management
4.6","Menlo Park, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1965,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
192,Data Analyst - E-Commerce Specialist,"$41k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Description

Lakeshore Learning Materials is one of the most innovative manufacturers of educational materials in the country. Specializing in top-quality products for the home and classroom, we are a thriving multichannel organization with a robust web business, multiple catalogs for early learning and elementary programs, 60 store locations, plus a sales force that is second to none. Thanks to the daily contributions of the amazing people who make up our team, Lakeshore has experienced continuous growth since the day it was founded in 1954.

Job Description

In a year unlike any other, Lakeshore continues to grow! (Don’t be too surprised. Our people are really good at what they do.) To support our ongoing development, we are looking for a highly motivated and experienced Data Analyst specializing in E-Commerce Analytics to join our Analytics team. Reporting to the Analytics Manager, the selected candidate will be responsible for helping Lakeshore meet its objectives to drive the growth and profitability of our business. The selected candidate will also work closely with our E-Commerce and Marketing departments, as well as other strategic business partners, to provide insights and analysis that support both B2B and B2C areas of the business. Successful candidates will have a proven track record of extracting, interpreting, analyzing, and presenting data with a high focus on accuracy and data integrity. They must possess a passion for problem solving and story building to be able to answer business questions and explain what is being told through data. The ideal candidate will be a self-starter with outstanding communication skills, can work autonomously and take initiative to multitask in a fast-paced, highly collaborative environment , and will possess the skills to quickly adapt to evolving priorities. Reach out to us and learn more! This position is based at our Corporate Office located in Carson, CA.

A day in the office looks like this.
• Developing reporting and analysis related to website engagement and behavior, e-mail and other digital marketing strategies, and seasonal campaigns to identify strategic sales and marketing opportunities
• Providing detailed and accurate reporting (weekly, monthly, quarterly, and annually) to E-Commerce and Marketing teams and all other related stakeholders
• Reviewing data sets and reports for accuracy, validity, and data integrity (assisting with the data QA process)
• Extracting, manipulating, loading, analyzing, and presenting data to complete ad hoc reporting requests for E-Commerce, Marketing, and other divisions as needed in a timely manner
• Communicating effectively across all levels of management throughout various departments within the company with excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills
• Displaying a positive, open-minded attitude and can-do outlook in all circumstances while being highly receptive to feedback
• Working independently and as part of a team in a fast-paced environment while handling multiple projects and meeting deadlines, and performing other duties and responsibilities as assigned with exceptional follow-through
• Working flexible hours as needed

Qualifications

Got the skills and experience? Here’s what we’re looking for.
• 2+ years of e-commerce analytics experience
• Strong background with data, analytics, reporting, and marketing with a track record of success
• BA/BS in computer science, math, economics, business or related field a plus
• Expertise with Adobe Analytics (Workspace) and a working knowledge of SQL
• Experience with additional web analytics and business intelligence tools (Salesforce, Adobe Target, QlikView, and Google Analytics) preferred
• Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Excel
• Strong understanding of Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Publisher, PowerPoint, and Outlook)
• Experience utilizing tools like Microsoft Power Query (programming experience a plus)
• Technical capacity and the ability to learn new systems and absorb information quickly
• Ability to set priorities, think critically, and make important decisions independently
• Ability to suggest ways to streamline and improve processes while keeping focus on long-term goals
*Applicants are strongly encouraged to include a cover letter along with their resume and application**
Additional Information

And here’s our end of the bargain!
• Competitive compensation based on skills and experience
• Excellent medical/dental and vision coverage—EPO, PPO and HSA
• 401(k) retirement plan with company contribution (because you will retire someday)
• Flexible benefits—choose what you like, ignore the rest
• Exceptional training and support, and all the resources you need to be successful
• Super-awesome annual profit bonus plan
• On-site preschool for our employees’ children
• On-site employee gym for all levels/fitness needs
• Generous employee discount
• Casual dress…and we really mean it

We know we couldn’t do the extraordinary things we’re doing without the people on our team. Thanks to their passion and enthusiasm, Lakeshore is more than a great place to work—it’s a great experience to be part of. So if you’re a down-to-earth professional who shares our desire for making a difference in the world, we’d love to hear from you.

To learn more about Lakeshore, visit www.lakeshorelearning.com/careers

Equal Employment Opportunity Policy
People are selected to become members of the Lakeshore family based on skill, merit and mind-boggling talent—not based on race, color, creed, sexual orientation, gender or gender identity, marital status, domestic partnership status, military status, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, alienage, AIDS or AIDS-related complex status, genetic information, predisposition or carrier status, status as a victim of domestic violence, physical or mental disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. If things aren’t equal, we all lose. INDRLL2",4.2,"Lakeshore Learning Materials
4.2","Carson, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1954,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
193,Energy Research and Data Analyst,-1,"Company Overview:

Edison Energy, a wholly owned subsidiary of Edison International (NYSE: EIX), provides independent, global advisory solutions to help large corporate, industrial, and institutional clients better understand and navigate the choices and risks of managing energy. Through a portfolio approach, Edison Energy enables decision-makers in organizations to deliver on their strategic, financial and sustainability goals.

Providing a suite of specialized services across sustainability, analytics, renewables, supply, and demand, Edison Energy addresses the three biggest challenges in energy today: cost, carbon, and complex choices.

Position Overview:

This role is an entry-level position within Edison’s Integrated Services team.

The primary goal for the Integrated Services team, which the Energy Research and Data Analyst position reports to, is to gain efficiencies through process development and standardization for client service delivery while maintaining the highest level of accuracy, timeliness and professionalism.

The Energy Research and Data Analyst will help internal and external customers achieve their goals by developing and maintaining custom reporting comprised of accurate and reliable data. This position is also responsible for maintaining various internal and external software programs utilized in data management and reporting.

Primary Responsibilities:

Prepare and develop various customer accounting and management reports (month-end costs, marked-to-market, budget reports, unit cost, volume/spend analyses, etc.)
Thoroughly analyze and validate key customer metrics across multiple data management systems to ensure accuracy and to identify trends and anomalies
Audit invoices against applicable tariff and/or contract terms
Resolve discrepancies directly with vendors and track avoided costs
Process invoices for payment according to customer parameters
Special Projects
Conduct research pertaining to industry, clients, utility tariffs, rate schedules and riders
Support energy managers with complex supply RFP activities
Collaborate with internal teams to serve client needs
Seek operational efficiencies through process development and standardization

Job Requirements:

Previous exposure to the energy industry is preferred, specifically doing data analysis and reporting
Attention to detail
Ability to prioritize multiple responsibilities and deadlines
Customer service, analytical and organizational skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office; particularly Microsoft Excel
Motivated to continually improve processes and tools
Eager to learn
Interpersonal skills with ability to communicate both written and verbally in a professional manner
Aptitude to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and create plan for resolution
Ability to decipher and process data points from multiple channels
Ability to effectively learn and work independently in a remote environment

Education Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree (Business, Finance, Accounting or Engineering preferred)

Work Environment:

Regular professional, office business setting
Noise level ranges from low to moderate (if in office setting)
Noise level ranges from moderate to high (if on construction worksite)

Benefits for Full-Time Employees:

Generous Paid Time Off (includes but not limited to Paid Parental Leave, Bereavement, Jury Duty, Sick, Vacation, etc.)
National Holiday Pay & Float Holidays
401(k) Employer Matching
Health Benefits: Medical, Dental, Vision
Employer 100% Paid Life Insurance Benefits
Employer 100% Paid Short Term and Long Term Disability
Supplemental (Flexible Spending Accounts, Commuter Benefits, Cancer/Critical Care, Hospitalization, Accident)
Recognition of Hard Work and Exemplary Performance
Clean, Air Conditioned, Friendly Working Environment
Discretionary Bonus Based on Several Factors

LOCATION: This position will be located in Dublin, OH.",2.6,"Edison Energy
2.6","Dublin, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
194,PMC: Senior Data Analyst,-1,"PMC: Senior Data Analyst

COVID-19 HIRING UPDATE: We have transitioned to a remote work model and are continuing to hire during this time. This role is expected to begin as a remote position. We appreciate this is unprecedented times and will work closely with you, taking into account your individual circumstances.

PMC is seeking a Senior Data Analyst who will turn data into information, information into insight, and insight into business decisions. This role will support the subscription strategy team and work heavily with paywall and engagement tactics to drive revenue growth. This position can be based in our West LA headquarters or can be remote in the following states: Arizona, California, Colorado, Delaware, Idaho, Illinois, Maine, Massachusetts, Nevada, Oregon, New York, Texas.

Responsibilities
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing visualization and reporting;
Develop and implement data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality;
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems;
Process confidential data and information according to guidelines;
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets;
Filter and clean data to ensure accurate analysis;
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs;
Training end users on new reports and dashboards;
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
Requirements
Work experience as a senior data analyst or in a related field;
Technical expertise regarding data models, data mining and segmentation techniques;
Experience in handling large data sets and relational databases;
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages, SQL databases, programming (python, XML, JavaScript);
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, R or SPSS);
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy;
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings;
Visualization expertise (Looker/Tableau/PowerBI/etc);
Ability to translate business requirements into non-technical, lay terms. High-level written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable presenting analysis.
BS/MS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics a plus.
About PMC:


Penske Media Corporation (PMC) is a leading digital media and information services company whose award-winning content attracts a monthly audience of more than 180 million and empowers more than 1 million global CEOs and business thought-leaders in markets that impact the world. Our dynamic events, data services, and rich content entertain and educate todays fashion, retail, beauty, entertainment and lifestyle sectors. Headquartered in New York and Los Angeles with additional offices in 11 countries worldwide, Penske Media is the way global influencers are informed, connected, and inspired. To learn more about PMC and its iconic brands, visit www.pmc.com.",4.4,"Penske Media Corporation
4.4",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
195,Data Analyst - Appraiser,-1,"Valucentric, an employee-based appraisal firm currently operating in 24 states, has an opening for an experienced Certified Residential Appraiser in our Boston office.

This is a full time position in support of our local TEAM of residential appraisers.

The ideal candidate is a currently a Certified Residential level Appraiser with experience in mortgage related residential appraisals. The ideal candidates enjoy having attained an expert level in UAD compliance, are very familiar with the UCDP data-set grading system, and are adaptable and flexible in the needs of the clients and the TEAM. The Valucentric TEAM works collaboratively in all aspects of the business, a truly futuristic approach in our industry.

If qualified and interested, please submit your resume. Qualified candidates will be contacted quickly as this position needs to be filled as soon as possible.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Professional Development Assistance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Appraisal: 3 years (Required)
License:
Residential or Higher (Required)
Working Days:
Monday (Required)
Tuesday (Required)
Wednesday (Required)
Thursday (Required)
Friday (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment
Company's website:
www.valucentric.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/valucentric/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Valucentric, LLC","Wakefield, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
196,Sr. Data Analyst,"$66k-$114k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Forest Lawn has always attracted unique and exceptional individuals; those who aren’t satisfied with simply building a career, but want to go home at the end of the day knowing they’ve made a profound and positive difference in people’s lives. If this sounds like you, take a look at our job openings....We may have your next GREAT OPPORTUNITY!

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Conducts special studies to analyze complex contract transactions and prepares recommendations for changes to reduce errors or simplify processes.
Identifies trends and recommends improvements accordingly.
Understands and has familiarity with the design of complex contract and accounts receivable software and the ability to quickly learn the design and operation of such systems.
Processes and inputs into computer database complex contract transactions.
Analyzes business process and discrepant data scenarios.
Mines data in contract database using Microsoft Access and Excel and SQL.
Develops and creates studies, reports, and analyses in areas such as, statistical sales reports, transaction exception reports, categorization of transactions by data fields present, etc.
Makes recommendations to management regarding cost saving or profit generating opportunities and profitability improvement strategies.
Prepares clear, concise written reports and presentations using Microsoft Word and PowerPoint.
Coordinates with all levels of management to provide, gather, analyze, summarize, and prepare recommendations regarding Client Accounts functions.
Works independently with minimal supervision as well as in a team environment.
Works closely with the Technology Services development, database and infrastructure team on various projects to gather requirements, document data and workflow requirements, and develop scalable, highly available, and secure automation, data models and reporting packages.
Handles multiple projects with detail and organization.
QUALIFICATIONS
BA/BS – Math, Engineering, Computer Science, Finance, or Accounting preferred;
Exceptional interpersonal and communication skills.
3 - 5 Years’ experience as a Data Analyst.
Proven experience as a problem solver.
Must be customer service oriented.
Must be flexible, proactive, and a self-starter.
Advanced Microsoft Excel, Access and PowerPoint skills
Moderate skills with MS SQL, Python and VBA
Experience in report writing tools
Experience working with Data Models
E-Verify Statement:

Forest Lawn has registered to participate in the federal government's E-Verify program. With E-Verify we are able to confirm the employment authorization of all newly hired employees through an electronic database maintained by the Social Security Administration and Department of Homeland Security. With respect to new hires, the E-Verify process is completed in conjunction with a new hire's completion of the Form I-9, Employment Eligibility Verification upon commencement of employment. E-Verify is not used as a tool to pre-screen candidates.

For up-to-date information on E-Verify, go to https://www.e-verify.gov/employees/e-verify-overview.",3.2,"Forest Lawn Memorial-Park Association
3.2","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1906,Company - Private,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
197,Revenue Data Analyst,-1,"Because you belong at Twilio

The Who, What, Why and Where

Twilio is seeking a Revenue Data Analyst to join our FP&A team. The team is building additional muscle to analyze customer and product usage for our high-growth business. You will play a critical role in analyzing the drivers of revenue performance and uncovering trends that will inform investment strategies and revenue maximizing initiatives. The role will require partnering with sales, marketing, and product teams to understand the data in a complex, usage based business model and share insights. The right candidate has a mix of technical, business, and analytical skills to identify and analyze ambiguous problems in a fast-paced environment.

Who?

Twilio is looking for an individual who lives the Twilio Magic and is excited to bring their data and analytical skills to a collaborative team-based working environment. This is a highly visible role for an enthusiastic analyst looking to take the next step in their career. We seek someone who has:
2+ years of data analysis experience in a professional organization.
Strong analytical skill set; experience in manipulating data sets using SQL, Python, R or other programming/scripting language.
Comfort with statistical concepts and methods for analyzing data.
Intense curiosity about understanding key drivers of a complex business.
Desire to build predictive and other ad-hoc models.
Track record of prioritizing and managing multiple projects and priorities.
Experience working with sales and marketing metrics at a SAAS company desired.
What?

As a Revenue Data Analyst, you will:
BE AN OWNER: Be responsible for understanding the core drivers of revenue. Deep dive into metrics and data to deliver actionable large-scale analyses.
DRAW THE OWL: Build predictive and other ad-hoc models to support business decisions.
BE BOLD: Have strong intellectual curiosity to partner with teams throughout the business to understand the available data and existing models that can be leveraged. Build analyses for understanding customer traffic patterns and churn across products.
EMPOWER OTHERS: Partner with sales and marketing to determine the core levers of our business and to identify revenue maximizing initiatives.
Why?

Twilio is a complex, high-growth, and quickly evolving business. The Finance team is central to Twilio's decision making process and the GTM Finance team guides company investment decisions to maintain Twilio as the platform to fuel the future of communications. As a Revenue Data Analyst, your ability to identify and understand trends, opportunities, and problems--and more importantly, recommend a course of action--will play a critical role in charting Twilio's future.

Twilio is committed to your growth, your learning, your development and your entire employee experience. We only win when our employees succeed and we're dedicated to helping you develop your strengths. We invest in weeks dedicated to tackling hard problems and creating your own ideas. We have a cultural foundation built on diversity, inclusion and innovation and we want you and your ideas to thrive at Twilio. Come join us.

Where?

This position can be located at our Denver or Atlanta offices or remote. Around the world, Twilio offers benefits and perks to support the physical, financial, and emotional well being of you and your loved ones. No matter where you are based, you will experience a company that believes in small teams for maximum impact; seeks well-rounded talent to ensure a full perspective on our customers' experience, understands that this is a marathon, not a sprint; that continuously and purposefully builds an inclusive culture that empowers everyone to do their best work and be the best version of themselves.

About us:

Millions of developers around the world have used Twilio to unlock the magic of communications to improve any human experience. Twilio has democratized communications channels like voice, text, chat, video and email by virtualizing the world's communications infrastructure through APIs that are simple enough for any developer to use, yet robust enough to power the world's most demanding applications. By making communications a part of every software developer's toolkit, Twilio is enabling innovators across every industry — from emerging leaders to the world's largest organizations — to reinvent how companies engage with their customers.",4.0,"Twilio
4.0",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
198,Sr. Staff Data Analyst - Marketing Analytics Manager,"$86k-$154k
(Glassdoor Est.)","WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart + $ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2500 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart + $ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

We are looking for a Senior Staff Analyst/Marketing Analytics Manager who will work closely with our internal and external business partners in developing data-driven solutions for the organization. In this role, you will be involved in analyzing campaign results, validating assumptions and provide recommendation for future campaigns and product offerings. You will also collaborate with team members in assessing and developing new analytic opportunities within the broader analytics organization

THE ROLE:

Conduct large scale analyses, with ownership through all stages: understand business goals and strategies, formulate the analytic approach, perform data extraction, exploration, and transformation, and translate results into actional items for the business team.
Leverage deep hands-on technical skills to produce analyses in various topics including, but not limited to, customer segmentation, campaign performance, marketing attribution and return on investment/ad spend.
Closely work with business partners on Direct Mail (DM) initiatives to ensure successful execution of campaigns.
Analyze DM campaign results to inform future targeting and optimization decisions
Iterate scoring model and perform model validation to be implemented on DM campaigns
Perform data operations necessary to execute campaigns
Develop methodologies to analyze, understand, and quantify trade-offs in marketing decision making
Interact with multiple functional teams across the organization to identify potential issues, implement solutions, improve throughput, and automate recurring processes.
Collaborate with Advanced Analytics, Data Science, and Data Engineering teams to implement predictive models into various stages of marketing funnels, particularly in adapting modern analytics techniques to offline marketing channels such as direct mail and linear television.

REQUIREMENTS/CHARACTERISTICS:

6+ years of hands-on analytic experience in the financial services industry
Hands-on experience in SQL, Python, R, Excel, and Tableau
Experience with data analytics and statistical modeling concepts such as multivariate regression, segmentation modeling, machine learning, data mining, simulation, optimization, and forecasting
Strong understanding on how the data should be captured, stored and structured in data warehousing environment
An effective cross functional communicator in both written and verbal skills
Ability and willingness to learn in a fast-paced environment and adapt to various situation
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Econometrics or equivalent

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.

Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted a Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday

This is your opportunity to be part of a growing company where dedicated professionals strive to help customers and each other succeed every day. If that sounds exciting, we want to talk to you. Apply today!

Attention Agencies & Search Firms: We do not accept unsolicited candidate resumes or profiles. Please do not reach out to anyone within Freedom Financial Network (FFN) to market your services or candidates. All inquiries should be directed to Talent Acquisition only. We reserve the right to hire any candidates sent unsolicited and will not pay any fees without a contract signed by FFN’s Talent Acquisition leader.",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
199,Data Exchange QA Analyst,"$49k-$96k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Summary
The Data Exchange QA Analyst is responsible for testing and ensuring the quality of all mechanisms of the Data Exchange platform. This position participates in all aspects of project testing, business requirements analysis, data analysis, testing strategy, test case creation, test case execution, logging defects, and production of metrics around the status of release testing.
Responsibilities
Review test plans with analysts and business users and participate in pre- and post-testing discussions of objective, scope, and methods. Document and provide sign-off for all changes.
Document any trending and root cause analysis of data quality errors.
Maintain a set of scripted tests and test cases for general regression testing. Create test cases as needed.
Contribute to defect management by clearly identifying and documenting all issues and providing actual test results with root cause analysis of defect issue.
Work with other team members to prepare for testing during the release cycle, as well as the impact to other downstream applications, and create standardized tools to assist users and streamline data organization and analyzation.
Provide support to team members regarding current/correct functionality of the data exchange platform and to identify defects.
Perform general analysis of customer data sets, including census, eligibility, and claims data.
Review and validate application configuration and data mappings during implementation of new customers.
Facilitate cross-functional teams and uses an inclusive approach to understanding current operations.
Perform other duties and responsibilities as required, assigned, or requested.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Computer Science, Mathematics or a related field required; in lieu of a degree, 5+ years of relevant experience in quality assurance, automation, or data analytics may be considered
3 – 5 years of experience in data validation, data quality, or data analysis. Experience specifically with health care data preferred
At least 2 years of experience with SQL queries
Understanding of the operational process flow for the data exchange platform
Ability to produce effective software test plans and test cases
Ability to work with large amounts of data, including checks for integrity
Strong knowledge of SDLC processes, Agile methodology and related tools preferred
Excellent organizational, communication and interpersonal skills
Excellent troubleshooting, analytical, and problem-solving skills
Ability to manage multiple tasks and assignments to meet deadlines
An ability to work effectively with all levels of team members, including both technical and non-technical staff, and both internal and external customers
Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and related tools
About naviHealth
naviHealth is improving the healthcare experience for seniors to live more fulfilling lives. For nearly a decade, naviHealth has been a trusted partner for the nation’s top health plans, health systems, and at-risk physician groups navigating the shift from volume to value. Powered by a predictive technology and decision support platform that provides clinicians and care teams with evidence-based protocols, naviHealth’s high-touch, proven care model fully supports patients from pre-acute through to the home. With naviHealth, patients can enjoy more days at home, and healthcare providers and health plans can significantly reduce costs specific to unnecessary care and readmissions. For more information about naviHealth, visit www.navihealth.com.
Our Purpose
Improving the healthcare experience for seniors to live a more fulfilling life
Our Values
Rooted in respect
Guided by purpose
Devoted to service
Energized by impact
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by colleagues assigned to this job. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive list of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications. naviHealth reserves the right to amend and change responsibilities to meet business and organizational needs as necessary.
naviHealth is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other protected status under applicable laws and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",3.6,"naviHealth, Inc.
3.6","Brentwood, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
200,Sr Data Analyst - Digital,"$80k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

The Data Analyst - Digital role provides a fantastic opportunity to work with a fast-paced and highly functioning Digital Marketing team. This role is responsible for modeling complex Industry problems, discovering Industry insights and identifying opportunities through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques. This role is also proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, architecting specialized database and computing environments, that will integrate with the Adobe Experience Cloud (e.g. Adobe Campaign, Adobe Analytics, Audience Manager etc.) focusing in areas of customer segmentation and analytics. Data Analyst work closely with SMEs, data stewards, project/scrum teams, and other IT teams to turn data into critical information.

They will need to validate their findings using an experimental and iterative approach. Also, the Data Analyst will need to be able to present their findings by exposing their assumptions and validation work in a way that can be easily understood using strong written and communication skills. These professionals will need a combination of business focus, strong analytical and problem-solving skills, and programming knowledge to be able to quickly cycle hypothesis validation.

Responsibilities:

JOB DUTIES

Leads discovery processes with GMF stakeholders to identify the business requirements and the expected outcome
Models and frames business scenarios that are meaningful and which impact on critical business processes and/or decisions
Works with and alongside business SMEs by suggesting other products of interest
Collaborates with Institute subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information
Identifies what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources, leveraging new data collection processes
Makes strategic recommendations on data collection, integration and retention requirements incorporating business requirements and knowledge of best practices
Develops innovative and effective approaches to solve client's analytics problems and communicates results and methodologies
Works in iterative processes with the client and validates findings
Develops experimental design approaches to validate finding or test hypotheses
Validates analysis using scenario modeling
Identifies/creates the appropriate algorithm to discover patterns
Assesses, with the business, opportunities to enhance the qualification and assurance of the information to strengthen the use case
Defines the validity of the information, how long the information is meaningful, and what other information it is related to
Partners with the data SMEs in continuous improvement processes impacting data quality in the context of the specific use case
Recommends ongoing improvements to methods and algorithms that lead to findings, including new information
Educates the organization both from IT and the business perspectives on new approaches, such as testing hypotheses and validation of results
Helps the organization understand the principles and the math behind the process to drive organizational buy-in
Contributes business metrics to show performance contribution over iterations
Contributes to on-going reporting metrics and data usage patterns to provide feedback to Marketing Management
Leads the design and deployment of enhancements and fixes to systems as needed
Interface with customers to provide issue resolution for products and processes
Maintain technical and functional awareness and competence of supported business applications, and organizational and industry technology standards
May participate in an on-call rotation that requires after-hours and weekend support for production outages and issues
Perform other duties as assigned
Conform with all company policies and procedures
Qualifications:

Knowledge

Data Strategies including customer segmentation, market segmentation
Marketing Campaign architecture
Marketing Analytics
Data Modeling/Engineering best practices
Delivery Methodologies including Agile, Waterfall, etc.
Thorough working knowledge of information systems and operations
Functional knowledge of the business area or areas assigned to them
Full technical knowledge of systems analysis techniques
Preferred Marketing/CRM platform(s) knowledge such as Adobe Experience Cloud and Google Marketing Suite

Skill

Analysis and reporting using knowledge in one or more of the following frameworks: SQL Server, SAS, or Power-BI
Excellent analytical, organizational, problem solving and follow-up skills with the ability to meet time sensitive deadlines
Must be a self-starter and able to manage the investigations function with minimal supervision
Proficiency with Microsoft Office products
Ability to interact with staff at all levels
Ability to make sound decisions and exercise good judgment
Promote a cooperative and productive team environment
Strong communication and interpersonal skills

Education

Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics or computer science or related field

Experience

5-7 years of relevant quantitative and qualitative research, analytics experience and SQL experience preferred
Knowledge in statistical analysis, quantitative analytics, forecasting/predictive analytics, multivariate testing, and optimization algorithms

Working Conditions

Normal office environment subject to stressful situations

Work is conducted in a professional office environment subject to stressful situations arising from meeting deadlines and managing multiple priorities

Evening and weekend work as required

Some travel to company and vendor sites may be required, including outside the United States

A passport is recommended

#DICE

#LI-KD2",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Irving, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
201,SAP Master Data Analyst,"$40k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","SAP Master Data Analyst, Bronx
General Information
Job Title:
SAP Master Data Analyst
Location:
2 Saint Ann's Avenue
Bronx, NY, 10454
United States
Job Category:
Corporate
Summary
Responsibilities include but are not limited to create, maintain and optimize master data related input, coordinate with binning, sourcing of products, new product development/support across all departments. In addition, responsibilities include projects for overall business improvements in relation to product master data standardization, integrity and optimization. The SAP Master Data Analyst Position will entail multi-facet contacts and coordination among merchant, operation, quality, supply/demand team, and capacity team.

Responsibilities:

Master Data / SAP: Includes but is not limited to the following functions:
Set-up and update materials in SAP environment, based on role and area assignment, in relation to optimal product supply (i.e. material master data, info records, source lists, condition record, etc)
Create and extend items with either individual or mass approach through SAP available functions and /or Win-Shuttle.
Create and maintain Vendor master.
Maintain and own all SKU related forms utilized among different teams.
Maintain item sales data and proper settings with respect to different status throughout material life cycle.
Maintain the consistency and accuracy of all data in the system.
Including but not limited to sales data, procurement related requirements, pricing, specific product information (case size, dimensions, etc.),
Support new system requirements with mass material master updates
Assist other value stream teams with prompt changes to support “quick-to-market” goals.
Maintain master data integrity repositories (models) and continuously track and update.
Communicate updates to stakeholders at multiple levels, including those external to the organization.
Ensure all product data is consistent with binning needs.
Coordinate with capacity team on re-binning needs.
Weekly Project / Processes Improvement Support
Education and Qualifications
BA/BS in Master Data Management, Systems, Computer Science, Business, Operations Research / Management, , Supply Chain or related
0-1year of experience in SAP Master Data / Systems Role.
Prior working experience in inventory control, receiving, merchandising or warehouse management preferred.
Experienced with Microsoft products (Word, PowerPoint, Excel)
Expert at Excel (formulas, pivots …)
SAP experience/knowledge of Master Data, purchasing module and MRP functionality preferred.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Able to present numerical data in a concise, logical and useful manner
Proven organizational and time management skills
Enjoys operating in a fast-paced, team environment under time constraints
Who is FreshDirect:

FreshDirect is the northeast's leading online fresh food grocer, delivering directly to customers throughout seven states, including the New York City, Philadelphia, and District of Columbia metropolitan areas. FreshDirect is committed to sourcing the freshest and best-tasting meat, fish, produce, and specialty items through direct relationships with suppliers, growers, and farmers. Launched in 2002, FreshDirect is a privately held company headquartered in Bronx, NY.

From the beginning, FreshDirect has set out to provide something different. We are a community partner with a mission to deliver the highest quality and service that customers can find. This is an environment in which associates can innovate, grow and have successful careers—most of our leaders have come up through our ranks. And thanks to our team’s extraordinary efforts, we are a leading innovator in the e-commerce and grocery industries.

Why choose FreshDirect?

We're a company that thrives on teamwork. Our evolution is driven by our passionate employees and investment in perfecting the technology that lets us deliver the highest-quality food. Our state-of-the-art facility creates an environment for innovation. We support our employees with on-the-job training for plant employees and drivers, team-building activities, workplace recognition opportunities, and by encouraging direct relationships with our suppliers in the field.

Great people deserve great perks. We offer comprehensive benefits, plus many workplace extras, including:
A flexible and generous paid time off plan
20% off at freshdirect.com and significant markdowns at our employee market
24-hour access to the FreshDirect shuttle between our Bronx headquarters and the subway
Regular events and barbecues for employees
Click to explore careers and life @ FreshDirect

Learn more @FreshDirect on Twitter, Instagram, Facebook, YouTube!

Disclaimer: The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by the Team member(s) assigned to this position. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of individuals in this position. Position Descriptions may be subject to change as the needs of the organization change.

As an EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER, FreshDirect does not discriminate against applicants or employees because of their race, color, citizenship status, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender, sexual orientation, age religion, creed, marital status, veteran status, domestic violence victim status, familial status, or on any other basis prohibited by law. Furthermore, FreshDirect will not discriminate against any applicant or employee because they are disabled, a disabled veteran, or a veteran of the Vietnam era, provided they are qualified and meets the requirements established by FreshDirect for the job.",3.2,"FreshDirect
3.2","Bronx, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Stores,Retail,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
202,Data Analyst,"$31k-$57k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Role and Responsibilities: *
Analyze, design, develop, implement and maintain data integrity enhancements regarding Western Express, Inc.’s business requirements. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

· Analyze, design, develop and implement new analytics to enhance internal decision-making processes.

· Design, develop and maintain internal data analytics enhancements to provide forecasting business requirements.

· Design and develop data sets used for external system API’s as needed.

· Analyze and utilize data sets used for integration with TMW/ICC, the TMS system; TMT, the Maintenance System; and Synergize, the document imaging system to enhance business operations.

· Interpret data, analyzing results using statistical techniques and providing ongoing reports.

· Developing and implementing databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.

· Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases/data analysis systems.

· Communicate and impart knowledge and skillsets to internal personnel as directed.

· Manage and maintain data integrity of select systems.

· Work with and assist the Director if IT and the VP of IT to accomplish business requirements and goals.

· Assist Accounting and Finance as needed to accomplish enhancements and business requirements.

· Refer difficult cases and projects to the VP of IT.
Qualifications and Education Requirements: *
· High school diploma/GED required.

· Minimum 3 - 5 years’ experience in information technology software development and analysis.

· Working knowledge of Windows Office and Outlook 365 software options and functionality.
Preferred Skills*
· Extensive knowledge of TMW/ICC modules, data base and peripheral systems used.

· Knowledge of internal iSeries TMW/ICC database structure and peripheral databases contained with iSeries.

· Knowledge of Information Builders suite of products.

· Bachelor’s degree. Extensive analytical skills and development experience in a working environment. Extensive data systems configuration, knowledge, and support. Ability to work with internal and external personnel in a calm, professional manner.

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
information technology software development and analysis.: 1 year (Required)
Location:
Brentwood, TN 37027 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.westernexp.com
Company's Facebook page:
www.facebook.com/drivewithwestern
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Western Express Inc.
3.8","Brentwood, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Trucking,Transportation & Logistics,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
203,Data Analyst - Sales Performance,"$34k-$59k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Summary:

The Data Analyst – Sales Performance is responsible for managing weekly and monthly reporting in conjunction with the Sales Administrator.

Job Duties: -

· Develops data queries and analysis to understand trends across the entire customer lifecycle, lead effectiveness, conversion rates, pipeline analysis, and customer retention

· Creates and maintains weekly informational reports for the Sales and Sales Performance teams, as well as developing data analysis tools

· Analyzes data and key metrics to make recommendations to management on improving sales reporting and sales performance based on the data; Audits and validates data; Ensures consistency in reporting

· Reviews results to determine root cause and leading indicators

· Develops action plans to improve reporting

· Other duties as required and assigned

Requirements:

· Experience working with large data sets and sourcing data from BI tools or CRM tools

· Proficient in Power BI or Tableau

· Proficient with Microsoft Outlook, Word, and Excel

· Ability to read, analyze, and interpret financial or technical reports

· Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals

· Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists

· Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form

· Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced and demanding environment

· Ability to work flexible schedule and weekends as needed

· Ability to travel as required to support regional labor management activities

Environment:

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to manipulate, handle, or feel. The employee is regularly required to talk, hear and communicate. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. The employee is frequently required to work in both an office setting and a warehouse. The employee may occasionally be exposed to moving mechanical parts. The employee is regularly exposed to ambient lighting and temperate climate conditions.

The following statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.

Job Duties as documented in this job description are considered “Essential Functions” and have been created by the standards of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission (EEOC). The standards of the Americans with Disabilities Act (1990) require that employees be able to perform “Essential Functions” of the job with or without reasonable accommodation. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the “Essential Functions”.

The following statements are representative of the work environment and physical demands required by an employee to perform the essential functions of this job, with or without reasonable accommodations.",3.2,"GEODIS
3.2","Brentwood, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1904,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
204,Data Quality Analyst,"$57k-$96k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Quality Analyst
10662
Tempe, AZ
3/25/2020 5:47:00 PM

Quality Engineering
Contractor - W2

Job Description
Good data analysis skills
Hands on experience with data profiling, DQ scorecard and profile creation, identifying DQ rules – Informatica Data Quality Analyst experience preferred
Good communication skills – ability to interact with business users to share data profiling results and get feedback
Experience working with Collibra, MDM will be a nice to have
Ability to liaison with IT partners and perform UAT
Financial background is required.
7-8 years of experience is required

Job Requirements",3.8,"IntraEdge
3.8","Tempe, AZ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
205,Data and Policy Analyst - Writer/Coordinator,-1,"Job Description

At Acumen, LLC / The SPHERE Institute, Data and Policy Analysts provide analytical support for research and consulting projects for government and private clients, primarily in the area of health policy. This position is responsible for managing and analyzing data, researching and interpreting policy, and communicating findings to multiple audiences.

Data and Policy Analysts perform a wide array of functions as part of the research process. Those applicants interested in focusing on writing/coordinating will help create and report descriptive statistics, conduct literature searches, independent research and summarize findings, coordinate project activities and communications among diverse groups of internal and external clients and team members, interpret study specifications, research findings and quantitative analyses for relevant audiences, prepare project reports, memos, presentations and proposals, deliver technical assistance and presenting findings to clients, and perform other duties as assigned.

Required Skills

As we review your materials, we are looking for candidates who best exemplify the following qualifications:

Qualifications Required
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative, public policy, or related field or equivalent relevant experience
Good quantitative analytical skills
Good oral and written communication skills
Good organizational skills and strong attention to detail
Familiar with one or more of the following technical competencies: statistics programming, policy writing, research methods documentation, or project management
Able to demonstrate initiative, critical thinking, and problem-solving
Able to work in a team-oriented environment
Able to prioritize tasks and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment
Demonstrated aptitude and enthusiasm for learning
Qualifications Desired
Demonstrated interest in health and social policy
Any application without a cover letter will not be considered. Transcripts and writing samples are not required, however highly preferred and may be requested. We ask that you submit an application for only one office location. We are excited to review your application and look forward to seeing how you may best contribute to our work.

Job Location

Washington, District of Columbia, United States

Position Type

Full-Time/Regular",3.4,"Acumen
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
206,Senior Marketing Data Analyst,"$55k-$98k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As part of the Marketing Analytics & Reporting team at Plymouth Rock Assurance, this position will play a critical role in extending Plymouth Rock’s digital data analytics and reporting capabilities. The Senior Marketing Data Analyst is responsible for customer and prospect interaction analysis, attribution models for eSales program, digital campaign and mobile app program analysis. The analyst will be an expert resource on all digital marketing related data analysis and reporting. The role is also responsible for producing ad hoc analysis on a wide variety of insurance and marketing topics as necessary.
A key part of this role will be to expand the capabilities of bridging customer information from intricate internal and external data sources, including digital customer data (such as site interactions and digital engagement data from third parties, e.g. Google, Adobe, Facebook, etc.), and internal core customer data (policy datamart, quote datamart, claims datamart, etc.). As we continue to expand our digital capabilities, it is crucial to integrate our data analysis to better understand our customers.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Use SQL and SAS to mine large relational database to drive data-oriented insights, such as sales trends, loss trends, business mix, standard vs nonstandard policies, as well as provide customer behavior insights and overall insurance book trends.
Analyze website and mobile app data on traffic sources and patterns. Provide insight on data trends and anomalies, making recommendations where appropriate to improve business performance.
Create model-driven customer segmentations for current customers, prospect customers, and agency customers.
Design A/B digital marketing test models, analyze, and report outcomes of marketing tests.
Conduct analysis related to the quality of leads, quotes, and sales from different marketing programs, by integrating both internal data in multiple business data marts and external data from partners, and developing in depth analysis to evaluate the effectiveness of each initiative.
Develop sales and KPI forecast for a broad range of marketing campaigns and programs, report periodically on performance against the forecast.
Perform complex data analysis in support of ad-hoc and standing requests and demand for insights and be able to present results to non-technical audiences.
Coordinate with cross functional teams, Product, Claims, and IT Team, and build relationships with business users of the data to support their requirements through effective communication, data governance and documentation.
Develop and maintain digital marketing and ecommerce site performance reports by using SQL and Adobe Analytics.
Build a reliable attribution model using stochastic modeling approach, such as Markov Chain, to capture the effectiveness of digital campaigns in various channels.
Set up automation in the data flow with the Media vendors to expand capabilities to bridge digital customer data (site interactions, digital engagement, etc.) with core customer data.
Build and enhance existing reports, and develop new reporting products in Excel, Tableau, and Salesforce Service Cloud.
Conduct data profiling and data quality analytics.
Stay up-to-date with data-driven technologies to keep us ahead of the competition, including new innovations in tracking social media marketing efforts, sales attributions, and related AI applications.
Qualifications and Education
Excellent analytical, critical thinking and problem-solving skills.
Excellent technical skills: expert SQL, experience with a statistical processing language (R, Python), and experience with a data visualization / BI tool (Tableau).
Relevant data and analysis experience, and work experience in dealing with complex data environment.
Proficient at statistical modeling, especially regression model and logistic model.
Working knowledge of mainstream marketing analytics tool, including Omniture/Adobe Analytics, and Google Analytics.
Ability to communicate effectively at all levels (including executive team) and articulate ideas, analysis results, and recommendations.
Ability to prioritize work independently, ensuring accuracy while meeting rigid deadlines.
Bachelors/Master Degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics or similar required
Minimum 3-5 years of relevant analytics experience, ideally in a tech savvy company
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.5,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
207,Data Analyst,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Kforce has a client that is seeking a Data Analyst in Richfield, MN.

Essential Duties:
Primary liaison between ELZ and Analytics Customer 360
Create all required documentation, data mapping and metadata documents for Customer 360
Analysis of SOR changes that might have impact Customer 360
REQUIREMENTS:
Ability to use documented metadata to quickly gain understanding of critical SOR data with minimal direction
Excellent verbal and written communication skills (resource will lead communicate with SOR primary contact, dev team, QA team, downstream consumers for impact analysis)
Business assessment (critical for impact analysis)
Understanding of System development life cycle (will occasionally coordinate changes with dev team, QA team, users)
Functional design
Technical troubleshooting
Mainframe -TSO, Filemanager, JCL (not required but a plus), ability to read COBOL copybooks
Power exchange (should be easy to pick up)
Toad - SQL to perform querying (involving multiple tables and subqueries)
Microsoft Excel, Word
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,"Kforce
4.1","Richfield, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
208,Data Analyst II,"$44k-$79k
(Glassdoor Est.)","You’re not likely to find another company like Vermeer. Our people are from all walks of life in locations around the world, rolling up our sleeves and getting tough work done every day. Together. We’re a family-owned and operated company with an unmatched culture, one that is built on the belief that every Vermeer team member has real, personal impact – on our people, our customers and our world. Whoever you are and where you are in your career, Vermeer helps you be Equipped to Do More®.

Job Summary

Work Shift

1 - First ShiftThe Data Analyst II is responsible for performing complex data analysis to make sense of, and draw conclusions from, information buried in raw data. This position works closely with project team members and business units to identify data-related issues and solve them. This role must be an expert at querying information in relational databases like Oracle, Microsoft SQL, and PostgreSQL and able to document findings in tools such as Word, Excel, or Power BI.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned.

1. Exhibit the Vermeer characteristics of caring culture, demonstrating agility, customer focused and stewardship while modeling the associated behaviors.

2. Analyze data sets using various statistical methods to identify patterns within data, to gain insight into process performance, and identify opportunities to enhance decision making. Leverage current information sources including databases, process models, business requirements and other artifacts to research and resolve issues. Interpret, draw conclusions, make recommendations, and present findings to customers to support business questions and promote data literacy. Assist the business to take advantage of opportunities to improve data usage, analytical processes, and business process improvements.

3. Contribute to a data strategy and approach including inventory of data sources, metadata, quality, issues, reconciliations and remediations. Participate in planning and execution activities to identify, extract, reconcile, transform, load, and validate and/or converted data. Create mapping specifications, review data models, update business data definitions, and maintain process and project documentation as needed.

4. Define data quality operations and support the development and use of automated tools to deliver comprehensive data cleansing, matching, and quality monitoring capabilities for master and transactional data. Ensure high quality data is collected and discover the source data that causes issues for downstream applications, processes, and reports. Troubleshoot and resolve discrepancies to maintain data integrity and quality of information assets.

5. Prepare data documentation for specific projects or domains. Participate in unit testing and/or user acceptance testing for deliverables. Provide post implementation support for data reconciliation and quality issues.

6. Participate in product evaluations, requirements gathering, and business decisions to ensure new solutions are aligned with the company’s strategic goals and are scalable into the data warehouse platform.

Education and/or Experience

- Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Business or related field.

- Minimum of 4 years previous experience with data and application standards, development, and integration; and/or equivalent combination of education and experience required.

Other Skills and Abilities

- Ability to shorten development cycles by implementing new and reusable technologies at Vermeer. Ability to examine business and development processes and apply continuous improvement methods to identify opportunities.

- Ability to define, create and complete a technical task without guidance.

- Excellent analytical skills.

- Ability to maintain positive interpersonal relationships which encourage openness with customers and peers; ability to develop interpersonal relationships with co-workers, staff, clients and the community to meet or exceed expectations.

- Demonstration of excellent written and verbal communication skills. This position requires presenting design recommendations to both technical and non-technical audiences. Clarity of ideas and overall understanding is crucial.

- Ability to create accurate, professional and error-free documents.

- Ability to manage multiple projects while applying project management and organizational skills for task breakdown, planning, and prioritization.

Travel

Up to 5% domestic and/or international travel by car or plane may be required.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability or veteran status. Applicants requiring a reasonable accommodation due to a disability at any stage of the employment application process should contact Team Member Solutions in human resources at (641) 621-8767 or at hr@vermeer.com.",4.1,"Vermeer
4.1","Pella, IA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1948,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
209,Data Analyst,"$38k-$65k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Snapshot
Location:

7500 East Columbia Street
Evansville, IN 47715
Job Type:

Retail
Date Posted:

9/16/2020
Job Description
Store number: Corporate Office
Shopping center: Evansville
Street address: 7500 E Columbia Street

Immediate opportunity! Join our Marketing team at our Corporate Headquarters in Evansville, Indiana and work directly for our stable, growing company in this full-time critical role. Due to the inability to provide sponsorships now or within the next three years, a U.S. Citizenship or Permanent Resident status is required.

Summary: The Data Analyst influences business decisions and strategies by analyzing and understanding customer behavior.

Primary Duties & Responsibilities:

Builds predictive models and performs descriptive analytics using statistical methods such as clustering and segmentation techniques, regression, and propensity modeling.
Provides ad-hoc reports and deep dives into customer analytics to help answer and guide strategic business decisions.
Analyzes Shoe Carnival customer data, demographics, segmentation, and market basket data to transform it into meaningful insights.
Ensures data integrity by leveraging proven methodologies, including data reconciliation, data integration, and data audits.
Translates complex analytics tasks into concise and easily consumable outputs (data storytelling and dashboards) to help business stakeholders make data driven decisions.
Designs and tests multivariate tests in collaboration with internal and external teams.
Provides multi-functional teams with data related to the performance of marketing channels, the health of the customer file, and the impact of pricing/promotions.

Requirements:

Ability to work independently and with cross-functional teams.
Strong problem-solving skills.
Strong communication and technical writing skills.
BA/BS degree in Business Analytics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, or related analytical degree and/or experience required.
Familiarity with a variety of statistical models including logistic/linear regression, cluster analysis, propensity models, and other modeling techniques required.
Experience with Tableau and/or Alteryx preferred.

Total Rewards:

The Shoe Carnival, Inc. Total Rewards program offers eligible associates highly competitive benefits, including the following:

Competitive Pay
Paid Time Off (Vacation & Sick Time)
Comprehensive Medical, Dental, & Vision Benefits
Flexible Spending Accounts
Life, Disability, and Voluntary Benefits
Fitness Membership Discounts
Employee Assistance Program
401(k) Retirement Plan
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
Employee & Family Discounts
Relocation Opportunities

Shoe Carnival, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.7,"Shoe Carnival Inc.
3.7","Evansville, IN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1978,Company - Public,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
210,Jr. Business Data Analyst,"$37k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","WebFX is looking for qualified candidates to fill the position of Jr. Business Data Analyst. Employees in this role will gather and analyze campaign data and consult with clients about their business goals and propose solutions and strategies that meet their needs, among other responsibilities.

What You'll Do
Gather and analyze campaign data
Consult with clients about their business goals and propose solutions and strategies that meet their needs
Analyze competitors’ websites and online marketing initiatives
Perform industry analysis and forecasting of trends
Interpret web analytics, demographic data, market research, and buyer behaviors
Optimizing client websites for search engines (on-page SEO)
Create and manage all aspects of SEO, PPC, and paid search ad campaigns for clients
Manage email marketing, website analysis and online advertising programs
Prepare monthly digital marketing campaign reports
Correct technical issues on the backend of website
Perform A/B, website usability, and website conversion rate testing
Responsible for driving client success on the web
5% analyzing clients’ competitors
10% writing ad copy, emails, etc.
10% working in the backend of websites/fixing technical issues
10% creating revenue, ROI and traffic reports for client campaigns
10% managing client projects and ad campaigns
15% performing industry, demographic and market research, and trend forecasting
20% client strategy and analytics
20% client interaction- phone calls, emails, in-person meetings

Note: The Jr. Business Data Analyst is a client-facing position

Training

Our “Bootcamp” web marketing training program will be provided for new WebFX “family members”.
On-site, state of the art training amenities to facilitate departmental trainings, trend watch reports, and monthly Lunch-and-Learns

What You'll Get

WebFX grew 250%+ over the past 3 years, and merit-based promotional opportunities are abundant for new family members who meet or exceed position performance metrics.

Potential Promotional Path for Jr. Business Data Analyst:

Digital Marketing Research Consultant
Director of Digital Marketing
Sr. Digital Marketing Research Consultant

Compensation

$35.5k to $38,500k (potentially higher based on work experience)

GPA 3.8+ : add up to $3k to high range
Elite college or university & graduation with high honors: Add $3.5k-$5k to high range

Candidates interested in the Jr. Business Data Analyst position may also have interest in:
digital marketing, online marketing, paid advertising, search marketing, inbound marketing, web marketing, social media, content marketing, PPC, SEO, SEM, blogging, Facebook, customer service, writing, editing, research, communications, etc.",4.7,"WebFX, Inc.
4.7","Harrisburg, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
211,Business Data Analyst - Medical Economics,"$60k-$109k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As a member of the Medical Economics team, you will manage the data and analytic reporting and analysis to support CareCentrix strategic and tactical needs, and to fulfill contractual requirements for external health plan clients. You will analyze extensive financial and healthcare utilization data to develop insights that support business decision and cost savings for CareCentrix.

In this Job, you will:
Under the direction of senior team members, perform analysis of complex and varied healthcare data.
Extract, collect, analyze and interpret data of various types from various sources/
Create Ad-Hoc reports using SQL.
Develop and maintain dashboards of key performance metrics.
Make assessments about health care costs and trends, quality and outcomes.
Present reports and analytic results.
Document issues and problems regarding data sets.
Provide design support for the development of business intelligence solutions.
You will enjoy this role if:
You love data mining and data manipulation, the larger the data set the better!
You love to learn and are curious to understand the nuances of a situation.
You like to move fast.
You enjoy working through ambiguity and a changing market environment.

This job is for you if:
You have a Bachelor's Degree in Machine Learning, Information Technology, Finance, Economics, Statistics or similar.
You have 1-3 years background in data management and healthcare industry (preferred).
You think in quantitative terms. You know Excel, SQL, Tableau and a little about Teradata or Vertica.
You have knowledge of big data concepts.
You have strong focus on process, continuous process improvement and quality
You have some answers but not all of them. You approach problems with questions not answers.
You are fun to work with! We take our commitment to patients seriously, but we don’t take ourselves seriously. We are looking for team members who bring joy to the work they do.

CareCentrix maintains a drug-free workplace.
We are an equal opportunity employer. Employment selection and related decisions are made without regard to age, race, color, national origin, religion, sex, disability, sexual orientation, gender identification, or being a qualified disabled veteran or qualified veteran of the Vietnam era or any other category protected by Federal or State law.",3.9,"CareCentrix
3.9","Tampa, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
212,Data Analyst/Data Scientist,"$39k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Swiss Re

Swiss Re is one of the world’s leading providers of reinsurance, insurance and other forms of insurance-based risk transfer, working to make the world more resilient. We anticipate and manage a wide variety of risks, from natural catastrophes and climate change to cybercrime.

At Swiss Re we combine experience with creative thinking and cutting-edge expertise to create new opportunities and solutions for our clients. This is possible thanks to the collaboration of our 15,000 employees across the world.

We offer a flexible working environment where curious and adaptable people thrive. Are you interested in joining us?

About the Role:

The position will be in a newly created unit to develop tools for use in the business management area of the Life and Health Americas unit of Swiss Re.

In this role, you will develop, enhance and utilize tools that manage large amounts of data to provide insight on the performance of Swiss Re's business. You will be collaborating with subject matter experts from Administration, Claims, Portfolio Management, Data Management, Products, Client Markets, Valuation, Finance and other Business Management functions. In addition, collaboration with Global teams representing other regions will be expected.

Key Business Responsibilities

Develop tools leveraging a ""big-data"" platform in Swiss Re to measure and attribute performance.
Coding and building data analytics tools in an efficient way to demonstrate the applicability of the technology to solve the business challenges that are presented.
Develop insights via financial history, projections, experience studies, current balance sheet & earnings, and quality of data, assumptions & models.
Interact with other business units to understand their data and their needs for tools to manage their tasks and goals through effective data integration.
Analyse data for trends and patterns, and Interpret data with a clear objective in mind
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Interact with the Information Technology areas of Swiss Re to ensure that prototype models are moved into a production state.
Own the release and end-user training of the developed application.
Develop presentation and/or communication materials for internal stakeholders.
Maintain current knowledge of business practices, data science trends, and technology.
Develop innovative solutions as the business and insurance industry changes.
Contribute ideas to gain efficiencies or reduce operational expenses.

About the Team:

This is a new function within Business Management Americas formed in 2020. It is responsible for development of tools that will allow Swiss Re to quickly prototype big-data models to assess the impact on the business before migrating to formal business applications. The tools will deliver the self-service analytics using Swiss Re's significant data repositories to end users.

About You:

University degree in mathematics, statistics or actuarial science, OR two to five years of relevant experience in the data science field
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SLQ, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Strong background in data mining, data transformation and modelling skills
Strong verbal/written communication skills
Ability to work independently and in a team (including cross functional teams) to contribute to the successful delivery of time-sensitive projects
Experience in data mining algorithms, and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, decision trees, neural networks, anomaly detection, sequential pattern discovery and text mining.

Swiss Re is an equal opportunity employer. It is our practice to recruit, hire and promote without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, disability, age, pregnancy, sexual orientations, marital status, military status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Decisions on employment are solely based on an individual's qualifications for the position being filled.

During the recruitment process, reasonable accommodations for disabilities are available upon request. If contacted for an interview, please inform the Recruiter/HR Professional of the accommodation needed.",3.9,"Swiss Re
3.9","Fort Wayne, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,1863,Company - Public,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
213,Data Analyst - Business Intelligence Virtual Hiring Event,"$35k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","TDS Telecom Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 15, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Administrator - Real Estate

Advanced Technical Support Specialist

Central Office Technician

Consumer Sales Advisor-Outbound

Customer Repair Advisor II

Data Analyst - Business Intelligence

Data Engineer I

Data Engineer II

Field Service Technician

Field Service Technician - Network

Lead Data Engineer

Network Specialist

Network Specialist - ATS Data

Network Specialist I - ATS Data

Network Specialist II - ATS Data

Outside Residential Sales Representative

Senior Data Engineer

Software Engineer II

Sr Analyst - Compensation

Staff Accountant

Intake Details:

Requirements

See each position for requirements

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

Resume

We prefer you use a device with a camera and a stable internet connection. If you are using an Apple device, we recommend using the Safari browser. For all other devices, Google Chrome is recommended.

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About TDS Telecom

TDS Telecommunications LLC (TDS Telecom/TDS®) delivers high-speed internet, TV entertainment, and phone services to nearly 900 rural, suburban, and metropolitan communities across the U.S. With more than 1.2 million connections, TDS is one of the fastest growing technology companies in the United States. Powered by fiber-optics and new industry-leading technologies, TDS delivers up to 1 Gigabit internet speeds and offers internet-protocol based TV entertainment solutions along with traditional phone services. TDS also offers businesses VoIP advanced communications solutions, dedicated internet service, data networking, and hosted-managed services. Visit tdstelecom.com.

TDS Telecom, headquartered in Madison, Wis., employs more than 2,800 people and is a subsidiary of Telephone and Data Systems, Inc. [NYSE: TDS], a Fortune 1000® company. Founded in 1969, TDS Inc. employs 9,400 people and has approximately six million connections nationwide through its businesses U.S. Cellular, TDS Telecom, OneNeck IT Solutions LLC, and TDS Broadband Service. TDS Inc.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

TDS is expanding our Contact Center Reporting team! As a Data Analyst-Business Intelligence, you will support our Customer Contact Center by providing maintenance and development of the reporting processes and applications utilized by TDS Telecom's Customer Contact Operations (CCO). You will work with management and end user community to develop a clear understanding of user information needs, prioritize the user requests according to business impacts and translate the user requirements into the appropriate report programs.

Required Qualifications

Associate’s degree or higher OR 2+ years professional work experience.
2+ year experience in the area of Relational Database Reporting Languages such as: SQL, PSQL, or TSQL OR experience programming with either Visual Basic for Applications (VBA), c#, asp.net or any object-oriented programming languages.

Follow the link to apply: https://external-telecom-teldta.icims.com/jobs/15923/data-analyst---business-intelligence/job",3.7,"TDS Telecom
3.7","Madison, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1969,Subsidiary or Business Segment,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
214,"Data Analyst, Wish X","$65k-$120k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

Wish is looking for an experienced Data Analyst to support our Wish X Team in San Francisco. The role entails driving analytics insights and enable senior leadership to make effective, analytically driven decisions, in particular area of logistics and customer support. The ideal candidate should be passionate about Wish and e-commerce, has a strong analytical and consultative mindset, deep understanding of databases and data visualization, the ability to thrive in a dynamic, fast-paced environment delivering against tight deadlines, and a passion for scaling operations through automation.

What you'll be doing:
Work cross-functionally with technical team and business teams (specifically WishX)
Work on high priority & new programs to help expand Wish’s product offerings including B2B initiatives & Wish Local (brick & mortar stores partnered with Wish)
Conduct insightful analysis to gain insights that will help drive business decisions
Provide concrete recommendations to help ramp up/down new experiments
Prioritize & manage business stakeholders’ adhoc requests related to new programs
Conceptualize and build centralized tools (including pipelines) that can extract data/insights for daily business management in an automated manner
Develop dashboards and visualizations for the business stakeholders and maintain the integrity of the reports.
Investigate monetary impact on new programs and assist with ad-hoc requests
Process a large amount of data and do deep dives to understand certain trends/patterns, carry out correlation analysis to identify causes and relatedness.
Qualifications
Bachelor's or Master’s degree in an analytical field or similar.
2+ years of work experience in doing finance/business data analysis.
Proficiency in SQL or other query languages, deep experience and strengths to develop complex queries.
Development experience in at least one scripting language (Python, PHP, Perl, etc.).
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills; ability to transform data into business insights and actionable recommendations.
Experience working with large data sets that are structured and partially structured.
Working knowledge of data visualization tools (Looker, Tableau etc.).
Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,"Wish
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
215,Senior Data Management Analyst,"$38k-$79k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Meet MedPro Group. We're an industry-leading Berkshire Hathaway insurance company with a passion for our clients and our team. We are hundreds of professionals with varied backgrounds and experience levels who came together to achieve one goal: protecting those who have made it their mission to serve and care for others.

We are seeking a driven individual to join MedPro Group who is passionate about using data to solve business problems. You will be joining the Enterprise Data Management (EDM) team, working with a cross functional team from across the business to (1) provide rapid response to business requests, (2) ensure existing processes continue to deliver value, and (3) helping drive an Analytical culture.

In this role you will…

Develop and maintain production support and rapid response standard operating procedures for the EDM teams including; ensuring proper documentation is captured, transparent prioritization, and proper customer service.
Work with cross functional teams across the business to ensure EDM deliverables continue to be improved and add value to their business stakeholders.
In addition to ensuring the appropriate team members are assigned to requests, actively develop reporting solutions and responses yourself where appropriate. This will focus on report development and maintenance leveraging industry standard Business Intelligence Reporting tools such as Tableau, SAP Webi, MS Report Services.
Actively participate in ongoing EDM initiatives to ensure transition to production processes and being a voice of our end-users for common requests.

We are looking for a candidate with…

Bachelors in Computer Science or related field, and a demonstrated pursuit of related continued education.
7+ years technical experience in the area of Data & Analytics with progressing leadership responsibilities
Proven track record of working with a cross functional team and acting as a liaison between business users and technical teams
Must be able to drive appropriate documentation including requirements and technical documentation
Technical aptitude with the ability and willingness to understand new technologies, systems, and infrastructure
Experience working with SQL technologies (ie T-SQL, PL/SQL)
Excellent interpersonal, oral, and written communication skills
Self-starter that can manage conflicting priorities, excels at time management, and can identify areas of continued improvement
The ability to provide oversight of indirect reports, onsite and remote team members, while working within a complex matrix organization
Bonus Skillset:
Relevant professional certifications such as Tableau, Alteryx, and other applicable self-serve analytics tools
Data & Analytics or Production Support management experience
Experience working with non-SQL technologies
Demonstrated experience with Java and/or Python programming languages
Experience with modern data technologies (ie Spark, Kafka, Presto, S3)

Why MedPro?

MedPro Group’s mission is built on a century-old legacy of protecting those who protect others. From our roots in our hometown of Fort Wayne, Indiana, we've worked diligently to become the nation's premier healthcare liability coverage provider, currently insuring more than 250,000 customers. With that growth, we've built a significant presence in all 50 states. Our team works across the country to provide the best strategies to mitigate risk and preserve the reputations of those who have entrusted their good name to us. That passion – built on a foundation of a culture that values uncompromised integrity, obsessive client focus, great teamwork, and a long-term mindset – makes MedPro a preferred employer that many call their career home.

General: MedPro Group is an equal opportunity employer.",3.2,"MedPro Group
3.2","Fort Wayne, IN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1899,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
216,Data Visualization Analyst,-1,"THE TEAM YOU WILL BE JOINING:

Highly innovative manufacturing/distribution company with revenues in excess of $5B annually
Industry leading market influencer experiencing strong growth, both organically and inorganically
Forward thinking organization committed to investing in cutting edge technology and resources to support growth

WHAT THEY OFFER YOU:

New Executive Leadership that is highly engaged offering both experience and knowledge, VERY collaborative work environment
See your impact on the business – a great opportunity to contribute at both strategic and tactical levels during a period of exciting change for the company
Dynamic employees with great morale, low turnover while offering growth opportunities
Excellent benefits and work environment

WHY THIS ROLE IS IMPORTANT:

Business leans on this person to create data visualizations in order to present to different lines of business
Act as a statistical translator for all business needs.
Be able to translate statistical data in ways that are useful for both subject matter experts as well as business stakeholders.
Use relational databases and SQL to access and manipulate data.
Strong use of PowerBI to produce an extensive variety of graphs and charts to present.

THE BACKGROUND THAT FITS:

2+ years of experience working with PowerBI (expert knowledge needed)
5 years of hands on experience in visualization, data modeling and analytics
5 years of business experience with exposure to strategy formulation and business analytics.
Proficient in Python
Strong SQL skills to pull data from database
The ability to look at data as it’s being pulled or when it is visualized and have the ability to think creatively as to what that data means",2.6,"AccruePartners
2.6","Huntersville, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
217,"Senior Data Analyst, Consumer Experience","$86k-$153k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About the role

As a Senior Data Analyst, you will be responsible for the success of our Move Money product experience, working cross-functionally with product, engineering and ops teams. You'll use data to develop insights, run experiments, and guide decision making with the goal of building support experiences and features to delight and solve our members' issues.

In this role, you can expect to
Define key metrics used to measure the success of our consumer banking experiences and products
Build a deeper understanding of our members needs and strategic product and business opportunities
Partner with product, engineering and operations to translate your data insights into product features or recommendations to improve operations
Lead experimentation by providing guidance on the experiments that should be run, how they should be run, and evaluating the impact on our key metrics
Foster a data-driven, test-and-learn culture with your passion for telling stories with data
To thrive in this role, you have
A quantitative degree in a field like Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Operations Research or Engineering. Advanced degrees preferred.
5+ years in analytics, leveling will be determined based on experience. B2C product analytics and FinTech experience preferred.
Strong SQL skills - familiarity with window functions would be a good sign.
Exposure to a scripting language like Python or R and relevant data science packages
Experience building metric frameworks to understand user behaviors.
Experience with data science, experimentation and statistical analysis used to guide decision making.
Excellent communication skills, a record of working cross-functionally to achieve results.
A little about us

We created Chime because we believe everyone deserves financial peace of mind. By eliminating unnecessary fees and helping people grow their savings automatically, we've empowered millions of Americans to take control of their finances.

Chime is the largest and fastest-growing U.S. player in the challenger-banking space. Through our banking partners, we offer access to bank accounts with fee-free overdraft, provide members the chance to receive early access to their paychecks, help them improve their credit, and more!

We've built one of the most experienced leadership teams in Fintech and were recently valued at over $14.5B. We've raised over $1B in funding from leading investors including DST, Coatue, Tiger Global, General Atlantic, Iconiq, Dragoneer, Menlo, Whale Rock, Access, Forerunner, Crosslink, Cathay, aCrew, and others.

What we offer
Competitive salary based on experience
401k match plus the usual medical, dental, vision, life, and disability benefits
Quarterly stipend to spruce up your home office
Generous vacation policy and company-wide Take Care of Yourself Days
Virtual events to connect with your fellow Chimers- think cooking classes, music festivals, mixology classes, paint nights, etc., and delicious snack boxes, too!
A challenging and fulfilling opportunity to join one of the most experienced teams in FinTech and help create a completely new kind of banking service
We know that great work comes from great, and inclusive teams. At Chime, we specifically look for individuals of varying strengths, skills, backgrounds, and ideas. We believe this gives us a competitive advantage to better serve our members and helps us all grow as Chimers and individuals.

We hire candidates of any race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital or family status, disability, Veteran status, and any other status. Chime is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know. To learn more about how Chime collects and uses your personal information during the application process, please see the Chime Applicant Privacy Notice.",4.8,"Chime
4.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
218,Product Data Analyst (MUST have SQL exp.),"$48k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Grubhub is dedicated to connecting hungry diners with our wide network of restaurants across the country. Our innovative technology, easy-to-use platforms and streamlined delivery capabilities make us an industry leader today, and in the future of online food ordering.
We strive to create a workplace that reflects the diversity of our customers and the communities we serve. When you join our team, you become part of a community that works together to innovate, solve problems, take risks, grow, work hard and have a ton of fun in the process!
Why Work For Us
We have a fast-paced environment and that is what our teams thrive on. Grubhub believes in empowering people and offering opportunities for development, as well as professional growth. We value strong, positive relationships in all areas: with each other, our customers and our greater community. Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture? If so, we want to talk to you - and hear what’s your favorite restaurant for food delivery!
About You: You are a smart, world-class, passionate about ecommerce and analytical person who wants to help define and build innovative experiences on both mobile and web platforms. You help develop a strategy and vision and build and execute feature roadmaps from start to finish. You embrace this cross-functional role that requires you to work closely and successfully with senior leaders across the company, engineering/IT, QA, design, customer care, and the rest of the product team.

Participate in defining roadmap projects
Support PMs with data analysis to help inform business decisions (impact analysis, root cause analysis, cost/benefit analysis), expediting product discovery and prioritization efforts
Create SQL queries and dashboards to monitor experiments
Provide insights into product usage to inform innovation or areas of weakness
Work closely with other product team members to help understand how you can provide data to power decision making
Gathering and unearthing unmet customer needs through research, data analysis, user experience analysis and testing, competitive research and any other relevant tools
Be able to prioritize and handle multiple requests for information at any one time
Understand how user interactions translate to data that you can provide insights

2+ years of relevant Product Management experience with 1+ years of that experience in e-commerce preferred
Technically proficient in pulling disparate data sets together to address questions and provide insights
MUST have 2+ years using SQL to build queries, reports and dashboards
Experience building KPI, KEI reporting to monitor performance and quickly respond to changes in performance
A born communicator with strong written and verbal skills
History of teamwork and proven ability to get the job done
Ability to “dive deep” and use data to prioritize a roadmap as well as validate completed projects
Have a natural curiosity that overcomes obstacles to get answers
Well organized, detail-oriented and self-motivated
Comfortable in a fast paced constantly changing environment
A self-starter with a strong bias for action
A team player and fun to work with too

Flexible PTO. Grubhub employees are provided a generous amount of time to recharge their batteries.
Health and Wellness. We provide programs that support your overall well-being such as generous medical benefits, employee network groups, company-wide fitness challenges, and a comfortable and casual workplace! We also support our parents by offering 8 weeks of paid parent bonding time, a 4-week returnship program, and 6-8 weeks paid medical leave.
Learning and Career Growth. Your personal and professional development is a priority at Grubhub. From day one, we empower you to lead and be an active participant in your career growth. We provide continuous learning opportunities, training, and coaching and mentorship programs.
MealPerks. Who’s ready for some lunch? We provide our employees with a weekly Grubhub credit to enjoy and support local restaurants. We also offer company-wide meals several times a year to bring our Grubhub family together.
Fun. Every Grubhub office has an employee-led Culture Crew that connects people through fun, meaningful events and initiatives. Some of our popular past events include: Wing-eating contests, Grubtoberfest, 5k Runs, Bring Your Child to Work Day, regular happy hours, and more!
Social Impact. We believe in the importance of serving the communities that support our business. In addition, employees are given paid time off each year to support the causes that are important to them.


Grubhub is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster. If you are applying for a job in the U.S. and need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to TalentAcquisition@grubhub.com and let us know the nature of your request and contact information. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
CA Privacy Notice: If you are a resident of the State of California and would like a copy of our CA privacy notice, please email privacy@grubhub.com.",3.9,"Grubhub
3.9","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
219,"Enterprise Data, Financial Data Analyst - Content Design Specialist Contractor","$58k-$98k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We're Bloomberg Enterprise Data - fast paced, innovative and expanding. We have worked hard and smart to become the $1bn business we are today. We partner closely with our clients, taking time to understand their unique businesses and individual data and technology needs. Our endless selection of datasets, covering all asset types, with multiple delivery technologies and flexible scheduling mean our clients are able to get exactly the data they need, when they need it, in the format they prefer. Without us, they simply can't operate.

What's the role?
In this role you will be working with the Bloomberg Enterprise Data Product Management Team specifically on Reference, Regulatory, Alternative and Pricing Data. We are constantly improving our products, to make them more feature rich and application ready, whilst reducing the total cost of ownership. Product Managers have a high level of business, communication, and technology skills, so that they can create working prototypes, specify Engineering tasks, and work effectively with Sales and Clients.

You will design, specify, and create prototypes of large and varied data models and data sets, both financial and non-financial, using a wide range of tools, methods and platforms.
We expect you to evaluate areas of interest, understand what is possible and commercially viable, recognize which models and concepts should be applied, and how the data resources should be acquired. An open, creative approach is critical to your success.

Whilst designing data for diverse addressable markets, you will explore and work with a wide range of data, and apply existing methods or develop new methods. You will also engage in data analysis in a practical way, convince business leaders that your results are worth investing in and educate other analysts and business team members.

Most critically, you will deliver the output of your data design to business users (both non-technical and technical) and will be a key person in shaping the product offering and the customer experience.

We'll trust you to

Operate in an influential business role within a fast growing area.
Design and specify commercially attractive products.
Grow your business and technology skills.
Understand addressable markets.
Evaluate what is possible and viable.
Take responsibility for the Data Architecture of multiple data sets.
Work with Engineering, Product Managers, Sales, and Clients.
You'll need to have:
Experience with financial data
Familiar with specifying and using large structured data and data sets to solve complex business demands
Experience in working with Global Teams, across Sales, Technology, Operations and customers
The ability to address multiple priorities in an extremely fast-paced environment.
Legal authorization to work full-time in the United States and will not require visa sponsorship now or in the future
If this sounds like you:Apply if you think we're a good match! We'll get in touch to let you know what the next steps are, but in the meantime feel free to have a look at this:https://www.bloomberg.com/professional/solution/data-and-content We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.9,"Bloomberg
3.9","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1981,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
220,Clinical Data Management - Technical Analyst,"$37k-$86k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Are Hiring

Clinical Data Management - Technical Analyst

Virtual Position

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension leverages technology to create collaborative solutions that improve everyday health decisions. The technology enables seamless access to data across all applications transforming the customer experience when interacting with technology and enhancing our ability across Ascension to better serve communities with greater agility and responsiveness. It is used to provide insightful use of automation and data-drive improvements to enhance the provider, patient and consumer experience as well as keeping cybersecruity with a strong posture to protect data and other valuable assets.

Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, especially to those most in need. In FY2018, Ascension provided nearly $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension you will work with assigned customers to define business requirements and translate them through system design and solution development.

Responsibilities:
Designs, directs and performs data analyses to resolve complex business issues including technical and economic feasibility of proposed system solutions.
Uses data analysis and technical skills to help architect comprehensive models that integrate with other systems and data consumers.
Works toward troubleshooting and streamlining data validation efforts in complex database migrations.
Works on projects with broad implications requiring systems integration of multiple technical platforms.
Works closely with other teams of internal and external customers and vendors, understanding critical touchpoints and implications.
Manages expectations and ensures prompt and complete customer service.
Produces project plans, RFP's, and RFI's.
Leads design sessions by presenting logical statements of business problems and designs.
Customizes presentations to the interests of the audience.
What You Will Need:

Desired Work Experience:
3-5 years of experience preferred.
3+ Years of SQL required.
Experience in Healthcare Technology/Terminology required.
Previous experience with other languages such as Python preferred.
Previous experience with multiple RDBMS, Oracle,SQL Server preferred.
Previous experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred.
What You Will Need

Education:
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required
Work Experience:
3 years of experience preferred.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension Technologies is an EEO/AA Employer M/F/Disability/Vet. Please click the link below for more information.
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf

E-Verify Statement

Ascension Technologies participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.3,"Ascension
3.3","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
221,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Please do not apply through Glassdoor; the application form needs to be completed in order to be considered. TO APPLY, VISIT: https://grnh.se/eb8d01633us.

About Us: At Emendata, we help bridge the gap between data and the real world. We partner with organizations that have a social mission and help them tackle their problems using analytics. Our role in these partnerships goes end to end—we handle everything from wrangling the data to analyzing the problem to turning the results into something actionable. Importantly, we understand that this analytics pipeline does not live in a vacuum. Getting to meaningful numbers requires more than just the right methods; it calls for understanding the people, policies, data, and systems involved. With this approach, our small but fast-growing team is having a big impact, taking on challenges like using analytics to combat fraud, waste, and abuse in Medicare.
About the Role: This role leads the way in producing analytics that reflect a deep level of understanding and a high degree of quality. We are looking for you to:
Take analyses from end to end: Understand the client’s problem, identify the right research question, plan the methodology, corral the data, code the analysis, interpret the results, craft the deliverable, and communicate the story
Apply a research mentality: Use all tools at our disposal (documentation, policy regulations, data investigations, etc.) to make sound analytic decisions
Help the team deliver its best work: Turn direction from clients/senior staff into tactical plans and work closely with data analysts to help them implement (conducting code reviews, teaching/reinforcing analytic strategies, etc.)
This role will be a good fit for people who naturally push towards progress and are undeterred when that requires a lot of effort or stepping into unfamiliar territory. Emendata is growing rapidly, and we are looking for people who are excited to march forward together.
Qualifications: If you do not meet all the criteria below but still think you would be a good fit for this role, please apply so we can see if we can find the right spot for you on the team. We value experience but also welcome aptitude and enthusiasm.
Education: Bachelor’s or master’s degree in a quantitative field or equivalent technical training
Programming: Experience with SAS is a must (comfortable with SAS macro language, advanced DATA step techniques such as hashes, and PROC SQL); experience with Python, Stata, R, or SQL is a plus
Technical Mentorship: Demonstrated experience with reviewing code and providing feedback
Data Management: Comfortable with the process of importing, cleaning, and preparing data for analysis in a reproducible way
Analysis: Exceptional problem-solving skills with a good understanding of statistical/social science research methods; 4+ years hands-on experience in an analytics role (e.g., economic consulting)
Working Style: Intellectually curious (keep pulling on threads until finding an answer), enterprising (eager to tackle the unknown and find a way to make things happen), and collaborative (work with others to explore, build, tear down, and build again)
To be considered for this position, applicants must have the ability to work in the U.S. without a need for current or future visa sponsorship.
About the Interview Process: We want both sides to learn what it would be like to work together. Part way through the interview process, we incorporate a lightweight at-home exercise that serves as the basis for a technical interview. The exercise gives us an outlet to show you what kind of problems this role would tackle and offers you an opportunity to show us how you would approach the work.",-1,Emendata,"Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
222,"Senior Business Analyst, Data Management","$61k-$111k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Senior Business Analyst, Data Management will be part of a team focused on the design, development and delivery of key operating metrics across the Plymouth Rock enterprise.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities:
Align metrics across the enterprise and document associated business logic and definitions.
Effectively manage projects of high complexity and maintain documentation of key decision points.
Analyze needs of various business stakeholders to identify and implement the best solution.
Coordinate business & IT data project discussions.
Design and implement test plans.
Validate data quality against business requirements.
Conduct post-release / post-implementation testing.
Ensure that datasets are maintained according to best practices.
Maintain a comprehensive library of technical terminology and documentation.
Build relationships and provide excellent customer service to internal and external business partners.
Ensure that the final product satisfies the requirements and meet end-user expectations.
Spot areas for improvement to enhance the team’s efficiency.
Qualifications and Education:
A Bachelor's degree from an accredited four-year college or university.
Understanding of and experience within the insurance industry is required.
Property and casualty industry experience preferred.
Expert SQL skills and experience with a data visualization / BI tool (Tableau).
Proficient working knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite products specifically Excel.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to communicate effectively to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Analytical and problem-solving abilities, with keen attention to detail.
Demonstrate strong organizational and time management skills in a project-based environment.
Ability to prioritize work independently, ensuring accuracy while meeting rigid deadlines.
Confidence in taking ownership of challenging business issues, making decisions with limited or incomplete data and seeing issues through to resolution.
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.5,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.5","Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
223,Analyst/Sr. Analyst - Data Engineering - Business Intelligence Data,"$46k-$105k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Description

This employee will lead a team responsible for using data to analyze market and business trends to increase profits and efficiency within the Ally Insurance Operations Business Unit. Extensive business data and process knowledge will be obtained and used, as well as competitor data and industry trends. This will develop a picture of where the company stands in the industry, where we can improve and where we can reduce costs. A clear understanding of the business use around downstream data is required to ensure success. This position will work closely with our resident subject matter experts in the data management - configuration department.

Job Responsibilities

Lead all data governance initiatives and action plans to success. Report the progress, road blocks, and benefits of these programs to the executive leadership team on a bimonthly basis. Subject matter expert on all Insurance systems Deep understanding of data management principles and practices. Responsible to learn our product data in 4 operational systems to obtain an overall picture of our Insurance business. Lead a team responsible for data and design reviews and testing for all Insurance systems. Responsible for the Quarterly Insurance Analytics Working Group Meetings, as well as our Annual Big Data Competition. Research of new technologies and data, such as telematics data usage, and new tools for data exploration and visualization.

Qualifications

1+ Years of Data and Business Analysis
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Economics, Statistics, Information Science or similar background preferred
1+ Years of Python/SQL experience
Ability to work across cultures and functions Experience Working with - Growing High Potential Talent Strong Written and Oral Communication skills, as well as ability to Manage Large Meetings Strong Microsoft Access, Excel, and Power Point skills Strong organizational, analytical and interpersonal skills Proficiency in Oracle SQL, Cognos, Tableau, and other reporting - analysis tools Technical expertise in data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets

Ally Overview

Ally Financial Inc. (NYSE: ALLY) is a leading digital financial services company and a top 25 U.S. financial holding company offering financial products for consumers, businesses, automotive dealers and corporate clients. Ally's legacy dates back to 1919, and the company was redesigned in 2009 with a distinctive brand, innovative approach and relentless focus on its customers. Ally has an award-winning online bank (member FDIC), one of the largest full service auto finance operations in the country, a complementary auto-focused insurance business, a growing digital wealth management and online brokerage platform, and a trusted corporate finance business offering capital for equity sponsors and middle-market companies.

Total Rewards Information

Ally's compensation program offers market-competitive base pay and pay-for-performance incentives (bonuses) based on achieving personal and company goals. But Ally's total compensation - or total rewards - extends beyond your paycheck and is designed to support and enrich your personal and professional life, including:

Time Away: competitive holiday and flexible paid-time-off, including time off for volunteering and voting.
Planning for the Future: benefits to help you plan for the near and long term including an industry-leading 401K retirement savings plan with matching and company contributions, student loan and 529 educational assistance programs, tuition reimbursement and other financial well-being programs.
Supporting your Health & Well-being: flexible health and insurance options including dental and vision, pre-tax Health Savings Account with employer contributions and a total well-being program that helps you and family stay on track physically, socially, emotionally and financially.
Building a Family: adoption, surrogacy and fertility support as well as benefits that help you take care of your family - parental and caregiver leave, back-up child and adult/elder day care program and child care discounts.
Work-Life Integration: other benefits including LifeMatters® Employee Assistance Program, subsidized and discounted Weight Watchers® program and other employee discount programs.

Ally is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We extend equal employment opportunities to qualified applicants and employees on an equal basis regardless of an individual's age, race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy status, marital status, military or veteran status, genetic disposition or any other reason protected by law.",3.8,"Ally Financial Inc.
3.8","Detroit, MI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1919,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
224,Tactical Data Link (TDL) Analyst,"$50k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Working at USfalcon is about providing exceptional professional services to the DoD and various Federal Agencies. We have been excelling in diverse platforms for almost 30 years and continue to be an industry leader. If you thrive in an organization that values integrity, commitment, stewardship, and service, we want to meet you.
We have an exciting opportunity to join us in supporting one of our valued customers as a Tactical Data Link (TDL) Analyst located at Langley, AFB in Hampton, VA.

Develop Interface Control Proposals (ICPs) that make editorial and technical changes to current/future multi-TDL configuration items (US Military Standard (Mil-Std) 3011, 6011, 6016, 6017, 6020, MADL, Cursor on Target (CoT), etc.). Perform detailed technical analysis of ICPs as they relate to USAF platforms and systems.
Provide technical multi-TDL expertise to support the integration of multi-TDL capabilities into USAF platforms and systems.
Develop, or review previously-developed, bit-level implementation specifications for USAF platforms and systems. These implementations shall depict the total multi-TDL implementation requirements for the platform.
Provide technical support at Technical Interchange Meetings and Design Reviews concerning multi-TDL implementations.
Provide technical expertise to analyze concepts or problems with Air Force, Joint, or Coalition standards or implementation of those standards and provide solutions or recommendations in appropriate format as required.
Support development of operational concepts and architectures that use existing and emerging capabilities in support of USAF platform/system information exchange, interoperability, and operational employment requirements. This support shall include participation in Integrated Product Teams (IPTs) and other working groups to address specific technical and operational issues.
Provide analytical assessments addressing impacts on existing allied message standards and systems technical accuracy effect on doctrine and identification of potential problems and provide solutions and recommendations for implementation.
Attend and provide technical support for Air Force, Joint and Coalition-related multi-TDL meetings.
Additional duties as assigned

Required Skills:
At least 5 years recent experience (within past 10 years) in a job working formal operational and information exchange requirements development as they relate to fighter aircraft tactical data exchange.
At least 5 years recent experience (within past 10 years) in a job performing formal Multi-TDL configuration management (to include development and analysis of complex ICPs), data management, military standards management, and staff processes.
At least 5 years recent experience (within past 10 years) working with and exposure to Joint/Air Force doctrine and the NATO Consultation, Command and Control Board (C3B) and it subcommittees.
Desired Skills:
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications (e.g., Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Access, and Outlook)
Education: Bachelor's degree in a technical field (such as engineering, computer science, etc.) from an accredited institution
Clearance: US Secret and NATO Secret
Travel: 10%
Air Force
EPASS",4.4,"USfalcon
4.4","Hampton, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
225,Data/Business Analyst,"$49k-$73k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Infosys is seeking a Data/Business Analyst. This position’s primary responsibility will be to help clients with strategy definition, value realization, implementation, and operations. The role holder will be a key player in the consulting team that helps discover and define the problem statement, evaluates the solution options and makes recommendations. You will create detailed design, architecture and process artifacts and implement the deployment plan. You will also support knowledge transfer with the objective of providing value-adding consulting solutions that enable our clients to meet the changing needs of the global landscape.

Required Qualifications
• Bachelor’s degree or foreign equivalent required from an accredited institution. Will also consider three years of progressive experience in the specialty in lieu of every year of education.
• At least 4 years of experience in Information Technology.
• Candidate must be willing to relocate to either Cleveland, OH. This position may also require relocation or travel to project locations.
• U.S. citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. are encouraged to apply. We are unable to sponsor at this time.
• Experience as a Data/Business Analyst.
• Certified Scrum Master

Preferred Qualifications
• At least 5 years of experience in a client facing role as Business Analyst/Data Analyst, experience creating requirement specifications documents, BRDs, Functional Specifications documents and interfacing with Business.
• Certified Scrum Master
• Strong SQL and data skills
• Experience in Tools like MS Word, Excel, Power Point, Visio, Project, JIRA, Confluence, SharePoint
• Exposure to various SDLC methodologies
• Dealing with and supporting users including for BAU prod issue
• Strong communication and Analytical skills
• Ability to work in team in diverse/ multiple stakeholder environment
• Experience and desire to work in a Global delivery environment

The job entails sitting as well as working at a computer for extended periods of time. Should be able to communicate by telephone, email or face to face. Travel may be required as per the job requirements.

About Us
Infosys is a global leader in next-generation digital services and consulting. We enable clients in 46 countries to navigate their digital transformation.

With over three decades of experience in managing the systems and workings of global enterprises, we expertly steer our clients through their digital journey. We do it by enabling the enterprise with an AI-powered core that helps prioritize the execution of change. We also empower the business with agile digital at scale to deliver unprecedented levels of performance and customer delight. Our always-on learning agenda drives their continuous improvement through building and transferring digital skills, expertise, and ideas from our innovation ecosystem.

To learn more about Infosys and see our ideas in action please visit us at www.Infosys.com

EOE/Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin",3.2,"Infosys Limited
3.2","Cleveland, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1981,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
226,Senior Data Analyst (Remote/ Virtual),-1,"We Are Hiring

This is your opportunity to join the growing Ascension Data Science Institute!

Remote opportunity!

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

Serves as key resource/SME in collection and analysis of data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports as needed.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
Oversees provision of ad hoc management reports.
May provide leadership, orientation, training, coaching, and mentoring to staff on how to access reports and interpret the data.
Identifies data trends and makes recommendations for quality improvement.
Parses, validates and scrubs data of widely differing formats.
Analyzes structured and unstructured data for business insight.
What You Will Need

Education:

High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required
Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Analytics, Data Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Decision Sciences, Computer or Information Science, Physics, Behavioral and Social Sciences or other related technical or quantitative fields strongly preferred.
Bachelor's level or higher is strongly preferred.
Work Experience:
3 years of experience preferred.
Preferred Skills:
1-3 years experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, QlikView, or Microstrategy
Web and social media analytics
Scripting language experience in Python, R and SQL preferred
Knowledge of and some experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.3,"Ascension
3.3",Missouri,-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
227,Senior Data Analyst,"$73k-$124k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

The Data Analyst will apply expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and data presentation to comprehend and identify trends and will provide technical solutions to a wide range of difficult problems.

The selected candidate will have the unique opportunity to support the customer through the application of programmatic and quantitative methods to identify patterns and relationships in large data sets using mathematical, statistical, and other data-driven analysis to address intelligence questions. The Data Analyst will apply and enhance their skills with developing, running, and analyzing results of complex queries against massive scale data stores/data processing environments.

Basic Qualifications:
The Data Analyst will provide imaginative, thorough, practicable, and consistent solutions with organizational objectives, work under general direction, and determine and develop approaches to solutions independently.
Present findings to both technical and non-technical collaborators and stakeholders.
Gather and analyze data across sources and systems to identify trends and derive recommendations or make predictions.
Generate and compile reports to provide a holistic comprehension of important performance metrics for more informed decision-making.
Position requires a Bachelor's degree.
Position requires five (5) years of related experience.
Experience with All-Source data analysis to perform technical targeting analytic support in the Intelligence Community.
Developing and using computer languages (e.g. Python, R, Pig, Java, C, SQL, ECL) to perform large scale parallel processing of data, and to develop, validate, and use methodologies to support analytic requirements in clustered computing environments.
Knowledge of SQL and databases
Experience using analytic techniques and tools to conduct technical targeting analytic support to the customer.
Ability to collaborate with technical teams to provide solutions.
Experience developing custom algorithms to support analytic requirements against massive data stores.
Desired Skills:
Experience in the Intelligence Community.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI Poly security clearance required.

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
228,Senior Data Analyst,"$40k-$70k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Who We Are

At Christian Care Ministry we believe that Christians can, and should, share in one another's burdens. Through the use of Medi-Share®, a Christian Healthcare Ministry, we cultivate that belief.

The Team

Everyone at Christian Care Ministry agrees to our Statement of Faith which outlines our core beliefs. Although we aren't perfect people, we are serving our perfect God to the best of our ability.

We work hard to serve our members, but know we can only do that if we invest in our employees professionally, financially, physically, and spiritually. Through times of prayer, weekly Chapel services, plenty of professional development, an onsite gym, 401(k) and, great benefits, we purposefully invest in our employees so that our employees can invest in others.

The Role

The Senior Data Analyst conducts statistical analysis and modeling on various datasets across the organization, identifying and presenting actionable analytics and insights to all levels of management. With strong proficiency in several technical coding skillsets, this position is able to write complex, accurate code to extract ministry data for analysis purposes with little supervision. This position also utilizes machine-learning to build models for implementation into production systems that are in line with the business' strategic objectives and values. This role will also demonstrate a good understanding of the business operations and datasets available in the healthcare industry.

In This Role You Will...
Analyze and interprets various types of data across the organization, identifying new metrics for measuring results as well as monitoring current metrics for trends. Ensures that all analysis is actionable for business process owners, enabling leaders of key areas to build, implement and identify solutions to address business performance gaps.
Assists in model development related to pricing and forecasting projects for the ministry.
Support in machine-learning and predictive modeling for various analysis not limited to healthcare cost, care management, sales and marketing, and others as applicable.
Develop and summarize conclusions gained from analyzing data using statistical and visualization tools like Microsoft Excel, SQL, Tableau and others
Builds accurate, complex datasets for use by the ministry, utilizing SQL best practices and adhering to coding standards as set forth by CCM's Data Services team.
Identifies and addresses expected and unforeseen data issues to ensure the accuracy of analytics, ensuring any resulting business decisions are made from accurate findings. In addition, the analyst will work with the data owners/stewards to improve data quality where possible
Effectively communicates and presents relevant findings to all levels of management.
Collaborates effectively inter- and intra-departmentally to assist team in reaching desired outcomes
In This Role You Must Have…
Strong proficiency and knowledge in SQL and Tableau
Strong understanding of modern business analytics technology
Skill in working with large datasets from multiple, seemingly unrelated sources
Advanced Microsoft Office skills including Excel and Powerpoint
Ability to multi-task and work effectively under pressure
Detail-oriented mindset with passion to understand data to ensure accuracy
Ability to effectively and accurately present analytical findings using a variety of tools to senior level management
Strong analytical skills, with the ability to perform complex analysis and make recommendations based on statistical inferences
Strong interpersonal and communication skills, with the ability to lead in projects and work as a team
Ability to extract internal customer's requirements while assessing if the requested criteria will lead to the expected outcome.
Ability to complete projects on or ahead of schedule
Demonstrated ability to think and work independently
Ability to maintain confidentiality
Education and Experience
Bachelor's degree in mathematics, economics, information science, engineering, data science or relevant field
2+ years' relevant working experience
Experience working with Healthcare data is required
Experience with statistical modeling tool(s) required",3.2,"Christian Care Ministry
3.2","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1993,Nonprofit Organization,Religious Organizations,Non-Profit,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
229,IT Metric Data Analyst,"$38k-$67k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Learn, grow, and achieve more with HSA Bank.

HSA Bank has over 20 years of experience in guiding our customers toward sound financial decisions, and we warmly invite you to join us in delivering a genuine, values-based experience to all we serve. Our team takes immense pride in offering our customers financial products designed to protect their health and wealth.

Founded in 1997, we are a leading provider of Health Savings Accounts (HSAs) and other healthcare solutions used by over 35,000 employers and more than 3 million members. HSA Bank is a division of Webster Bank, N.A., a national banking services provider.

Summary:

The IT Metrics Data Analyst is responsible for external reporting on HSA Banks SLAs, internal reporting for required information and/or metrics. This position is responsible for proactively leveraging this data, incidents and system information to a) identify, b) prescribe and c) predict based on the data analysis opportunities for improvements.

Job Responsibilities:

The IT Metrics Data Analyst assists the Change Manager during absences and/or conflicts. This requires the position to understand, facilitate and execute the Change Management functions necessary to support the bank.
Executes the Change Management process tasks in adherence with global and local requirements
Coordinates and manages the Incident Management process activities across departments and ensure meeting SLAs
Escalates risks and issues to the IT Service Delivery Manager
Supports IT reporting (KPIs and customer SLAs)
Assists the Incident Management in ensuring consistent end-to-end application of the Incident Management process
Drives the execution of the Service Level Management process
Is responsible for the complete process adherence to SLAs
Design appropriate metrics for reporting on key performance and quality indicators in relation to IT, particularly in terms of in-depth trend analysis
Integrate with Problem Management performing deep dives on issues, analyzing root cause and provide recommendations for improvements and efficiencies
Creating documentation for advance workflows including monitoring, processing and administrative
Other duties as assigned
Skills/Education:
Minimum 4 years' experience in Service Delivery.
ITIL certification or relevant experience with ITIL implementations required.
Experience with ServiceNow Preferred
Solid leadership and communication skills (written and verbal)
Proven ability to work in a high pressure, client facing environment.
Solid problem-solving skills; must be detailed and results oriented.
Strong time management/planning skills, must be able to allocate resources for a 24x7 on call support environment
SQL Server Studio, EDI, XML, FTP, SCOM, ActiveBatch, BASIC, MS Office Suite
#LI-BY1

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",2.9,"HSA Bank
2.9","Milwaukee, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
230,Senior Data Analyst - CRM,"$44k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Zeta Global CRM division provides email, database and interactive marketing services worldwide to clients, the company’s services include strategic campaign planning and optimization, test design, creative development (including rich media), campaign execution, web application development, research, and advanced analytics.

The Analytics team is currently seeking a Senior Analyst. As a Senior Analyst, you will use a variety of data sources and software tools such as SQL, Excel and internal tools to develop reports and insights based on specification provided by clients or client analytical leads.

Primary Job Responsibilities:
Work with digital marketing and CRM partners to understand clients’ requests, design proper metrics reports and dashboard.
Handle data gathering and analysis construction with a variety of data sources and tools.
Develop reports and customized analysis, data organizing and cleansing, and analysis and presentation
Create easy-to-understand data visualization, presentations and provide logical insights and actionable recommendations to clients.
Work with BI and technical team to prioritize and identify the opportunity to automate reports.
Streamline the reporting process; develop repeatable and scalable process and coding across multiple systems and platforms
Work with various businesses and technical teams to make sure the data presented are accurate and flawless.
Well document the standard reporting or analysis procedures and other necessary documents.
Job Requirements:
Minimum Bachelor’s degree in Computer Programming, Statistics, Marketing Analytics or related technical/quantitative field; Master degree a plus
Minimum 3 years of professional experience in an analytical role (prior experience in Agency/consulting or Email industry a plus), digital marketing, database marketing and web analytics a plus
Experience working in rational database, SQL coding, SAS or R or Python programming and extensive Excel skills
Experience working in BI tools, such as Tableau, Microstrategy, Jasper, etc.
Experience in development, presentation and/or deployment of predictive model and segmentation is strongly preferred; knowledge of Machine Learning approaches a plus
Experience working with 3rd party data providers such as Acxiom, IRI a plus
Able to take broad specifications or requests from client and ask the right “questions” to help fine tune the request to help deliver reporting needs. Be able to conduct data investigation when issue arises both independently and/or working with cross functional technical resources, if required, to solve problem
Good verbal and written communication skills; Attention to details, be able to identify data gaps/abnormality in output
Able to plan, organize, & work on multiple projects at once
#LI-MC1

About Zeta Global
Zeta Global is a data-powered marketing technology company with a heritage of innovation and industry leadership. Founded in 2007 by entrepreneur David A. Steinberg and John Sculley, former CEO of Apple Inc and Pepsi-Cola, the Company combines the industry’s 3rd largest proprietary data set (2.4B+ identities) with Artificial Intelligence to unlock consumer intent, personalize experiences and help our clients drive business growth.

Our technology runs on the Zeta Marketing Platform, which powers ‘end to end’ marketing programs for some of the world’s leading brands. With expertise encompassing all digital marketing channels – Email, Display, Social, Search and Mobile – Zeta orchestrates acquisition and engagement programs that deliver results that are scalable, repeatable and sustainable.

Zeta Global is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, ancestry, color, religion, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, medical condition, disability, veterans status, or any other basis protected by law.

Zeta Global Recognized in Enterprise Marketing Software and Cross-Channel Campaign Management Reports by Independent Research Firm

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-opens-ai--data-labs-in-san-francisco-and-nyc-300945353.html

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-recognized-in-enterprise-marketing-software-and-cross-channel-campaign-management-reports-by-independent-research-firm-300938241.html",3.3,"Zeta Global
3.3","East Lansing, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
231,"Senior Analyst, Quality Assurance (Postsecondary Data Partnership)","$50k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About the Role:


The Senior Analyst, Quality Assurance, (aka Test Designer I) will work with Application Development staff in creating and maintaining a robust quality assurance process for testing Clearinghouse applications. The Test Designer I will be working in an Agile/Scrum environment where the focus is on the teamwork and ownership of each project. The ideal candidate will create and maintain manual and automated tests within the Clearinghouse and will act as a quality advocate within their Scrum team and across the Clearinghouse to ensure QA standards and processes as necessary throughout the Agile SDLC.

How You Contribute:
Work with business partners, product management, and application development to ensure that developed applications and infrastructure changes meet Clearinghouse business needs and deliver business value.
Create and adjust test design strategies, test plans, and test data as needed to meet changing user requirement.
Verify software functionality based on the test strategy and test plans created.
Utilize various software testing methodologies to identify the decision points in the software.
Demonstrate NSC’s competencies, which align with our corporate
Core Competencies include: Customer Focus, Optimizes Work Processes, Collaborates, Communicates Effectively, and Be Open and Authentic.
Manager will provide more detail as needed.
Position may be required to perform other duties as required. These essential functions are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the job. Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform these essential functions.

What You Bring to the Table:
Bachelor’s degree or some equivalent combination of education and experience, including through military service will also be considered.
Proficient in software testing/quality assurance, typically acquired through 8-10 years of experience in a formal testing role.
5+ years of QA SDLC process experience, to include previous experience in test strategy and test plan creation.
2-4 years of experience with the following:
testing web-based applications.
SQL experience, with strong understanding of database structure and design, to include advanced SQL language query skills.
testing data-centric applications, working specifically with data warehouse dimension data.
Demonstrated experience in working within an Agile/Scrum environment.
Experience in planning the implementation of automated test plans and automated testing using either open source or commercial test automation tools.
Knowledge of Database design and usage.
Demonstrated experience with testing data file and job processing on UNIX/Linux server applications.
Must live within a commutable distance of Pittsburgh, PA.
Additional Desired Requirements:
Experience utilizing tools such as Selenium IDE, Selenium Webdriver and API tools (e.g., Rest Assured).
Experience with SauceLabs or other cross browser testing tools.
Experience in testing EDI files and processes, preferably related to Post Secondary Electronic Standards Council (PESC) approved standards.
Experience in testing Business Intelligence tools including visualizations.
Ability to modify and maintain test frameworks via Java coding.
Demonstrated experience in:
Performing cross-browser compatibility testing.
API/web services testing.
Testing integrated 3rd party applications.
Physical Demands:

Use of a computer terminal and/or laptop computer for 8 or more hours a day.
Use of copy machine and telephone.
Frequently required to sit for 7 or more hours per day in close proximity to others in an open office environment.
Occasionally required to use hands and fingers to operate, handle, and reach.
Vision abilities include ability to close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
May be required to work during maintenance windows, provide on-call remote, or 24/7 technical support.
Must be able to travel occasionally via car, train, and airplane to remote data center locations, as needed.",3.0,"National Student Clearinghouse
3.0","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Nonprofit Organization,Colleges & Universities,Education,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
232,"Senior Data Analyst, Project Controls","$66k-$114k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Under the direction of the Senior Manager of Project Controls, the Senior Data Analyst will develop reporting, analyze, evaluate and forecast project controls data. The analyst will also collaborate across San Manuel Band of Mission Indians (SMBMI) & San Manuel Casino (SMC) business operations to gather requirements for report development and/or in depth analysis. Will share activities with project controls team and grow the Project Controls department analytics/BI and process initiatives. The Senior Data Analyst will be required to use independent judgment, provide report and recommendations to Project Controls leadership team.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

1. Responsible for project financial planning and forecasting, report development and automation with visualizations software.

2. Develop automated reporting and adhoc reporting for Project Controls team and leadership as needed (SAS Enterprise Guide).

3. Meets with Project Controls team as necessary to provide information and address departmental issues, such as system interruptions or critical data integrity issues.

4. Define and gather information from Financial system of record as needed to enhance the Project Controls Data Structures.

5. Perform duties such as: validating, financial capital planning, cash flow analytics, break even analysis, creating KPIs, and tracking methodologies.

6. Provide guidance and lead information gathering sessions with Project Managers in adherence to approved project controls policy and procedures.

7. Work closely with Project Managers, Procurement Managers, Financial Analysts, Legal, Finance/Accounting, and Data Services to ensure timely approvals.

8. Perform other duties as assigned to support the efficient operation of the department.

Education/Experience/Qualifications
Bachelors degree in finance, accounting, auditing, or related field required.
Minimum of five (5) years of analytical experience is required.
Demonstrated experience working with relational databases and enterprise reporting tools required.
Experience with software programs Tableau and Lawson is preferred.
Equivalent combination of education and progressive, relevant and direct experience may be considered in lieu of minimum educational/experience requirements indicated above.
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Word, Excel, and Access is required.
Employee must have experience demonstrating the utmost discretion and confidentiality.
Certificates/Licenses/Registrations
At the discretion of the San Manuel Tribal Gaming Commission you may be required to obtain and maintain a gaming license.
A qualified candidate/employee must have a valid drivers license with an acceptable driving record as determined by the companys insurance carrier.
San Manuel Band of Mission Indians and San Manuel Casino will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990

As one of the largest private employers in the Inland Empire, San Manuel deeply cares about the future, growth and well-being of its employees. Join our team today!",3.3,"San Manuel Band of Mission Indians
3.3","Highland, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
233,Data Analyst,-1,"Company*
Juniper is a fast-growing luxury Architectural lighting brand with locations in New York and Connecticut. We serve the high-end Architectural lighting industry; providing innovative, custom solutions to luxury office and hospitality spaces globally.
Job Description: *
The Data Analyst will work under the general direction of the ERP & Inventory Control Manager, responsible for collecting, analyzing, and reporting data to monitor business performance and quality plans to identify improvements; and to ensure the quality and accuracy of that data is used in ways to assist the business make better decisions.
Essential Duties & Responsibilities: *
Collect, interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques.
Provide reports and ongoing results back to the relevant members of the business.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain ERP.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Providing technical support across the company.
Identify areas of improvement in business processes and apply support changes to the organization.
Effectively communicate with outside vendors.
Manage and assist with special projects.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree in Information Management, Computer Science, Business or a related field.
At least two years experience as a Jr. Data Analyst or in a similar role.
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy.
Able to analyze existing tools and databases and provide software solution recommendations.
Strong verbal and written communications skills.
Excellent computer skills.
Able to work independently with minimal supervision.
Able to work in a support team environment.
Benefits: *
Full Health, Dental, and Vision
Paid time off
401K matching plan
Generous bonus plan
Excellent advancement opportunities

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Information Management: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Juniper
3.8","Southington, CT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
234,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

We are seeking individuals to support our logistics analysis activity, to include the following duties:
Review, analyze and extract data from various types of technical (engineering) source material (equipment parts lists, engineering drawings, bills of material)
Migrate data into a relational database tool for additional data development and analysis
Conduct analysis on data and identify additional information required
Extract data using report functions for additional review and/or delivery to customer
Work as an individual or team member on various projects concurrently
Required Skills / Experience:
*US CITIZENSHIP *
Knowledge of MS Office, Excel and MS Access functions for data entry, migration and manipulation
Ability to recognize discrepancies in data (part numbers, names, etc.) from various and multiple sources
Attention to detail, good spelling/grammar
Very accurate typing and data entry skills
Good organizational skills
Ability to take direction both verbal and written from a variety of sources Ability to multi-task and maintain high level of quality and accuracy in a variety of duties
Solid work ethic
Positive attitude
Ability to work remotely or onsite
Additional Skills / Experience
Technical knowledge in mechanical, electrical or electronic design, with an ability to analyze data (including but not limited to: create disassembly or repair instructions)
Familiar with engineering drawings
General understanding of the hierarchy of an assembly and the parts that make up the assembly
Military background - preferred
Willing to travel
Background and drug screen required*
Skills assessments will be administered to candidates as part of the evaluation/interview process

Payrate: $16.00 - $18.00 per hour – depending on experience

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $16.00 - $18.00 per hour

Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
MS Office, Excel and MS Access: 4 years (Required)
Data Analysis Skills: 4 years (Required)
technical knowledge in mechanical, electrical design: 4 years (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Due to government contracts, our client required US Citizenship. Are you a US Citizen?
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Stafkings Personnel Systems,"Endicott, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
235,Sr. Business Analyst/Data Analyst,"$75k-$134k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are looking for an experienced Business Analyst/Data Analyst who is able to turn BI product requirements into custom-formatted data reports. The ideal candidate for this position is able to do a complete life cycle data generation and outline critical information. We also need someone who is able to analyze business procedures and recommend specific types of data that can be used to improve upon them

Primary Responsibilities:

Reporting & Analysis:

+ Enable effective decision making by retrieving and aggregating data from multiple sources, identifying key indicators and actionable insights, and effectively communicating the most important information to drive decisions.

+ Design, develop, and evaluate recurring and ad hoc reporting / dashboards to drive and monitor the business and our products using best practices in data visualization and reporting tools, including Tableau, DataStudio, Power BI or similar.
Process Documentation: Work with various functions and end users to identify, document, and communicate standard business processes.
Project Management: Produce detailed business requirements, coordinate and manage user acceptance test plans, and participate in stakeholder management.
Problem Solving: Demonstrate good judgment in solving problems as well as identifying problems and possible mitigation plans in advance. Strong desire and ability to dive deep into a given problem statement.
Subject Matter Expert: Develop deep knowledge of related sub brands data architecture, system map and relation to product/feature use by customers. Act as a trusted adviser to internal stakeholders by sharing best practices and requirements for optimal use of these systems and data.
Required Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree -5+ years of relevant professional experience as a Business Analyst, Data Analyst, or related role
Expert in SQL
Experience with data visualization and reporting tools like Tableau, DataStudio, PowerBI
Strong business analysis and functional experience, including requirements gathering, creating/deploying solutions to end users, writing user acceptance test scripts and facilitating UAT sessions
Proven ability to manage multiple, competing priorities simultaneously and work well in an ambiguous and dynamic environment. -Ability to use data to develop insights, recommendations, and business cases
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including translating findings into compelling recommendations, polished deliverables, and actionable solutions.
Ability to partner with and communicate across business functions,
Excellent problem-solving skills
Willingness to roll up your sleeves and do whatever is necessary
Preferred Qualifications: *
Proven ability to communicate with business and technical audiences at all levels, including demonstrated success influencing senior leaders and decision-makers
Demonstrated ability to dive deep in understanding our business, projects, and opportunities to improve the outcomes of our largest strategic projects and programs
Experience with open-source data scripting languages (Python, R etc.) or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R, SAS, or Matlab) -Experience with data mining and analytics techniques
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Business Analysis: 7 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"FPT Software
3.3","Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
236,DLP Analyst III (Data Loss Prevention),-1,"Position/Title: DLP Analyst III (Data Loss Prevention)

** NOTE: Must have demonstrated experience with McAfee ePO/HBSS. **

Location: Charlotte, NC (Must be within a few hours of our corporate office in Winston-Salem, NC)

Primary Purpose:

The Data Loss Prevention compliance analyst will be the primary Point of Contact of a critical system and process that will ensure key data is monitored and protected following regulatory and legal compliance standards such as PCI, HIPAA, ISO27001 and NIST Cybersecurity Frameworks. The Compliance Analyst will work with the other members of the team to enhance business practices, internal controls and performs other review related activities to support the execution of the department's annual assessment plan.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Following is a summary of the essential functions for this job. Other duties may be performed, both major and minor, which are not mentioned below. Specific activities may change from time to time.
Monitor the data movement and ensure the security protocols are well designed and in function as per requirement.
Work with Security Architects, Security Analysts, Security Administrators and other IT and business departments to design effective and efficient procedures and controls to meet IT compliance requirements
Monitor the use of the tools and ensure a consistent process of improvement is in place.
Understand Healthcare sector requirements and rules for implementing a DLP solution. Adhere to local policies and laws to ensure data movement is appropriate.
Reviewing BAU processes to ensure they are fit for purpose
Recommend remediation activity for compliance activities found deficient and monitors remediation progress
Provide technical auditing duties as liaison between the IT department and internal and external auditing teams
Review audit trails and access control violations, reporting such violations to Security Analysts and management when necessary
Monitor changes in the IT regulatory and security landscape and reports on the impact of those changes to IT security and operational processes and procedures
Collect and document business requirements for process identification/improvement/automation efforts
Contribute to the development of process improvements
Apply knowledge of key regulations to influence assessment scope
Formulate appropriate conclusions regarding the adequacy of internal controls and procedures based on the assessment work performed and knowledge of company operation, drafts well written, clear and concise finding reports and participates in presenting the findings to the Enterprise Risk & Compliance management
Minimum Skills and Competencies:

The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
8+ years substantive experience with End Point protection tools within a licensed financial institution or a regulatory compliance examiner with a federal or state financial services regulator
Bachelors degree in Computer Science or Computer Information Systems or related or equivalent experience
Demonstrated knowledge of HIPAA, PCI, SOX, ISO27000 and NIST Cybersecurity Frameworks
Excellent communication and writing skills
Demonstrated detailed oriented self-starter and the ability to work independently with limited supervision and limited direction, and in collaborative team environments
A strong ability to multi-task and manage varying priorities and projects
Excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills with the ability to communicate security risk and compliance related concepts to a broad range of technical and non-technical staff
The ability to provide support after normal business hours as needed
Proficient in Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)
Desired Skills:
CIA, CISSP, CISA, CISM, CCRISC, or CGEIT certifications
GRC Tool, Tripwire Enterprise, Tripwire IP360, Nessus, BeyondTrust Retina, Qradar, Trustwave TrustKeeper, Proofpoint, McAfee ePO/HBSS
#LI-PJ1

National General Holdings Corp. is an Equal Opportunity (EO) employer Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of any characteristic protected by law. Candidates must possess authorization to work in the United States, as it is not our practice to sponsor individuals for work visas.

In the event you need assistance or accommodation in completing your online application, please contact NGIC main office by phone at (336) 435-2000.",3.2,"National General Insurance
3.2","Charlotte, NC",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1939,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
237,Senior Health Data Analyst I,"$74k-$127k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Senior Health Data Analyst contributes to the overall success of the organization by developing analytic solutions that support activities related to health services utilization management, care coordination, quality improvement and population health. Through analyzing patient claims, member enrollment, and other data, the Senior Health Data Analyst participates in identifying progress, performance and opportunities for improvement on programs, quality of care, patient experience, and other metrics. The Senior Health Data Analyst requires a thorough understanding of healthcare data and workflows, combined with an extensive experience creating large data sets, conducting statistical data analysis (SAS), and using BI tools (Tableau).

Works closely with other members of the Health Analytics team, as well as the Financial Analytics and Data Warehouse teams to gather key data from various internal and external systems.
Creates data sets, extracts and synthesizes data; conducts and interprets quantitative analyses.
Prepares a variety of reports, including statistical analyses and dashboards that allow key stakeholders to make informed business decisions based on data.
Assists in design and development of data collection strategies, aggregation, analysis, and reporting to ensure data integrity and enhance information value.
Generates a quality work product, presentable for content and audience, in a timely manner while maintaining strong attention to detail.
Manages and prioritizes workload while meeting deliverables and expectations.
Works autonomously and collaboratively with report requestors, providing guidance to define report requirements and validate results.
Works collaboratively across departments to understand and meet analytic needs.
Researches and recommends areas for improvement of data quality and reporting.
Maintains in-depth knowledge of health plan operations, including claims processing, utilization management, quality improvement activities and pay for performance programs
Documents report processes/logic and actively engages in department’s documentation efforts to improve knowledge base of team.
SECONDARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Performs other assigned or needed activities required to assure success of the organization.
Participates in special projects as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned.

Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree with concentration in health informatics, health administration, public health, computing, epidemiology, statistics or related field, Master’s degree preferred. Minimum four (4) years of experience in data analysis and reporting.
Special Skills, Licenses and Certifications
Knowledge of major health plan operations: healthcare claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Excellent knowledge of data collection, analysis, statistics and data presentation with experience in data mining techniques and procedures. Experience using statistical packages for analyzing large data sets. Experience working with administrative data, ideally health care data. Understanding of health data formats including claims, lab and pharmacy. Knowledge of clinical coding systems (e.g., ICD9, ICD10, CPT). Proficiency in inferential and predictive statistical analysis. Proficiency in business software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite, SQL, SAS, and Tableau.
Performance Based Competencies
Must demonstrate strong verbal and written communication skills. Ability to clearly communicate complex information to diverse audiences. Ability to communicate data needs to various customers (internal and external) in order to compile and produce necessary reports. Excellent analytical, problem solving, investigative and research ability. Ability to work in a team environment, take and give direction, follow through with tasks and projects, compromise, negotiate and achieve consensus decisions, support consensus decisions, be flexible and adaptable to changes in assignments and the work environment, work independently, manage time efficiently and multi-task effectively. Ability to make decisions that require significant analysis and investigation with solutions requiring critical thinking. Ability to quickly acquire in-depth knowledge of various systems related to claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits at PHC. Ability to present complex information in an understandable and compelling manner. Ability to interpret and understand technical requirements. Must be highly organized and proficient at multi-tasking. Must be willing and able to provide gracious assistance to users, providers, and other constituents of PHC.
Work Environment And Physical Demands
More than 50% of work time is spent at a video display terminal. May be required to bend, stoop, kneel, crawl, or work in other non-standing and non-sitting positions to install cabling, systems hardware, and other related equipment.
All HealthPlan employees are expected to:
Provide the highest possible level of service to clients;
Promote teamwork and cooperative effort among employees;
Maintain safe practices; and
Abide by the HealthPlan’s policies and procedures, as they may from time to time be updated.
IMPORTANT DISCLAIMER NOTICE
The job duties, elements, responsibilities, skills, functions, experience, educational factors and the requirements and conditions listed in this job description are representative only and not exhaustive or definitive of the tasks that an employee may be required to perform. The employer reserves the right to revise this job description at any time and to require employees to perform other tasks as circumstances or conditions of its business, competitive considerations, or work environment change.",3.5,"Partnership HealthPlan of California
3.5","Fairfield, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
238,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description:

Job Title: Data Analyst

Client: State of Arkansas, Department of Health

Location: Onsite – Little Rock, Arkansas

This is a contract position in Data Analysis. You will be responsible for data cleanup and analysis of covid related data.

Must have:

Excel experience
Data Analysis experience (trends, thresholds, queries, etc)
Data Cleanup experience
Data entry experience
Be able to work Full time, Monday through Friday, 8am-4:30pm with possible weekend work

What you will need to be successful in this role:

Strong Excel and data analysis experience
Strong attention to detail
Ability to handle confidential information with discretion and professionalism
Some understanding of medical terms and terminology is preferred but not required

Sounds Great, Right? Here’s What’s Next

Apply online and our team will contact you ASAP to discuss further!

A Little About Us

Learn about TalenTrust – helping clients find, keep and grow the best people

Read This New Book: Solve the People Puzzle

TalenTrust and our partners are Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employers and welcome all qualified applicants. Applicants will receive fair and impartial consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status.",3.4,"TalenTrust LLC
3.4","Little Rock, AR",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
239,Data Analyst - Client Success,"$55k-$101k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst (Client Success)*
Are you looking to contribute your skill in data analysis to optimize business outcomes for a top performing account management team at a growing, successful company in an exciting, technology-driven industry?

Welcome to ALOM. We are an award-winning global supply chain leader that develops and implements highly optimized product delivery strategies for our customers representing leading brands in the automotive, energy, technology, and medical industries. Every minute of every day ALOM staff and systems affect manufacturing, eCommerce, fulfillment, and logistics operations all over the world. Sound exciting? It is!

See your career grow in an environment where innovative problem solving and professional development are encouraged and the company culture is based upon respect for diversity and operational excellence.

We are currently onboarding new customer programs and hiring to fill a Data Analyst position supporting our Client Success team at our Fremont, CA headquarters.
POSITION OVERVIEW*
The Data Analyst fills a critical life-cycle data generation and business optimization function within our Client Success team. You will support client requirements including data collection, reporting, modeling, research and data analysis to identify useful trends and provide relevant information that will facilitate informed decisions and improve business processes. We are looking for a solution-oriented data analyst with 5 years of job experience and a Bachelor’s degree in information management, computer science or mathematical statistics. We require a candidate that is an effective communicator and organized multi-tasker who can work effectively in both a team oriented environment, and independently in a fast-paced and changing environment. Of course you will be a master of Microsoft Excel including the ability to write macros and do pivot tables. You must also be proficient in Microsoft Office tools, MRP and ERP system operation, and think objectively when interpreting raw data or challenged to identify patterns and project outcomes.

This position is an excellent opportunity to work with a high-performing, world-class team. You will experience the thrill and satisfaction of seeing your research and data analysis in action and positively affecting supply chain operations for many of the world’s leading brands.

Does this sound like the opportunity and challenge you have been looking for to advance your career? If so, we would like to hear from you.

Reports to: Director of Client Success

Key Responsibilities and Job Duties

· Examine and evaluate existing business practices, systems and data, to offer suggestions aimed at creating efficiencies and streamlining operations

· Compile Excel spreadsheets with data, macros, formulas and create visualizations, including dashboards, flowcharts, graphs and reports

· Conduct research into data anomalies or other relevant information related to individual queries or systemic issues

· Apply predictive analysis and tools to forecast and employ business analytics (including an enhanced ability to quantify and qualify data)

· Present findings and relay business concepts clearly via reports, presentations, and verbal communication to colleagues

· Create and design specifications as requested by account management

· Be highly organized and dedicated to quality, safety, and customer satisfaction

ALOM offers competitive salaries and benefits including; medical, dental, vision, life insurance, long term disability, flexible spending, employer HSA contribution, 401(k) with match, vacation, sick leave and PTO. Bottom line; ALOM is a great place to work! If you want to be a part of a growing, firmly established, and success-driven company that values and invests in the development of its staff we encourage you to submit your resume. ALOM was selected as one of The Bay Area News Group's Top 100 Workplaces for the past seven years.

Equal Opportunity Employer

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Analysis: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
alom.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"ALOM Technologies
3.9","Fremont, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
240,Data Integration Analyst,-1,"Data Integration Analyst (Logistics)*
Distribution Technology*
Charlotte, NC*
_JOB DESCRIPTION_*
New Position. Seeking a proven Data Integration Analyst for our Third-Party Logistics operation. The ideal candidate will work with many tasks involving SQL, EDI, SSRS, Data mining and Dashboard reporting. You will be working with both Warehouse Management and Transportation Management Systems. SQL coding over both oracle and SQL data bases.
_ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: _*
Maintain high level of Customer service skill set both internal and external.
Self-starter working independently as well as following instructions with focus and good attention to detail.
Technical and Application Software troubleshooting.
Microsoft Windows and Office support.
Develop strong working knowledge of application software.
Dashboard reporting via SQL.
Interpret retailer routing and instruction guides including EDI requirements.
Manage EDI mapping. Document specifications.
_QUALIFICATIONS: _*
Degree in Technology or Logistics related field or equivalent work experience.
Minimum of (3) year’s SQL coding.
Oracle data base knowledge a plus.
EDI experience is a plus.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Intermediate level knowledge of Microsoft Office products.
Technical and application troubleshooting.
Must be able to travel to all company and outside locations.
Ability to cooperate and communicate effectively, both orally and in writing, with users, technical staff and management.
Linux/Unix is a plus.
Project management
Maintain excellent vendor relationships
_REQUIRED EXPERIENCE: _*
SQL coding
Technology and Application support
Windows and Microsoft Office support
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $52,000.00 - $72,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Location:
Charlotte, NC 28273 (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",4.2,"Distribution Technology
4.2","Charlotte, NC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
241,Client Experience Program Manager (Data Analyst),"$58k-$106k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Alkami builds and delivers the nation’s most innovative cloud-based digital banking (online and mobile apps) for Credit Unions and Banks with over 6M users on our platform. Through our bold investments in technology and people, our clients confidently grow, adapt quickly and build thriving digital banking communities to compete against the Megabanks. Founded 10 years ago with headquarters in Plano, Alkami is one of the fastest growing software companies in Texas and among the fastest growing privately held technology companies in the U.S. To share just a few of our recent recognitions: Best Place to Work in Fintech; Inc. 500 America’s Fastest-Growing Private Companies; Deloitte Technology Fast 500; Tech Titans Top 5; and, SMU Cox Caruth Institute Dallas 100. With every Alkamist having ownership in Alkami, we are obsessively intentional about our culture: optimistic-perseverance, caring-collaboration, transparent-communication, courageous-innovation, trusted-accountability and real-fun. Beyond intentional culture, our commitment is to attract and retain amazing talent by fostering a high-growth, dynamic and rewarding environment; providing great benefits; making meaningful investments in learning and development; offering free lunches every work day; celebrating our successes together in remarkable ways; and, ACTing together by taking time to give back and volunteer.

Position Overview

The Program Manager, Client Experience is a key position to help Alkami maintain very high levels of client satisfaction. Reporting to the Chief Delivery Officer, the role is intended to measure and trend client satisfaction and then drive necessary cross-functional initiatives throughout the company. It will partner very closely with Client Success, Implementations, Support, Product, Engineering and Sales to ensure Alkami focuses its efforts on those things that ensure our remarkable clients have a gold standard experience. This role is data-driven and execution focused.

Key Responsibilities& Duties
Partner with Client Success to administer recurring Client Satisfaction (CSAT) and Net Promoter Score (NPS) surveys. Using data driven methodologies, publish results and carefully analyze data to identity trends or key focus areas.
Evolve Alkami CSAT measurement methodologies and implement new best practices and innovative methods of collecting data over time.
Leveraging insights learned from surveys, interviews, scorecards and other client feedback mechanisms, oversee a program portfolio of cross-functional initiatives designed to improve client satisfaction. Complete ongoing reporting and presentations intended to update key stakeholders.
Initiate and lead a Client Experience Feedback Group intended to give participating clients a voice in the Alkami improvement initiatives.
Work collaboratively with Alkami teams to identify and implement measures intended to consistently improve the client experience.
Raise organizational awareness about the Alkami client experience and help foster a culture where every Alkamist sees themselves a part of“client success”.
Present results and recommendations to key stakeholders which may possibly include, Alkami leadership, the Client Advisory Board and the Board of Directors.
Qualifications:
Love of data and an understanding of how it informs decision-making and can transform a business. Possess a track record of leveraging insight and data analysis to determine ways to exceed client expectations.
Familiarity with client success metrics including CSAT, NPS, health scores, churn risk and be a constant learner about changing trends and new ways to be innovative.
Direct experience analyzing data sets and mining for trends or key highlights related to client satisfaction measurement.
Experience working within an external client facing organization.
Demonstrated experience leading projects or initiatives directly with external clients.
Proven experience in managing a portfolio of projects across multiple functions with a track record of successfully improving the client experience.
Ability to build strong internal and external relationships .
Strong verbal and written communication skills with particular experience presenting complex data sets in easy to understand ways.
Comfort with ambiguity and an ability to work independently with a high degree of autonomy.
Desired Skills:
B2B SaaS experience.
Agile software development methodology familiarity.
Cool Things to Know
Not Just Any Company: Alkami has an awesome diverse and inclusive environment. We have a FUN culture and offer great benefits. Did you know every Alkamist has ownership in Alkami? We also have on and off site employee events and activities.
Free Lunch: Who said there is no free lunch? At Alkami, every day we offer free lunch
Relocation: Unfortunately we don't offer relocation assistance. We are ready for you to contribute from our super cool Plano, TX location.
Work Authorization: We cannot offer employer sponsorship at this time; candidates must be eligible to work in the US for full-time employment.
Recruiters: We are not looking for outside recruiting firms to help us in this search— we know who you are and we love you, but we don’t need you right now.
The Important Stuff

Alkami Technology is an Equal Opportunity Employer and Prohibits Discrimination and Harassment of Any Kind:Alkami is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Alkami are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV Status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Alkami will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Alkami encourages applicants of all ages.",4.3,"Alkami Technology
4.3","Plano, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
242,Data Analyst/Tableau,"$48k-$87k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Data Analyst II.
Job Summary: *
Responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external data) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies. Identifies and compiles data sets using a variety of tools (e.g. SQL, Access) to help predict, improve, and measure the success of key business to business outcomes. Responsible for documenting data requirements, data collection/processing/cleaning, and exploratory data analysis; which may include utilizing statistical models/algorithms and data visualization techniques. Incumbents in this role may often be referred to as Data Scientists.
Responsibilities: *
Day-to-day actions are focused on administering defined procedures, analysis and report preparation.
Commands knowledge of data elements across the enterprise and industry – definitions, lineage and usage
Executes creation of tabular operational reports and aggregation reports with medium to high complexity.
Commands intermediate to expert level t-SQL coding proficiency
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Responsible for documenting metadata, data lineage, data definitions and business glossary entries.
Handles basic data transformation tasks such as date and decimal formatting, rounding of numeric values, and conversion of numeric values to percentages.
Has intermediate to expert level SSIS ETL build proficiency
Works with Data stewards to enforce adherence to standards for enhancements and new repositories.
Handles more complicated report requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing (e.g. Fibonacci or similar) and trend analysis.
Can deduce portfolio or market trends from reports or chart analysis.
Understands business logic for aggregation and analysis services.
Can perform data transformation and can produce dimensional reports
Can perform basic data profiling activities, understands cardinality
Helps to define guidelines for data management, governance and reporting
May direct day-to-day work of employees, but will not typically have formal management role.
Individual at this level is expected to use some independence of thought but to refer more complex problems to supervisors or other experts.
Individual would be expected to contribute to work flow or process change and redesign and to form a strong basic understanding of the specific product or process.
Qualifications: *
Typically exhibits strong executional capabilities and is beginning to take on more responsibility.
Primary focus is on execution within defined parameters, with some expansion based on developing capabilities and or experiences. In partnership with more experienced staff.
Minimum of 5 years of experience.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, finance, mathematics, statistics (or similar) or equivalent work experience
Total Rewards: *
Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Tableau: 5 years (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply",2.5,"Cenlar FSB
2.5","Ewing, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
243,Data Informatics Analyst,-1,"You could say Brightree by ResMed is a technology company. And that’s true. But Brightree is, at its heart, about people. We develop innovative, end-to-end technology solutions and services for people facing everyday challenges in the post-acute care industry. Brightree helps streamline processes, improve efficiency, and increase profitability. For over fifteen years, organizations big and small have put their trust in us—for our wide-ranging solutions, our leadership, and our unmatched customer service. Going to work each day and creating new ways to positively impact our customers’ businesses and the lives of patients is just what we do. Because Brightree is, after all, about people.

To learn more about Brightree technology and solutions watch this short video by our CEO: https://vimeo.com/293016800

.

Let's talk about your responsibilities:
Work on a team of co-located Data Architects, Business Analysts and Engineers on the Advanced Analytics solution.
Collaborate with Product Owners and Technical Directors to align priorities and approach employing agile software development methodologies.
Partner with key stakeholders (internal and external) to interpret, define, and document requirements
Create data cubes within a SQL Datawarehouse, schedule the import of those cubes into a Business Intelligence tool.
Design BI dashboards and reports.
Coordinate with DBAs to derive data from various source systems
Be cognizant of internal and external customer’s expectations on timelines and work diligently towards achieving that goal
Partner with multiple stakeholders to deliver Ad Hoc reporting and analytics as requested
Effectively communicate with internal and external customers in non-technical language
Identify and communicate the potential for enhanced business opportunities based on data
Design, implement, and support Brightree Data architectures applying standards for security (HIPAA/HITRUST), scalability, performance, and reliability.
Load domain-specific data marts for consumption by analytic processes, reporting, and BI tools.
Ensure security and availability of information for our analytics consumers.
Collaborate effectively with stakeholders and subject matter experts to define and interpret requirements in non-technical language.
Be a key contributor in democratizing Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence innovation initiatives.
Leverage data to identify trends and patterns to articulate ROI for Brightree products and services.
Deliver Ad Hoc reporting and analytics as needed.
Commit to timelines and exceed customer expectations.
Let's talk about skills and qualifications:
2+ years experience
Passionate about people, learning, data, and creating business impact.
Fascinated by data and find reward in the analysis of business data/metrics to identify trends and implement solutions.
Creative, analytic problem solver with diligent attention to detail.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to collaborate on solutions and develop successful business partner relationships at all levels of an organization
Exposure to data management technologies including SQL Databases, data warehouses, data lakes, data marts, and NoSQL data stores.
Experience writing T-SQL and performance tuning queries.
Experience working with BI Tools (such as Tableau, Power BI, Sisense)
Experience with Sisense strongly preferred
Experience working with cloud technologies (Azure) a plus.
Experience in programming/scripting languages a plus; such as R, Python, NodeJS, AngularJS, VueJS, and .NET core.
Experience in Healthcare IT a plus.
Bachelor's degree in any technology discipline, or equivalent experience.
#LI-DF1

Joining us is more than saying “yes” to making the world a healthier place. It’s discovering a career that’s challenging, supportive and inspiring. Where a culture driven by excellence helps you not only meet your goals, but also create new ones. We focus on creating a diverse and inclusive culture, encouraging individual expression in the workplace and thrive on the innovative ideas this generates. If this sounds like the workplace for you, apply now!",3.5,"Brightree
3.5","Peachtree Corners, GA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
244,Clinical Data Analyst (PharmD or PhD Required),"$29k-$55k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview

DRT Strategies delivers expert management consulting and information technology (IT) solutions to large federal agencies, the U.S. Navy, state and local government and commercial clients in health care, technology, and the financial services industries.

The three letters of our name, DRT, stand for Driving Resolutions Together, which is the core philosophy on which the company was founded. That is, we collaborate with our clients to solve their most pressing IT challenges - together.

We are problem solvers dedicated to your success, combining Fortune 500 experience with small business responsiveness. We have established a reputation with our clients as a forward-thinking consulting firm with demonstrated success in implementing solutions that lead to meaningful results. Our world-class consultants unite people to work collaboratively to achieve project goals and make your vision a reality.

Project Summary

This project will support the Office of New Drugs within FDAs Center for Drug Evaluation and Research (CDER). Specifically, this project will support ONDs Integrated Review for Drug Marketing Applications program by providing comprehensive safety data analyses for new drug applications (NDAs) and biologics license applications (BLAs) in collaboration with clinical reviewers.

Position Summary

The clinical data analyst position interacts with many FDA stakeholders across several Offices and Centers specifically with clinical reviewers (Medical Officers) and statistical reviewers. This role will be responsible for reviewing safety data sufficiency and integrity, conducting safety data analyses, verifying safety data submitted by the applicant, and generating high-quality scientific reports.

Responsibilities
Develop safety data analysis plans (SDAPs) with clinical reviewers in advance of initial scoping meetings. Execute SDAPs in support of marketing application review process.
Provide written reports regarding assessment of safety data sufficiency, integrity, and quality to clinical review teams
Perform comprehensive safety data analyses and provide written reports containing standardized safety tables and figures to clinical review teams
Conduct in-depth safety analyses for specific safety signals as requested by clinical review teams
Verify safety data submitted by the applicant in the proposed drug label, clinical study report, and integrated summary of safety
Lead meetings with clinical reviewers and statistical reviewers to present results from data quality assessments and standard safety data analyses
Collaborate with CDER OND staff to optimize team processes and deliverables
Work with FDA stakeholders to review background packages and mock safety datasets to assess appropriateness of controlled terminology and safety dataset structure
Manage, organize, and update SharePoint sites
Assist in overall project support, as needed
Required Experience
2+ years of relevant experience in STEM disciplines: bioinformatics, Public Health, Pharmacology, Toxicology, Biology, Biomedical Engineer, biology, biostatistics, computer science, epidemiology, health informatics, or pharmaceutical science
Technical proficiency in programming languages, Python and R
Strong analytical and statistical skills to assess safety data
Excellent organizational, time management, verbal and written communication skills
Ability to independently manage a variety of projects with frequent interruptions and shifting priorities
Ability to organize a continuous flow of work in a timely manner and meet mandatory deadlines
Computer skills: MS Office Suite (particularly PowerPoint, Word, Excel), Adobe Acrobat
Ability to work independently within a multidisciplinary team
Preferred Experience
Experience and/or knowledge of analytical software including JReview, JMP, JMP Clinical, etc.
Working experience at FDA
Familiarity with FDA regulatory process
Experience in clinical trials, especially statistical hypothesis testing methods
Managerial experience - leading and mentoring a team
Education and Training
PharmD or PhD
Presently, due to the COVID-19 pandemic, DRT employees are teleworking from home and leveraging video conferencing along with other virtual productivity tools. During normal circumstances, the requirement of this position is to be onsite, however, DRT has not yet determined when employees will be required to return to their workspaces. Please be aware that at the time a date is determined, the requirement of this position will be to report to the worksite.

DRT Strategies, Inc. (DRT) celebrates diversity and is proud to provide Equal Employment Opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, genetics, disability, or protected veteran status. In addition to federal law requirements, DRT complies with applicable state and local laws governing non-discrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities.

Powered by JazzHR",4.2,"DRT Strategies, Inc.
4.2","Silver Spring, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
245,"Nurse Informatics Data Analyst, Biomedical Informatics","$35k-$61k
(Glassdoor Est.)","JOB SUMMARY:

This role bridges the gap between business end-users, clinical data scientists, leadership, and medical informatics to support development of systems for both operations and research purposes. Supports customer use of electronic health record and other technology and associated workflows, including troubleshooting when issues arise, under occasional guidance. Educates customers on use of sound informatics principles, including but not limited to problem shaping, design requirements, change management, etc. Gathers and integrates appropriate data, conducts analyses using SQL, and provides manual chart review and annotation.

Department/Unit Summary:

The mission of the Vanderbilt Department of Biomedical informatics has complementary themes that include education, research, service, and a commitment to our colleagues in our own institution and around the world. The Educational Mission is to educate undergraduate, graduate, and postgraduate trainees in the theory and practice of biomedical informatics. The Research and Service Mission is to develop and evaluate innovative technologies for the storage, retrieval, dissemination, and application of biomedical knowledge, in order to support clinical practice, biomedical research, life-long learning, and administration and as a result, to contribute to the professional body of knowledge in the field of biomedical informatics. The Professional and Ethical Mission is to maintain cooperation and collegiality with all those who learn and work with us locally, nationally, and internationally; and, to develop and disseminate ethical and professional standards for the conduct of biomedical informatics research and for the use and evaluation of health care informatics applications.

Position Shift:
Day Shift/ Exempt Position
Click here to view how Vanderbilt Health employees celebrate the difference they make every day:

Celebrate 2019

Click Here To View The VUMC Promise of Discovery

Discover Vanderbilt University Medical Center:

Located in Nashville, Tennessee, and operating at a global crossroads of teaching, discovery and patient care, VUMC is a community of individuals who come to work each day with the simple aim of changing the world. It is a place where your expertise will be valued, your knowledge expanded and your abilities challenged. It is a place where your diversity — of culture, thinking, learning and leading — is sought and celebrated. It is a place where employees know they are part of something that is bigger than themselves, take exceptional pride in their work and never settle for what was good enough yesterday. Vanderbilt’s mission is to advance health and wellness through preeminent programs in patient care, education, and research.

VUMC Recent Accomplishments

Because we are committed to providing the best in patient care, education and research, we are proud of our recent accomplishments:

· US News & World Report: #1 Adult Hospital in Tennessee and metropolitan Nashville, named to the Best Hospitals Honor Roll of the top 20 adult hospitals, 10 nationally ranked adult specialty programs, with 3 specialties rated in the top 10 nationally, Monroe Carell Jr. Children’s Hospital at Vanderbilt named as one of the Best Children’s Hospital in the nation, with 10 out of 10 pediatric specialties nationally ranked.

· Healthcare’s Most Wired: Among the nation’s 100 “most-wired” hospitals and health systems for its efforts in innovative medical technology.

· Becker’s Hospital Review: named as one of the “100 Great Hospitals in America”, in the roster of 100 Hospitals and Health Systems with Great Oncology Programs and to its list of the 100 Hospitals with Great Heart Programs.

· The Leapfrog Group: One of only 10 children’s hospitals in the to be named at Leapfrog Top Hospital.

· American Association for the Advancement of Science: The School of Medicine has 112 elected fellows

· Magnet Recognition Program: Received our third consecutive Magnet designations.

· National Academy of Medicine: 22 members, elected by their peers in recognition of outstanding achievement

· Human Rights Campaign Healthcare Equality Index: 6th year in a row that Vanderbilt University Medical Center was a Leader in LGBTQ Healthcare Equality.

Additional Key Elements/ Responsibilities:

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Analyzes and annotates complex medical charts using technical experience and clinical judgement to trace data quality issues or leverage data/information to improve outcomes or create new knowledge to advance patient care. Identifies data quality trends through chart review and provides this to leadership to address.
Utilize multiple sources of data including tools to analyze and resolve problems.
Develops work plans to ensure analysis is completed accurately and on time.
Gathers and integrates appropriate data and conducts analyses using SQL.
Chooses or develops appropriate data collection tool, output/visualization for the end-user or leadership, and communicates findings effectively.
Under minimal supervision, provides a single point of contact to partner with customers in defining issue, scope and objectives.
Ensures adherence to the highest of quality standards and maintains appropriate documentation.
Collaborates with ETL and QA teams, VUMC stakeholders, subject matter experts, end-users, and third-party application experts to support business needs.
Acts as liaison between operations, research teams and medical informatics departments and performs analysis of needs for new services or enhancements.
Assists with submission of IT enhancement requests and guiding those requests through the process on behalf of customers. Assists ETL team and leadership in analyzing customer requests for changes or enhancements to production. Communicates with clients and conducts fact gathering sessions for enhancements. Handles simple root cause analysis of business data issues and provides clinical data guidance to non-clinical computer scientists on more complex issues.
Competently identifies data mapping gaps and provides data requirements.
Assists with improvements in workflows and processes with technology components through workflow gap analysis and current state and future state planning. Identifies new opportunities to optimize content delivery and improve user experience via content mapping efforts
Supports data use workflows by coaching customers thru processes to troubleshoot and resolve technological or clinical considerations in collaboration with other teams as appropriate.
Collects data and information pertinent to the situation and uses effective communication to define issues and problems. Identifies key stakeholders.
Utilizes current evidences based nursing knowledge, including research findings to guide practice.
Works on projects and work groups. Lead small area-based projects with oversight from manager or director.
The responsibilities listed are a general overview of the position and additional duties may be assigned.

CORE ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Organizational Impact: Delivers job responsibilities that impact own job area/team with some guidance.
Problem Solving/ Complexity of work: Uses existing procedures, research and analysis to solve standard job related problems that may require some judgement.
Breadth of Knowledge: Requires subject matter knowledge within a professional area to meet job requirements.
Team Interaction: Individually contributes to project/ work teams.

Position Qualifications:

· Bachelor's Degree (or equivalent experience) and 2 years experience required. (**3 years of experience in information technology and clinical healthcare operations strongly preferred**)

Registered Nurse License Required
CA
IND000
NHCN
Basic Qualifications

Additional Qualification Information:

• Current RN license in state of TN (Required) • Bachelor’s Degree in Nursing (Required)• Master’s Degree in Nursing Informatics (Preferred)• Experience in information technology and clinical healthcare operations. (Required)• Experience conducting manual chart reviews and conducting annotation on electronic health records (Preferred)• Experience or desire to learn to work with relational databases using SQL and assisting in the development and curation of clinical data. (Preferred)• Understanding of the extract, transform, load (ETL) and Quality Assurance (QA) process. (Preferred)• Certification- American Nurses Credentialing Center (ANCC) - Nursing Informatics or CPHIMS (Preferred)

Physical Requirements/Strengths needed & Physical Demands:

Sedentary category requiring exertion up to 10 lbs. of force occasionally and uses negligible amounts of force to move objects. Sedentary work involves sitting most of the time.

Movement

Occasional: Standing: Remaining on one's feet without moving.
Occasional: Walking: Moving about on foot.
Occasional: Lifting under 35 lbs: Raising and lowering objects under 35 lbs from one level to another
Occasional: Carrying under 35 lbs: Transporting an object holding in hands, arms or shoulders, with help of coworkers or assistive device.
Occasional: Push/Pull: Exerting force to move objects away from or toward.
Occasional: Bending/Stooping: Trunk bending downward and forward by bending spine at waist requiring full use of lower extremities and back muscles
Occasional: Reaching above shoulders: Extending arms in any direction above shoulders.
Occasional: Handling: Seizing, holding, grasping, turning or otherwise working with hand or hands.
Frequent: Sitting: Remaining in seated position
Frequent: Reaching below shoulders: Extending arms in any direction below shoulders.
Frequent: Bimanual Dexterity: Requiring the use of both hands.

Sensory

Continuous: Communication: Expressing or exchanging written/verbal/electronic information.
Continuous: Auditory: Perceiving the variances of sounds, tones and pitches and able to focus on single source of auditory information
Continuous: Vision: Clarity of near vision at 20 inches or less and far vision at 20 feet or more with depth perception, peripheral vision, color vision.
Continuous: Smell: Ability to detect and identify odors.

Environmental Conditions",3.7,"Vanderbilt University Medical Center
3.7","Nashville, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1874,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
246,Healthcare Data Analyst,"$42k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview: *
Recovery Centers of America is looking for an experienced Healthcare Data Analyst to join the Operations Team. Goal of position will be to gather and analyze healthcare data from multiple sources and deliver actionable insights that will guide organization to make well informed decisions. This position will also support Operations and EHR team in development of business requirements and UAT testing for system enhancements and product improvements.
Specific Responsibilities**: *
Designs, develops, maintains, and validates business intelligence and analytics capabilities/tools in support of company’s goals of improving quality/access and reducing costs.
Performs ad hoc analysis from initial ask to delivery, including preliminary conversations with end users, data extractions from various data sources, data visualization, and narrative analysis.
Collaborate with team members to collect and analyze data
Establish KPI’s to measure the effectiveness of business decisions
Structure large data sets to find usable information
Create presentations and reports based on recommendations and findings
Ability to gather and analyze data to solve complex problems and evaluate scenarios to make predictions on future outcomes and support decision making
Leverages thorough understanding of business process and system processes to make recommendations and propose technical/non-technical solutions to meet business requirements
Translate story boards and metrics into technical requirements from which to develop insightful solutions
Work independently as well as in a team to deliver end-to-end analytic solutions within tight deadlines
Ensure quality of deliverables using development testing methods, code reviews and user acceptance testing
Able to adapt quickly to new technologies to create the most insightful analytics for the business need
Strong and effective inter-personal and communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group of clients and staff, including management and senior level executives
Analytical mind with problem-solving aptitude
Offer suggestions on ways to improve healthcare delivery, quality, and cost effectiveness for client health plan populations
Responsible for tracking on-going outcomes reports and manage priorities for upcoming reports
· Work closely with the EHR team to understand the workflows and data points that exist in the EHR system, myAvatar.

· Responsible for UAT testing in the EHR to ensure enhancements/product improvements being delivered meet business requirements and delivers on business needs.
Required Education and Experience: *
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Operations Research, Economics, Management Science, Mathematics, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, or similar field preferred
Experience in data analysis
Technical writing skills
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Experience working in healthcare setting required
Experience in interpreting data and making the outcomes actionable
Experience developing and deploying BI Solutions with at least one of the following applications: QlikView, Qlik Sense, Microsoft Power BI, Tableau preferred
Proficiency in SQL database design and SQL programming, including stored procedure and table joins preferred
Excellent oral, written, and presentation communication skills
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.4,"Recovery Centers of America
3.4","King of Prussia, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
247,DATA ANALYST/PROVISIONING,"$40k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Oshkosh Defense, an Oshkosh company

Oshkosh Defense stands behind those who dedicate their lives to protecting others. As an industry-leading tactical vehicle manufacturer, every day we strive to meet or exceed our customers' ever-changing needs with next generation defense technologies and advanced systems. We operate with unparalleled commitment to those who depend on our products and services worldwide to perform their missions.

JOB SUMMARY

Develop or supervise logistics support subcontractor development of all ILS contract deliverables for provisioning, associated parts lists, associated support documentation, computer programs and parts catalogs. Interface with the customer to deliver, review, and sell these contract deliverables.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES
Completely understand and use ILS military specifications and associated computer programs.
Understand and implement all contract variations to the basic provisioning and parts catalog specifications and associated computer programs.
Obtain a complex set of source materials required for the development of all ILS deliverables from all vendors, Oshkosh engineering, and Oshkosh purchasing to include supplier cost information.
Supervise or computer load and process all materials developed and maintain complex customer based computer program through Oshkosh-based ILS computer programs, meeting with the customer to resolve problems.
Maintain all data current with changes and record all change in program configuration control document.
Review data against repair and overhaul manuals, drawing packages, and hardware to assure consistency of all ILS contract deliverables.
Identify and cost ILS impact for all changes affecting provisioning, computer program outputs, and parts catalogs.
Maintain JDE 7.3 item master, bills of materials, cross reference and branch plants.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in mathematics, statistics or like field.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS

· Proficient with Microsoft Excel

· Advanced database software knowledge (ie: Access, Maple)

· Numeric Data Entry Experience

· FEDLOG, Logicom and Logistic Information Warehouse (LIW) a plus
OSK100
LI-TLD1
Oshkosh is committed to working with and offering reasonable accommodation to job applicants with disabilities. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to disability for any part of the employment process, please contact us at: 920-502-3009 or corporatetalentacquisition@oshkoshcorp.com.

Oshkosh Corporation is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. This company will provide equal opportunity to all individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status. Information collected regarding categories as provided by law will in no way affect the decision regarding an employment application.

Oshkosh Corporation will not discharge or in any manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with Oshkosh Corporation's legal duty to furnish information.

Certain positions with Oshkosh Corporation require access to controlled goods and technologies subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulations or the Export Administration Regulations. Applicants for these positions may need to be ""U.S. Persons,"" as defined in these regulations. Generally, a ""U.S. Person"" is a U.S. citizen, lawful permanent resident, or an individual who has been admitted as a refugee or granted asylum.",4.2,"Recovery Centers of America
3.4","Oshkosh, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
248,"Product Data Analyst, International","$48k-$90k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Car shopping is complicated. At CarGurus, we use data and technology to make it simple, giving people the tools they need to confidently find, buy, finance, or sell a car. The best part? Our work makes a real impact. We're the most-visited car-shopping site in the US and we are growing fast in our international markets. Ready to come along for the ride?

About the Role

At CarGurus we use data, not hunches, to inform decisions. Product Analysts play a key role in crafting the data narrative for these decisions. We love to collaborate, we're excited by a challenge, and we believe that ownership enables us to grow.
This Product Analyst role will support the growing International team where you will have opportunities for outsized positive impact through a high level of autonomy as we further develop our Canadian and UK markets. We are looking for thoughtful, daringly curious candidates who can dive into complex data and draw insightful conclusions. You'll work cross-functionally with many departments and stakeholders, and gain exposure to multiple dimensions of the business.

Our team values diversity in experience and backgrounds—we do our best work when we create space for different voices and perspectives. Whatever unique experiences or skill sets you bring, we look forward to learning from each other.

What You'll Do:
Conduct exploratory data analysis across disparate data sources (spanning website usage, dealer behavior, customer activity and more) to understand the performance of existing UK and Canadian products, target opportunities for new product offerings, and map user journeys throughout the website.
Analyze Canadian and UK user behavior via A/B testing, to identify winning product changes unique to each market.
Partner with the product, engineering, marketing, sales, and finance departments to grow our business, including recommending and advocating for performance improvement ideas unique to the international setting.
Define metrics to evaluate business performance, products and experiments; build reports and dashboards to monitor and understand them
Communicate and present data analysis, visualizations, and insights to key stakeholders
Be a voice and advocate for using data to improve the quality of our decision-making
Who You Are:
1-3 years of experience in data analysis (experience in consumer internet, digital marketing or SaaS product data a plus)
Fluency in SQL
Understanding of statistical concepts
Demonstrated ability in learning new reporting or BI tools
Ability to work independently and in a cross-functional setting
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
CarGurus Culture:

At CarGurus, we invest in our people's professional growth with everything from learning and development programs to tuition reimbursement. Want to work on projects that expand your skill set without sacrificing your work/life balance? You got it. We also strive to provide perks and benefits that employees actually care about like free lunch, commuter subsidies, and more. That includes equity in the company—our way of showing that we want you here for the long haul.

We work hard every day to build the world's most trusted and transparent automotive marketplace, but trust and transparency don't just apply to our consumers. They extend to our talent, too. We aim to create a workplace where everyone feels they can bring the ultimate expression of themselves and their potential—where you don't just fit, you thrive. We don't discriminate based on race, colour, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

In addition to the US, CarGurus operates sites in Canada and the UK. We have offices in Cambridge, MA; Detroit, MI; Dublin, Ireland; San Francisco, CA and London, UK. Check out our careers page to learn more.",3.9,"CarGurus
3.9","Cambridge, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
249,Data Quality Analyst Lead (SAT/PHX and/or Remote),"$80k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Purpose of Job CANDIDATE WILL BE REQUIRED TO WORK IN THE SAN ANTONIO, TX HOME OFFICE/PHOENIX CAMPUS AND/OR A 100% REMOTE WORK ENVIRONMENT MAY BE CONSIDERED

Manages and analyzes information using a variety of techniques and tools in alignment with USAA's Enterprise Information Standards. This role may be responsible for one or more information management function noted below:
Metadata includes defining and documenting data ensuring the information is understood. This may include working with project teams or support teams to define, redefine, or continue maintenance of the metadata.
Data Quality includes defining data quality rules ensuring data is measured and trusted. This may include working with project teams to define data quality requirements as well as ensuring ongoing assessments of data quality.
Information Lifecycle Management includes archiving and purging of data to meet the needs of the business while reducing corporate risk.
Data Security and Privacy includes managing the security of data access as well as privacy of data sharing in compliance with external regulations and internal policies. This may include working with other departments to ensure compliance to GBLA, FCRA, PCI DSS, etc.
Master Data and Reference Data includes managing key corporate data to ensure the organization can manage its operations with accurate and consistent information.

Job Requirements

About USAA
USAA knows what it means to serve. We facilitate the financial security of millions of U.S. military members and their families. This singular mission requires a dedication to innovative thinking at every level.

In each of the past five years, we've been a top-40 Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work For®, and we've ranked among Victory Media's Top 10 Military Friendly® Employers 13 years straight. We embrace a robust veteran workforce and encourage veterans and veteran spouses to apply.

USAA Careers - Award Winning Workplace (17 seconds)
USAA Careers – World Class Benefits (31 seconds)

Leverages expert data management knowledge to support in one or many of the information management functions.

Tasks may include any of the items noted below:

General
Identify and implement process improvements Lead discussions with cross-functional teams on complex problems Oversee alignment of best practices and tools based on business needs.

Metadata and Data Quality Support
metadata repository maintenance, access requests, and proper metadata association Review, validate, and record metadata and data quality information.
Development of definitions, data quality rules, thresholds, and standard metrics of quality for data elements that support critical business processes.
Development of controls to mitigate data quality risks including data quality plan development, monitoring data quality results, reports and dashboards for high risk issues.
Define and oversee high risk data quality corrective action plans.
Oversee data quality compliance assessment process.

Information Lifecycle Management
Oversee archiving and purging activities of data
Develop archiving and purging strategies and processes
Oversee ILM compliance assessment process identifying items that may be a risk to the corporation.

Data Security and Privacy
Manage Data Access security as needed
Support Privacy initiatives through analysis of sensitive data
Ensure sensitive data is accessed and shared in accordance to policies and processes.

Master and Reference Data
Develop Master and Reference Data processes and procedures to align with Enterprise Policies and Standards
Create and maintain reference data in accordance to processes and procedures.
Ensure quality and maintenance of master data.

Minimum Education:
Bachelor's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or 4 years work experience in data management, data quality or business application function or related experience can be substituted in lieu of a degree in addition to the minimum years of work experience required. (12yrs total experience in lieu of a degree)
OR
A Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline
OR
A PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline

Minimum Experience:
8 or more years of experience in one or more information management functions below and any relevant tools
Metadata
Data Quality including metrics, dashboards, advance knowledge of frequency and duplicate analysis, cross dataset dependencies, orphan 'child data' rows, redundancy analysis, etc.
Information Lifecycle Management including archiving, purging, content and document management
Master and Reference Data
Data Security & Privacy
OR
Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline PLUS 6 or more years of experience in a data management/quality analytic function.
OR
Master's Degree and PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline PLUS 5 or more years’ experience in a data management/quality analytic function.
Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*
When you apply for this position, you will be required to answer some initial questions. This will take approximately 5 minutes. Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not be able to change your responses.

Preferred Experience
Advanced SQL or SAS programming skills
Experience mentoring/leading junior team members, prioritizing work items, and establishing/executing peer review processes
Strong technical acumen; previous experience working on or in support of a data and analytics team
Excellent attention to detail and ability to create synergies/draw connections across multiple platforms/disparate systems to drive consistency and reuse in metadata
Intermediate understanding of the data development life cycle and information management principles (ETL/ELT process, SDLC, metadata management, data quality, etc.)
Demonstrate familiarity with IT development environments, tools, and maintenance processes and how these pieces impact metadata and quality
Previous experience as working in an Agile environment
At least 5 years’ Experience working in the Data Quality field working with Data Quality Management, Metadata Management, Master Data Management, and Information Life cycle Management.
Prior experience working with Data Stewards to ensure identification of critical data.
Prior experience with tools: JIRA, Rally, Informatica, and IBM Infosphere Suite (Information Governance Catalog, Information Analyzer, DataStage)

Relocation assistance is not available for this position.

The above description reflects the details considered necessary to describe the principal functions of the job and should not be construed as a detailed description of all the work requirements that may be performed in the job.

Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement), or must have manager’s approval prior to posting.

Last day to apply to the opening is 10/12/20 by 11:59 pm CST time .",3.6,"USAA
3.6","Surprise, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
250,Data Science Support Analyst (Journeyman),"$89k-$147k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description BAE Systems is seeking to hire multiple Journeyman Data Science Support Analysts to help support counterterrorism intelligence integration on a multifaceted U.S. Government program. The Journeyman Data Science Support Analyst will leverage numerous analytic tools and databases to evaluate information that bolsters the U.S. Governments response to and prevention of potential threats to the homeland and interests abroad.

The Journeyman Data Science Support Analyst is responsible for constructing scripts and configuring controls to support analysts performing repeatable complex database queries in multiple databases. This role is responsible for creating automated-scripting to assist analysts with data discovery. Responsibilities include working independently and collaboratively to identify and implement solutions.
Required Skills and Education
Degree : BA/BS in a technical field such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science (6 years of work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor's degree)
Experience supporting complex data science and analytic projects
Experience/knowledge of computer science concepts including programming, statistics, data architecture, and data analytics
Experience with quantitative and qualitative content analytics
Excellent reading comprehension skills
Detail-oriented with a proficiency for researching, analyzing, and prioritizing intelligence reports and cables
Ability to work with IC tools and databases
Strong problem-solving, analytic, and written and oral communication skills
Excellent attention to detail and ability to accurately follow SOPs
Ability to work shift work/extended hours
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work well both independently and in a team environment
Preferred Skills and Education
Demonstrated knowledge of intelligence analysis and experience with synthesizing large amounts of data
Familiarity with analytic tools; experience with constructing and performing complex database search queries across multiple databases
Proficiency with software applications/databases used in support of research and analysis for the U.S. Government
About BAE Systems Intelligence & Security BAE Systems Intelligence & Security, based in McLean, Virginia, designs and delivers advanced defense, intelligence, and security solutions that support the important missions of our customers. Our pride and dedication shows in everything we dofrom intelligence analysis, cyber operations and IT expertise to systems development, systems integration, and operations and maintenance services. Knowing that our work enables the U.S. military and government to recognize, manage and defeat threats inspires us to push ourselves and our technologies to new levels. Thats BAE Systems. Thats Inspired Work. Equal Opportunity Employer/Females/Minorities/Veterans/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Gender Expression. To see Inspired Work in action, visit www.baesystems.com and follow us on Facebook: www.facebook.com/baesystemsintel.",3.7,"BAE Systems USA
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
251,CNO Financial Group Data and Reporting Analyst,"$36k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","CNO Financial Group is hiring for our next Data and Reporting Analyst!

The Data and Reporting Analyst provides our internal and external customers with routine and ad-hoc reporting as well as project level data analysis used to monitor performance metrics. This includes examining impact of process changes, helping production and management personnel better understand and identify risks, validating key assumptions, and supporting business decisions. The Data and Reporting Analyst also provides high level dashboards, scorecards, and key risk indicators to senior management on a weekly, monthly and quarterly basis.

This role should have a good understanding of some Enterprise Operations functional areas (claims, policyholder services, contact center, new business, underwriting), business management issues and data analysis. Strong analytical, quantitative and problem-solving abilities are required for this position. CNO has multiple sources of data and systems. The team uses Business Objects, Access, Tableau and Alteryx to provide information to numerous internal and external customers.

Key Job Responsibilities and Accountabilities:
Gathering data and analyzing business and user reporting requirements in consultation with both business managers and end users.
Collecting, analyzing, mining and leveraging data stored in data warehouse universes and databases utilizing Alteryx Compiling detailed reports using data reporting tools such as Business Objects/Tableau and providing insights on based on their findings.
Performing quality assurance on reporting to ensure output as accurate and within control parameters.
Facilitation of collection and distribution of report inputs and commentary with the Operations Leadership Team (Directors / VPs).
Providing reporting support for regulatory and compliance activities.
Updating, modifying, developing and automating new reports using Business Objects, Excel, Tableau, Access, Alteryx.
Participating on cross-functional projects working with individual contributors as well senior managers.
Stays abreast of changes in reporting / analytic tools and techniques to grow and expand their capabilities.
Skills, Knowledge, and Abilities:
Technical skills including Excel, Access, Power Point, Word, Business Objects or similar tool, R or SAS, Tableau, Alteryx or similar tool.
Ability to effectively manage small to midsized report development projects.
Strong, independent critical thinking skills.
Strong verbal and written communication skills as it relates to presenting complex, fact-based analyses.
Ability and willingness to work independently and as part of a team.
Education and Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Economics, Mathematics, Statistics, or other quantitative discipline.
A minimum of one year of data analysis experience preferably in Insurance, Financial Services or Operations Consulting role.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Alteryx: 1 year (Required)
Tableau: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible",2.6,"CNO Financial Group
2.6","Carmel, IN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1979,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
252,Data Security Analyst II / Information Security Analyst,"$53k-$133k
(Glassdoor Est.)","During the pandemic, safety is of primary importance to us! After a very brief onboarding process on the first day, new employees will train/work from home until such time that it is deemed safe to return to the office.

Knowledge of identity management software, experience with DEV – SEC – OPS, exposure to modern authentication components such as Identity Federation, Multi-Factor Authentication, or identity experience with hosted cloud computing such as AWS, Azure or Google.

Critical in achieving our vision of establishing predictive analytics as a competitive advantage of MAPFRE USA. Work has strategic impact on potentially all functional areas including marketing, product, actuary, operations, and claims. Responsible for identifying both internal and external data sources, extracting and cleansing data elements, creating variables and datasets, and utilizing programming and analytical skills to conduct qualitative and quantitative analysis related to pure premiums, customer life time value, customer buying behaviors, retention and other topics. Develop processes and applications to facilitate internal deployment of models and work as a liaison with IT for enterprise implementation. Monitor the performance of models in production and maintain quality documentation on all data subjects.

Responsibilities will evolve over time.

Job Requirements

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Education: Masters Degree or equivalent, related experience.
Experience: 4 - 6 years - or Associates Degree equivalent plus 6 - 8 years.
Knowledge: Complete understanding and knowledge of industry practices, standards, and concepts within field of work. Applies them to perform or lead work requiring extensive analytical business skills.
Decision Making: Makes decisions using broad management limits. Applies guidelines and procedures that leave considerable room for discretion and interpretation. Decisions directly influence project, client relationships and or expenditures. Additionally, decisions exert some influence on organization's long-range goals and objectives. Participates in determining objectives of assignments.
Supervision Received: Works independently under general supervision. Work is reviewed for overall adequacy in meeting objectives.
Leadership: May provide training and guidance to less experienced staff.
Problem Solving /Operations/Direct Work Involvement: Applies knowledge to determine solutions to complex problems with minimal direction. Uses research and analysis to develop innovative and practical solutions which are consistent with organizational objectives.
Client Contacts: Contacts other departments and or external organizations or parties frequently. Contacts are primarily at or below upper management levels. Represents organization on specific projects. Communication may involve persuasion, and negotiation.

Additional Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Basic Qualifications:
Master's Degree or above with 0+ years of experience, Bachelor's Degree with 4+ years of experience, or Associate's Degree with 6+ years of experience
Degree in Economics, Finance, Engineering, Mathematics, Science, Information Technology, Computer Science, Business Administration or a related quantitative analytical field.
Experience in insurance, banking, credit card or other financial industries, or comparable consulting experience.
Strong programming skills in SQL, SAS, VBA, EXCEL, ACCESS.
Strong in data modeling, merge/purge, query, and reporting in SAS, DBMS (e.g. Oracle, DB2, ACCESS), and other systems.
Familiar with quantitative and qualitative analysis .

Preferred Qualifications:
SQL Server, Teradata, UNIX, LINUX, MVS, R, Congos
C, C++, JAVA, or other programming languages
Database design
If you require an accommodation for a disability so that you may participate in the selection process, you are encouraged to contact the MAPFRE Insurance Talent Acquisition team at talentacquisition@mapfreusa.com.

We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer.

Click here to review our Privacy Policy

#INDEED123",3.0,"MAPFRE Insurance
3.0","Webster, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1972,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
253,Data Analyst,"$38k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About the role:

Dodge Data & Analytics is searching for a Data Analyst who will responsible for the production, support, and maintenance of custom Dodge Research and Analytics products and services. The Analyst will work closely with the Dodge sales force and will serve as part of a team for the Analytics group customers in the support and use of their products.

What you'll do:
Work in a group of 4-6 analysts to provide regular data analysis and delivery of ongoing services to a set of clients.
Support clients by providing an understanding of our proprietary data and its application to their business and industry.
Work in a PC based environment using a variety of software and database packages to provide data analysis and production of numerous client-specific deliveries.
Work directly with specific customers as the key contact for certain information services.
Build strong relationships with the internal sales team to enhance existing services and to support new business opportunities.
Maintain quality standards in all client deliveries.
Develop a thorough knowledge of Dodge Analytics databases and products.
Work with the Analytics sales specialists in supporting our products with customers and supporting any efforts to maintain or enhance our current client relationships. This will eventually include some direct client contact by telephone and email.
What you'll bring:
Strong analytical and problem-solving ability, self-motivated team player, and capable of working in an independent atmosphere with minimal supervision.
Technical proficiency with database (Microsoft Access) and spreadsheet (Excel) applications beneficial.
Strong written, oral, and interpersonal communication skills, including the ability to effectively interact with both customers and team members. The Data Analyst will be a direct point of contact for customers whose services are assigned to him/her.
Familiarity with basic business analysis.
BA/BS or more required
0-3 years of professional experience required.
Dodge Data & Analytics is committed to leveraging the talent of a diverse workforce to create great opportunities for our business and our people. EOE/AA. Minority/Female/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Disability/Veteran",2.6,"Dodge Data & Analytics
2.6","Bedford, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
254,Data Analyst,"$51k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","A Data Analyst job in St. Louis, MO is currently available through Belcan. In this role, you will be responsible for creating and maintenance of customer master data in SAP. To be considered for this role, you will have a Bachelor degree and master data experience. This is a very visible, contract opportunity with a growing company and has excellent upward mobility. Data Analyst Job duties: * Accountable for the creation and ongoing maintenance of customer master data in SAP and ancillary systems (Integrated Reference Data (IRD), SalesForce, Master Data Management (MDM), etc.) to ensure the availability of timely, accurate, high quality customer master data. * Accountable to proactively identify and resolve customer master data related issues. * Incorporate process changes into appropriate audit and training materials. * Coordinate with IT support for enhancements and production support issues. * Participate on or manage small customer data related projects within or outside of the team. * Maintain key operational metrics: timeliness and accuracy to support operational excellence and a strong internal control environment. Qualifications: * Bachelor degree * Proactive problem solving skills with the ability to identify, analyze and interpret data * Strong communication skills to interact with internal and external stakeholders * Assist with writing documentation as needed for customer master training, policies, standards and procedures and train accordingly * Ability to multi-task and seamlessly switch gears from task to task throughout the day. * Critical thinking to solve issues that arise and grounded judgement to ensure appropriate action is taken. * Strong communication skills * ERP data governance, data management or working with customer or supply chain data is a plus If you are interested in this Data Analyst job in St. Louis, MO, please apply via the 'apply now' link provided. Belcan is a global supplier of engineering, technical recruiting, and IT services to customers in the aerospace, industrial, and government sectors. Belcan engineers better outcomes through adaptive and integrated services-from jet engines, airframe, and avionics to heavy vehicles, chemical processing, and cybersecurity. Belcan takes a partnering approach to provide customer-driven solutions that are flexible, scalable, and cost-effective. Our unique capabilities have led to continuous growth and success for nearly 60 years. We are a team-driven Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity.",3.3,"Belcan
3.3","Saint Louis, MO",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
255,Data Integrity Analyst,"$35k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Integrity Analyst*
*3 month contract - possibility of extension*
*Compensation: $40/hour*
*Liaison between the data analytics team and business stakeholders to provide support for project deliverables and assist in reporting efforts. *
*Skilled with MS Excel*
Summary: *
We recognize the tremendous growth possibilities afforded by eCommerce and data science. The emergence and subsequent expansion of eCommerce has resulted in substantial investments from companies across the grocery and consumables industries, and has fundamentally changed the way shoppers interact with and discover products. As such it is imperative that we transform in ways that enable us to meet the future needs of our customers and retail partners.

To this end, and to ensure we continue to succeed in this space, we have established a dedicated eCommerce group; bringing together world class talent across the food & beverage, technology, and online retail industries. While tied closely to broader the company, the eCommerce group has a unique start-up feel and defined values that embrace a more entrepreneurial mindset: bias for action; results oriented; community-focused; prioritization of people.

As a Data Integrity Analyst, you will play a critical role in shaping and executing the global ecommerce growth agenda. You will be tasked with maintaining data and processes vital to the company's data analytics workflow. You will also act as a liaison between the data analytics team and business stakeholders to provide support for project deliverables and assist in reporting efforts. Successful performance in the role is measured by the quality, impact, and delivery speed of this work.
Accountabilities: *
• Data entry and formatting using word processing or spreadsheets
• Data validation and quality assurance - Reviews discrepancies in data received, requests clarification or advises on issues related to data and performs audit routines in accordance with company procedures
• Interacts with departmental and other staff on matters affecting data flow and makes recommendations for job processes improvement to advance standards in data entry, collection and retrieval
• Establish processes for cleaning up and maintaining product catalog hierarchy and relevant attributes
• Work with business stakeholders to define use-cases, identify pain points, and provide regular updates on projects
• Preprocessing new data sets using established processes to ensure reliable delivery
• Partner with other analytics leaders to foster greater analytical capabilities globally
Key Skills/Experience Required: *
• Bachelor’s Degree
• Data management experience
• Demonstrated problem solving skills
• Ability to meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills
• Experience with Microsoft Office, especially Microsoft Excel
• Highly organized with careful attention to detail
• Embodies entrepreneurial mindset and key values of having a bias for action, results-oriented, community-focused, and prioritization of people

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: $40.00 per hour

Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Ability to Commute/Relocate:
San Francisco, CA 94105 (Required)
Experience:
data analysis: 4 years (Required)
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.4,"Epitec
3.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
256,Project Data Analyst,"$46k-$84k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


A&B Process Systems, a business unit of JBT Corporation, is an industry leader in the design, fabrication, automation and installation of stainless steel process systems used in a variety of industries. At A&B Process Systems, our quality stainless steel process vessels, stainless steel process modules, skidded systems and process automation systems are all developed at one location in Stratford, Wisconsin. Our advanced 175,000 square-foot manufacturing facility is distributed over five physical plants. As a member of the JBT team, you will find that you are joining a world class organization with an entrepreneurial work environment and innovative spirit.

We have an immediate opportunity for a Project Data Analyst

Responsibilities


Position Summary:

The Project Data Analyst is a key member of the project management team and will work closely with project managers and finance to ensure effective and proactive monitoring, tracking and trending of project execution. Critical to execution is a near real-time understanding of the status, financials, concerns and critical dependencies required to successfully meet project budget and schedule. The Project Data Analyst is responsible for ensuring alignment and consistency with data reporting as well as supporting activities to improve processes and tools for standardization in tracking and reporting. This individual will also support communications to senior executive management. Tasks may include statistical analyses, managing key performance indicators, cost monitoring and control services and monitor project schedules and procurement status throughout the execution of projects.

Duties/Responsibilities:
Dashboard management - Develops, tracks and managing dashboards, metrics,
Project Financials – budget, actuals and forecast, analyzing results of project financial status,
Analyzes variances by function and reports out to the project teams including root cause analysis
Project leader for PM database – structuring data from ERP/ROMA/PM Tool & creating management reporting
Maintains project change order database – including aging and reporting
Interface with functional groups for project updates, variances to budget and awareness of issues
Interface with procurement for project material tracking (ordering and delays) and reconciliation
Develop and assist in managing project Bill of Materials and assure that the Purchase Reqs. match the project budget.
Supports recurring financial update meetings reporting with PM’s
Liaison between AR and PM team to resolve invoicing & collection issues
Qualifications


Education & Experience:

BS degree Data Management, Finance, or other related field. Five plus years of experience. Experience interfacing data from various tools such as ERP systems, Finance, Portfolio Project Management Tools, Procurement, Tableau (or visual dashboard) etc. in order to provide Project Managers, Finance and functional leads a complete picture of the project status.

The successful candidate will be comfortable working in various tools and with data, must have the ability to analyze data and report/present information to all levels of management.

It is critical for the successful candidate to possess accurate documentation practices, be detailed orientated, maintain and follow deadlines and demonstrate the ability to effectively multi-task.

This is a service-orientated position. The successful candidate must genuinely enjoy working with people and be willing to advance the goals of the organization by demonstrating competence in relevant subject areas and a willingness to be helpful.

AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

It is the policy of JBT Corporation to provide equal opportunity for qualified persons and not to discriminate against any applicant for employment because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran status, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law at the JBT Corporation location to which this application is submitted. In addition, as a Federal Government contractor, JBT Corporation is an affirmative action employer. If you require accommodation during the application process, please contact the local Human Resources department. EOE-Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

If you have a disability or impairment that prevents you from completing the online application, please seek the assistance of your local employment services agency. JBT maintains active relationships with local employment services agencies, and they have pledged their support in assisting any applicant needing help in applying. To find information on agencies throughout the United States, please go to www.careeronestop.org

You may also call Megan Centers at 844-286-4524 if your disability or impairment prevents you from applying online. NOTE: Do not use this number unless you need assistance because of a disability or impairment. The personnel attending this phone line will not be able to give you a status update regarding your application and will not be the individuals making a decision regarding your employment.",3.6,"John Bean Technologies Corporation
3.6","Stratford, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1884,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
257,Senior Data Analyst,"$71k-$129k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Us

Today's economy requires business owners to adapt quickly and think on their feet. ShopKeep's software-first commerce solutions make that possible.

Our cloud-based point of sale, payment processing, flexible hardware, and business-friendly financing let owners start, run, and grow their businesses in person and online. They can manage inventory, optimize staffing, streamline their operations, and market to their customers from one intuitive dashboard.

We understand what it's like to run a business, because we've been helping business owners succeed for over a decade, and we share their mindset. ShopKeep, after all, is also a small business, born to give our peers the tools they need to dream big, fight smart, and succeed on their own terms.

Today that mission is more relevant than ever, driven by team members around the world. ShopKeep is headquartered in New York City, with offices in Portland, Chicago, and Belfast. We're innovators, technologists, and customer advocates who are obsessed with helping independent businesses survive and thrive.

About This Role

As a Senior Data Analyst you'll help leverage our vast amounts of data to inform actionable insights and data-driven decisions. We're a start-up with a huge opportunity in front of us and we are looking for an awesome person to join the Data team. We want someone who embraces aggressive goals, works hard to achieve them, thrives in uncertainty and brings passion to their work.

What You Will Do
Build and maintain new data models to answer questions and provide visibility for various teams throughout the organization
Make a measurable contribution to our internal analytics platform
Automate manual processes in order to increase efficiency and provide more time for analysis
Partner with business users to help them make smarter decisions
Analyze data to understand key trends and drivers of performance
Develop and present actionable insights to help inform decision-making
What You Need
3 - 5 years of experience working with large amounts of data, including building, managing and working with databases (SQL, Redshift, etc) and using analytical tools (Looker, Tableau, etc).
Advanced SQL skills
Demonstrated problem solving skills
Strong attention to detail and able to effectively prioritize and manage multiple priorities
Ability to navigate ambiguity and a strong drive to succeed
Ability to learn quickly and thrive in a fast-paced changing environment
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Benefits


We provide the essentials…
Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Flexible Paid Time Off (PTO)
Commuter Benefits
401k Match
...and the fun-damentals:
Lively and enriching Engineering culture
Regularly scheduled hackathons, meetups and Tech Talks
Opportunity to attend Engineering Conferences, thanks to our generous company conference budget
Newsletters produced by Engineering teams
Cross-office collaboration between our NYC and Belfast teams with the opportunity to travel to our different offices
Regular team events, including Happy Hours and Game Nights
Catered lunches
Break area to play and relax
Standing desks
Meditation Sessions
And more to come as we work on ideas to help us keep the community feel connected while working remote
ShopKeep is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are an Equal Opportunities Employer. We don't discriminate based on gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, nationality, or any other individual characteristics. We practice equality of opportunity in employment and select the best person for the job.",3.5,"ShopKeep
3.5","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
258,Lead Data Analyst,"$52k-$99k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Big Huge Games is looking for a Lead Data Analyst. In this position, you will be a key member of the product and analytics team, working with cross functional leads in the studio, providing the game development teams the data and insights to help us achieve continued success and ensure that we offer the best possible experience to our players.

Responsibilities
Analyze large, complex data sets representing the behavior of our games' players
Develop the framework, models, tools, and processes that will enable data-driven decisions in our live service games
Provide recommendations based on game data to influence game economies, feature development, and product roadmaps.
Working with Product Management and Design, identify ways to improve the player experience and create enhanced revenue generation in the live service
Deliver regular and ad-hoc reports to studio management as necessary
Coordinate and Manage Analytics Teams across all projects that have a data presence
Understand timeline/roadmap of the product team(s) and how analytics folds into that roadmap
Assist in keeping team members appropriately tasked and understands team time constraints
Motivate, support and mentor other members of the Data Analytics Team and help them meet their career growth goals
Qualifications
BA/MSc in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Economics, or other quantitative field; Masters desirable
10+ years experience with querying large complex data sets with SQL on relational databases
Prior management experience including lead roles managing and mentoring an Analytics Team
R experience and familiarity with column store databases a plus
Proven track record as an analyst, preferably within gaming, mobile, web, or online economy industries
Experience working in large data sets
Experience in defining highly complex requirements, with a focus on providing actionable and understandable results
High level of proficiency in data visualization tools such as Tableau, Excel, or equivalent
Excellent organizational, communication, presentation and interpersonal skills
Track record of success working in fast-paced environments with some shifting priorities
Demonstrated critical thinking and problem-solving capabilities both independently and with others
Strong self-motivation and initiative
Passion for problem-solving from generating insightful questions to research through presentation of results and follow on steps
Excellent team, motivational and interpersonal skills a must
Bonus
Experience with staffing and team building
------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

About Big Huge Games:

Big Huge Games is a small, passionate team led by experienced game development veterans, proudly located just north of Baltimore, MD, who are excited about the rise of touchscreen platforms. We believe in hiring talented team members who enjoy working in a fun and positive environment.

The company was founded in March of 2013 by Brian Reynolds (Civilization II, Rise of Nations, FrontierVille) and a group of longtime collaborators. Big Huge Games is dedicated to ""Finding The Fun"" through rapid prototyping and a focus on great user experience.

In July 2015 we launched our first game, DomiNations, which was awarded “Editors Choice” in the app store and continues to be successful with audiences across the globe. In 2016 we were acquired by our publisher, Nexon, and now operate as a wholly-owned subsidiary, allowing us the stability of a larger studio but the feel of a smaller, indie game team.

Our goals are simple: Make great games, strive to always be improving, and live up to the motto you gotta have fun to make fun.

This a full-time position onsite at our studio in Timonium, MD.
Due to the circumstances surrounding COVID19 positions will begin remote before transitioning to onsite.

Applicants should download DomiNations on iOS or Android and be prepared to discuss the game.",4.9,"Big Huge Games
4.9","Timonium, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
259,Data Analyst,-1,"Advantage Federal Credit Union is seeking a Data Analyst to join our team.

To improve the credit union's competitive position, consistent with its mission by turning data into information, information into insight therefore providing management with the tools they need for business decisions. Interpret data, analyze results, make suggestions/recommendations, providing return on investment on all marketing campaigns and provide ongoing reports. In doing so, this will help direct and coordinate the efforts of marketing, sales and strategic planning.

All applicants must undergo a credit background check before an offer can be presented.

Essential Functions & Responsibilities:

>Interpret data, analyze results and provide ongoing reports.

>Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns.

>Filter and ""clean"" data, review reports, printouts and performance indicators for trends or issues.

>Work closely with management to provide and prioritize business and information needs.

>Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.

>Reporting software of member data in order to develop marketing plans for members, and member relationship development.

>Supports all departments and Strategic Planning.

>Tracks productivity of staff.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

>Two years to five years of similar or related experience.

>Four year college degree in data analytics or similar major, or completion of a specialized course of study at a business or trade school.

>Data Studio, Advanced Excel, SQL, Tableau and Jaspersoft experience preferred.

>Advanced Excel, DB2, SQL, Tableau and Jaspersoft experience preferred.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $21.00 - $23.75 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Referral Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Analysis Skills: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"Advantage Federal Credit Union
5.0","Rochester, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Other Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
260,Data Analyst,-1,"Position Number: 348227

Location: Saint Louis, MO 63146

Position Type: Temporary

Required Skill Set:
DATA MANAGEMENT, Database, ERP, SalesForce

Optional Skill Set:
SAP

Position Description:
*C2C is not available**
*Only U.S. Citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. can be considered as W2 candidates.**
Duration: 12 months
Location: St, Louis MO 63146

Manage North America Customer Master Data (Grower & Retailer) for Crop Protection, Seed Growth, Row Crops and Licensing businesses to support Commercial, Product Supply, Finance and Global business processes for operational and project related purposes.

Responsibilities:
Accountable for the creation and ongoing maintenance of customer master data in SAP and ancillary systems (Integrated Reference Data (IRD), SalesForce, Master Data Management (MDM), etc.) to ensure the availability of timely, accurate, high quality customer master data.
Accountable to proactively identify and resolve customer master data related issues.
Identify best practices and process improvements for data management based on investigation/analysis and solicited feedback.
Incorporate process changes into appropriate audit and training materials.
Coordinate with IT support for enhancements and production support issues.
Participate on or manage small customer data related projects within or outside of the team.
Maintain key operational metrics: timeliness and accuracy to support operational excellence and a strong internal control environment.
Required Skills / Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree
Fast learner; seeks to understand a number of processes with consistency and accuracy
Detail oriented and highly focused on delivering results
Self-starter and ability to work as part of a team
Proactive problem solving skills with the ability to identify, analyze and interpret data
Strong communication skills to interact with internal and external stakeholders
Assist with writing documentation as needed for customer master training, policies, standards and procedures and train accordingly
Desired Skills / Experience:
Knowledge of breeding, agriculture, and/or biotechnology
Experience in ERP data governance, data management or working with customer or supply chain data
Understanding of complex database systems and management of large data sets
#CBRose#",4.4,"Rose International
4.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
261,"AVP, Data & Systems Analyst – Information Technology","$47k-$102k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Scope and Responsibilities

Oaktree’s Information Technology team is seeking an individual who will provide Business and Data Analysis capabilities focused on portfolio and security analytics, investment and portfolio reporting, as well as operational process design and oversight. This individual will partner with various departments within the company and serve as a thought and change leader as we build our Enterprise Analytics platform. In partnership with the Portfolio Analytics, Risk and Reporting (PARR), operations and the investment teams, this individual will design specifications for new portfolio and security analytics, perform quality tests, oversee the development to production implementation lifecycle.

Responsibilities include:
• Work with IT senior leaders, PARR, Investment Teams, Fund accounting and others to support ongoing development of Oaktree’s Enterprise Analytics suite;
• Collaborate with the investment teams, PARR and other internal partners to draw up formal specifications for portfolio and security analytics;
• Take ownership of all aspects of software development including specifications, testing, debugging, roll-out (including user training), documentation, and maintenance;
• Design and implement operational processes to monitor the accuracy and timeliness of data flows, analytics calculators and report outputs;
• Troubleshoot and resolve production related issues arising from missed or problematic data feeds, inaccuracies related to calculations, and report output discrepancies;
• Write reports using off the shelf and proprietary tools (and manage the development of new reports with stakeholders);

• Deliver reports or self-service tools to internal and external stakeholders;
• Enhance and evolve Oaktree’s broader data and reporting environment.

Skills and Experience Required

• Minimum of 5 years of experience at an asset management company, investment/portfolio analytics software vendor, investment/portfolio analytics consultancy, or other related financial services company working with credit products in an analytical capacity;
• Must have a working knowledge of security analytics for bonds, leveraged loans(Bank Debt), convertible securities, options and structured products;
• Foundation in investment finance concepts and familiarity with credit instruments, investment performance, closed-end funds, open-end funds and Fund Accounting;
• Ability to quarterback assigned projects to resolution, seeking guidance and escalating issues as appropriate;
• Comfortable and capable of working with product specialists, vendors, portfolio managers, and senior management to understand and define reporting requirements;
• Expertise in investment platforms, systems, operations, data flows, and processes, as it relates to alternative asset management and the investment lifecycle in general, is a major plus;
• Experience using SQL, Python, C#, and MS Visual Studio preferred. An interest or experience in Machine Learning/AI/Deep Learning algorithms and investment financial models a plus;
• Experience building reports in business intelligence tools such as Microsoft BI or other industry wide tools is a plus;
• Advanced knowledge in Excel and Macro-VBA programming is a plus;
• Experience working with Global Teams is an added advantage.

Personal Attributes

• Outstanding initiative and a strong work ethic;
• Ability to operate independently on short and long term goals;
• Analytical with a keen focus on quality and accuracy;
• Interest and desire to learn and stay updated via research on latest techniques, trends, products, offerings;
• Detail-oriented and natural problem solver; have the ability to independently research problems and offer solutions;
• Organized and able to manage multiple projects with differing priorities to meet deadlines;
• Excellent interpersonal skills with the ability to leverage firm wide resources in an effective and judicious manner;
• Team-oriented, perpetual learner and must possess strong integrity and professionalism and share Oaktree’s common goal of excellence.

Education
• A Bachelor’s degree is required with a major in Computer Science, Math, Engineering, Economics, Finance or another related field.
• CFA/FRM candidates will be given viewed favorably, as will anyone who at least demonstrates and an interest – though not a requirement.

Equal Opportunity Employment Policy

Oaktree is committed to diversity and to equal opportunity employment. Oaktree does not make employment decisions on the basis of race, creed, color, ethnicity, national origin, citizenship, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, past or present physical or mental disability, HIV status, medical condition as defined by state law (genetic characteristics or cancer), pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions, veteran status, military service, marital status, familial status, genetic information, domestic violence victim status or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state and local laws and ordinances. This policy applies to hiring, placement, internal promotions, training, opportunities for advancement, recruitment advertising, transfers, demotions, layoffs, terminations, recruitment advertising, rates of pay and other forms of compensation and all other terms, conditions and privileges of employment.

This policy applies to all Oaktree applicants, employees, clients, and contractors.",3.5,"Oaktree Capital Management
3.5","Los Angeles, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
262,Data Analyst - YouTube Trust & Safety,-1,"Google via Webhelp – San Bruno, CA*
YouTube's user base is growing and changing, which presents unique challenges and opportunities to support over a billion users globally. Fast-paced, dynamic, and proactive, the YouTube Trust and Safety team provides scaled support to keep YouTube safe for the 1+ billion viewers, creators, and advertisers. The team provides scaled, effective reporting for the YT trust and safety operations and driving actionable insights for future investments.*
\*
\*
\*
The Data Analyst will be responsible for driving the integrity and completion to our most important data set: our Trust and Safety workflow data. You have technical aptitude and are able to handle large data sets with facility, but can also patiently work through individual issues. You are comfortable analyzing the key causes of data integrity and duplication issues and driving processes/systems that solve these issues.

Most of all, you have a commitment to providing internal and external YouTube customers with the best possible experience.

Responsibilities:
Experience of working with large data sets to develop analytics pipeline, build dashboards that drive business insights
Data validation and reporting to business partners to monitor trends in YouTube operations
Ability to respond to one off escalations with quick data insights
Streamline operations with quick and easy automation solutions
Requirements:
BA/BS Degree in Business, Finance, Engineering or related technical field, or equivalent practical experience
4+ years professional experience with SQL, reporting tools and advanced spreadsheet skills
Experience with Google proprietary tools preferred
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Attention to detail and work ethic for dealing with a variety of data issues
Strong grasp on data structure and data integrity issues.
Experience in business or operations analysis
Able to thrive in the hands-on, high-growth environment of YouTube
Aggressive problem solver, curious for challenges as opposed to committed to reproducing former structures
Ability to work for any US employer (we do not provide visa sponsorship)
\*
\*
Additional Notes:
Resumes without professional SQL experience will not be considered
We do not provide visa sponsorship nor C2C transfers
Non-local resumes require a cover letter mentioning availability for interviews, as this is not a remote or telecommute role
Resumes should be no longer than two pages
We do not provide relocation packages
\*

\*
About the Company

Webhelp is a global outsourcing company specializing in Sales, Service, Support, Human Resources, Training and Back Office. We are a trusted partner of Google in the promotion of Google Apps and related products.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $2.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Professional SQL: 4 years (Required)
Data Visualization: 3 years (Required)
License:
authorization to work in the US without visa sponsorship (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
webhelp.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Webhelp Americas,"San Bruno, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
263,Data Analyst - YouTube Trust & Safety,-1,"Google via Webhelp – San Bruno, CA*
YouTube's user base is growing and changing, which presents unique challenges and opportunities to support over a billion users globally. Fast-paced, dynamic, and proactive, the YouTube Trust and Safety team provides scaled support to keep YouTube safe for the 1+ billion viewers, creators, and advertisers. The team provides scaled, effective reporting for the YT trust and safety operations and driving actionable insights for future investments.*
\*
\*
\*
The Data Analyst will be responsible for driving the integrity and completion to our most important data set: our Trust and Safety workflow data. You have technical aptitude and are able to handle large data sets with facility, but can also patiently work through individual issues. You are comfortable analyzing the key causes of data integrity and duplication issues and driving processes/systems that solve these issues.

Most of all, you have a commitment to providing internal and external YouTube customers with the best possible experience.

Responsibilities:
Experience of working with large data sets to develop analytics pipeline, build dashboards that drive business insights
Data validation and reporting to business partners to monitor trends in YouTube operations
Ability to respond to one off escalations with quick data insights
Streamline operations with quick and easy automation solutions
Requirements:
BA/BS Degree in Business, Finance, Engineering or related technical field, or equivalent practical experience
4+ years professional experience with SQL, reporting tools and advanced spreadsheet skills
Experience with Google proprietary tools preferred
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Attention to detail and work ethic for dealing with a variety of data issues
Strong grasp on data structure and data integrity issues.
Experience in business or operations analysis
Able to thrive in the hands-on, high-growth environment of YouTube
Aggressive problem solver, curious for challenges as opposed to committed to reproducing former structures
Ability to work for any US employer (we do not provide visa sponsorship)
\*
\*
Additional Notes:
Resumes without professional SQL experience will not be considered
We do not provide visa sponsorship nor C2C transfers
Non-local resumes require a cover letter mentioning availability for interviews, as this is not a remote or telecommute role
Resumes should be no longer than two pages
We do not provide relocation packages
\*

\*
About the Company

Webhelp is a global outsourcing company specializing in Sales, Service, Support, Human Resources, Training and Back Office. We are a trusted partner of Google in the promotion of Google Apps and related products.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $2.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Professional SQL: 4 years (Required)
Data Visualization: 3 years (Required)
License:
authorization to work in the US without visa sponsorship (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
webhelp.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Webhelp Americas,"San Bruno, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
264,Data Analyst - YouTube Trust & Safety,-1,"Google via Webhelp – San Bruno, CA*
YouTube's user base is growing and changing, which presents unique challenges and opportunities to support over a billion users globally. Fast-paced, dynamic, and proactive, the YouTube Trust and Safety team provides scaled support to keep YouTube safe for the 1+ billion viewers, creators, and advertisers. The team provides scaled, effective reporting for the YT trust and safety operations and driving actionable insights for future investments.*
\*
\*
\*
The Data Analyst will be responsible for driving the integrity and completion to our most important data set: our Trust and Safety workflow data. You have technical aptitude and are able to handle large data sets with facility, but can also patiently work through individual issues. You are comfortable analyzing the key causes of data integrity and duplication issues and driving processes/systems that solve these issues.

Most of all, you have a commitment to providing internal and external YouTube customers with the best possible experience.

Responsibilities:
Experience of working with large data sets to develop analytics pipeline, build dashboards that drive business insights
Data validation and reporting to business partners to monitor trends in YouTube operations
Ability to respond to one off escalations with quick data insights
Streamline operations with quick and easy automation solutions
Requirements:
BA/BS Degree in Business, Finance, Engineering or related technical field, or equivalent practical experience
4+ years professional experience with SQL, reporting tools and advanced spreadsheet skills
Experience with Google proprietary tools preferred
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Attention to detail and work ethic for dealing with a variety of data issues
Strong grasp on data structure and data integrity issues.
Experience in business or operations analysis
Able to thrive in the hands-on, high-growth environment of YouTube
Aggressive problem solver, curious for challenges as opposed to committed to reproducing former structures
Ability to work for any US employer (we do not provide visa sponsorship)
\*
\*
Additional Notes:
Resumes without professional SQL experience will not be considered
We do not provide visa sponsorship nor C2C transfers
Non-local resumes require a cover letter mentioning availability for interviews, as this is not a remote or telecommute role
Resumes should be no longer than two pages
We do not provide relocation packages
\*

\*
About the Company

Webhelp is a global outsourcing company specializing in Sales, Service, Support, Human Resources, Training and Back Office. We are a trusted partner of Google in the promotion of Google Apps and related products.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $2.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Professional SQL: 4 years (Required)
Data Visualization: 3 years (Required)
License:
authorization to work in the US without visa sponsorship (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
webhelp.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Webhelp Americas,"San Bruno, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
265,Data Analyst - YouTube Trust & Safety,-1,"Google via Webhelp – San Bruno, CA*
YouTube's user base is growing and changing, which presents unique challenges and opportunities to support over a billion users globally. Fast-paced, dynamic, and proactive, the YouTube Trust and Safety team provides scaled support to keep YouTube safe for the 1+ billion viewers, creators, and advertisers. The team provides scaled, effective reporting for the YT trust and safety operations and driving actionable insights for future investments.*
\*
\*
\*
The Data Analyst will be responsible for driving the integrity and completion to our most important data set: our Trust and Safety workflow data. You have technical aptitude and are able to handle large data sets with facility, but can also patiently work through individual issues. You are comfortable analyzing the key causes of data integrity and duplication issues and driving processes/systems that solve these issues.

Most of all, you have a commitment to providing internal and external YouTube customers with the best possible experience.

Responsibilities:
Experience of working with large data sets to develop analytics pipeline, build dashboards that drive business insights
Data validation and reporting to business partners to monitor trends in YouTube operations
Ability to respond to one off escalations with quick data insights
Streamline operations with quick and easy automation solutions
Requirements:
BA/BS Degree in Business, Finance, Engineering or related technical field, or equivalent practical experience
4+ years professional experience with SQL, reporting tools and advanced spreadsheet skills
Experience with Google proprietary tools preferred
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Attention to detail and work ethic for dealing with a variety of data issues
Strong grasp on data structure and data integrity issues.
Experience in business or operations analysis
Able to thrive in the hands-on, high-growth environment of YouTube
Aggressive problem solver, curious for challenges as opposed to committed to reproducing former structures
Ability to work for any US employer (we do not provide visa sponsorship)
\*
\*
Additional Notes:
Resumes without professional SQL experience will not be considered
We do not provide visa sponsorship nor C2C transfers
Non-local resumes require a cover letter mentioning availability for interviews, as this is not a remote or telecommute role
Resumes should be no longer than two pages
We do not provide relocation packages
\*

\*
About the Company

Webhelp is a global outsourcing company specializing in Sales, Service, Support, Human Resources, Training and Back Office. We are a trusted partner of Google in the promotion of Google Apps and related products.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $2.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Professional SQL: 4 years (Required)
Data Visualization: 3 years (Required)
License:
authorization to work in the US without visa sponsorship (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
webhelp.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Webhelp Americas,"San Bruno, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
266,Sr. Principal Data Ingest Analyst (TS/SCI Poly),"$81k-$137k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At the heart of Defining Possible is our commitment to missions. In rapidly changing global security environments, Northrop Grumman brings informed insights and software-secure technology to enable strategic planning. We're looking for innovators who can help us keep building on our wide portfolio of secure, affordable, integrated, and multi-domain systems and technologies that fuel those missions. By joining in our shared mission, we'll support yours of expanding your personal network and developing skills, whether you are new to the field or an industry thought-leader. At Northrop Grumman, you'll have the resources, support, and team to do some of the best work of your career

Are you ready for a new mission? Our Cyber & Intelligence Mission Solutions Division and Software & Digital Technology team is looking for a Sr. Principal Data Ingest Analyst to work in Chantilly, VA.

If you are interested on working for the good of safety everywhere, you enjoy the challenge of solving difficult problems, and you are excited to get started then apply today. The search for your new career starts here!

Primary Responsibilities:
Apply technical skills and experience in working with structured and unstructured data for ingest into a variety of applications.
Write/edit and test macros, scripts, parsers, and small programs to process, load or analyze data, and perform configuration management before entering into production baseline.
Monitor data loads, fix errors during the load process, and perform quality control on ingested data.
Provide daily logs and statistics, and output from utility tools, as well as track and provide daily, weekly, monthly and yearly reports and statistics/metrics, and support COOP and emergency response activities.
Work under only general direction, and independently determines approaches and develops innovative solutions to improve efficiency and quality of data loads.
CYBERINTEL
NGMSCIMS
#LI-M-105
CIMS

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI with polygraph clearance
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Electrical Engineering, Math or related field plus a minimum of seven (10) years of professional experience. Or, 8 years with a Master's Degree. Overall years will be considered in lieu of degree.
Previous years of experience working with structured and unstructured data for ingest into a variety of applications.
Experience with computer file management in Windows and UNIX/Linux environment.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with a variety of scripting languages
Java, C, Shell Scripting, Perl, Python, HTML, JavaScript, PS/SQL, JSON, XML, CSV,CSS , HTML, YAML
Demonstrated ability to work in teams with a collaborative interpersonal style
Ability to interact with various stakeholders to include senior management and customers
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Excellent interpersonal skills
Experience in the Intelligence Community
Experience working in a Customer Facility
Ability to perform with minimum direction
Ability to work in a demanding environment with changing priorities
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.

#NGFeaturedJobs",3.8,"Northrop Grumman
3.8","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
267,Intern - Data Analyst,-1,"Join Episerver in an exciting Internship as a Data Analyst with our Product Team.

As a Data Analyst Intern, you will:
Analyzing historical win/loss data as well as identifying trends in the business
Analyzing product usage by region and customer
Developing reports for C suite
Requirements:
Interested in business
Must be pursuing a Bachelors degree with a major finance or business
Needs to know Excel with experience building pivot tables
This internship will be for 6 months long, 20-25 hours/week, remote-based USA. You will be compensated at $18.00/hour. There are no benefits offered.",4.2,"Northrop Grumman
3.8",United States,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
268,Programmer and Data Analyst,"$38k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Carillon Assisted Living is actively seeking a Programmer and Data Analyst for our corporate office in Raleigh, NC. The Programmer and Data Analyst manages the Programming and Analysis department including developing project plans from internal requests and implementing those plans from initial concept to full production. The department runs primarily on ad-hoc requests with a wide variety of skills necessary to implement the associated projects. The Programmer and Data Analyst must be versatile and excellent at time management. A typical week involves:

Meeting with the CEO and VPO to discuss priorities, statuses of current projects and any requests for new projects
Meeting with outside software vendors to discuss any necessary implementation, customization or integrations
Aiding in the implementation, customization and integrations for third-party software
Designing and proposing plans for projects or analysis necessary to fulfill new requests
Completing or delegating to the team tasks related to any current projects. Tasks generally include:
Developing SQL databases to store data for either program development or data warehousing
Pulling data through outside vendor APIs to move into on-prem data warehouse or to use in in-house programming or reporting
Supporting business decision making processes through analytical analysis of available options
Full-stack programming of any requested web applications
Determining necessary data and analyzing that data to answer questions posed by the VPO and CEO
Developing data visualizations and reports for ad-hoc or continual business analysis
Developing mathematical models for predictive analysis and forecasting
Scheduling and managing team meetings and deadlines for timely project completion
Ensuring all auto-generated reports send on the proper schedule

Qualifications

Required

Bachelors degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or other analytical field
5 or more years of experience in programming and analysis
2 or more years in a management role
1-2 years of experience in business decision making processes, including analyzing and determining a cohesive software suite and developing technical policies and procedures
Excellent communication skills for conveying technical material to non-technical audiences
Experience with full lifecycle project management, including both application development and other large scale projects directed from initial request to full production
Ability to manage multiple project requests with varying priorities and deadlines
Experience maintaining company software suite including implementing customizations and integrations
Experience in full-stack web application development, preferably with C# and Angular 5+
Experience with report development and data visualization, preferably with SSRS
Experience in database development and management including on-prem data warehousing
Experience writing advanced SQL queries and procedures
Working knowledge of REST API's
Experience analyzing data to answer business questions, both on an ad-hoc and routine basis
Experience with Microsoft Excel including writing custom VBA add-ins

Preferable

Masters degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or other analytical field
7 or more years of experience in programming and analysis
3 or more years in a management role
3 or more years in business decision making processes
Experience with BPM tools
Advanced skill set in Microsoft Office Suite including Excel, Word and Visio
Mathematical modeling abilities including stochastic models and linear optimization",2.0,"Carillon Assisted Living
2.0","Raleigh, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
269,Data Analyst,-1,"We are currently recruiting for an Data Analyst Audit in the White Plains, NY area (remote to start - White Plains office when office reopens). The Audit Data Analyst will support the global audit function and optimize reporting capabilities. This is a unique role in a growing Audit department. The Data Analyst will assist in the deployment and ongoing maintenance of the audit management tool, TeamMate+. This role, provides a unique opportunity for the right candidate to learn both the internal audit function as well as the business. This is an exciting time as the Internal Audit department is undergoing rapid transformation globally. Key to the success of this new global function is the development of innovative data analytics and visualization tools. These tools will range from supporting the auditors in execution of their audits and other assurance work, to providing audit management with insightful dashboards and metrics to both supervise their staff and report the Board Audit Committee. Compensation: 85K – 95K Base +15-20% Bonus + Benefits package
Responsibilities: *
Partner with the global Internal Audit department to create, execute and manage a portfolio of analytic projects for use in Audit execution testing, continuous monitoring and continuous auditing
Develop data analytics and visualization tools, utilizing various data sources from throughout organization
Develop dashboards and metrics reports highlighting key performance indicators
Develop automated quality assurance tools
Assist in Senior Management and Board Reporting data visualization
Contribute to the TeamMate+ global deployment and provide on-going support
Perform iterative analytic scripting of ad-hoc requests supporting audit projects
Work with audit teams to continuously assess results and refine the analytics
Experience & Requirements: *
Bachelor's degree (Master's a plus) in Data Science, Computer Science, Information Technology, Information Systems, Statistics, Applied Math, or any other related field
Demonstrated skills in data analytics and/or visualization is required
Experience in Power BI and Alteryx
Prior role within big-4 consulting or internal audit function covering data analytics/automation/visualization
Experience with TeamMate+ would be an advantage
Excellent analytical, verbal and written communication skills
Strong MS Office skills required
Additional language(s) desirable
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $95,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Power BI: 2 years (Preferred)
Data Analysis: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Bellwether Staffing Solutions,"White Plains, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
270,Service Delivery Center: Government & Public Sector – Data and Analytics - Senior Analyst Virtual Hiring Event,-1,"EY is hiring for our Service Delivery Center in San Antonio, TX!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 15, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Service Delivery Center: Government & Public Sector – Data and Analytics - Senior Analyst

Service Delivery Center: Financial Services Consulting: Senior Analyst - Digital & Emerging Technology

Service Delivery Center: SAP FICO/Treasury Senior Consultant

Service Delivery Center: Analyst – Technology Risk

Service Delivery Center: Senior Analyst – Technology Risk

Government & Public Sector - Technology Risk/Cyber - Associate Analyst II

Government & Public Sector - Technology Risk/Cyber - Senior Analyst

Government & Public Sector - Audit - Senior Analyst

Government & Public Sector - Finance - Senior Analyst

Government & Public Sector - Technology Risk/Cyber - Analyst

Government & Public Sector - Finance – Analyst

Intake Details:

Requirements

Experience working with accounting, business and technology concepts

Excellent English language skills – both written and verbal

Excellent communication, facilitation, presentation and personal organization skills

Ability to evaluate project structure, assumptions and constraints and adjust, if necessary

Ability to monitor and manage project deadlines and economics

Understanding of professional standards by relevant bodies, including the Institute of Internal Auditors, the AICPA and the PCAOB

Flexibility and confidence to work with a distributed team and ability to oversee and direct resources in a multi-project environment

Excellent MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, SharePoint) skills. Ability to become proficient with MS Visio and EY proprietary technology

What to bring to this event

Resume with updated contact information

What to wear

Dress code is Casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About EY

At EY, we’re dedicated to helping organizations solve their toughest challenges and realize their greatest ambitions - from start-ups to Fortune 500 companies – and the work we do with them is as varied as they are.

Through our four service lines — Assurance, Consulting, Strategy and Transactions, and Tax — we help our clients capitalize on transformative opportunities. We also help them fulfill regulatory requirements, keep investors informed and meet the needs of all of their stakeholders. And in a fast-changing world, we give them the support they need to be effective today and create long-term value for tomorrow.

Across all disciplines and from every angle, EY professionals draw on our shared creativity, experience, judgment and diverse perspectives to reframe the future for our clients – now, next and beyond.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

From strategy to execution, the Government & Public Sector practice of Ernst & Young LLP provides a full range of consulting and audit services to help our Federal, State, Local and Education clients implement new ideas to help achieve their mission outcomes. We deliver real change and measurable results through our diverse, high-performing teams, quality work at the highest professional standards, operational know-how from across our global organization, and creative and bold ideas that drive innovation. We enable our government clients to achieve their mission of protecting the nation and serving the people; increasing public safety; improving healthcare for our military, veterans and citizens; delivering essential public services; and helping those in need. EY is ready to help our government build a better working world.

The opportunity

The Service Delivery Center is made up of high-performing, US-based resources who work closely with our experienced professionals to deliver project-based work and managed services to our federal clients. The Service Delivery Center is a core component of the Government & Public Sector practice (GPS). This position supports the Data and Analytics team by directing and managing work. This position will provide day-to-day management of Associate Analyst I through Senior Analyst (Analysts) ranks.

Your key responsibilities

Provide management, supervision and evaluation of Analysts
Manage the administration of reporting and documentation
Identify potential audit issues or unusual relationships from analysis of financial statements
Apply accounting and auditing concepts to client situations
Oversee documentation and execution of specific audit procedures
Identify opportunities to enhance audit techniques
Drive development of audit and accounting client deliverables
Perform financial and audit data analytics
Monitor project scope and schedule and the progress of client engagement deliverables.
Develop and maintain relationships with stakeholders across other EY functional groups
Meet engagement project expectations defined by project and engagement stakeholders
Identify, communicate and address project risks, assumptions and constraints
Direct field work, inform supervisors of the engagement status and manage Analyst performance
Manage resources, communications, and cost management of projects/programs
Assume responsibility for the collection and documentation of project and engagement financial, accounting and audit related information for daily, weekly, monthly and ad hoc reporting, as directed
Assume responsibility for the completion and delivery of engagement specific work products and deliverables
Direct, review and analyze the work of Associate Analyst I through Senior Analyst ranks

For more info please go to: https://eygbl.referrals.selectminds.com/jobs/government-public-sector-%E2%80%93-data-and-analytics-%E2%80%93-analyst-143907",3.8,"EY
3.8","San Antonio, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1989,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10+ billion (USD),-1
271,Data Analyst,"$48k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Symetra has an exciting opportunity to join our Data and Analytics team as a Data Analyst!

About the role

The Data Analyst will be responsible for crafting, developing and maintaining database components and providing support for data integration initiatives. This position is responsible for understanding and documenting business and technical data requirements by partnering with business customers and business analysts. The Data Analyst will also draw out requirements by analyzing existing reports, queries, and data.

What you will do
Document enterprise-wide and application team specific data/reporting requirements
Transform client requests into data deliverables to include data models, data mappings and data transformation rules
Debug and optimize existing queries, views, and tables to improve performance
Provide technical consulting in the definition, design, and creation of Microsoft SQL database environment
Ensures that the documentation is complete and up-to-date
Manage the SQL Server database and maintain database documentation
Create custom reports to support multiple functional users
Work closely with management in functionality needed to extract and manage data
Design admin screens layouts and functional user experience using custom interface tool
Depict moderately complex-to-complex ideas, issues and data designs to varied audiences
What we offer you

We don’t take a “one-size-fits-all” approach when it comes to our employees. Our programs are designed to make your life better—both at work and at home.

Flexible work program and telecommute arrangements
Wellness program offering employees a variety of resources crafted to assist you in reaching and maintaining your optimum health
Plan for your future with our 401(k) plan and take advantage of immediate vesting and company matching up to 6%
Paid time away including vacation and sick time, flex days and ten paid holidays
Give back to your community and double your impact through our company matching
Want more details? Check out our Symetra Benefits Overview
opens a pdf file
Who you are
Bachelor of Science degree in Information Technology, Information Systems, or Computer Science
3-5 years of related work experience with SQL Server data administration. Business and data analysis experience
Proficient in Microsoft SQL Server
Outstanding communication, interpersonal and reporting/presentation skills. Report development experience with SSRS. Experience in proactive analysis, scripting and generating reports
Experience with ETL tools, appliances and platforms a plus – MuleSoft, Informatica, Jitterbit, CastIron. Experience in Financial Services/Insurance a plus
We empower inclusion

At Symetra, we embrace and celebrate diverse experiences, identities and perspectives, because lifting each other up fuels thought and creates a stronger, more innovative company. Learn more here.

In a complex industry, we strive for clarity.

Symetra is a dynamic and growing financial services company with 60 years of experience and customers nationwide. In our daily work delivering retirement, employee benefits, and life insurance products, we're guided by the principles of VALUE, TRANSPARENCY AND SUSTAINABILITY. That means we provide products and services people need at a competitive price, we communicate clearly and honestly so people understand what they're getting, and we build products that stand the test of time. We work hard and do what's right for our customers, communities and employees. Join our team and share in our success as we work toward becoming the next national player in our industry.

For more information about our careers visit www.symetra.com/careers.",3.5,"Symetra
3.5","Bellevue, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1957,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
272,Data Analyst,"$49k-$88k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Coherent is a world leader of lasers and laser-based technology for materials processing, microelectronics, scientific, life sciences and medical customers. The light we deliver touches almost every aspect of human life—vision correction to cell analysis, precision welding to 3-D metal printing, gravity wave detection to brain research. Put your talents to work at Coherent where you can create and innovate enabling technologies that will push the frontiers of science and technology. Responsibilities include:

Serve as lead buyer with responsibility for the entire Fiber Components spend for raw materials. Conduct weekly ASCP reviews and place orders accordingly
Lead monthly and quarterly reviews with Coherent senior corporate management on inventory status and reduction programs. Maintain inventory metrics in Fiber Operations scorecard
Assist in completion of Engineering or Manufacturing Change Orders (ECOs / MCOs) to ensure inventory is properly accounted during implementation of changes
Oversee miscellaneous transactions as needed
Oversee the slow-moving and obsolete goods (SMOG) program, to keep RM, WIP and FG inventory at prudent levels
Work on projects and other duties as required by business conditions
Managing the Fiber Components supplier base, including leading pricing negotiations, assessing supplier performance and taking steps to de-risk the supply chain
Monitor purchasing activity to remain compliant with the Corporate SOX and Global Procurement Policies
Manage the Fiber Components inventory, tactically through management of our cycle counting programs and strategically by leading and driving continuous improvement activities with the supply base to help reduce inventory through strategic initiatives suchas lead time reduction, establishing min/max/Kanban systems and developing phased delivery programs
Serve as Administrator for our Kardex Vertical Lift Module (VLM) system. The individual will need to understand the Powerpick Global software and its interactions with Oracle to make recommendations / decisions in areas affecting inventory control, includingfixing issues that occur with errors, cycle-counts, and data mismatches between the two systems
Track root causes for inventory errors. Author new Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) to document the proper inventory procedures, then conduct training of employees

Education and Work Experience:

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance, or a related field
7 or more years of professional experience in a manufacturing setting with extensive experience in purchasing or inventory management
Experience with Oracle or a similar ERP program
Proficiency in Microsoft Word and PowerPoint, and extremely proficient in Microsoft Excel to be able to perform loading of mass data files to Oracle/Agile
The job requires access to defense articles and related technical data subject to the International Traffic and Arms Regulations (“ITAR”) 22 C.F.R. §§ 120-130. Therefore applicants must be U.S. persons as the term is defined in ITAR § 120.15

Desired Qualifications:

Experience with Agile and Powerpick Global software
Experience with inventory forecasting
Familiarity with continuous improvement methodologies
High energy, self-motivated, passionate about success
Organized, analytical and detail-oriented with an ability to bring clarity to financially complex situations
Continuous Improvement mindset, focused not only on task completion but also opportunities for process improvement
Conscientious and capable of organizing support functions in the achievement of program goals
Team player, able to work effectively within and across departments
Strong written and verbal communication skills and interpersonal skills",4.3,"Symetra
3.5","Bellevue, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1966,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
273,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Our Mission
We’re here to create a safer, happier and more mindful future for all with the help of data science, engineering, design, and mobile technology. We're starting by reinventing insurance, by rethinking the technologies that enable it, but our true goal is to build a platform that rewards people for driving well — creating safer roads with fewer accidents in the process.

Backed by impressive funding, we're poised to re-engineer a trillion-dollar category, and that’s just the beginning. We’re using rich customer insights, advanced technology and data science to build our cloud-native InsurTech solution, and other things we haven’t even dreamt up yet. We're out to change behavior and promote mindful living at a societal level. But the key to us being successful in our mission isn’t just about nailing the technology—it’s about hiring the talented people who can help us make a quantifiable impact in the world. We’re growing our world-class team.
And that’s where you come in.

The Role
The Senior Data Analyst will work with teams (product, marketing, engineering, data science, CX and business owners, etc.) to measure, understand, and monitor key business metrics across our mobile apps and websites. The ideal candidate will be comfortable working with datasets across a variety of systems (SQL, Firebase,...).
This role will be responsible in delivering ad-hoc analysis with actionable insights and translating stakeholders’ priorities into dashboards. As an early member of the analytics team, you’ll have many opportunities to make a meaningful impact by helping develop how we do analytics as a company.

All applicants for this job posting must complete the simple challenge.
Must have:
Previous experience(s) in an early stage startup in an analytics role. Not everything has been built yet and data is often messy or incomplete. This role is just as much of doing the difficult work to design the core system as it is in getting reliable analytics results.

Skills and Experience:

Degree in quantitative or business fields preferred
Prior experience in a consumer organization is a plus
Web and mobile analytics experience using a variety of tools
Proficiency with Firebase and/or Google Analytics
Experience using SQL
Python experience is a great plus
Experience with web and mobile tagging, including tag management system (GTM, DTM,...)Ability to build and manage dashboarding tools (Data Studio, Redash, Tableau,...)
Strong analytical skills
Team player
Highly organized, attention to detail and curious

Salary & Benefits:

Salary: We invest in first-rate people and pay top-of-market salaries for most positions, factoring in experience, talent and location. We do not offer equity.
Benefits: Medical, dental, vision, 401(k), wellness reimbursement, four weeks of vacation + six weeks of parental leave, and great work-life balance. Our office building offers on-site shower and bike stalls, and panoramic views of San Francisco.
Location: Due to COVID-19 our teams are all working remotely through 2020. We provide an in-home office set-up including laptop, monitor, ergonomic desk, chair and other items as needed
Location: Post COVID-19: San Francisco, CA near Montgomery Bart Station
BlueOwl, LLC is an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

If you are a San Francisco resident, please read the City and County of San Francisco's Fair Chance Ordinance notice. https://sfgov.org/olse/sites/default/files/FCO%20poster2020.pdf",4.5,"Blue Owl
4.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
274,Data Analyst,"$34k-$64k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At TrialCard, our passion is success - success for clients, success for us. You’ll notice who comes first. We’re committed to providing solutions, through innovation and unparalleled customer support, to the pharmaceutical industry to improve access and affordability of their medicines to patients. We work tirelessly on the behalf of our clients, because when they succeed, so do we.
The Data Analyst will support internal stakeholders through the aggregation of data for reporting and analytical purposes. The candidate must have the ability to manipulate and normalize data in a way that helps support accurate reporting and foster operational standardization. The Data Analyst will also work cross-functionally to gather and translate requirements across business units creating synergies and developing efficiencies.
The candidate must be an excellent communicator (both orally and written) and be able to effectively foster interactive collaboration and discussions among clients and internal TrialCard teams. The Data Analyst must be able to present analyses and conclusions in a logical and clear manner and must be able to effectively work as part of a team.

Assists program managers with ad-hoc and standardized reports through data manipulation and raw data extracts.
Works directly with business users and decision-makers to gather and document requirements and define scope to ensure accurate development of reporting solutions.
Works primarily within SQL, Excel, and MicroStrategy platforms for data manipulation.
Performs continuous audits to ensure standard, consistent, and quality master data in catering systems is valid and correct.
Supports and maintains current Quality Assurance Program to ensure continued effectiveness within the department.
Identifies additional data, reporting and analytic opportunities to support our pharmaceutical clients and scope work necessary to fulfill them.
Maintains master data lists through additions and revisions when identified by the business users.
Performs and documents procedures for data preparation including data cleaning, standardization and analysis.
Develops and maintains operational dashboards for key decision-makers.
Standardizes and cleanses raw data using predefined rules as well as establishing new rules as needed.
Translates business requirements into reporting requirements/mock-ups for BI and MicroStrategy teams.

Bachelor’s degree in Math, Statistics, Economics, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering or similar discipline.
Must have 2+ years of related data-management, analytics, or business intelligence experience.
Solid technical writing skills; ability to clearly and completely articulate work to be done and describe tasks using proper terminology.
Experience interpreting data and presenting meaningful, client-ready business insights.
Demonstrated application of analytical skills.
Mid-level proficiency in SQL programming and common query optimization techniques for data extraction.
Advanced Excel and/or Access skills. (e.g., VLOOKUP, SUMIF, Macros)
Understanding of dimensional data modeling concepts, as well as data warehousing design highly desirable.
Experience designing and implementing enterprise business intelligence solutions using Microstrategy, Microsoft SSRS or similar highly desirable.
Knowledge of the pharmaceutical industry highly desirable.
Knowledge of direct marketing highly desirable.
Experience in the healthcare industry is highly desirable.",3.1,"TrialCard
3.1","Morrisville, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
275,Product Data Analyst,"$40k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","See What Were All About

As the fastest growing distributor of foodservice equipment parts, we like to do things a little differently. We believe our team should be like family. Not like a second cousin, twice removed, but more like the family you choose to be with every day. First, you have to demonstrate our core values and keep safety as your #1 priority, thats key. But were also looking for unique enthusiasm, high integrity, courage to embrace changeand if you know a few jokes, that puts you on the top of our list.

Do you have a genius-level knowledge of foodservice equipment parts? If not, no problem! Were more interested in passionate people with fresh ideas from different backgrounds. Thats what keeps us at the top of our game. Were proud that our workplace has been recognized for its growth and innovation on the Inc. 5000 list, twelve years in a row and the Crains Fast 50 list seven times.

If youre ready to roll up your sleeves, go above and beyond and put your ambition to work, all while having some fun, lets chat Apply Today!

Perks
Parts Town Pride check out our virtual tour and culture!
Quarterly profit sharing bonus
Fitness center, game room and on-site food market
Team member appreciation events and recognition programs
Volunteer opportunities
Casual dress code
All the traditional benefits like health insurance, 401k/401k match, employee assistance programs and time away dont worry, weve got you covered.
The Job at a Glance

The Product Data Analyst (internally known as Product Data Wizard) is responsible for completing project work to add and update all product data, images, digital media, pricing, and categorization information that supports the unique search functionality of the Parts Town website, mobile app, and mobile-optimized website as well as improves our SEO positioning. Product Data Analyst will be working directly with supplier service managers to design and execute brand-specific landing pages or working directly with customer procurement managers to design and execute customer-specific web portals.

A Typical Day
Obtain current manufacturer service and parts manuals and parts diagrams for all models related to specific manufacturers
Analyze collected data and refresh any current information located on our website
Create/update interactive parts diagrams for each parts diagram provided by the manufacturer
Analyze data on a daily basis in regards to product description, image, price, and product replacement or obsolescence
Maintain a relationship with manufacturers to ensure price lists are current in our system
Utilize numerous ecommerce tools such as Google Analytics, Hotjar, Hybris etc.
To Land This Opportunity
You possess strong analytical skills with strong knowledge of Access and Excel
Bonus points if you utilized scripting languages such as Python and Powershell
You are familiar with vendor management
You have experience with e-commerce product data management
Youre an all-star communicator and are fluent in English (both written and verbal)
About Your Future Team

Our Product Data and Images team is an eclectic bunch who likes to have fun, eat and drink a lot of coffee (we are in the foodservice space after all). If you have a wealth of knowledge of pop culture, you like sci-fi, or Hawaiian shirt day is your favorite day, youll fit in just fine

Parts Town welcomes diversity and as an equal opportunity employer all qualified applicants will be considered regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.",3.7,"Parts Town
3.7","Addison, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
276,COVID 19 Data Analyst (Temporary),"$36k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Works with a team of data analysts and data entry operators to analyze various COVID 19 data in an effort to accurately characterize the spread and epidemiology of COVID 19. Uses software to provide routine and special analysis of COVID 19 case data.

Conduct daily data analysis by a daily deadline. Assure results of analysis are entered into spreadsheets for daily update of website by daily deadline.
Assist lead data analyst in determining special data analysis needed to investigate trends in data.
Assist lead data analyst in designing special data analysis protocols.
Prepare data analysis/epidemiological reports on COVID 19 data analysis.
Work as part of a team to assure consistency in COVID 19 data analysis and to identify opportunities for quality improvement in data analysis.Maintains strict confidentiality, adheres to all HIPAA guidelines/regulations.
Maintain daily communication with supervisor on activities and tasks.
Presents a courteous and helpful demeanor.
Pending City Manager’s Approval.

Minimum Qualifications

A Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited four-year college or university with an emphasis in health statistics, biostatistics, or epidemiology. Master’s Degree preferred.A track record of excellent communication, customer service, computer, and attention to detail skills is required, including the ability to interact professionally and with culturally diverse individuals.
Skilled in using analytical software such as Excel and SPSS.
Ability to relate to diverse populations.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit, talk, hear and use hands to perform office work.
Occasional need to stand, walk, stoop, bend, kneel or crouch.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and color vision.",2.8,"City of Columbia, MO
2.8","Columbia, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1820,Government,Municipal Governments,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
277,Rolling Stone: Data Quality Analyst,"$55k-$97k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Rolling Stone: Data Quality Analyst

Rolling Stone is looking for a data analyst and music charts lover to join the Rolling Stone Charts team as a Data Quality Analyst. The RS Charts offer in-the-moment view of the biggest songs, albums, and artists as they pop up, giving both music fans and music creators an unfettered glimpse into whats really happening. The Data Quality Analyst will play a key role in QAing streaming and sales data and ensuring the accuracy and punctuality of the daily and weekly charts.

Reporting to the Director of Charts on the editorial team, the Data Quality Analyst will also help produce engaging data journalism for RollingStone.com. In addition to a meticulous attention to detail, the ideal candidate will also have a passion for popular music.

The Data Quality Analyst works a Sunday to Thursday schedule.

Responsibilities:
QAing daily charts
Maintaining a music release calendar and ensuring the accuracy of sales and streaming data for new releases.
Conducting frequent tests of Alpha Data's databases for accuracy
Maintaining a robust database for chart histories, flagging major milestones for songs, albums and artists on the charts.
Regular upkeep of music metadata
Requirements:

Work experience as a data analyst or in a related field
Experience in handling large data sets and relational databases
Proficiency with SQL
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Familiarity with the music industry and an ear to the ground for new releases
About Rolling Stone:


Rolling Stone, the number one brand in music publishing, has been the leading voice of music and popular culture for over 50 years. The multi-media brand features the latest in music reviews, in-depth interviews, hard-hitting political commentary and award-winning journalism across many platforms including magazine, digital, mobile, social and event marketing. Rolling Stone provides all the news that fits to a global audience of approximately 60 million people every month and publishes over 100 pieces of content every day. Rolling Stones parent company, Penske Media Corporation (PMC), is a leading digital media company, publishing, and Information Services Company founded in 2003.

About PMC

Penske Media Corporation (PMC) is a leading digital media and information services company whose award-winning content attracts a monthly audience of more than 180 million. Our dynamic events, data services, and rich content entertain and educate todays fashion, retail, beauty, entertainment and lifestyle sectors. Headquartered in New York and Los Angeles with additional offices in 11 countries worldwide, Penske Media is the way global influencers are informed, connected, and inspired. To learn more about PMC and its iconic brands, visit www.pmc.com.",4.4,"Penske Media Corporation
4.4","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
278,Configuration and Data Management Analyst III,"$37k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

The successful Configuration Management and Data Analyst will support a new program at Perspecta, focused on baseline establishment and management of a new Space Domain architecture. This CM Analyst will be responsible t establish the technical baseline including all cross-space and ground segment interfaces and to lower levels for interfaces considered to be key to inter- or intra-segment interoperability; Support baseline development for the Segments; Identify disconnects between segments and external agencies, and work the issues to closure; Develop system and segment level requirements that allow the Mission Users to effectively and efficiently interoperate and submit the requirements to the change process.

Baseline Management tasks include establish a formal process for capturing the baseline and managing changes and distribution; Employ this process to identify, control, maintain, make recommendations to evolve, and execute changes to technical baselines; Use change management software to mitigate the risk of unauthorized and unplanned changes to the technical baseline, including document content and the associated links; Provide user access to all databases used to manage the technical baseline; Perform requirements analysis in response to requested changes, addressing flow‐down, and changes to systems engineering products such as ICDs and verification plans; Maintain interface control for all ICDs/ISs that involve interaction between segments, contractors, or external agencies.

The CM Analyst will organize, facilitate and provide agendas, briefings and minutes for all System and Segment level CM‐related boards, forums and working groups.

Qualifications

Requires 5 to 8 years with BS/BA or 3 to 5 years with MS/MA or 0 to 2 years with PhD, or at least 5 years as a CM/DM Analyst.
Experience required supporting similar DoD or Space Domain Configuration Management Efforts
Experience with agile COTS Configuration Management Tools
Minimum TS Clearance required

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
279,Healthcare Data Analyst,-1,"ITAC Solutions is seeking a Healthcare Data Analyst for an established company in Nashville, TN.

What you’ll be doing (duties of this position):

Assist Clinical Directors or Managers in organizing, documenting, and testing requirements for cost analytics tools
Generate client reports and analysis, including running models, assessing market-level variation in provider performance, assess client-specific healthcare spend
Develop, create and utilize new tools / dashboards for spend and utilization analytics
Work to continuously improve dashboards and other customer-facing tools for tracking opportunities and value delivery
Assist in the data integration process, including preparing and training data, creating and running reports, and maintaining documentation
Perform aspects of the analytic and business intelligence (BI) lifecycle from requirements to data analysis, report analysis, understanding of business processes, and definitions of success
Initiates interactions with business leadership and analysts to deeply understand the business needs related to reporting and visualization efforts
Assist in the development of strategic roadmaps for corporate leadership
Perform ad hoc savings analysis for potential and current customers

What you’ll need to be considered (requirements):

Bachelor’s degree preferred
2+ years data/process/analysis experience in healthcare industry
Strong programming skills in SQL, R, and Excel; additional programming skills in Python, SAS, and BI reporting development in Power BI and complex data a plus
Exceptional analytical and problem-solving skills; demonstrated ability to anticipate and creatively solve problems and resolve issues with practical and reasonable solutions; with attention to detail and data quality assurance.
Ability to analyze data to produce accurate and unbiased results and tell the story of those results in data visualizations, dashboards, and reports.",4.1,"ITAC Solutions
4.1","Brentwood, TN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
280,Research Data Analyst,"$30k-$57k
(Glassdoor Est.)","RESEARCH DATA ANALYST Opportunity

RiverPoint Group is looking for a Research Data Analyst skilled in conducting surveys, performing research and data analysis on large volumes of data. Familiarity with Data Analytics tool and strong SQL skills are required. It is highly preferred that the person is familiar with medical/clinical data. This position is currently remote but will require onsite work in Chicago later in 2021.

This is a contract role that has the potential to go perm. US Citizens and those authorized to work in the US are encouraged to apply. We are unable to sponsor visas at this time.
Local candidates are only being considered
This is NOT open to C2C
Required:
Research and Data Analysis skills and experience
Experience using analytical tools (examples: SPSS/SAS, R, Python, UNICA, Business Objects, Tableau, etc.)
Manage and integrate insights and establish monitoring around multiple internal data sources, such as Enterprise Data Warehouse, customer database and purchased/appended data if available
Strong statistical analysis capabilities and ability to correlate survey activities towards areas of weakness and evaluate the efficacy of data collection efforts, and redeploy as necessary to ensure strong result and return on investment
Experience with procuring, maintaining and analyzing data from electronic health record system, such as administrative/encounter data, scheduling data, work after work data; also including experience with clinical, cost and patient experience data
Familiar with SQL in the extraction and manipulation of datasets
Must possess the ability to communicate technical and/or complicated processes to non-technical staff
General knowledge of transactional, ETL, data warehouse, data mart, and operational reporting solutions a plus; any experience with the following tools is desirable: IBM DataStage/QualityStage, Information Analyzer, Informatica Business Glossary and PowerCenter, and Aqua Data Studio
Strong organizational skills and project management experience; some background with process improvement techniques desired
Ability to work in a multi-tasked environment, as a strong team member, with potential for rapidly changing priorities
Any experience with or basic understanding of newer database structures and models such as NoSQL, Hadoop, Marklogic and Cassandra, a plus; basic to advanced programming skills highly desirable
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, ability to interact effectively with various levels of internal management and with external vendors
BS in Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Information Systems or a minimum of one year of data analysis experience required; advanced degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field highly desirable
#IND1",2.8,"RiverPoint
2.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
281,Senior Risk Data Analyst (Bellevue),"$83k-$147k
(Glassdoor Est.)","OfferUp is dedicated to building the simplest and most trustworthy way for people to buy and sell in their communities. Every year, millions of people use OfferUp to buy and sell locally, resulting in billions of dollars of local commerce. As the largest mobile marketplace for local buyers and sellers in the U.S., our iOS and Android app has been in the top five most popular shopping apps lists for more than three years. Join us as we build the marketplace of the future and reinvent local commerce by helping consumers uncover value through simplicity and trust.

At a Glance
90M+ Downloads
Top 5 Shopping app in App Store and Google Play Store for three years
15+ percent of adults in key markets like Los Angeles, Seattle, Miami and Las Vegas use OfferUp every month
About the role:

OfferUp is looking for an analytical and technical problem solver, who is able to dive into unstructured environments to design solutions. You will drive analysis behind company-wide decisions related to our community's experience; build scalable processes and systems that enable stakeholders to leverage data and act upon insights. You will have the opportunity to work on a wide range of high-priority projects and have exposure to multiple stakeholders within Operations, Product and Engineering.

At OfferUp, you will be part of a purpose-driven community dedicated to creating a dynamic and versatile work environment. OfferUp Risk Operations is an integral part of a growing organization that values neighborly collaboration, passion, and inventiveness. You will help create the future of recommerce and make an important, positive impact on millions of OfferUp buyers and sellers.

Here's more of what you will get to do:
Conduct forensic deep dives and analysis using internal and external data (e.g. customer, revenue, product, 3rd party) to derive insights that will drive risk business decisions and inform product direction
Work with Integrity Engineering and Project Managers to operationalize metrics and team goals to measure OfferUp's effectiveness at combating integrity issues
Work effectively with cross-functional teams, assimilating requirements, driving results in the form of data insights and building strategic partnerships
Support the Risk Operations Team with creating meaningful goals, KPIs, key planning, and operational asks
Conceptualize and build models, centralized tools (including dashboards) that the Risk Operations team can use to extract data/insights for daily business management in an automated manner
Act as a mentor and Tableau SME for other Tableau users across the company
Coordinate with members of other teams across the company to measure the impact and efficiency of new risk initiatives and processes
You'll thrive in this role if you have:
5 or more years of hands-on experience working with database technologies like Teradata, Snowflake, RDS as well as proven BI skills with Tableau, including performance tuning, development of reports, dashboards, KPI scorecards, and aggregating data from multiple sources
Deep understanding of BI methodologies, Data Architecture principles, Master data and metadata for complex business scenarios
Experience across high tech industry sectors is a must-have
Ability to support the creation of single source of truth for performance monitoring leveraging agreed-upon data definitions, create a common data foundation, and semantic layers to be consumed by business
Expertise including identifying patterns, attribute hierarchies and data relationships and organize into data dictionaries, create standardized definitions for metrics and critical metrics
Analytical and problem-solving experience, exposure to large-scale systems and experience writing code to support analysis
Strong business skills - capturing and documenting requirements, understanding business impacts and tradeoffs, proposing solutions, documentation and process mapping, etc
A strong sense of execution and accountability for the overall success of the program
Articulate the technology, requirements, goals and milestones of the program working with multiple teams
Drive technical excellence in development and solution designs and provide technical guidance, direction and problem solving to team members
OfferUp is changing the way people buy and sell locally and we've built a dynamic team to do it. To learn more about what it's like to work at OfferUp, check out our blog: https://blog.offerup.com/tagged/culture

OfferUp provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, OfferUp complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.

OfferUp expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status. Improper interference with the ability of OfferUp's employees to perform their job duties may result in discipline up to and including discharge.",3.3,"OfferUp
3.3","Bellevue, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
282,Operations Data Analyst I,-1,"WHO WE ARE

We are Allvue Systems, a rapidly growing software company formed by the merger of AltaReturn and Black Mountain. Allvue has over 420 employees in offices throughout North America, Europe and Asia. We are the leading provider of software solutions for the Private Capital and Fixed Income markets. Whether a client wants an end-to-end technology suite, or independently focused modules, Allvue helps eliminate the boundaries between systems, information, and people. We're looking for ambitious, smart, and creative individuals to join our team and help our clients achieve their goals

SUMMARY

Reporting to the Head of PMO, the Operations Data Analyst will be responsible for working with our various technological systems to collect, analyze and report on data to support the Professional Services team.This role will have responsibility for creating reports, identifying data errors, and providing insights and recommendations to business decision-makers. The candidate is expected to quickly build technical and content expertise about our platform, as well as the touch-points through which the operations teams interact with our customers.

YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Develop KPIs, reports, and dashboards using BI/data visualization tools at the direction of the senior management team to track the effectiveness of current strategies
Operationalize data processes: provide the team with ad-hoc analysis, automated dashboards, and self-service reporting tools so that everyone gets a good sense of the state of the business
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Work with team members and mentors to distill the problem, adapt your tools to answer complicated questions, and identify the trade-offs between speed and quality of different approaches
Play a key role in defining, documenting, and implementing key project data governance processes (e.g., data quality issue management) to help monitor the health of our business and projects
Create dashboards to identify potential data issues or unusual trend
Training end users on new reports and dashboards and communicate findings effectively to anyone in the company from executives to staff
Other duties as assigned by management.
WHAT WE NEED
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Computer Science, Applied Statistics, or related field required
2+ years of relevant work experience in Reporting, Analysis and/or Business Intelligence
Experience using data visualization tools like Tableau, Looker.
Strong interpersonal skills including collaborating and team building.
Strong analytical, planning, and organizational skills with an ability to manage competing priorities.
Excellent oral and written communications skills and experience interacting with both business and IT individuals at all levels including the executive level.
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment.Ability to track multiple projects running in parallel.
Habitually do more than asked.
WHAT WE OFFER
Fun, fast-paced work environment
Constantly evolving, cutting edge technology
The ability to make a significant impact immediately upon jumping in
An opportunity to work with some of the best firms and the best people in the financial industry
The ability to create change in the product we sell, by using the very same solution (in a very different way) to perform your daily job
Numerous team building activities to promote collaboration
Unlimited PTO
Allvue Systems provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) for all employees and applicants for employment. We recognize the real value of bringing people together from diverse backgrounds, experiences and perspectives - we don't just accept difference, we celebrate and support it. We are committed to advancing these efforts through our strategies to hire, promote, create and support a diverse and inclusive environment throughout our workforce and workplace. It is our policy to prohibit discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, marital status, age, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, pregnancy, genetic information, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other status protected under federal, state, or local law. In addition, Allvue will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",3.6,"Allvue Systems
3.6","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
283,Data Analyst with Risk Experience,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Kforce has a client in search of a Data Analyst with Risk Experience in Newport Beach, CA.

Responsibilities:
Ensures consistent, complete, high quality risk data, is analyzed and available to stakeholders
Creates and maintains data dictionary
Consults on data architecture and data mart design
Coordination of data owners to ensure data completeness
Alignment with production support for data integrity
Consultant for development on data usage, interpretation and import templates
Coordination with IT on technology and Corporate Finance on best practices
Preparation of periodic risk committee reports and dashboards
Provide useful interpretation of data/reports
Analysis of historical and current risk data
Data transformation from transactional system (archer) to data warehouse (ETL)
Using Oracle Analytics create custom queries, calculated fields, views and other techniques to enable presentation of data to range of stakeholders
Build and maintain views to enable end user reporting from single source of truth
Trending of behaviors shown through patterns in historical data
Presentation of findings through visualization and other reporting techniques
Mine/analyze database to identify actionable and business impacting insights
Analyze data with the intention of identifying insights that will assist in the company's long term growth and strategy
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree, ideally with Statistics major/minor
2-5 years of data analysis
Very strong report presentation skills
Oracle Analytics and Advanced Excel essential
SQL experience
GRC experience - ideally RSA Archer
Strong technically and strong communications
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Nice to have:
1-3 years of experience in Risk Management, Compliance, or Internal Audit reporting
Previous experience as a Business Analyst (as they will be translating requirements from areas they might be typically unfamiliar with, having those conversational skills, deciphering current reporting and translating to OAC, Excel, etc.)
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,"Kforce
4.1","Newport Beach, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
284,Data Quality Analyst,"$40k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

The Data Steward at Southern Management Corporation is responsible for helping drive that improvement in the accessibility and quality of our data assets and tools and allow us to deliver data solutions faster than we do today. This role will be intertwined will all aspects of the business and their vendors to accomplish a robust and comprehensive understanding of the data and how it is intertwined. Our goal is to ensure ability to grow is unconstrained by any limitations of our data.

Responsibilities:
Create and evolve Enterprise Data Standards for SMC including:
Business Terms
Business Definitions
Critical Data Elements
Business Rules
Define and execute processes to monitor data integrity and privacy, establish consistent data definitions, and monitor overall data quality for assigned data entities
Partner with Data Architect Team and business to maintain a business data model and ensure data is aligned across the business
Keep management informed on day-to-day activities and potential risks found
Keep customer engaged by providing feedback on data quality trends and making sure that they are part of the resolution process
Other tasks as assigned
Qualifications:

Education & Experience

Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience
1-3 years of experience in Data Quality, Data Stewardship, Business Analytics, ETL, Business Intelligence

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:

SQL experience preferred
Passionate about Data Quality
Ability to triage and prioritize tasks based on the business needs
Knowledge of data quality, data management, and master data management concepts
High level of accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to deal with ambiguous situations
Understanding of Data Warehousing concepts
Ability to interface with the business leaders
Proactive and able to work in an autonomous work environment
Proven data gathering and analytical skills
Expertise with Microsoft Office",3.3,"Southern Management Corporation
3.3","Greenville, SC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
285,Data Analyst,"$42k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst

At Pactiv, the health and safety of our employees is a top priority. In response to the COVID-19 pandemic and in accordance with guidance from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), we have implemented a number of safety precautions at all of our locations to protect our employees. These precautions include, but are not limited to, mandatory face coverings, daily COVID-19 screenings, including temperature screenings, social distancing requirements and proper hygiene protocols. In addition, we provide all of our employees with regular COVID-19 updates and education.

This position is for Pactiv, a company of Reynolds Group Holding Inc.

Job Description:

Develop digital solutions that address unmet needs, provide new insights or identify opportunities for growth.
Utilize digital solutions to enable more effective strategic, tactical and operational insights to support business functions.
Extract big data and transform it into actionable information for users by using the data visualization software Tableau.
Determine best methods to extract, model, manipulate, and present data that meets the requirements of the business.
Assist in the identification of opportunities across functional areas where the application of improved data would create value for the user.
Assist the Project Management Office with the development of digital reporting and tracking solutions for major company initiatives.
Work cross-functionally with groups such as IT, Finance and Logistics.
Assist in the creation and documentation of Robotic Process Automation (RPA) projects aimed at process improvement.
Assist in the development and coding of RPA solutions using the platform Automation Anywhere.

Qualifications:

BA/BS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Finance, Statistics or related field.
Experience transforming large amounts of data.
Experience with data visualization software like Tableau a plus.
Comfortable taking initiative and working both autonomously and in a team environment.
Strong analytical skills and exceptional attention to detail
Python experience required
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

Pactiv LLC is the leading manufacturer of food and beverage packaging solutions in North America and beyond. Since its founding in 1965, Pactiv has grown to support its customers, providing the broadest selection of products made from over a dozen materials. Today, the company is headquartered in Lake Forest, Illinois, and operates over 60 facilities with more than 14,000 employees across the globe. For more information, visit www.pactiv.com.

Pactiv LLC is an equal opportunity employer. We consider applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, ancestry, citizenship, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, protected veteran status, or any other legally protected status. ""IND1P"" #LI-TM1 #CB1",2.5,"Pactiv
2.5","Lake Forest, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1965,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
286,Senior Data Science Analyst,"$75k-$100k
(Employer Est.)","Discover. A brighter future.

With Discover, you’ll have the chance to make a difference at one of the world’s leading digital banking and payments companies. From Day 1, you’ll do meaningful work you’re passionate about, with the support and resources you need for success. We value what makes each employee unique and provide a collaborative, team-based culture that gives everyone an opportunity to shine. Be the reason millions of people find a brighter financial future, while building the future you want, here at Discover.

Job Description

At Discover, be part of a culture where diversity, teamwork and collaboration reign. Join a company that is just as employee-focused as it is on its customers and is consistently awarded for both. We’re all about people, and our employees are why Discover is a great place to work. Be the reason we help millions of consumers build a brighter financial future and achieve yours along the way with a rewarding career.

Responsible for working closely with management to execute analytical initiatives. Responsible for solving business problems by leveraging techniques such as segmentation, optimization, advanced analytics and machine learning. Creates reports and dashboards to closely monitor performance metrics and provide insights.

Responsibilities

Develops advanced analytics solutions including customer segmentation, optimization, test & design of experiments and prescriptive analytics to solve business problems. Operates as a subject matter expert on statistical analysis, test and design of experiment, analysis methodology, modeling & application and financial impact analysis.
Collaborates with cross-functional partners to understand their business needs, formulated and completed end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering, analysis, ongoing scaled deliverables and presentations. Delivers effective presentations of findings and recommendations to multiple levels of leadership, creating visual displays of quantitative information.
Establishes and maintains effective performance tracking; identify improvement opportunity, form hypothesis, propose, design and implement tests to drive strategy enhancement and optimization.
Manages multiple priorities, communicate business performance and project progress to management & business partners.
Develops and automates reports, iteratively build and prototype dashboards to provide insights at scale, solving for analytical needs. Facilitates implementation of work product and ensure accuracy.
Consistently follows standard work processes and documentation requirements. Recommends improvement to work processes to increase efficiency while maintaining quality of work. Continuously improves technical and leadership skills through training and development.

Minimum Qualifications

At a minimum, here’s what we need from you:

Bachelor’s Degree in Analytics, Engineering, Statistics or related field
2+ years of experience in Credit Risk, Fraud Risk, Marketing Analytics, Optimization, Operations Analytics, Modeling/Data Science or related field

Preferred Qualifications

If we had our say, we’d also look for:

Master’s Degree in Analytics, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics or related field

What are you waiting for? Apply today!

The same way we treat our employees is how we treat all applicants – with respect. Discover Financial Services is an equal opportunity employer (EEO is the law). We thrive on diversity & inclusion. You will be treated fairly throughout our recruiting process and without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status in consideration for a career at Discover.",3.9,"Discover
3.9","Riverwoods, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
287,Data Quality Control Analyst,-1,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Quality Control Analysts to work on customization and optimization of Publicly Available Information (PAI) data ingestion. The analyst will work closely with technical teams to execute on client expectations concerning evolving technical requirements, breadth and depth of collection, and accuracy of content. The selected candidates will perform testing on collected media content that has been processed using natural language processing and machine learning to provide feedback to the Machine Learning Team. In addition, they will coordinate and customize human analyst workflow.

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree required
Strong quantitative reasoning and writing skills are a must as well as the ability to work well with teams or individually with minimal supervision
Technical proficiency with web-based applications
Apply filters and parse data sets
Demonstrated competency analyzing geopolitical affairs and world event
Conduct quality control analysis of geopolitical content and provide feedback to technical development team
Desired Skills:
Prior experience utilizing traditional intelligence collection and analysis tools
Prior experience conducting manual testing on intelligence related products
Experience integrating multiple data sources to produce analytics and reports
Capability to apply principles of data science and data management to identify trends and patterns in unstructured news media content
Academic-quality research and writing skills
Capability to rapidly master and apply specialized software suites to daily workflow
Foreign language proficiency (Russian, Mandarin, or Farsi) preferred
Security Clearance:
Candidates must be eligible for a security clearance, ACTIVE Secret clearance is preferred.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
288,Data Analyst,"$44k-$77k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As a Data Analyst, the primary responsibility is to acquire and transform clinical and health data from Inovalon’s technical platforms and databases to create impactful, dynamic, and insightful healthcare data analytics such as opportunity analyses, pharma reports/ extracts and program evaluation studies, customer reporting, product development, and ad-hoc analytics.
Responsibilities: *
Performs detailed statistical analyses and modeling of clinical and operational data with outputs that are clear and relevant to the users;
Participates in the design and development of analyses and reports that explore and present large amounts of data to discover underlying patterns and trends related to quality, safety, and clinical performance;
Works with information from a variety of sources, including the Specialty Pharmacy and Pharma data, and other sources using a variety of highly-specific tool such as, but not limited to, Oracle, SQL or Tableau;
Develop requirements for data mapping and data loading processes. Execute data mapping/loading requirements and reconciliation of such activities;
Assist with the design of data integration strategies, develop intuitive designs, and build enterprise interactive dashboards with built in guided healthcare data analytics;
Identify and research anomalies and outliers in data. Identify problematic areas and conduct research to determine the best course of action to correct the data;
Monitor and perform trend analysis for the company and research report on anomalies Maintain compliance with Inovalon’s policies, procedures and mission statement;
Maintain compliance with Inovalon’s policies, procedures and mission statement;
Adhere to all confidentiality and HIPAA requirements as outlined within Inovalon’s Operating Policies and Procedures in all ways and at all times with respect to any aspect of the data handled or services rendered in the undertaking of the position; and
Fulfill those responsibilities and/or duties that may be reasonably provided by Inovalon for the purpose of achieving operational and financial success of the Company.
Qualifications: *
At least 3 years of experience in data analytics, data science, or related field;
Experience with data management and visualization tools, such as SQL and Tableau, Power BI, and Oracle APEX;
Possession of strong analytical / statistical skills used in evaluating and analyzing data;
Strong organization skills and attention to details, comfortable working with minimum direction;
Adaptable to changing organizational requirements and priorities and supportive of a diverse work force;
Ability to collaborate with others in diplomatic, tactful manner, while exercising sensitivity and discretion as needed;
Specialty Pharmacy and/ or Pharma Industry Experience is preferred;
Advanced PC skills (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Visio, and other programs); and
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Bachelor’s degree in Information Systems, Computer Science, Statistics, Analytics, or a related field of study;
Physical Demands and Work Environment:
Sedentary work ( i.e. sitting for long periods of time) Exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally and/or negligible amount of force;
Frequently or constantly to lift, carry push, pull or otherwise move objects and repetitive motions
Subject to inside environmental conditions; and
Travel for this position will include less than 5% locally usually for training purposes.
Inovalon provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data analytics, data science, or related field: 3 years (Required)
data management and visualization tools (e.g., SQL, Tableau): 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Canonsburg, PA 15317 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
inovalon.com
Work Remotely:
No",2.4,"Inovalon, Inc.
2.4","Canonsburg, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
289,Data Analyst,"$41k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Sony Electronics, Inc. look for the risk-takers, the collaborators, the inspired and the inspirational. We want the people who are brave enough to work at the cutting edge and create solutions that will enrich and improve the lives of people across the globe. So, if you want to make the world say wow, let's talk.

Job Description

Sony Electronics Inc. has an opportunity available for a Data Analyst within the B2B team for Imaging Products & Solutions of Americas – Professional Division. Based in the group’s Paramus, NJ headquarters, the Data Analyst reports into the Business Management (marketing) group, but will support cross-business functions including sales, marketing, and planning and control. The Data Analyst will be the primary point of analyzing various monthly and quarterly reports received such as industry market research reports, channel partner point of sale (POS) reports, channel program utilization reports and financial reporting reports. This highly visible position will be tasked with developing and maintaining databases and automated reporting analytics as well as processes to ensure consistency and accuracy of information that will be used for business decisions by the B2B management team.

Responsibilities

The Data Analyst will have as a key responsibility the gathering, consolidation, reporting and analysis of POS data from multiple sources (internal and external) for the B2B segment on a monthly and ad-hoc basis. Focus will include assessing sales performance versus budget/forecast on a consolidated, territory and individual basis (identifying areas of success and gaps/opportunities) and reporting those results to management. This assessment will go beyond numbers presentation; and will involve identify trends and providing initial insight regarding contributing factors.

The Data Analyst will also prepare monthly & quarterly consolidated revenue attainment results by salesperson for compensation purposes, and actively contribute to and support management during the sales quota-setting process. Working with B2B sales team, will help identify gaps in revenue/quota attainment. In addition, this position will be involved in research and analysis of year-over-year sales results, and marketplace conditions/areas of business growth potential.

With management input, the Sales Analyst will build upon existing corporate analytics to establish the tools, processes and reporting methodology to support these analyses as they relate to the B2B business and modify accordingly based on future business direction and needs.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree.
Must have 2-4 years of related experience.
Advanced Excel proficiency including pivot tables, formulas and macros.
Solid oral and written communication skills, and professional presentation skills.
Must have high level skills in Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook.
Preferred Requirements
Bachelors’ Degree concentration in finance, mathematics, statistics is preferred.
Working knowledge of database creation, coding, manipulation preferred.
Experience with Oracle databases and Power BI is highly desired.
Salesforce.com experience is a plus.
Sony Electronics is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values employees with a broad cross-cultural perspective. We strive to create an inclusive environment, empower employees and embrace diversity. We encourage everyone to respond. All applicants will receive fair and impartial treatment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, legally protected physical or mental disability, protected veteran status, status in the U.S. uniformed services, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information or on any other basis which is protected under applicable federal, state or local law.

Disability Accommodation for Applicants to Sony Electronics, Inc.

Sony Electronics, Inc. provides reasonable accommodation for qualified individuals with disabilities and disabled veterans in job application procedures. For reasonable accommodation requests, please contact us by email at talenthelp@am.sony.com, or you can mail your resume to: Sony Electronics, Human Resources Department, 16535 Via Esprillo, San Diego CA 92127. Please indicate the position you are applying for.
EEO is the Law

EEO is the Law Supplement

Right to Work (English/Spanish)

E-Verify Participation (English/Spanish)",4.2,"Sony Electronics
4.2","Paramus, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1946,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
290,Data Analyst,"$36k-$65k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Overview:

Analyzes company functions, processes, and activities to improve computer-based business applications for the most effective use of man, methods, machine and materials. Recommends alternative solutions to management as to courses of action that best meet the organization's goals

Responsibilities include but not limited to:

Gather data, analyze data, and deliver accurate reports in a timely manner
Excel guru capable of compiling data without system support.
Utilizes available computer systems resources and personnel to carry out analysis to support management's quest for performance improvement.
Reviews and analyzes information, forecasts, methods, schedules, systems, processes, and procedures.
Determines most useful business solutions for the company.
Performs duties concerned with the design and improvement of computer-based business systems.
Works closely with senior managers to identify and solve a variety of computer-based business system problems.
Analyzes requirements, procedures, and problems to automate processing or to improve existing business systems.
Confers with personnel of organizational units involved to analyze current operational procedures and identify problems.
KPI's creation, update and development.
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques
Build analysis and reporting capabilities and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Filter and clean data by reviewing computer reports, printouts and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems
Collaborate with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities

Job Qualifications:

3+ years of relevant analyst experience
Technical expertise related to data models, data design development, data mining and segmentation techniques.
Microsoft Access, SQL and/or Tableau a plus.
Experience with Oracle a plus.
Microsoft Office Skills required
Organizational skills
Collaborative project management
Excellent communication skills (telephone, verbal and written)
Self-motivated
Advanced technical skills.
Excellent documentation skills
Customer focused and professionalism
Excellent multi-tasker and handles pressure well
Solid analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy

Educational Requirements:

A bachelor's degree in business or related field.

We look forward to hearing from you!",3.3,"FOX Factory, Inc.
3.3","Gainesville, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1975,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
291,Data Analyst - Catalog Research,"$38k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Who We Are

At True Fit, we believe when it comes to fashion, its all about the details.

True Fits personalization platform is strategically leveraged by 250 global retail sites, representing 17,000 brands and 175 million registered users. Since 2010, we have built the worlds largest data collective connecting consumers with apparel and footwear they will love and keep.

As our data collective continues to grow, so does our team! Lets disrupt this $3 trillion industry together.

True Fit, named a Top Place to Work, is looking for a Data Analyst.

What We Do

True Fit is building a comprehensive taxonomy of clothing products powered by text, image, user interactions, and manually derived data. The Data Science team at True Fit is leveraging this information to power the next generation of fashion recommender systems and help shoppers navigate the fashion world.

We are looking for a Data Analyst to help us expand what we can do with our fashion catalog.

COVID-19 and True Fit

While this role is based out of our Boston HQ, due to the ongoing response to COVID-19 all True Fit employees are working on a remote basis, with a return date TBD. Once our offices are reopened, we can remain flexible and work together on a schedule that best suits your needs at the time.

Responsibilities
Contribute to ongoing efforts to expand the features of clothing we model.
Collaborate with Data Scientists to measure performance of recommender systems and devise improvements.
Develop a holistic, data-driven perspective on the accuracy, coverage, and consistency of product features.
Own the Science code base for product-specific analytics. Build centralized reporting mechanisms.
Work with Scientists, Engineers, and Product Managers to communicate important results.
Develop techniques for increasing stakeholder awareness across the organization.
Required Skills
Experience solving data problems using quantitative tools. For example, experience acquired with a Bachelors in a quantitative field (computer science, math, physics, computational biology; economics, psychology, or other quantitative social science; or related fields) and 1-2 years of work experience.
Experience applying analytical tools such as statistics to real world problems.
Experience querying large complex datasets with SQL
Experience writing data analysis scripts with Python.
Excellent communication skills.
Willingness to learn new tools as they become needed.
Nice to Have
Experience with analytics dashboards.
Experience or interest in machine learning and/or mathematical modeling.
Experience with big data tools and frameworks, such as Spark.
Previous experience working with clickstream data and/or transaction data.
Why True Fit?

One size does not fit all in what you wear or your True Fit career. Everyone at True Fit has the opportunity to push their professional boundaries, while balancing personal ambitions.

Together weve built a tight-knit culture thats reflected in our Glassdoor reviews; Great people, cool product refreshing place to work everyone actually works together like a team, employees are all pro-active and genuinely take pride in their work growth potential plus culture management is approachable, mindful of their people opportunity to learn/work on new technology you are an integral part of the success of the company the work you are doing everyday really matters and makes a difference managers provide autonomy and trust you really innovative company, open to share ideas to make a better product great culture with the right vision.

We believe that how we dress is an expression of who we are and the confidence we feel. As an EEO employer, we work to help all team members experience an inclusive, diverse and accepting work environment, so you can be True To You.

Powered by JazzHR",3.6,"True Fit
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
292,Business Data Analyst,"$45k-$88k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position*: Business Analyst (Secondary Marketing/Capital Markets)*

Location*: Tustin, CA*
Position Summary**: *The Business Analyst (BA) will play a key role in Capital Markets department. The BA will work with department team members to produce regular and ad hoc reporting, identify trends, areas of opportunity and data inconsistencies. This person must have critical thinking skills necessary to solve complex problems and technical skills to write advanced business rules.
Duties and Responsibilities: *
· Proven analytical and problem-solving skills, project management skills, attention to detail, and exceptional organizational skills

· Must be able to effectively communicate with both technical and non-technical users

· Own the design, development, and maintenance of ongoing metrics, reports, analyses, dashboards, etc. to drive stakeholder engagement

· Have attention to detail to ensure the highest level of quality/rigor in solutions

· Strong verbal and written communication skills; ability to present complex information in an easy-to-understand manner with clear recommendations based on data insight.

· Have the ability to function collaboratively as part of a fast-paced, customer-oriented team, perform effectively and demonstrated willingness to support the team on all levels to get the job done

· Possess the ability to identify, analyze and resolve problems logically and systematically

· Knowledge of SQL a plus but not required

· Ability to deal with ambiguity and competing objectives in a fast-paced environment

· Other duties may be assigned.
Desired Competencies: *
· 3+ years of experience analytical experience

· In-depth understanding of the mortgage industry including the life cycle of a loan.

· Clear, concise, and professional written and verbal communication skills.

· Experience independently designing and implementing financial models and reporting

· Proficiency with MS Office Suite
Desired Education/Experience**: *
Bachelor's degree in Business, Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or a related field; 5+ years of relevant experience in a business analyst, data analyst or statistical analysis role; Experience developing reports in Tableau
Other Duties: * This job may require frequent sitting or standing for long periods of time. This job profile is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of job duties and responsibilities, as one may perform additional related duties as assigned in order to meet the needs of the organization.
Work Authorization: * Must be able to verify identity and employment eligibility to work in the U.S.
[EOE/M/F/D/V. Drug-free workplace.]
Physical Demands: * The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Must be able to lift up to ten pounds. Primary functions require sufficient physical ability and mobility to work in an office setting; to stand or sit for prolonged periods of time; to occasionally stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, reach, and twist; to lift, carry, push, and/or pull light to moderate amounts of weight; to operate office equipment requiring repetitive hand movement and fine coordination including use of a keyboard; and to verbally communicate to exchange information. VISION: See in the normal visual range with or without correction. HEARING: Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
SQL: 3 years (Preferred)
Tableau: 3 years (Required)
Microsoft Excel: 3 years (Preferred)
report developing: 1 year (Preferred)",3.5,"New American Funding
3.5","Tustin, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
293,Marketing Data Quality Analyst I,"$49k-$86k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Purpose of Job The candidate selected for this position with join an experienced Information Governance and Management team that supports USAA’s enterprise strategy, marketing, corporate communications, corporate responsibility, corporate development and military affairs functions. The candidate with have the opportunity to work with the USAA Information Governance Catalog and Information Analyzer tools as part of the IBM InfoSphere platform to support Marketing technology and data transformation projects.
Manages and analyzes information using a variety of techniques and tools in alignment with USAA's Enterprise Information Standards. This role may be responsible for one or more information management function noted below:
Metadata includes defining and documenting data ensuring the information is understood. This may include working with project teams or support teams to define, redefine, or continue maintenance of the metadata.
Data Quality includes defining data quality rules ensuring data is measured and trusted. This may include working with project teams to define data quality requirements as well as ensuring ongoing assessments of data quality.
Information Lifecycle Management includes archiving and purging of data to meet the needs of the business while reducing corporate risk.
Data Security and Privacy includes managing the security of data access as well as privacy of data sharing in compliance with external regulations and internal policies. This may include working with other departments to ensure compliance to GBLA, FCRA, PCI DSS, etc.
Master Data and Reference Data includes managing key corporate data to ensure the organization can manage its operations with accurate and consistent information.

Job Requirements
Leverages intermediate data management knowledge to support in one or many of the information management functions. Tasks may include any of the items noted below:
General
Identify opportunities for improvement in processes
Participate in and possibly lead discussions with cross-functional teams.
Participate in development of best practices and tools based on business needs.
Metadata and Data Quality
Support metadata repository maintenance, access requests, and proper metadata association
Review, validate, and record metadata and data quality information.
Development of definitions, data quality rules, thresholds, and standard metrics of quality for data elements that support critical business processes.
Development of controls to mitigate data quality risks including data quality plan development, monitoring data quality results, reports and dashboards, as appropriate.
Identify and maintain data quality corrective action plans.
Support compliance assessment process by reviewing and documenting failures from data quality compliance assessment checks.
Information Lifecycle Management
Support archiving and purging activities of data
Develop archiving and purging strategies and processes
Support compliance assessment process by identifying and escalating items that may be a risk to the corporation.
Data Security and Privacy
Manage Data Access security as needed
Support Privacy initiatives through analysis of sensitive data
Ensure sensitive data is accessed and shared in accordance to defined policies and processes.
Master and Reference Data
Recommend Master and Reference Data processes and procedures to align with Enterprise Policies and Standards
Create and maintain reference data in accordance to defined processes and procedures.
Manage quality and maintenance of master data as it is created
Minimum Education:
Bachelor's Degree in a Business or Science discipline (4 years’ work experience in data management, data quality or business application function or related experience can be substituted in lieu of a degree in addition to the minimum years of work experience required) OR
A Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline OR
A PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline
Minimum Experience:
4 or more years of experience in one or more information management functions below and any relevant tools:
Metadata
Data Quality including metrics, dashboards, knowledge of frequency and duplicate analysis, cross dataset dependencies, orphan 'child data' rows, redundancy analysis, etc.
Information Lifecycle Management including archiving, purging, content and document management
Master and Reference Data
Data Security & Privacy OR
Possession of a Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline PLUS 2 or more years of experience in a data management/quality analytic function. OR
Possession of a Master's Degree and PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline and 1 or more years’ experience in a data management/quality analytic function
Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*
When you apply for this position, you will be required to answer some initial questions. This will take approximately 5 minutes. Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not able to change your responses.

Preferred Qualifications
Experience working in a Marketing organization
Experience using IBM InfoSphere Info Governance Catalog and Info Analyzer
Good understanding of agile principles and ways of working
Experience working with third party vendors
Can communicate well with all levels of employees in IT and business areas

The above description reflects the details considered necessary to describe the principal functions of the job and should not be construed as a detailed description of all the work requirements that may be performed in the job.

At USAA our employees enjoy one of the best benefits package in the business, including a flexible business casual or casual dress environment, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, along with wellness and wealth building programs. Additionally, our career path planning and continuing education will assist you with your professional goals.

Relocation assistance is not available for this position.

For Internal Candidates:
Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement), or must have manager’s approval prior to posting.

Last day for internal candidates to apply to the opening is 08/18/20 by 11:59 pm CST time .",3.6,"USAA
3.6","Randolph, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
294,Data Analyst,"$59k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Foundation Finance:

Foundation Finance Company (FFC) is one of the fastest-growing consumer finance companies in the U.S. We work with home improvement contractors nationwide to help them close more sales through the use of flexible financing plans. FFC's full-spectrum lending approach has driven billions in originations and helped many customers make needed improvements to their homes. We're making big investments in both infrastructure and employee talent to keep up with our growth, so the time is right to join our team! It's a fast-paced environment with room to advance. We offer a competitive salary, medical/dental/vision benefits, 401(k) with company match, a casual dress work environment and much, much, more.

To learn more, check us out on Facebook at ""Foundation Finance Company Careers."" If you think you have what it takes to help our team succeed then apply today!

Data Analyst Description & Duties:

We are looking for a strong analyst to help drive profitable growth by leveraging data and analytics. This is a hands-on role requiring technical skills to query and manipulate data to develop data-driven reports and recommendations. The analyst will have a wide range of exposure to loan originations and servicing areas in consumer lending. The analyst will on a regular basis present reports, findings and recommendations to senior management to improve business strategies and practices

Duties may include, but are not limited to:
Dive into data and quickly become an expert on internal and non-traditional data sets. Maintain data and file integrity. Improve existing data query scripts and develop new ones as needed.
Create user-friendly reports and Tableau visualizations for staff and management. Enhance existing and build new Tableau dashboards as needed.
Track, review, manage and audit software development projects, particularly from database access and usage perspectives.
Work with staff, managers and executives on analytic projects and develop data-driven solutions and recommendations.
The Ideal Candidate:

Applicants must be reliable, dynamic, sociable and enthusiastic team players; while possessing a positive ""can-do"" attitude, excellent judgement and communication skills. Applicants must also have great attention to detail and ability to multi-task under the stress of deadlines with a strong desire to help the organization succeed.

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Finance, Business, Economics or related field.
Hands-on familiarity with SQL data querying, coding experience and understanding of basic coding syntax.
Advanced Excel skills to create/edit pivot tables, understand/create/manipulate database formulas, create/modify macros (VBA knowledge preferred), adjust formatting to create professional reports.
Advanced data visualization skills, preferably with Tableau.
Must have the ability to research, think through and solve technical and analytic problems.
Strong communication skills, attention to detail, analytical curiosity is required.
Working Conditions:

Office environment with significant time spent sitting, typing and talking on the telephone.

Foundation Finance Company provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",4.8,"Foundation Finance
4.8","Weston, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
295,Healthcare Data Analyst (Accountable Care Organization),"$37k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Excellent career opportunity. Rapidly growing healthcare network / organization is seeking a motivated and focused team player. This is a tremendous opportunity for an individual who wants to join one of the United States premier healthcare companies. Ideal candidate will have a strong working knowledge of SQL, ISOM, Data Analytics, Statistics & Microsoft Office
IMPORTANT APPLICATION INSTRUCTIONS: *
Submit: Cover letter with salary requirements
Submit: Resume
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Applies knowledge of data, data structure and analytical tools to research or identify trends, expenditures, and utilization of healthcare providers/practices.
Applies in-depth knowledge of health care operations and systems
Responds to requests for data by determining user’s needs, collecting, organizing, and analyzing data, and providing accurate and complete reports and information.
Works with other analysts to perform evaluate the performance of facilities, practices, provider services, and utilization.
Works with other analysts to perform a variety of ad-hoc analysis and assessments or initiatives as requested.
Identifies, develops and implements methods for improving reporting efficiency for department.
Performs checks and audits of various data sources to ensure data adheres to data governance and maintenance policies.
Maintains and applies knowledge of current trends, practices and developments in health care.
Educates and assists in problem solving to promote the implementation of the health care initiatives and research.
Suggests ways to both increase healthcare quality and reduce costs.
Applies knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, procedures, and programs within healthcare technology field.
Contributes in the data integrity, governance, and data structure standards and policies.
Abides by all HIPAA, Confidentiality and Privacy laws.
Other duties as assigned within the scope of responsibilities and requirements of the job; not limited by this job description.
Supervisory Responsibilities: *
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.
Competencies: * To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
Analytical and advanced problem solving strategies.
Strong knowledge of health care models including ACO’s.
A working knowledge of industry coding (revenue codes, ICD 9/ICD10 classifications, CPT codes, etc.).
Strong knowledge of data, data objects, data structure, and industry standards.
Advanced-level computer skills in a Microsoft Office environment
Strong skills in Microsoft Office
Strong internet research capabilities
Bi- or Multi- lingual skills (written and verbal): A Plus
Attention to detail
Report Writing
Problem Solving
Systems/Workflows/General IT
People Skills
Assertive / Reliable
Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; listens and gets clarification; responds well to questions
Safety and Security - Uses equipment and materials properly
Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time
Knowledge of legal and ethical consideration related to patient information.
Qualifications: *
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Education and/or Experience: *
Required: Bachelor's degree in a related area and 2-4 years of experience in the field or in a related area.

Preferred: Master’s degree in a related area (ex. MHA, MBA, Master's Information Systems, etc.)
Language Skills: *
Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, correspondence, and memos. Ability to write simple correspondence. Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one situations to visitors, clients, and other employees of the organization.
Reasoning Ability: *
Ability to think critically and objectively and unbiased. Quickly learn/adapt to healthcare industry standards, codes, data, and business practices.
Computer Skills: *
MS Office Productivity Tools (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint) Intranet, Internet, SQL & Data Objects, various report writing tools.
Other Skills and Abilities: *
High accuracy and extreme confidentiality a *MUST* .Highly detail-oriented and must possess a very high degree of organization.
Physical Demands: *
While performing the duties of this Job, the employee will have a combination of standing, sitting, bending and reaching. May work at a computer monitors for prolonged periods. The employee may lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.

Job Type: Full-time

COVID-19 considerations:
Mask required within offices at all times.

Experience:
Data Analysis: 2 years (Required)
Healthcare: 3 years (Preferred)
SQL: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Palm Beach Accountable Care Organization, LLC
3.8","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
296,Data Analyst,-1,"The Health Information Systems Manager will provide crucial clinical context and direction to the development, design, implementation, and maintenance of all information systems used in delivery of care for Clinical Programs. Bachelor’s degree in Medical Informatics, Business Administration, Computer Science, or related field is required; Knowledge of clinical-based care delivery processes; Computer skills including Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Project) and experience in maintaining the integrity of a database; a moderate to high knowledge of statistics and their use in outcome reporting; Able to perform database queries with SQL, have SQL programming experience to fill data requests for the Clinical Research Data Warehouse (CRDW). This position will be responsible for translating technical specifications from a business analyst into SQL code, generating data, deliverables, and conducting code review; Ability to multi task and be extremely detail oriented; Must be able to quickly master medical terminology related to filling data requests; Knowledge of governmental regulations and institutional Policies and Procedure a plus. Job Type: Full-time Pay: $45,000.00 - $50,000.00 per year Benefits: * Dental insurance * Disability insurance * Employee assistance program * Health insurance * Life insurance * Paid time off * Retirement plan * Vision insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Experience: * Database Management: 2 years (Required) * Electronic Medical Records: 2 years (Required) * Data Analysis: 2 years (Required) Education: * Bachelor's (Required) Location: * La Plata, MD 20646 (Preferred) License: * Driver's License (Required) Work authorization: * United States (Required) Work Location: * One location Benefits offered: * Paid time off * Health insurance * Dental insurance * Flexible schedules * Retirement benefits or accounts Work Remotely: * No",-1,"Center for Children, Inc","La Plata, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
297,Data Governance Analyst,"$54k-$97k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Ocean Spray believes that our employees are our best asset and we offer an environment where you can work with exceptionally smart, innovative, passionate teams that are motivated to deliver Ocean Spray products around the world. If you are looking for a rewarding career where you can Grow, Own, Live and Drive your career every day, Ocean Spray is for you!

Who We are Looking For:

We are looking for a challenge seeker with a passion for data to help us grow our Data Governance program at Ocean Spray. If you have a deep appreciation for efficiency and for getting things right up-front, this is the role for you! The ideal candidate will possess solid business acumen and the ability to evaluate processes and drive improvements. Self-motivation, strong organizational and prioritization skills, an ability to multi-task and attention to detail are just a few of the competencies that will lead to success in this role.

What You Will Do:

In this role you will help drive forward data governance improvements by developing a deep understanding of business processes, identifying opportunities for fixing broken processes and ensuring quality data capture and maintenance. You will partner with business process subject matter experts across departments to create, document and maintain validation rules for automation. You will also work hand in hand with the Data Architecture team and other members of the Tech team as you gain knowledge of our end-to-end system design and build understanding of data elements and their lineage.

Responsibilities:
Support development of data governance framework and enterprise data governance policies, processes, standards and roles across systems and projects
Own, understand and govern the master data management process (own the rules of the data)
Improve data capture processes to enhance business analysis and decision-making
Improve data accuracy and “tie-out” between systems
Provide clarity to filed values, calculations and reporting to improve internal understanding
Configure attribute workflow management using Ocean Spray’s master data management toolset
Identify opportunities for system automation and reduction of manual data capture
Collaborate with business process SMEs across departments to develop mechanisms and rule sets to validate the accuracy of data
Contribute to Ocean Spray’s Data Governance Policies & Procedures and share with the cooperative to ensure best practices are followed
Audit master and transactional data for SLA compliance
Qualifications:
B.S. or M.S. in either Business or an Analytical discipline – a combination of the two major/minor would be ideal (for example Data Science and Business)
3-5 years of related CPG experience
Knowledge of industry data standards
Experience with Tibco EBX preferred
Strong project management skills
Intermediate understanding of data architecture concepts
Experience with SQL preferred
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Ability to work independently when needed
Strong “executive presence”
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.",2.8,"Ocean Spray
2.8","Lakeville, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1930,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
298,Data Analyst,"$27k-$49k
(Glassdoor Est.)","PURPOSE OF THE POSITION

The Data Analyst is able to perform complete life cycle data generation and outline critical information for users. Data analysts will develop analysis and reporting capabilities. We also need someone who is able to analyze business procedures and recommend specific types of data that can be used to improve upon them.
ESSENTIAL POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES
Effectively administers systems, processes and datasets: Manages master data, including creation, updates, and deletion. Manages users and user roles in various BI tools and datasets. Manages and designs the reporting environment, including data sources, security, and metadata. Provides Level 1 support for report and data related helpdesk tickets.

Works collaboratively with Information Services to troubleshoot, research, and escalate issues as necessary, proactively keeping end users aware of status and taking responsibility for ensuring that outstanding issues are addressed in a timely manner.

Provides technical support for the BI team: Develops and implements datasets, data collection systems, data analytics and reports. Troubleshoots the reporting environment and reports. Filters and cleans data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct problems. Trains end users on new reports and dashboards.

Plans and develops processes, reports, and automation: Acquires data from primary or secondary data sources and maintains datasets. Identifies opportunities for enhancements, automation and self-service in an effort to achieve a higher level of excellence. Supports the data warehouse in identifying and revising reporting requirements. Supports initiatives for data integrity and normalization. Develops and provides ad-hoc reports as requested.

Participates as a member of the Team. Participates in the ongoing development, communication and implementation of team concepts, programs and policies; coordinates work to ensure best practices with all team members. Attends appropriate team meetings. As a member of the Team, fosters strong cohesiveness regarding all major issues; e.g., direction, annual plan, budget, policy changes, etc. Accepts responsibility to quickly identify any areas that lack cohesiveness, bringing them to the attention of the team leader and working with the team in a supportive manner to resolve issues and actively look for ways, and reinforce actions needed, to achieve synergy possible within the larger organization.

Simmons Operating systems principles and objectives: Is familiar with Simmons' established operating systems (e.g. quality, security, office environment, company policies, LEAN); understands the responsibility to maintain familiarity with the systems and this position's role in support of these systems - including a consideration of the impact of individual actions on the systems and the responsibility to communicate concerns and improvement ideas.

Performs other duties as necessary in support of business objectives: This position description is intended to guide the activities of the person in this position and is not intended to limit the thinking and creativity of the person as to the work of this function nor is it intended that this describe all the work that may be required of the person in this position.

Physical Activities: Enters and locates information on a computer. Visually verifies information, often in small print. Communicates with Customers, Vendors, or Employees via telephone, in person, and/or electronic mail. May present information to small or large groups. Must be able to work in various temperatures. Move about in a manufacturing environment and surrounding property.

Personal Protective Equipment (PPE): As required by facility.

Travel: Up to 25%

Technical Experience: 1 year of experience in data analysis and reporting. Strong preference for previous experience with BI tools and processes.

Industry Experience: Preference for food processing organization.

Minimum Education: High school diploma or equivalent.

Preferred Education: BS in Mathematics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics

Additional Skills:

Working knowledge of Microsoft Excel skill and experience with database management.

Working knowledge of Tableau

Demonstrated delivery of exceptional customer support, process orientation and continuous focus

Business judgement, problem solving, communication skills and analytical thinking

Results orientation and the ability to thrive in a fast paced, performance orientated culture

Ability to work with highly sensitive and confidential material and possess good business judgment and ethics

Ability to work both independently and in a team environment

Highly organized with strong attention to detail, and ability to manage multiple priorities

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Work Remotely:
No",3.1,"Simmons Foods
3.1","Siloam Springs, AR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1949,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
299,Data Analyst,"$46k-$88k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About adMarketplace
With 20 years of search marketing expertise our goal is to add value to every search. On the simplest level we are the largest consumer search technology platform outside of Google and Bing. adMarketplace delivers incremental search traffic across native channels, including mobile apps, consumer sites, and browsers. Our technology enables audiences to skip search results pages and navigate directly to trusted sites in moments of intent. As well as driving incremental reach we are also market leaders in terms of privacy and performance.

The Role
We have a fantastic opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our growing team. The right person will be a champion of big data who can extrapolate big ideas from data analysis. You will support key projects to deliver scalable solutions that tackle our biggest business challenges.

What You'll Do:
Synthesize raw data into actionable insights to drive business results, identify key trends and opportunities for business teams and report the findings in a simple, compelling way
Develop a deep knowledge of data, partner with business leads to provide data sets and ad hoc reporting to solve day-to-day issues or answer key questions from our business teams
Work closely with product analyst team to support data projects of varying degrees of scale
Build reports and dashboards via our new business intelligence platform
Qualifications:
BA/BS degree or equivalent, (Math, Statistics, CS, Engineering background preferred); 1-2 years of relevant experience
Able to organize large data sets to answer critical questions, extrapolate trends, and tell a story
Highly proficient knowledge of Excel (pivot tables, VLOOKUP, formulas, functions)
Experience with SQL and databases
Python and scripting languages is a plus
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Able to understand key business drivers; strong attention to detail combined with an ability to see the big picture
Eagerness to learn and grow professionally
Interest and/or experience in advertising a plus",4.1,"Simmons Foods
3.1","Siloam Springs, AR",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
300,Data Analyst,-1,"\*\*\*This is a FULL TIME/DIRECT HIRE POSITION with a local client company. Candidates must be US Citizens or Green card and MUST either live in Columbus, OH or want to relocate here permanently.\*\*\*

Position Statement:

This Data Analytics Senior role for the accounting firm is responsible for assisting with the development, services and solutions of our client needs within Data Analytics and Business Intelligence. The Associate is also responsible for developing work plans for clients, processing, querying and analyzing data, assisting the project manager with automation solutions and interacting with the client. Individuals also may perform investigative forensics, data collection, report writing, visualization development and drafting presentations for leadership. Our ideal candidate is an experienced data analyst, database tech or financial planning & analysis associate whose career includes a broad range of hands-on experience working with large data sets, databases and reporting solutions, including visualization tools.

Tasks:

Provide data analytics and business intelligence advisory services to our clients, including a variety of the following:

Ø Interacts with high level client personnel, and plans and manages engagements to ensure engagement metrics are achieved;

Ø Designs, develops, tests, and implements data analytics or business intelligence solutions;

Ø Data visualization using PowerBI for data analysis and reporting;

Ø Data analytics projects including litigation and fraud detection;

Ø Assists with loading large datasets into SQL Server/Oracle, creating and optimizing SQL queries and analyses;

Ø Other duties as required

Client Focus:

Ø Ability to provide outstanding client service.

Ø Attention to detail and accuracy.

Ø Analytical and creative problem solving skills.

Ø Work in partnership with other team members and client personnel to help ensure efficient flow of information from client to team.

Ø Comprehend new, complex issues and perform research to solve complex problems.

Ø Proficient with data analytics and visualization tools (IDEA, Power BI), familiarity with related languages (DAX, SQL, R, etc), required.

Ø Proficient with SQL Server or similar databases, required.

Ø Any one of the following experiences, preferred: SSIS, Microsoft Azure SQL, UiPath, AWS, Alteryx, IDEA, Power BI, Tableau, Python, R, SAS or T-SQL.

Ø Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite, required.

Work Experience and Education:

Ø Bachelor’s degree required; major in business, information systems or computer science, preferred.

Ø Minimum of two (2) or more years of hands-on relevant data analytics experience in some/all of the following areas, preferred.

o Business intelligence

o Data visualization

o Data warehousing

o Database administration

o Fraud analytics

o Application development

o Robotic process automation

o Machine learning and/or artificial intelligence

Ø Minimum of one (1) or more years of database experience and writing SQL queries, preferred.

Ø Financial and/or economic analysis, business valuation, public accounting, investigative or forensic technology consulting experience, preferred.

Ø Microsoft Software Development, SQL Server or Oracle certifications, preferred.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
www.psi92.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.6,"ProTeam Solutions Inc.
2.6","Columbus, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
301,Sr. Data Analyst - Supply Chain Management,"$52k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","You will like working for us as we have amazing people and a highly collaborative culture. Global success hasn’t changed our tight-knit feel – we’ve simply grown into a larger, more diverse family. We have thousands of jobs around the globe and encourage all of our associates to chase their dreams without having to find them in another company – it truly is a special place.

Under the direction of Manager, Center of Excellence this position is responsible for managing and creating spend analysis, operations reports, and compliance tracking for assigned Supply Management spend globally. This position ensures the accuracy, distribution, and integrity of the data. Specific duties include, but are not limited to:
Build and edit dashboards catered to Supply Management’s KPIs - blending data sources where required
Leverage the latest reporting technology to develop sophisticated dashboards that provide thought-provoking insights and enhance the visibility of direct and indirect spend data
Ability to learn, understand, and deploy new reporting and analysis tools
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations
Design and run reports for improved spend visibility, compliance and identification of productivity opportunities Distribute reports to senior leaders, division general managers, Supply Management and others as needed
Evaluate, implement and deploy new tools to assist in data analytics, market research and other aspects of data analysis
Proactively identify and lead process improvements to data analysis and reporting processes across area of responsibility
Lead data mining required for accurate spend reporting.
Coordinate data maintenance required for Oracle. Ariba, or other system (supplier, item, commodity code, etc.).
Perform routine spend analysis in support of Supply Management sourcing events.
Provide summary and detail trend analysis of spend globally.
Develop and provide reporting for both internal and end customer diversity reporting, contract management, supplier performance, and e-procurement systems.
Develop and conduct routine data audits to verify data accuracy. Identify and address root causes of problems with data integrity.
Enforce standardization of supplier and purchased item data.
Ensure linkage of tools with effective Supply Management and Logistics practices.
This position is in a perfect location at our corporate headquarters in Hartsville, SC and close to exciting destinations (Myrtle Beach, SC; Charleston, SC; Columbia, SC and Charlotte, NC).

Requirements:
Strong use and understanding of data visualization, extraction and/or analysis tools, preferably with at least 5 years of experience
This position will require advanced computer skills with the ability to quickly master emerging technologies.
Excellent communication skills are needed to interact with different levels within the company.
Preferred experience in Supply Management or Logistics experience to understand terminology and philosophy and how the data can translate into results.
We care about the health and wellness of you and your family. That’s why we offer a comprehensive benefits package that makes it easier to manage your health and provide financial security for you and your family. In addition, we offer competitive wages and retirement plans.

Apply today and help us grow stronger.

For more information, visit www.sonoco.com/careers

#LI-JF1

#GDSponsored

We are an equal opportunity employer, and we strictly prohibit and do not tolerate discrimination against employees, applicants or any other covered persons because of race, color, religion, national origin or ancestry, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status, or any legally protected characteristic.",4.0,"Sonoco Products
4.0","Hartsville, SC",-1,10000+ Employees,1899,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
302,Data and Integration Business Analyst,"$46k-$90k
(Glassdoor Est.)","A career at T. Rowe Price says you want to contribute and make a difference at a leading global investment management firm where success results from the dedication our associates have in building success for our clients. We are a growing organization of associates from diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives.
We take a long-term view on associates and their careers. Our associates do phenomenal work with purpose, and as a result, we provide growth opportunities through in-person and online training, management development programs, and career development on the job.
If you are seeking a meaningful work experience along with a workplace culture that thrives on teamwork, we invite you to explore the opportunity to join us.


T. Rowe Price seeks a Data and Integration Business Analyst in Owings Mills, MD to partner with the technical project teams and business partners to elicit, clarify and translate complex business requirements into application functional and detailed technical solution documentation and conceptual designs. Define and translate business needs for new and/or enhanced products, services or optimized business processes. Participate in all phases of project lifecycle with internal and external business and technical partners to ensure business requirements are understood, documented and met.

Position requires a Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering or a related technical field plus two years of experience as a systems analyst or a related field, or in the alternate a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering or a related technical field plus five years of experience as a systems analyst or a related field. Requires two years of experience with gathering, documenting, analyzing system specifications and requirements, testing concepts, SDLC Processes (Agile Scrum, Waterfall), and Visio. At least 1 year of experience with strong testing strategy and formulating test strategies.

T. Rowe Price is an equal opportunity employer and values diversity of thought, gender, and race. We believe our continued success depends upon the equal treatment of all associates and applicants for employment without discrimination on the basis of race, religion, creed, colour, national origin, sex, gender, age, mental or physical disability, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, citizenship status, military or veteran status, pregnancy, or any other classification protected by country, federal, state, or local law.",3.7,"T. Rowe Price
3.7","Owings Mills, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1937,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
303,Senior Data Solutions Development Analyst,"$49k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Sun Life, we work together, share common values and encourage growth and achievement. We offer many career paths that attract a wide variety of talent and skills. Follow a path that lets your talents shine.

Job Description:

We are looking for a highly skilled and experienced IT professional. The candidate would have 5 years experience in the following technologies: MSSQL, SSIS, SSAS, SSRS, IBM Datastage, BOXI, LOGI Analytics. Knowledge of AWS Cloud would be beneficial They should display an interest in new technologies with an ability to self-teach if required. They must have good communication skills and work well as part of a team. They should demonstrate a strong ability to problem solve, a methodical and analytical approach to tasks, and the ability to build productive and sustainable relationships at all business functional levels while responding swiftly to changing business needs.

Preferred skills

SQL Server
SSRS\SSIS\SSAS
Informatica
Logi
Salesforce
MSBI Tools
Datastage
Oracle

Qualifications

Degree or higher level
5 year minimum experience in the above disciplines

Sun Life Financial (U.S.) Services Company, Inc. is a federal contractor subject to Executive Order 11246, Section 4212 of the Vietnam Era Veterans’ Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974, as amended, and Section 503 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended. As such the company is committed to taking positive steps to implement the employment-related aspects of the company’s equal employment opportunity policy. It is the company’s policy to take affirmative action to employ, advance in employment, and otherwise treat qualified minorities, females, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities without regard to their race/ethnicity, sex, veteran status, or disability.

Pursuant to 41 CFR §§ 60-300.44(f)(1)(ii) and 741.44(f)(1)(ii), we hereby notify you of our company policy related to our affirmative action efforts and request appropriate action on your part.

Job Category:

IT - Application Development

Posting End Date:",3.6,"Sun Life Financial
3.6","Scarborough, ME",-1,10000+ Employees,1865,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
304,Data Analyst,"$40k-$70k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Description

What does a great Data Analyst do?

The data team is looking for a data analyst who is interested in leading the effort to promote a data-driven culture at Clover. We are looking for a problem solver who has strategically built data visualization tools and conducted in-depth analyses for an executive audience. Are you a strong self-starter who can build and lead new projects from scratch with minimal guidance, oversight, or resources? We are looking for a collaborative, team player who thrives in a fast-paced environment with quickly changing, ambiguous requirements. If you are passionate about systematically finding creative approaches to most effectively bridge the gap between data and decision makers, we want to hear from you!

In this role, you can expect to:
Serve as a bridge between decision-makers and the data needed to deliver measurable insights
Work with product, engineering, and operational teams to proactively gather requirements, develop metrics, instrument features, and deploy monitoring tools to measure product performance
Design, develop, own, and maintain ETL/ELT data flows across a constellation of data sources and systems
Use Python libraries (matplotib, seaborn) and business intelligence tools (Tableau, Sigma) to create data visualizations that enable teams to make data-driven decisions quickly and easily
Conduct in-depth analyses using statistical techniques to uncover insights into the factors that drive product performance
Lead efforts to improve data literacy and fluency within the company by contributing to data warehouse development, documentation, and training teams to become self-sufficient in data exploration and analysis
Basic qualifications for consideration:
Experience providing analytical services to executive-level partners of varying technical backgrounds
Hands-on experience building and iterating on self-serve, data visualization tools
Experience in data collection, transformation, and storage from various sources including relational databases, APIs, logs, and unstructured files
Experience in Python (or at least one scripting language) and SQL
Preferred qualifications:
Master's degree in a quantitative field: Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research, Information Systems, Engineering, Economics, or Social Sciences.
Experience implementing one or more or of the following techniques: A/B testing, regression analysis, non-parametric models, time series analysis, experimental design, survival analysis, clustering, natural language processing, or neural networks
Industry experience developing cloud-based data warehouse solutions
Experience with technologies such as Kafka, Docker, Kubernetes, and Spark
About us:

Join the Fintech and SaaS revolution that is helping small businesses grow faster and get the technology and insights previously available only to the big guys. At Clover, you will be part of an entrepreneurial team working in a fast-paced and high growth environment, with the benefits of a parent company, First Data, that is the largest payments processor and merchant acquirer worldwide.

Clover delivers the leading Point of Sale system with an elegant end-to-end solution that incorporates beautiful devices, cloud-based POS software, payments processing, platform APIs for third-party developers, and an ecosystem with over 220 apps. The Clover platform delivers solutions in a scalable and modular fashion that powers tiny merchants through large football stadiums, supporting millions of transactions daily.

We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.

Learn more about Fiserv:

To support the total well-being of our associates, Fiserv takes a broad approach to our benefits. We offer a comprehensive benefits package that provides flexibility and affordability with a variety of medical, dental, vision, life insurance and disability options.

We are #FISVProud of our benefits and well-being programs. Our commitment to wellness, wellness education, preventive services and fitness activities are designed to meet you where you are.

Life moves fast. And as it does, we know most people arent thinking about financial services. But we are.

We help people and businesses move money and information every minute of every day. Our solutions connect financial institutions, corporations, merchants and consumers to one another, millions of times a day, behind the scenes, reliably and securely.

Were Fiserv, a global leader in Fintech and payments enabling innovative financial services experiences that are in step with the way people live and work today. The companys approximately 44,000 associates proudly serve clients in more than 100 countries, so their customers, members and consumers can move money when and where they need it, at the point of thought.

Our Aspiration is to move money and information in a way that moves the world. As a FORTUNE 500 company and one of FORTUNE Magazine Worlds Most Admired Companies for the seventh consecutive year, we are committed to excellence and purposeful innovation.

We welcome and encourage diversity in our workforce. Fiserv is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran

Explore the possibilities of a career with Fiserv and Find Your Forward with us.

Fiserv is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Vet. Visit http://www.careers.fiserv.com/eeo for more information.",3.2,"Fiserv
3.2","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
305,Clinical Data Management - Technical Analyst,"$36k-$87k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Are Hiring

Clinical Data Management - Technical Analyst

Virtual Position

Why Join Ascension?

Ascension leverages technology to create collaborative solutions that improve everyday health decisions. The technology enables seamless access to data across all applications transforming the customer experience when interacting with technology and enhancing our ability across Ascension to better serve communities with greater agility and responsiveness. It is used to provide insightful use of automation and data-drive improvements to enhance the provider, patient and consumer experience as well as keeping cybersecruity with a strong posture to protect data and other valuable assets.

Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, especially to those most in need. In FY2018, Ascension provided nearly $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension you will work with assigned customers to define business requirements and translate them through system design and solution development.

Responsibilities:

Designs, directs and performs data analyses to resolve complex business issues including technical and economic feasibility of proposed system solutions.
Uses data analysis and technical skills to help architect comprehensive models that integrate with other systems and data consumers.
Works toward troubleshooting and streamlining data validation efforts in complex database migrations.
Works on projects with broad implications requiring systems integration of multiple technical platforms.
Works closely with other teams of internal and external customers and vendors, understanding critical touchpoints and implications.
Manages expectations and ensures prompt and complete customer service.
Produces project plans, RFP's, and RFI's.
Leads design sessions by presenting logical statements of business problems and designs.
Customizes presentations to the interests of the audience.

What You Will Need:

Desired Work Experience:

3-5 years of experience preferred.
3+ Years of SQL required.
Experience in Healthcare Technology/Terminology required.
Previous experience with other languages such as Python preferred.
Previous experience with multiple RDBMS, Oracle,SQL Server preferred.
Previous experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred.

What You Will Need

Education:

High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required

Work Experience:

3 years of experience preferred.",3.4,"Ascension Technologies
3.4","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
306,Tableau Developer & Data Analyst,-1,"We're hiring!

Leaf Group is looking for an experienced Tableau Developer & Data Analyst for Saatchi Art to join our Business Intelligence (BI) team in Santa Monica, CA.

Saatchi Art is the world's leading online art gallery, established with the goal of helping people all over the world connect with art and artists they love. We offer an unparalleled selection of paintings, drawings, sculpture, and photography in a wide range of prices, and provide artists worldwide with an expertly curated environment in which to exhibit and sell their work. Based in Los Angeles, Saatchi Art is redefining the experience of buying and selling art, making it welcoming and accessible for artists and collectors alike.

Leaf Group is a house of digital brands, creating and cultivating digital-first companies in growing lifestyle categories, including Fitness & Wellness, Art & Design and Publishing. Our media and marketplace brands are authentic and authoritative, reaching a large and growing passionate, creative audience.

We work in a fun, collaborative environment that is diverse, adventurous, and open-minded. We look for proactive, accountable people focused on continuous learning and growth to push themselves and our businesses forward. Check us out here: https://www.leafgroup.com/brands/

A big vision calls for a big job. As we grow, our need for a Tableau Developer & Data Analyst grows with us.

You'll Report To: Sr. Director, Business Intelligence

A typical day as a Tableau Developer & Data Analyst might include:
Create complex SQL queries and perform ad-hoc and exploratory data analysis.
Provide data-driven insights to enable decision-making.
Create data visualizations using Tableau
Work with the business units to establish KPIs and methodology, and then create the appropriate reports and analysis.
Develop, own, and present dashboards to Senior Management that provide actionable insights.
Investigate data anomalies and perform Root Cause Analysis (RCA).
Audit peer reports and provide constructive feedback.
You'll be successful if you are a motivated Data Analyst with strong SQL/Tableau skills and are looking to join an energetic, fast-paced, project-driven BI team.

What You Have:
BA in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics or Mathematics or equivalent experience.
3+ years practical experience in SQL query scripting, debugging, and execution.
2+ years of experience building Tableau dashboards.
1+ years of experience working in a data-intensive organization with large-scale datasets.
Excel proficiency is required.
Previous eCommerce experience is a plus.
Proficiency in Python or other scripting language is a plus.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Not afraid to wear multiple hats - no job being too small or too large.
We're casual and informal but we work hard and work responsibly. Personal accountability goes a long way. We believe we are the change.
What We Have:
eHow is the 2019 & 2020 People's Choice and official Webby Winner for Social Video/How To-DIY
Well+Good is the 2019 People's Choice winner of the Webby's Award for Best Lifestyle Brand
Leaf Group is among TalentDesk's 2019 Best Companies To Work For
Leaf Group is among the 2019 Built In LA Best Companies To Work For
Leaf Group is among Comparably's 2018 Best Companies in Los Angeles
Well+Good is the 2018 winner of Fast Company's Most Innovative Company Award
MyPlate is the 2018 winner of the Webby Award for Best Design
Winner of the 2017 Best Company for Diversity award Comparably
Competitive compensation and benefits packages (i.e., Medical, Dental, Vision, FSA, 401K)
Discounted gym memberships
Paid-to-play vacation rewards
Discretionary unlimited vacation time
Employee discounts for Saatchi Art, Society6, and Deny Designs
Leaf Group, Ltd. is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants for all job openings are welcome and will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, or any other basis protected by state, federal, or local law. It is the intent of the Company to comply with all applicable federal, state, and local legislation concerning equal opportunity in employment.

Agency Disclosure:

If the Leaf Group Talent Acquisition department, or any current company employee, receives an unsolicited resume from a third party recruiting agency and Leaf Group does not have a signed Agency Agreement active, Leaf Group will not be deemed liable to pay a placement fee. The unsolicited resume will be considered a gift and can be considered for our recruitment efforts.",4.2,"Leaf Group
4.2",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
307,Marketing Data Analyst,-1,"WHO WE ARE*
Wilshire Law Firm is one of Southern California’s largest plaintiff personal injury, employment, aviation and class action law firms, and recognized as a 2020 Best Law Firm by U.S. News & World Report. To date, our team of nearly 200 legal professionals has recovered more than $750,000,000 for the Wilshire Law Firm client family, providing exceptional service every step of the way.

Utilizing diverse talents and a deep-seated drive to succeed, Wilshire Law Firm consistently delivers on our greatest commitment—achieving the absolute best results for our clients. We constantly ask ourselves, “What can we do better?” We dream big, going beyond what we have done before to redefine our future. Bring your knowledge, your creativity, your passion, and your confidence, and help us empower the world to do more.
Job Description *
Wilshire Law Firm is seeking a full-time Marketing Data Analyst to work as part of our stellar, legal marketing team, in our LA office. You must have outstanding analytical skills, a positive attitude, a creative mind, and the ability to handle multiple projects at once. Essentially, you will hit the ground running with the help and support from everyone at our firm.
Your duties and responsibilities include writing content for: *
· Thrives off of data and analytics

· Perform in-depth attribution and data analysis, including web analytics

· Partner with relevant departments, including IT to develop strategic reporting and dashboards

Perform web analytics tracking initiatives using Google Analytics

· SQL knowledge required

· Knowledgeable in marketing business analytics

· Preferable experience with marketing technologies, including Salesforce CRM, Invoca, Tableau, Domo, Python, digital ads, PPC

· Able to handle large data sets, including advanced Excel experience including pivot tables

· Oversees database development and modification efforts.

· Designs and implements secure, efficient, and accurate databases.

· Maintains current and accurate knowledge of data storage and management best practices.

· Ensures that databases are designed to meet specifications and requirements at the lowest possible costs.

· Ensures that database projects are completed on time and within estimated costs.

· Develops and maintains documentation and standards.

· Gathers, organizes, and interprets statistical data from the database to provide reports to, and answer questions from, upper management.

· Performs other related duties as assigned.
To be considered for this position you must: *
• Work extremely well under pressure, adhere to deadlines.

• Be organized and detail-oriented.

• Possess excellent English written and oral communication skills.

• Have an understanding and sensibility of the legal market and consumers.

• Have strong research and analytical skills.

• Be able to perform with little supervision.

• Positive attitude, work ethic, and ability to multitask across a multitude of projects and tasks.

• Agency experience, plus.
Desired qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree or relevant work experience.

Analytical/Marketing background.
BENEFITS PACKAGE*
Wilshire Law Firm offers competitive pay, great opportunities for growth and advancement and a competitive benefits package, including PTO policy, paid holidays, company-paid medical coverage option, option (plus HMO, PPO and PPO with Health Savings Account options), dental, vision and life insurance. We also provide company-paid life/AD&D coverage, EOP assistance and parking in the office building. We also sponsor professional development trainings and educational conferences.

We strive to maintain a familial atmosphere and team work environment by working collaboratively and hosting various firmwide social events throughout the year.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",4.5,"Wilshire Law Firm
4.5","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Private Practice / Firm,Legal,Accounting & Legal,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
308,Data Analyst,"$32k-$62k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About the Position: *
TruHearing’s provider network consists of 6,000+ hearing care professionals. As a Network Adherence Analyst, you will be playing a vital role in ensuring that our provider network maintains the highest quality standards by monitoring, tracking, and reporting satisfaction data for adherence.
Essential Functions & Responsibilities: *
• Convert patient satisfaction data found in various databases into information that supports the decision-making process of quality adherence

• Utilize data to assess overall provider quality by:
systematically track providers past performance of delivering customer satisfaction
develop audit capabilities to ensure adherence to patient care and physical location standards
identify trends that can be used to drive improvements
• Collaborate with Network Management team to improve provider quality outcomes by
providing timely and actionable provider scorecards/ dashboards
make recommendations for provider education opportunities and corrective actions where necessary o
identify and report key, top performing providers
• Support quality improvement initiatives and assist with developing new initiatives

• Interpret and comply with quality adherence standards • All other duties as assigned by your supervisor
Qualifications: *
A minimum of 2 years of experience in a similar analytics role
Proficiency with Microsoft programs including Access, Word, Excel & Outlook (Certifications preferred
Expertise on datasets and reports relevant to provider quality, including trends, and customer facing reports
Highly self-motivated
Problem-solving and decision-making skills
Customer service competence
Ability to work well with a group of people to achieve a shared goal or outcome
Excellent communication skills, verbal and written
Coachable and willing to improve • Ability to be creative and flexible when exploring new ideas
Exude the “TruHearing DNA” which includes being energetic, passionate, empathetic, and mission-driven
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $34.00 - $42.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.truhearing.com/careers/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.3,"TruHearing
4.3","Draper, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
309,"Data Analyst IV(Dashboarding, Enterprise reporting, Healthcare)","$65k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Purpose:

Responsible for analytic data needs of the business unit. Handle complex data projects and acts as a lead for other Data Analysts.
Provide advanced analytical support for business operations in all or some of the following areas: claims, provider data, member data, clinical data, HEDIS, pharmacy, external reporting

Extract, load, model, and reconcile large amounts of data across multiple system platforms and sources

Review data to determine operational impacts and needed actions; elevate issues, trends, areas for improvement and opportunities to management.

Develop reports and deliverables and make recommendations to management

Model data using MS Excel, Access, SQL, and/or other data ware house analytical tools

Assist management in driving business decisions based on data

Ensure compliance with federal and state deliverable reporting requirements by performing data quality audits and analysis.

Assist with training and mentoring other Data Analysts.

Assist with determining work load and related activities for other Data Analysts

Education/Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience. 6+ years of statistical analysis or data analysis experience. Healthcare experience preferred. Advanced knowledge of Enterprise Reporting and Analysis tools, SQL, and Microsoft Office applications, including Excel and Access. Experience managing projects or heavy involvement in project implementation.

HEDIS:
Bachelor’s degree related field or equivalent experience. 6+ years of statistical analysis or data analysis experience or 3+ years of HEDIS data analysis experience including measurement and rates impacted. Advanced knowledge of Business Intelligence Tools, SQL, and Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access.

BUSINESS ANALYTIC:
Bachelor’s degree’s related field or equivalent experience. 6+ years of statistical analysis or 3+ years of related IT experience, including data warehouse, coding or ETL experience. Healthcare experience preferred. Advanced knowledge of Enterprise Reporting and Analysis tools, SQL, and Microsoft Office applications, including Excel and Access. Experience managing projects or heavy involvement in project implementation. Encounters experience preferred.

PHARMACY UNDERWRITING
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience. 5+ years of experience in underwriting analysis (preferred in pharmacy or medical field), or 6+ years of experience in data analysis, or financial reporting/auditing, data warehouse, coding, or predictive analytics. Expert knowledge of SQL, Excel, and Microsoft Applications

Centene is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to diversity, and values the ways in which we are different. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.",3.4,"Iowa Total Care
3.4","Des Moines, IA",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
310,Data Analyst,"$41k-$73k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst *
National healthcare organization offering a work atmosphere committed to statistical and analytical quality while exploring and leveraging leading edge methodologies for product customization and development. We are looking for an individual who enjoys designing and building report deliverables and using data to answer challenging patient care and business questions, all within a dynamic team environment. We are interested in individuals with the ability to learn quickly, solve problems creatively, and that bring strong communication skills and work ethic while delivering innovative, high quality reporting and analyses to our clients.

This role plays a critical part in designing and building standardized health outcomes reports for our clients. Applicants should have SQL expertise in a SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) environment that includes, at minimum, experience using subqueries to pull database results. Technical report building skills, combined with data management and statistical skills, will be used to drive improvements in patient care. Advanced knowledge and experience with “real world” data and an interest in behavioral health/clinical outcomes are required. A successful member of our data science team will have a natural curiosity for research, an aptitude for analytics, a desire for data-driven decision making, and interest in improving mental health treatment and outcomes.
Summary of Major Functions *
Provide support to Senior Data Scientist and other Data Scientists in standardized report design and building, data management, data cleaning, and analysis. Drafting both standardized and ad hoc analytics reports for non-technical audiences including visual displays of results. Write new SPSS syntax code and/or modify existing code to conduct analyses. Verify accuracy of reports produced by other Data Scientists.

_The ideal candidate has experience building automated reports in an SSRS environment, or at minimum a desire to learn this skill. _
Minimum Qualifications *
_*Ability to: *_
• Conduct complex SQL queries, including the use of subqueries within a main query
• Perform analytics to drive clinical decision making.
• Use statistical modeling software (i.e., SAS/R/Python Pandas/Stata/SPSS experience) to perform analytics, including writing syntax or code.
• Communicate complex statistical results to non-technical audiences orally, in text, and with visualizations.
• Conduct statistical tests, including but not limited to t-tests, Pearson’s correlation, cross-tabulation with chi-square, and one-way ANOVA.
• Meet deadlines and work diligently as both part of a team and individually.

_*Has: *_
• Organizational and problem solving skills, attention to detail, and strong communication skills, oral and written.
• Critical thinking and logical, analytical skills.
• Proficiency in Microsoft Suite products such as Word, PowerPoint, and Excel.
• Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Mathematics or another quantitative field, such as Psychology, Economics, or Sociology and 2+ years of experience.
Preferred Qualifications *
_Also Has: _
• Experienced in using BIDS (Business Intelligence Development Studio) or SSRS to build reports containing data tables and visual displays of data
• Experience using Python within SPSS
• Exposure to health care data, specifically mental health and surveys.
• Research/publication background
• Proficiency in more advanced multivariate statistical models, such as MANCOVA, multiple regression, or logistic regression.
• Exposure to nonparametric statistical tests like Spearman’s correlation, Mann Whitney U, or Kruskal Wallis.
• Master’s degree in Statistics, Mathematics or another quantitative field, such as Psychology, Economics, or Sociology and 5+ years of experience.
To submit your resume please click ""Apply Now"". *
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
SPSS, SAS, Stata, Python Pandas, or R statistical software: 2 years (Required)
SQL queries: 1 year (Required)
t-tests, Pearson's correlation, chi-square, one way ANOVA: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
How many years of experience do you have in using statistical methods such as t-tests, Pearson’s correlation, chi-square, and one-way ANOVA to answer business questions?
WILL YOU NOW OR IN THE FUTURE REQUIRE SPONSORSHIP FOR EMPLOYMENT VISA STATUS? (E.G. H-1B VISA STATUS)",3.2,"Horizon Health
3.2","Lewisville, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
311,Healthcare Data Analyst I-Anesthesia,"$31k-$56k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Boston Children’s Hospital, success is measured in patients treated, parents comforted and teams taught. It’s in discoveries made, processes perfected, and technology advanced. In major medical breakthroughs and small acts of kindness. And in colleagues who have your back and patients who have your heart. As a teaching hospital of Harvard Medical School, our reach is global and our impact is profound. Join our Anesthesia IT Department and discover how your talents can change lives. Yours included.

Anesthesia IT is a highly collaborative group of software engineers, data analysts, and business analysts that support the research and the daily duties of the Anesthesiology Department. We are looking for a Data Analyst that is both a team player and a self-starter. If you are extremely detail oriented and enjoy solving difficult problems, this position is for you!

The Healthcare Data Analyst I will be responsible for:
Communicating directly with clinicians to gather requirements throughout the project.
Supporting various research groups within the Anesthesia Department with their data needs:
Curating ad-hoc datasets/reports from Electronic Medical Record,
Building and supporting data warehouses,
Data wrangling/cleaning,
Data validation and documentation,
Statistical Analysis,
Visualization.
Taking part in internal infrastructure projects involving workflow orchestration, data warehousing, and visualization.
Required qualifications:
A bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or STEM field and 1+ years of work experience.
Experience with relational databases and SQL.
Proficiency in Python (pandas).
Experience designing and implementing ETL pipelines using Python.
Familiarity with building dynamic dashboards using tools such as Tableau or Microstrategy.
Preferred qualifications:
Proficiency in Statistical/Machine Learning
Experience with healthcare data
Familiarity with R
Familiarity with distributed frameworks for Big Data
Please note: During a public health emergency, individuals in this role may be expected to take on additional duties to respond to organizational needs.

Boston Children’s Hospital offers competitive compensation and unmatched benefits, including a flexible schedule, affordable health, vision and dental insurance, generous levels of time off, 403(b) Retirement Savings plan, Pension, Tuition Reimbursement, and discounted rates on T-passes (50% off). Discover your best.

Boston Children’s Hospital is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disability.
LN",4.1,"Boston Children's Hospital
4.1","Boston, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1869,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
312,Energy Analyst/Data Analyst,-1,"Open until filled

Position Summary:

This position is responsible for assisting the Markets Department in the analysis of electric energy supply strategies, power purchase contracts, project development, load trends and rates and pricing strategies in support of the Cooperative's strategic initiatives.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Perform quantitative analysis of historic market pricing data, load data and other factors that drive the strategic decisions for the cooperatives power supply
Create models and tools to automate, increase accuracy and expedite analysis
Assist the Markets Department with database queries, cleaning and formatting of large amounts of data
Identify sources of appropriate economic demographic and load data, design studies to collect and analyze pertinent information in support of load and revenue forecasting activities
Develop and maintain cash flow simulation models for purchased power, load costs and rate recovery
Develop portfolio and market impact analysis based on Nodal Protocols Revision Requests
Develop analytical techniques used in the economic analysis of various supply options and contracts
Develop, analyze and interpret load data to understand customer usage patterns for use in forecasting models, rate design and energy services offerings
Update existing and create new revenue and expense forecasting models using proven methodologies
Compare forecast performance with actual results, explain variances and recommend changes for future forecasting cycles
Perform financial evaluation and analysis of different retail rate structures
Research economic trends, emerging industry issues, impact of technologies, i.e., renewables, energy storage, end-use efficiencies, etc. and develop recommendations regarding their effects on usage patterns and the future demand
Monitor electric market data and factors, regulatory changes and competitor’s rate offerings
Develop and maintain critical information, history and databases
Provide routine and ad-hoc reports and analysis
Develop presentations and reports
Maintain the security of confidential information
Stay abreast of changes in technology

Supervisory and/or Leadership Responsibilities:

May provide technical direction, training and project lead responsibilities

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Knowledge of using computer systems, which may include setting up and using hardware and software programs, entering data, configuration, or processing information
Knowledge of principles and processes for providing customer service
Knowledge of ERCOT market operations
Knowledge of ERCOT’s Nodal Protocols and financial settlement concepts
Skilled in time management
Skilled in prioritizing and managing changing priorities
Skilled in prioritizing, time management and managing changing priorities
Skilled in project management
Ability to function in a complex, rapid changing environment
Ability to query data, manipulate databases, and create reports and dashboards from databases
Ability to compute and interpret complex financial and statistical data
Ability to stay organized amid many evolving projects; detail-oriented and methodical with large amounts of data
Ability to manipulate and analyze data
Ability to work in a team oriented environment providing ideas and open feedback
Ability to maintain confidentiality
Ability to communicate effectively verbally and in writing
Ability to listen and understand information verbally and in writing
Ability to anticipate, identify, analyze and resolve conflict and problems

Minimum Qualifications – (Education, Experience, Certification, & Licensure):

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Economics, Accounting, Finance or related discipline
Five years relevant experience
Directly related experience may substitute for education
Valid Driver’s License

Preferred Qualifications:

Advanced degree
Forecasting, statistical analysis and financial evaluation experience
Five years querying and managing large data sets
Advanced user of Microsoft Excel
Advanced user of database querying tools
Proficiency with SQL, VBA, and other programming languages
Experience with scrubbing and managing large data sets

Pedernales Electric Cooperative is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, sexual orientation and gender identity.",3.0,"Pedernales Electric Cooperative
3.0","Johnson City, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1938,Nonprofit Organization,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
313,Data Analyst,-1,"The St. Jude League is currently seeking a *Data Analyst *who will execute the daily data processing and analysis of fundraising and marketing systems, currently based in Aegis, ensuring we are maximizing efficiency and capitalizing on the full features and benefits of the system. This position is integral to the overall success of the organization by maintaining, developing and leveraging constituent data and reporting on fundraising results. The ideal candidate will have a record of success in improving processes and adoption, ideally using Aegis, and will be an enthusiastic team member who is organized, self-motivated, has high attention to detail, a positive attitude, and is resourceful. Exceptional technical, analytical, written, verbal, and interpersonal skills are required.
Responsibilities*
Create standard operating procedures (SOPs) to ensure consistent data entry and use of Aegis.
Develop standards and processes to clean database records.
Develop, document and maintain efficient system processes and work flows for data entry, gift processing, prospect research, and moves management to ensure data integrity.
Continue to highlight trends in the donor base, execute analysis as requested by senior development staff, “pull” different donor groups for messages and appeals.
E*n*sure accuracy and consistency of database information and formatting.
Ensure accuracy and consistency of daily datasync between online database (Luminate) and offline database (Aegis).
Perform regular audits to ensure data integrity and quality.
Create and administer training to existing or new users/groups and provide one to one training to end users.
Use quantitative analysis tools to assemble, analyze, and draw conclusions from data.
Identify and develop tools to manipulate data where current system tools are insufficient with a focus on streamlining team processes.
Provide standard and custom reporting for fundraising campaigns, planned giving and other giving, including batch reporting, month end reporting and ad-hoc reporting.
Collaborate closely with Finance and Development teams to standardize routine queries and reports, reconcile projected and actual revenue.
Processing weekly jobs (i.e. Acknowledgements, WP)
Prepare files for Lettershop vendors.
Remain current on new releases and disseminate for staff.
Qualifications*
Bachelor’s degree.
Highly organized and efficient; with the ability to prioritize and get things done on schedule and work under pressure to meet deadlines.
Proficiency using Windows-based programs, especially Microsoft Office (Excel/Access in particular).
Quick learner, detail-oriented, with ability to use website maintenance interfaces.
Experience with project management a plus.
Ability to work independently as well as collaboratively in a team.
USPS Knowledge a plus.
BCC – Postal Software a plus.
PrintShop Mail – Formatting software for acknowledgement letters a plus.
Blackbaud – Luminate Data Integration interface with Aegis a plus.
For consideration, please submit a cover letter and resume.

The St. Jude League is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $55,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Analyst: 2 years (Required)
Blackbaud or Luminate or PrintShop mail/Aegis: 1 year (Preferred)
non-profit fundraising/marketing data analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://shrineofstjude.org/about-us/faqs/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,St. Jude League,"Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
314,Data Analyst,-1,"The St. Jude League is currently seeking a *Data Analyst *who will execute the daily data processing and analysis of fundraising and marketing systems, currently based in Aegis, ensuring we are maximizing efficiency and capitalizing on the full features and benefits of the system. This position is integral to the overall success of the organization by maintaining, developing and leveraging constituent data and reporting on fundraising results. The ideal candidate will have a record of success in improving processes and adoption, ideally using Aegis, and will be an enthusiastic team member who is organized, self-motivated, has high attention to detail, a positive attitude, and is resourceful. Exceptional technical, analytical, written, verbal, and interpersonal skills are required.
Responsibilities*
Create standard operating procedures (SOPs) to ensure consistent data entry and use of Aegis.
Develop standards and processes to clean database records.
Develop, document and maintain efficient system processes and work flows for data entry, gift processing, prospect research, and moves management to ensure data integrity.
Continue to highlight trends in the donor base, execute analysis as requested by senior development staff, “pull” different donor groups for messages and appeals.
E*n*sure accuracy and consistency of database information and formatting.
Ensure accuracy and consistency of daily datasync between online database (Luminate) and offline database (Aegis).
Perform regular audits to ensure data integrity and quality.
Create and administer training to existing or new users/groups and provide one to one training to end users.
Use quantitative analysis tools to assemble, analyze, and draw conclusions from data.
Identify and develop tools to manipulate data where current system tools are insufficient with a focus on streamlining team processes.
Provide standard and custom reporting for fundraising campaigns, planned giving and other giving, including batch reporting, month end reporting and ad-hoc reporting.
Collaborate closely with Finance and Development teams to standardize routine queries and reports, reconcile projected and actual revenue.
Processing weekly jobs (i.e. Acknowledgements, WP)
Prepare files for Lettershop vendors.
Remain current on new releases and disseminate for staff.
Qualifications*
Bachelor’s degree.
Highly organized and efficient; with the ability to prioritize and get things done on schedule and work under pressure to meet deadlines.
Proficiency using Windows-based programs, especially Microsoft Office (Excel/Access in particular).
Quick learner, detail-oriented, with ability to use website maintenance interfaces.
Experience with project management a plus.
Ability to work independently as well as collaboratively in a team.
USPS Knowledge a plus.
BCC – Postal Software a plus.
PrintShop Mail – Formatting software for acknowledgement letters a plus.
Blackbaud – Luminate Data Integration interface with Aegis a plus.
For consideration, please submit a cover letter and resume.

The St. Jude League is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $55,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Analyst: 2 years (Required)
Blackbaud or Luminate or PrintShop mail/Aegis: 1 year (Preferred)
non-profit fundraising/marketing data analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://shrineofstjude.org/about-us/faqs/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,St. Jude League,"Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
315,Data Analyst,-1,"The St. Jude League is currently seeking a *Data Analyst *who will execute the daily data processing and analysis of fundraising and marketing systems, currently based in Aegis, ensuring we are maximizing efficiency and capitalizing on the full features and benefits of the system. This position is integral to the overall success of the organization by maintaining, developing and leveraging constituent data and reporting on fundraising results. The ideal candidate will have a record of success in improving processes and adoption, ideally using Aegis, and will be an enthusiastic team member who is organized, self-motivated, has high attention to detail, a positive attitude, and is resourceful. Exceptional technical, analytical, written, verbal, and interpersonal skills are required.
Responsibilities*
Create standard operating procedures (SOPs) to ensure consistent data entry and use of Aegis.
Develop standards and processes to clean database records.
Develop, document and maintain efficient system processes and work flows for data entry, gift processing, prospect research, and moves management to ensure data integrity.
Continue to highlight trends in the donor base, execute analysis as requested by senior development staff, “pull” different donor groups for messages and appeals.
E*n*sure accuracy and consistency of database information and formatting.
Ensure accuracy and consistency of daily datasync between online database (Luminate) and offline database (Aegis).
Perform regular audits to ensure data integrity and quality.
Create and administer training to existing or new users/groups and provide one to one training to end users.
Use quantitative analysis tools to assemble, analyze, and draw conclusions from data.
Identify and develop tools to manipulate data where current system tools are insufficient with a focus on streamlining team processes.
Provide standard and custom reporting for fundraising campaigns, planned giving and other giving, including batch reporting, month end reporting and ad-hoc reporting.
Collaborate closely with Finance and Development teams to standardize routine queries and reports, reconcile projected and actual revenue.
Processing weekly jobs (i.e. Acknowledgements, WP)
Prepare files for Lettershop vendors.
Remain current on new releases and disseminate for staff.
Qualifications*
Bachelor’s degree.
Highly organized and efficient; with the ability to prioritize and get things done on schedule and work under pressure to meet deadlines.
Proficiency using Windows-based programs, especially Microsoft Office (Excel/Access in particular).
Quick learner, detail-oriented, with ability to use website maintenance interfaces.
Experience with project management a plus.
Ability to work independently as well as collaboratively in a team.
USPS Knowledge a plus.
BCC – Postal Software a plus.
PrintShop Mail – Formatting software for acknowledgement letters a plus.
Blackbaud – Luminate Data Integration interface with Aegis a plus.
For consideration, please submit a cover letter and resume.

The St. Jude League is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $55,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Analyst: 2 years (Required)
Blackbaud or Luminate or PrintShop mail/Aegis: 1 year (Preferred)
non-profit fundraising/marketing data analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://shrineofstjude.org/about-us/faqs/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,St. Jude League,"Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
316,Senior Data Analyst,"$43k-$79k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


Company Overview:

Guided by a mission to help, ABILITY, an Inovalon company, is a leading information technology company helping healthcare providers and payers simplify administrative and clinical complexity by enabling data-driven improvements in healthcare.

Through specialized, easy-to-use applications and data analytics that work together, customers of all types and sizes across the continuum of care – rely on ABILITY to help optimize reimbursement, care quality and staffing.

Our employee philosophy is simple: We hire smart, talented people and trust them to do their thing. As part of ABILITY, you’ll grow with a company that wants you to succeed. To support you, we provide the teams, the latitude, the support and the culture so you can try new things, broaden your experience, and grow and succeed with us. Join our team and help make ABILITY a great place to do great work.

Job Purpose:

There are two primary outcomes of this Senior Data Analyst role. The first outcome is to provide analysis and reporting to leadership to drive the business forward. The second outcome is to keep our systems and data warehouse efficient and accurate through writing efficient SQL code, designing automated reporting, and providing recommendations to committees for further process/workflow automation. This role will be interacting with all departments and job roles, from the bottom of the org chart up to the President of ABILITY and will require strong communication and technical skills.

Responsibilities


Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Developer of ad-hoc, automated, and recurring reporting enterprise wide (Executive Team, Finance, Marketing, Sales, Sales Operations, Customer Operations, IT, Development, Product Management)
Develop and maintain a database and reporting structure in order to remain the primary source of data analytics and reporting within the company
Communicate your analysis and reporting in an easy to understand way through presentations, email, and with proper documentation.
Learn & maintain an in-depth knowledge of the processes relevant to data analytics that are in place for each department while identifying areas for process improvement and working to fix them
Perform month end variance analyses to understand in detail the drivers for variations in financials and various other 'ad-hoc' analyses as requested to help identify what is happening within the business
Lead, encourage, and support all analysts with reporting, insights, project review, and training in our data measures and structures
Research and implement new reporting solutions, both with internal applications and external applications in order to utilize our technology to the fullest
Maintain compliance with Inovalon’s policies, procedures and mission statement;
Adhere to all confidentiality and HIPAA requirements as outlined within Inovalon’s Operating Policies and Procedures in all ways and at all times with respect to any aspect of the data handled or services rendered in the undertaking of the position;
Fulfill those responsibilities and/or duties that may be reasonably provided by Inovalon for the purpose of achieving operational and financial success of the Company;
Uphold responsibilities relative to the separation of duties for applicable processes and procedures within your job function; and
We reserve the right to change this job description from time to time as business needs dictate and will provide notice of such.
Qualifications
BA/BS in Finance, Accounting or related Data Analysis field
Minimum 5 years of related experience
Expert knowledge in Microsoft Office suite including Word, Excel, Visio and PowerPoint
Ability to write complex SQL queries required
Experience with Tableau required
Experience with SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) required
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Demonstrate ability to work effectively with others within a complex, fast paced organization required
Capability to work independently when needed, with strong “executive presence”
Merger and acquisition experience a plus


Travel: 0%",3.0,"Ability Network
3.0","Minneapolis, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
317,Data Analyst - Looker Expert,-1,"Officium is Latin for **service**. We believe in service—as an experience, as a business, as a social responsibility.

We are a global network of remote customer experience (CX) professionals helping companies create best-in-class support for their customers, transforming customer service from a cost center to a growth opportunity. Our *TalentPlace* platform connects on-demand CX workers with companies in need of CX staff. Our *ExperienceMatters* experts provide consulting and coaching to service leaders of all types. We also offer a set of patented standards and digital tools—including analytics, workforce planning, and automation capabilities—to improve experiences for customers and employees.

Officium was founded in 2019 on the concept of a decentralized network of people and currencies. Our remote workforce model has the potential to improve work/life balance and shift wealth from large cities to new communities around the world. We are also building future CX leaders by providing scholarships and mentorship programs to disadvantaged youth in the US.

Responsibilities

A Data Analyst interprets data and turns it into information which can offer ways to improve a business, thus affecting business decisions. Data Analysts gather information from various sources and interpret patterns and trends. Once data has been gathered and interpreted, the Data Analyst will report back what has been found in a comprehensive study to the wider business/relevant colleagues.
Use statistical methods to analyze data and generate useful business reports
Work with management team to create & maintain a prioritized list of needs for each business segment
Use data to create models that depict trends in the customer base and the consumer population as a whole
Work with departmental managers to outline the specific data needs for each business method analysis project
Other related duties as assigned.
Skills and Requirements
Experience with Looker reporting and analytics
Must have a good working knowledge of Excel and other Windows based programs (Word, PowerPoint, etc.), and have the ability to organize/analyze data in a structured manner.
Experience working within a Contact Center environment, with focus on ticket trends / volume spikes, customer satisfaction, KPIs, etc.
Experience with Zendesk, Helpshift or comparable CRM systems strongly preferred.
Experience with PowerBI and Looker preferred.
Strong quantitative and analytical skills.
Excellent communication, collaboration and delegation skills.
Knowledge of SQL desired
Ability to navigate and manage change.
Why Officium
Opportunity to help build a growing and disruptive start-up
Flexible remote work environment – choose your own schedule (on-demand/hourly based on need)
We are people focused, socially responsible, and collaborative
Iterative improvement with “win or learn” mentality
Job Type: Contract",-1,"Officium Labs, Inc.","Raleigh, NC",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
318,Data Analyst/ Senior Data Analyst,-1,"You will be a crucial member of the team tasked with capturing data workflows and use cases across EQRx and turn them into reproducible, democratizable tools on a modern data tech stack, enabling faster and more successful drug development. You will map how data is used to understand the complex web of interrelationships in taking drugs from a pharmaceutical company to a patient. You will translate and harden these workflows to a modern data tech stack in collaboration with data scientists and engineers.
You will understand how clinical scientists and staff capture, maintain, and use data and use these insights to organize data across EHR (Electronic Health Record), clinical trial, and other data sources. You will integrate data across sources and use cases (e.g. pricing, claims, and clinical) to enable end users to see across EQRx’s data asset to improve our program design, operations, opportunity targeting, pricing, and access. You will assist in building a digital-native life sciences company, identifying and prioritizing areas to pursue, where data tools could inform decision making throughout EQRx.
The Impact You'll Have
You will enable experts across EQRx to look across datasets to identify key opportunities to dramatically reduce prices and expand access to novel drugs, connecting information across market data, patient claims and adherence, and clinical datasets to enable experts to pinpoint the most salient opportunities for developing novel, more accessible medicines. This person will speed the development and trialing of novel medicines by bringing a digital and data native technology stack to drug development, powering a modern, and radically new paradigm in drug development.
Your Superpowers
You have a Bachelors or Masters degree in a quantitative scientific, or social scientific field, e.g. biology, engineering, economics, etc.
You have 3+ years of experience in industry (Life sciences/healthcare background a major plus).
You are skilled at building insightful visualizations in a modern dashboarding tool (e.g. Mode, Looker, Spotfire); experience with D3.js a plus.
You are fluent in SQL and comfortable in a scripting language such as python.
You have worked with modern cloud data warehousing tools (e.g. BigQuery, Snowflake) and ETL tools (e.g. Stitch, Fivetran, DBT).
You are an excellent communicator, empathetic with end users and internal customers. You can translate a problem from a description of a business process to organization of data and pipelines.
You have a quick, flexible mind; always looking for clever ways to connect data and transform processes to a modern, digital and data native architecture.
You possess strong communication, organizational and presentation skills.
You can participate and work effectively on multiple cross-functional teams.
You play well in the sandbox. You understand relationships are key and have strong interpersonal skills.
Teams love working with you and learning from you.
You can thrive in a smaller company environment and love the pace of a true startup.
You’re a team player who is willing to roll-up your sleeves and get the job done.
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,"EQRx
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
319,Data Analyst - Insights,-1,"Doximity is transforming the healthcare industry. Our mission is to help clinicians save time so they can provide better care for patients.

We value diversity — in backgrounds and in experiences. Healthcare is a universal concern, and we need people from all backgrounds to help build a better future for all.

How you'll make an impact:
Play a key role in creating client-facing analytics by working closely with our Client Service Managers and Sales teams.
Showcase your engineering skills by creating data products from scratch and automating code so they can be re-used by other teammates.
Work with your team to build your technical and non-technical skill sets.
Leverage Doximity's extensive datasets to identify and classify behavioral patterns of medical professionals on our platform.
Grow into a presentation/communication-focused role or dive deeper into more-involved technical challenges—the choice is yours.
We're trying something different. In the past we'd throw out a laundry list of requirements but we realized there were 4 key traits we need - everything else can be flexible.

A successful candidate must have at least a three-year track record of these traits:
Collaborative—The best candidates and teammates are not only strong in their own aptitudes but care deeply about supporting each other's growth.
Passion for Data—You're going to help our clients and team members with data-driven decision making. We need someone that can manipulate millions of rows of data and also ask the right questions to find the important insights.
Attention to Detail—Clients expect the right answers and the successful candidate will have a history of error handling and creating quality checks to make sure we provide accurate data.
Time Management—Our team operates in a fast-paced environment. We have a lot of clients with a lot of questions and are looking for the best person to manage competing priorities from various stakeholders.
After 90 days on the job, we expect that you will be:
Able to create and evaluate complex SQL statements involving numerous tables and complex relationships.
Conducting Exploratory Data Analysis using Python using some of the most common modules (numpy, pandas, statsmodels, matplotlib).
Comfortable with UNIX command line interface and standard programming tools (vim/emacs, git, etc.).
Fun facts about the Insights team:
We have access to one of the richest healthcare datasets in the world, with deep information on hundreds of thousands of clinicians and their connections.
The members of our team bring a diverse set of technical and cultural backgrounds.
Business decisions at Doximity are driven by our data, analyses, and insights.
We like to have fun - company outings, team lunches, and other social events.
More info on Doximity

We're thrilled to be named the Fastest Growing Company in the Bay Area, and one of Fast Company's Most Innovative Companies. Joining Doximity means being part of an incredibly talented and humble team. We work on amazing products that over 70% of US doctors (and over one million healthcare professionals) use to make their busy lives a little easier. We're driven by the goal of improving inefficiencies in our $3.5 trillion U.S. healthcare system and love creating technology that has a real, meaningful impact on people's lives. To learn more about our team, culture, and users, check out our careers page, company blog, and engineering blog. We're growing steadily, and there's plenty of opportunity for you to make an impact.

Doximity is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, and committed to providing employment opportunities regardless of race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy, childbirth and breastfeeding, age, sexual orientation, military or veteran status, or any other protected classification. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.",4.7,"Doximity
4.7",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
320,Senior Data Analyst,"$51k-$94k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Senior Data Analyst is a key position within the Data Mining Group, relied upon to identify the needs of the business and drive product development to meet them. In this role, you will lead new initiatives and mentor other analysts within the Data Mining Group. You will maintain regular communication with all levels of the organization while managing several high impact projects.

About Us

The Rawlings Group provides payment integrity services and claims data analysis for health insurance carriers and their members. We work behind the scenes to make sure that members are receiving the full value of their coverage by ensuring that claims are appropriately paid. Providing payment integrity and recovery services to the industry creates a more equitable distribution of healthcare dollars so members can receive the care they need when they need it most.

We offer opportunities for growth and development, continuing education, internal mobility and promotions, and unrivaled income earning potential. We are looking for individuals that have the drive and commitment to make a difference in the industry. We invite you to apply to become a part of The Rawlings Group team.

Our Culture is focused on:

The guiding principle of doing the right thing
Caring for our employees and taking pride in the work they do
Providing recognition and financially rewarding employees for their success

Our Values are:

Integrity and Trust
Customer Service Excellence
Innovation
Diversity and Inclusion
Honoring our Veterans and their service
Responsibilities
Meet regularly with all levels of the organization to understand core business concepts or challenges, form requirements, provide updates and deliver results
Operate with reduced levels of supervision while meeting deadlines
Work independently or collaboratively as required by the project
Mentor and educate data analysts in support of a positive team culture
Use strong written and verbal skills to provide analysis to an executive audience
Create custom reports and visualizations to support operations
Maintain, execute, and create SQL queries to support critical business needs
Perform data engineering related tasks
Originate targeted mining processes to create inventory and report results
Research new tools and techniques to improve mining and enrichment processes
Performs other duties as assigned
Bachelor’s degree in a business, computer, data, mathematics, or science related field is required.
4 or more years of professional experience
4 or more years of SQL experience and Python (or similar general-purpose language)
2 or more years of data visualization (Tableau preferred)
Experience building SSIS packages
Experience processing, cleaning, and warehousing unstructured data
Fundamental understanding of statistics
Familiarity with basic machine learning algorithms
Ability to present major initiatives and results to Leadership
Strong analytical mindset and eagerness to learn a complex business
High attention to detail and data accuracy
Proactive, inquisitive and creative in approach to work
Ability to handle multiple projects effectively
Capability to work in a small team setting with frequent outreach
Physical Requirements
Frequently remains in sitting position for long periods of time to perform duties
Frequently concentrates for long periods of time, paying close attention to detail
Frequently uses and views the computer using fingers, hands, and vision
Frequently works in a well-lit, tempered environment
Occasionally walks through office to communicate with other employees
Equal Employment Opportunity. It is our policy to recruit, hire, train, and promote people without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status, except where age, sex, or physical status is a bona fide occupational qualification.
The Rawlings Group is an employment at will employer.
#LI-JS23",2.8,"The Rawlings Group
2.8","Lagrange, KY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
321,Data Analyst,"$25k-$47k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Osmose

With 85 years of experience, Osmose proudly serves the electric utility and telecommunications industries across the U.S., helping enable the delivery of safe, reliable and affordable electricity and communications services to millions of customers nationwide. We are the industry leader in wood and steel structure condition assessment, life-extension and rehabilitation services. Our mission is to accurately inspect and mitigate aging infrastructure in a planned, programmatic manner that minimizes owner costs while maximizing benefits.

Headquartered in Peachtree City, Georgia, with satellite offices in Atlanta, Buffalo-Depew, Syracuse, Boston-Westborough and Secaucus, NJ, the Osmose footprint extends throughout the country. Our employees are inspired to perform each and every day by our core values of integrity, customer focus, safety, respect, excellence, flexibility, efficiency and ownership. Our staff and field personnel represent some of the most tenured, well trained, and innovative professionals in the industry.

We are currently seeking a Data Analyst responsible for researching, gathering and presenting data as it pertains to consultative selling engagements and to validate data within the asset analytics platform.

Responsibilities
Execute ETL processes and workflows to capture, store and process utility infrastructure data in specific ways that make it actionable in machine learning/modeling processes.
Collaborate with Solution Consultants and other staff members to provide data needed to supplement the consultative selling engagements.
Analyze data and identify trends in individual customers and the entire electric and telecom utility population as a whole.
Download and apply spatial datasets using GIS Software to perform ad hoc analyses as well as to supplement the Asset Analytics platform of models.
Assist the Data Engineer in gathering company wide data for utilization outside of the Asset Analytics team.
Serve as a contributing member of the project team from project inception to completion.
Use defined application requirements to validate outcomes from the a suite of applications.
Qualifications
A minimum of one (1) year of work experience in a similar role.
Proven history of generating innovative and effective data analyses.
Excellent interpersonal communication skills to explain complex technical topics in an easily digestible manner.
Strong Microsoft Excel, T-SQL skills, basic working knowledge of modern scripting languages (preferably R and Python).
Utilities services background a plus.
Benefits

Come grow with us! Full-time employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package that includes:

Medical Insurance and Health Savings Account with company contribution
Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, STD, LTD, Critical Illness Plan and more!
401(k) with excellent company match
Paid time off (vacation, sick)

Osmose is an Equal Opportunity employer. EOE M/F/Disabled/Vet

REQ ID 535",3.3,"Osmose Utilities Services
3.3","Depew, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1934,Company - Private,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
322,Data Analyst,"$45k-$83k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

i3 is seeking a Data Analyst to support Mission Integration Management, Engineering, and Analysis activities. This position is located in Arlington, VA.

This position will support programs in the Office of the Under Secretary of Defense for Research & Engineering (OUSD(R&E)). USD(R&E) requires mission engineering, analysis, and integration expertise to produce objective insights and analytic justification to inform future technology and capability investment decisions within the Planning, Programming, and Budgeting Execution (PPBE) process and aid in the prioritization, alignment and validation of requirements within Joint Capabilities Integration and Development System (JCIDS) to deliver modernized capabilities that enable an all domain joint force aligned with future Joint Warfighting Concepts.

Responsibilities:
Synthesize vast amounts of complex technical data into management level information
Conduct data analysis in support of technical, managerial or operational fields
Support development, maintenance, and curation of government reference architectures used to communicate and guide analysis efforts, document and communicate results, and set the basis for subsequent engineering and prototyping activities
Conduct project management related tasks, meeting management and administrative duties as requested including stakeholder integration working level meetings related to Joint Capabilities Integration and Development System (JCIDS), Joint Force Integration Cell (JFIC), Joint All-Domain Command and Control (JADC2), War gaming/Table Top Exercises (TTX), Service/COCOM Engagement, Industry Engagement, and USD(R&E) Modernization Assistant Directors
Qualifications:
Minimum of a bachelor’s degree in science, technical, engineering or mathematics (STEM) discipline
Minimum of five (5) years of experience
TS/SCI security clearance
Experience in supporting technical, managerial or operational fields and mature judgement required to interface with external stakeholders and senior government personnel
Strong organizational and oral and written communication skills are required. Experience synthesizing vast amounts of complex technical data into management level information.
Experience preparing presentations and other visualization forms to communicate results and artifacts to varied audiences
Experience maintaining configuration management on large and complex projects and developing and administering integrated data environments including cloud based storage approaches",3.9,"Integration Innovation, Inc.
3.9","Arlington, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
323,Reconciliation Data Operations Analyst,"$42k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Global Payment Operations organization is hiring a Recon Ops Data Analyst in Austin TX, who will be responsible for day-to-day reconciliation, data analysis and reporting of payment transactions processed through our system and the related general ledger accounts. You will partner closely with our Controlling, Accounting, Payments product and Payments operations Team etc. The ideal candidate will be self-motivated, process-oriented, works effectively with cross functional teams, in addition to strong written and verbal communication skills.

Job Responsibilities:

Reconciles variances by identifying patterns in complex data sets
Works with accounting and product on key performance metrics, reports and analytics related to reconciliation
Manages daily, weekly and monthly reporting for review with Accounting team
Develops standardized reporting packages, and delivers ad-hoc reporting/analysis required to support reconciliation procedures
Works with large volumes of data for extraction and transformation leveraging eBay’s massive and rich databases
Analyze current manual process surrounding Operations for optimization opportunities.
Designs optimal data architecture for data management and high performance.
Designs and execute reports to measure success and performance of business initiatives.
Automates data driven system controls for Operational procedures
Performs data modeling, documents and presents analysis

Job Requirements

Advanced SQL knowledge
General Ledger and Payments Industry Experience
Experienced in data mining and analysis
Expertise in deriving and building Metrics to help quantify Business Processes.
Ability to work with various stakeholders to understand and build project requirements.
Understands SOX compliant processes and builds accordingly.
Experienced in Agile environment.
Problem solving approach with great verbal and presentation skills
SAS, Python, Hadoop experience is a plus
Master+ 3 Years or Bachelors+ 5 Years

This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies

View our privacy policy

View our accessibility info
eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com . We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible.

For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement",3.7,"eBay Inc.
3.7","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
324,2021 IT - Advanced Data Analytics Product Analyst Remote Intern,-1,"Information Technology - Advanced Data Analytics Product Analyst Intern

The Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco believes in the diversity of our people, ideas, and experiences and our committed to building inclusive culture that representative of the communities we serve.



FEDERAL RESERVE SYSTEM OVERVIEW

The Federal Reserve Bank’s mission and work are built on over hundred years of strength, stability, and excellence. No other organization does what we do or has a greater impact on global economies. Our mission is to promote low inflation, full employment, and financial stability as well as provide services to financial institutions and the Treasury.

FEDERAL RESERVE BANK OF SAN FRANCISCO OVERVIEW

The Reserve Bank of San Francisco is one of Twelve Reserve Banks responsible for setting the nation’s monetary policy, serving the as the fiscal agent for the United States Treasury and supervising banking institutions, ensuring their stability and compliance with banking regulations. Our headquarters are in SF, CA serving the largest geographic district within the Federal Reserve System. With Branches offices in Los Angeles, Seattle, Portland, Salt Lake City, and Phoenix.

GOLD INTERN PROGRAM OVERVIEW

Invest in your future and consider joining the Growing Opportunity for Leadership and Diversity (GOLD) Program. Our paid internship program will offer you the opportunity to work on projects that supports the Bank’s business and impact the United States economy.

GROUP/DEPARTMENT OVERVIEW

Within the ADAC team, our day to day tasks revolve around supporting one of the multiple projects that are being worked on by our team. Specifically on my project, daily tasks include, writing user stories, participating in scrum meetings, working on user stories (as applicable), building report-out decks for management.

POSITION/PROJECT OVERVIEW

This project/position would challenge the intern because usually interns do not have a lot of experience working within a product team. Our team is extremely product focused and will continue to be so in the future. Additionally, we are currently focusing on Cloud technologies which allows interns to learn in detail more about the cloud environment as well as get hands on experience within the cloud.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES

The intern will write user stories for our development team, work on user stories (as applicable), gather functional requirements from stakeholders and product leadership, work through information security aspects (as necessary), present on completed user stories (as necessary), support product leadership with marketing, customer outreach, etc.

REQUIREMENTS:
U.S. Citizen or Permanent Residency
Freshman, Sophomore, Junior, or Senior standing in a 4-year bachelor’s degree program
Ability to work 40 hours week throughout the duration of the approximately 10 -week internship program
MS Suite Proficiency
Strong written communication skills
PREFERRED SKILLS:
Desired skills: SQL, Tableau,
Students graduating in 2021 or 2022
Jira, AWS Cloud, product management, agile methodology
The Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.6,"Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1913,Government,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
325,Data Analyst,"$41k-$74k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Who we want

Teammates. Partners who listen to ideas, share thoughts and work together to move the business forward.

Strategic thinkers. People who enjoy analyzing data or trends for the purposes of planning, forecasting, advising, budgeting, reporting, or sales opportunities.

Data translators. Highly effective communicators who can transform data findings into recommendations to compose reports and executive level presentations.

Detail-oriented process improvers. Critical thinkers who naturally see opportunities to develop.

Collaborative partners. People who build and leverage cross-functional relationships to bring together ideas, information, use cases, and industry analyses to inform business strategy and decisions.

Analytical problem solvers. People who go beyond just fixing to identify root causes, evaluate optimal solutions, and recommend comprehensive upgrades to prevent future issues.

Data managers. People who enjoy compiling, organizing and consolidating large volumes of data and reports.

Business-oriented evaluators. People who effectively interpret information to demonstrate the effects of business initiatives, regulation and industry trends for sales, management and leadership teams.

What you will do

As a Data Analyst you will focus on contracts, pricing, and customer intelligence to maximize revenue and margin through contract and pricing strategy by leveraging analytic tools such as Power BI, excel, etc. You will elevate Stryker's approach to customer data by providing business intelligence solutions that supply our business leaders and sales teams with information to support and inform business strategy, identify opportunity, and inform negotiations and decisions. In addition, you will gain a deep understanding of the businesses you support and development, maintain, deploy, and scale data models and internal solutions that support the business needs. You will build strong relationships with internal customers and sales teams and provide exceptional customer service. Lastly, you'll have the opportunity to build relationships and collaborate with a robust team, deliver business focused analytics and recommendations, and enable key initiatives for HCS and our business partners.

What you need
Bachelor's degree in Computer Information Systems, Business Analytics, Data Science, Business, Accounting, Finance, or related discipline with one year of data analysis and reporting experience preferred OR Master's degree in Computer Information Systems, Business Analytics, Data Science, Business, Accounting, Finance, or related discipline.
Experience with excel and other reporting and visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau. Basic data modeling and fundamental core database concepts.
Effective presentation, written, verbal communication skills, including the ability to explain data and findings.
Work From Home: Occasional

Travel Percentage: 10%

Stryker Corporation is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, ethnicity, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. Stryker is an EO employer - M/F/Veteran/Disability.

Stryker Corporation will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information.",4.2,"stryker
4.2","Portage, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1941,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
326,Data Insight Analyst,"$41k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Are you interested in expanding your career through experience and exposure, all while supporting a mission that seeks to ensure the security of our nation and its allies? If so, then Northrop Grumman is the place for you. As a leading global security company, we provide innovative systems, products and solutions to our customers worldwide. We are comprised of diverse professionals that bring different perspectives and ideas, understanding that the more experiences we bring to our work the more innovative we can be. As we continue to build our workforce, we look for people that exemplify our core values, leadership characteristics, and approach to innovation.
Are you ready to put your experience to work at Northrop Grumman? If so, Northrop Grumman Technology Services has an opening for a Data Insight Analyst and we want you to join our team of qualified, diverse individuals in Warner Robins, Georgia.
Your responsibilities include:
You will develop and implement data processing and visualization products supporting various aerospace systems programs. You will use your understanding and experience in specifying, collecting, processing and presenting information from potentially several disparate data sets. Also, generate actionable knowledge from data. Possesses analytical and problem solving skills necessary for quickly developing recommendations based on quantitative and qualitative data from many different types of sources. Ability to identify patterns and higher level information from all the data sources through use of tools and application programming.
Specific Responsibilities:
Supports multiple business areas and programs by developing visibility reports and tools
Analyzes/interprets data and converts it to meaningful information for the business
Explores/develops new technologies or approaches to data analysis and interpretation
Creates ad hoc reports based on unique business needs
Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
A Bachelor's degree and a minimum of 3 years of direct relevant experience OR a Masters Degree and 1 year of related experience. An additional 4 years of direct relevant experience may be considered in lieu of the degree requirement.
Advanced proficiency using MS Excel to include:
• Power Query & Power Pivot
• Data Models & creating measures
• Slicers and timelines
• Dashboard building experience and KPI implementation in Excel
Intermediate experience with MS access DB creation for use in consolidating source data from ODBC connections into queries that can be pulled in to Excel's Power Query
Intermediate knowledge of database structure and relationships
General knowledge of concepts and experience doing statistical analysis. (Developing Key Performance Metrics)
Ability to obtain/maintain access to work on-site in Warner Robins, Georgia
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's degree in a STEM discipline with a minimum of 1 year of data analysis experience
Experience incorporating data into MS project
MS Power BI, Tableau, or other Business Intelligence Software
Experience writing and managing queries in SQL and Oracle databases
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.8,"Northrop Grumman
3.8","Warner Robins, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
327,Sr. Analyst Data Analytics- Reporting & Analytics (Supply Chain),"$76k-$125k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Are you looking for an opportunity where you can leverage your passion and expertise in providing data analytics and reporting to business teams to help guide and shape their planning and operations? If so, this may be the ideal role for you! Best Buy is looking for an experienced and knowledgeable Senior Supply Chain Analyst to work with our Supply Chain team to provide analytics, reporting and forecasting.

At Best Buy we offer latest and greatest technology, a team of amazing coworkers and a work environment where anything is possible, you'll find it easy to be your best when you work with us. We provide an exciting work environment with a community of technology learners where you can be yourself while investing in your career. Empowered with knowledge you will discover endless opportunities to grow. We believe the success of our company depends on the passion of employees for learning, technology and people.

What is the Senior Supply Chain Data Capabilities Analyst responsible for?

This individual is responsible for data mining, interpreting data, identifying operational gaps and developing solutions, which drive efficiency and support Best Buy's Supply Chain planning and operations. This role will own the process of providing recommendations and insight by using analytics, reporting and forecasting for Supply Chain Business Teams in the field and at corporate by utilizing the latest technology and developing automation to retrieve data from multiple systems and/or sources and will lead the partnership with Supply Chain and cross-functional peers to identify specific data needs and operational gaps for visibility to drive results across Supply Chain and cross-functionally to achieve consistency in data outcomes.

Areas of ownership and impact:
Interpret, develop and maintain Supply Chain analytics and operations reporting for Best Buy’s Transportation, Parcel, Distribution Center Operations, and Distribution Field teams.
Partner with Supply Chain teams (i.e. Transportation, Parcel, DDC Operations, and RDC Operations) and other cross-functional areas to determine the right attributes and sources, and the right level of granularity, including definitions, explanations and back up detail if needed for analytics and reporting needs.
Drive efficiencies across analytics and reporting processes by use of automation and implementation of industry best practices.
Be the lead subject matter expert in current state-of-the-art data analytical methods useful in Supply Chain analytics.
Be the lead in driving recommendations for project requirements by providing knowledge and experience in defining data requirements needed for business teams.
What is required for this role?

This person will be exceptional at data mining, a reporting and analytics professional with the ability to build strong cross-functional relationships across the organization. The Supply Chain team is a group of individuals who are passionate about problem solving, “telling the story” with data, and uncovering new insights that drive business strategy decisions.

The ideal candidate will roll up his/her sleeves, embraces continuous improvement, is forward-thinking, progressive, understands the retail world and has a past track record of significant accomplishments in the reporting and analytics space, and creating win/win solutions. The Senior Analyst should possess strong written and oral communication skills and be comfortable navigating through ambiguity, managing multiple priorities, and meeting deadlines while living the values of the Best Buy brand.

In addition to having experience in the responsibilities above, the ideal candidate will have the following qualifications:

Basic Requirements:
2 or more years of experience of Supply Chain, Retail or related fields (e.g. Demand Planning, Forecasting, etc.)
2 or more years of experience with SQL and familiarity with concepts of database design
2 or more years of using ETL tools like Informatica, Alteryx, or DataStage
2 or more years of using BI tools like Power BI, or Cognos, etc.
Advanced skills using Excel and PowerPoint
Preferred Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree (4 years) or related industry experience
Experience using data visualization tools (Microsoft Power BI, or R)
Experience in statistical modeling (regression methods or time series methods)
Experience using SSAS Tabular, PowerPivot and DAX language",3.9,"Best Buy
3.9","Richfield, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Consumer Electronics & Appliances Stores,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1
328,Senior Healthcare Data Analyst,-1,"Job Summary*
The Senior Healthcare Data Analyst position involves programming, data mining and analysis of healthcare data with an emphasis on medical economics, clinical and financial reporting.

An inquisitive and detail oriented mind and a passion for using data and analytics to drive results

is critical to the success of this position.
Essential Functions*
Analyze medical cost and utilization trends is support of medical economics and population health initiatives supporting our ACO
Work with key business owners to establish and meet their analytic needs and the analytic needs of the organization
Execute the various outcome and predictive analytic studies that support MHN’s model of care.
Management, maintenance, and design of integration strategies regarding eligibility and empanelment including data quality, reporting and retention initiatives.
Assist with the design, development, and maintenance of the Analytic DataMart including quality checks, identifying data issues and working with partners to create solutions
Complete a variety of clinical and financial client ad hoc analyses in an efficient and timely manner.
Developing and using risk models for comparative analysis and patient stratification
Work with IT teams to operationalize analytic and reporting innovations
Conduct analysis to support Shared Savings and other key improvement programs
Develop actionable dashboards and reports to support care management and ACO operations
Competencies*
Must be analytical, detail oriented, and a problem solver
Expertise in data manipulation, analysis, and presentation
Advanced knowledge of medical claims, pharmacy, and eligibility data
Ability to work independently on multiple projects. Must have strong organization and time management skills
Experience with risk adjustment methodologies and predictive analytics
Experience developing visualizations and working with BI tools
Experience developing medical performance metrics and clinical quality measures (Physician Scorecards, HEDIS, PQRS, etc.)
Required Experience*
Minimum 4 years of professional experience in a data analytics role within healthcare (payer, provider, consulting)
4 – 10 years of experience using Base SAS, SAS/Macros, and SQL
Required Education*
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, public health, information systems, computer science, or a comparable program with a quantitative emphasis. Master’s degree preferred.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
data analytics in healthcare field: 4 years (Required)
SAS work: 4 years (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Other
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Medical Home Network,"Chicago, IL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
329,Data Analyst,"$46k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Jackson Family Wines is much more than a family owned wine company. We're risk-taking innovators with a strong belief that quality is paramount. We're always on the lookout for top talent -- individuals who possess a strong work ethic, commitment to quality and share our beliefs in healthy lands and a healthy community. In 2019, we were selected as one of the North Bay Business Journal's Best Places to Work for the fifth year running.

SUMMARY

Data Analyst

The Data Analyst position will capture, manage, analyze, and apply customer knowledge to help Jackson Family Wines win, support and retain customers. To succeed, this person will partner with Direct-to-Consumer teams to define, develop, deliver and support technology solutions that align with department goals and business strategy. This includes capturing customer data from all sources, managing across customer-facing systems and functions as well as partner with Business Analysts to obtain actionable insights.

A successful candidate will have proven experience in producing reporting, dashboards and visualizing insights; expertise in pattern mining and business analytics. This role requires both a broad knowledge of existing data mining and processing along with the creativity to invent and customize as needed.

Responsibilities
Proficient in the analysis, design, development, debugging, and support of data ecosystems including data management, governance, and ETL integration processes to generate insights
Participates in the development of statistical and predictive models and leveraging machine learning algorithms
Take ownership of both recurring/standardized reporting as well as ad hoc projects and requests
Lead the analysis of transactional and customer data, including cross-tabulations and statistical analysis, provide insights into purchasing patterns, develop hypotheses about trends, and translate results into actionable recommendations for business partners
Responsible for business analytics work through all phases, including data quality, data analysis, data visualization, and presentation of results and deliverables
Design and create scalable BI analytic solutions that provide insights into business KPIs. Analytic solutions to cover data acquisition, storage in data warehouse, automation, and visualization of insights
Quantify the impact of DTC sales and marketing initiatives on customer success and future behavior
Develop reusable analytics and assets working closely with the Data Warehouse/BI team to ensure scalability of analytical outputs
Build relationships with customers and peers and work closely with them to influence the design of acceptable solutions
Qualifications
Ability to operate comfortably, and effectively, in a fast-paced, highly cross-functional, rapidly changing environment
Intermediate to advanced experience with an enterprise reporting/BI platform (Power BI preferred)
Proficient with SQL, creating stored procedures, and data models
Advanced knowledge of relational Database Management Systems (RDBMS)
Proficient at creating, testing and supporting ETL processes with modern integration tools
Experience with R, Python, or similar scripting language
Knowledge of statistical and predictive data models
Ability to work effectively with data, BI developers and consumer research and insights partners to meet the data needs of the business, translating business needs into analytical requirements
Desire to take proactive ownership of the accuracy and timeliness of reported data
Education: Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics, Economics or related field

Experience: 3-8 years of exemplary experience in a business analyst, data analyst or similar role. Wine industry and/or CPG experience preferred.",3.7,"Jackson Family Wines
3.7","Santa Rosa, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
330,Data Analyst with sql,-1,"*Job Summary*
*Role-Data Analyst with Sql*
*Location-Richmond, VA & Vienna,VA*
*Contract Duration-Long Term*
*Visa-Any*

JD- Our Client is looking for a candidate with 1+years of relevant experience with SQL experience

* High level of AWS experience
* Python knowledge or experience.

Job Type: Contract

Pay: $22.00 per hour",-1,First Notch Technology,"Richmond, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
331,Data Analyst with sql,-1,"*Job Summary*
*Role-Data Analyst with Sql*
*Location-Richmond, VA & Vienna,VA*
*Contract Duration-Long Term*
*Visa-Any*

JD- Our Client is looking for a candidate with 1+years of relevant experience with SQL experience

* High level of AWS experience
* Python knowledge or experience.

Job Type: Contract

Pay: $22.00 per hour",-1,First Notch Technology,"Richmond, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
332,Data Quality Analyst Senior,"$65k-$113k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Purpose of Job

Job Requirements
We are currently seeking a talented Data Quality Analyst Senior for Phoenix, Tampa, San Antonio Home Office II/III or 100% Remote Work Environment .

Manages and analyzes information using a variety of techniques and tools in alignment with USAA's Enterprise Information Standards. This role may be responsible for one or more information management function noted below:

Metadata includes defining and documenting data ensuring the information is understood. This may include working with project teams or support teams to define, redefine, or continue maintenance of the metadata.
Data Quality includes defining data quality rules ensuring data is measured and trusted. This may include working with project teams to define data quality requirements as well as ensuring ongoing assessments of data quality. Information Lifecycle Management includes archiving and purging of data to meet the needs of the business while reducing corporate risk.
Data Security and Privacy includes managing the security of data access as well as privacy of data sharing in compliance with external regulations and internal policies. This may include working with other departments to ensure compliance to GBLA, FCRA, PCI DSS, etc.
Master Data and Reference Data includes managing key corporate data to ensure the organization can manage its operations with accurate and consistent information.

Leverages advanced data management knowledge to support in one or many of the information management functions.

Tasks may include any of the items noted below:

General
Identify and implement process improvements.
Lead discussions with cross-functional teams.
Align best practices and tools based on business needs.
Metadata and Data Quality
Support metadata repository maintenance, access requests, and proper metadata association
Review, validate, and record metadata and data quality information.
Development of definitions, data quality rules, thresholds, and standard metrics of quality for data elements that support critical business processes.
Development of controls to mitigate data quality risks including data quality plan development, monitoring data quality results, reports and dashboards, as appropriate.
Identify and maintain data quality corrective action plans.
Support compliance assessment process by reviewing and documenting failures from data quality compliance assessment checks.
Information Lifecycle Management
Support archiving and purging activities of data
Develop archiving and purging strategies and processes
Support compliance assessment process by identifying and escalating items that may be a risk to the corporation.

Data Security and Privacy
Manage Data Access security as needed.
Support Privacy initiatives through analysis of sensitive data.
Ensure sensitive data is accessed and shared in accordance to defined policies and processes.

Master and Reference Data
Recommend Master and Reference Data processes and procedures to align with Enterprise Policies and Standards
Create and maintain reference data in accordance to defined processes and procedures.
Manage quality and maintence of master data as it is created

Minimum Requirements:

Bachelor's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or 4 years work experience in data management, data quality or business application function or related experience can be substituted in lieu of a degree in addition to the minimum years of work experience required.
OR
A Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline
OR
A PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline
6 or more years of experience in one or more information management functions below and any relevant tools:
Metadata
Data Quality including metrics, dashboards, advance knowledge of frequency and duplicate analysis, cross dataset dependencies, orphan 'child data' rows, redundancy analysis, etc.
Information Lifecycle Management including archiving, purging, content and document management
Master and Reference Data
Data Security & Privacy
OR
Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline PLUS 4 or more years of experience in a data management/quality analytic function.
OR
Master's Degree and PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline and 3 or more years experience in a data management/quality analytic function.
Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*
When you apply for this position, you will be required to answer some initial questions. This will take approximately 5 minutes. Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not able to change your responses.

Preferred:

Intermediate SQL or SAS programming skills
Strong technical acumen; previous experience working on or in support of a data and analytics team
Excellent attention to detail and ability to create synergies/draw connections across multiple platforms/disparate systems to drive consistency and reuse in metadata
Demonstrate deep curiosity and willingness to trace gaps in metadata (and ultimately quality) back to the originator to address and resolve issues proactively at the source
Intermediate understanding of the data development life cycle and information management principles (ETL/ELT process, SDLC, metadata management, data quality, etc.)
Demonstrate familiarity with IT development environments, tools, and maintenance processes and how these pieces impact metadata and quality
Previous experience as a DPO/Scrum Master or experience working in an Agile environment
Prior experience with tools: JIRA, Rally, IBM InfoSphere Suite (Information Governance Catalog, Information Analyzer, DataStage)
Experience working for a large financial institution

The above description reflects the details considered necessary to describe the principal functions of the job and should not be construed as a detailed description of all the work requirements that may be performed in the job.

At USAA our employees enjoy one of the best benefits package in the business, including a flexible business casual or casual dress environment, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, along with wellness and wealth building programs. Additionally, our career path planning and continuing education will assist you with your professional goals.

Relocation assistance is not available for this position.

For Internal Candidates:
Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement), or must have manager’s approval prior to posting.

Last day for internal candidates to apply to the opening is 9/02/20 by 11:59 pm CST time .",3.6,"USAA
3.6","Avondale, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
333,Data Analyst,"$41k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","EquipmentShare is Hiring a Financial Data Analyst


EquipmentShare is searching for a Data Analyst for the corporate office in Columbia, Missouri to help us drive profitability through data-driven analysis.

About EquipmentShare


EquipmentShare is dedicated to creating a connected jobsite for the modern contractor. We deliver user-friendly technology solutions that help contractors maximize their equipment uptime, reduce risk exposure and increase productivity. EquipmentShare's product offerings include an improved equipment rental experience, fleet tracking and asset management software, hardware security solutions and predictive service and maintenance applications.

EquipmentShare is the fastest-growing, independently owned construction equipment rental company in the country. We serve dozens of markets across the U.S. and are on track to create a national footprint in every major market in the country by the end of 2023. Our branch locations are equipped with a broad range of construction equipment, ranging from 150-foot telescopic booms to 120,000-lb. track excavators.

EquipmentShare's rapid growth goes beyond meeting a demand for equipment rentals in booming new markets. Instead, our mission begins with our rental product, and it's a testimony to our ability to improve industry standards and better serve the customer. Our expansion and customer retention is a validation of strong contractor demand for the smart jobsite technology we've built into our rental fleet. And it's just the beginning of our journey to establishing a global presence.

Your Opportunity to Grow With Us


The EquipmentShare team is a close-knit group of professionals who all share an interest in providing a service and product that improve our customer's experience. Above all, we care about building something people want, and the only way to do that is by assembling a skilled, passionate and talented team. Our mission is to improve productivity and efficiency throughout the entire construction industry, and our people are how we make achieving that goal possible.

We're seeking a Financial Data Analyst who loves a challenge and wants the opportunity to grow with a fast-paced company. Industry competitors often have layers of tenured management that create barriers to career advancement. The opportunity for career growth is unparalleled at EquipmentShare, where you'll find no shortage of challenging yet fulfilling work, chances to build new skills and supportive teammates who will push you to achieve your best.

Primary Responsibilities
Analyze a wide range of data, and turn that data into action, whether that looks like process improvements, best business practices or other data-backed solutions
Use your strong development and analytical skills to solve business problems across the company
Produce reports and models for senior leaders and other key team members
Identify trends, correlations and patterns in data, and present findings to stakeholder
About You


Our mission to change an entire industry is not easily achieved, so we only hire people who are inspired by the goal and up for the challenge. In turn, our employees have every opportunity to grow with us, achieve personal and professional success and enjoy making a tangible difference in an industry that's long been resistant to change.

Skills & Qualifications
Must be qualified to work in the United States - we are not sponsoring any candidates at this time.
2 years of experience in an analysis-focused role
Forecasting, reporting, and analysis experience
You have a proven ability to approach complex problems with curiosity and an analytical mindset.
You roll with the punches and can adapt quickly, manage competing projects and challenge the status quo.
A keen understanding of data interpretation and the ability to swiftly extract key insights
Expert-level Excel skills
SQL experience required
Preferably knowledge of an analytical language like Python, R, SAS, SPSS, etc.
Why We're a Better Place to Work
Competitive salary
Health insurance and medical coverage benefits
401(k)
Generous paid time off
Stocked breakroom and full kitchen
Free weekly team workout at a local gym
Volunteering and local charity initiatives that help you nurture and grow the communities you call home through EquipmentCare
Opportunities for career and professional development with conferences, events, seminars, continued education
Since our founding in 2015, we've had explosive growth—and we're not stopping anytime soon. Ready to invest in our mission, invest in yourself and discover a better place to work? Then we'd love to meet you. Apply today.

EquipmentShare is an EOE M/F/D/V",4.3,"EquipmentShare
4.3","Columbia, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Commercial Equipment Repair & Maintenance,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
334,Material Master Data Analyst,"$40k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Material Master Data Analyst will be responsible for maintaining the SAP Material Master Data module in SAP for Sabert's North American Operations. The focus of this role is to effectively manage the SAP materials data originating from Marketing, New Product Development, Manufacturing and Procurement groups that require creation and changes to support the Order to Delivery process.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Responsible for executing the end-to-end Material Master Data process. Responsible for coordinating with all process areas to ensure the end-to-end completeness, accuracy and quality of the Material Master Data, which supports supply chain and plant production processes

• Collaborate with NPD, Marketing, Purchasing, Accounting, Production, Planning, Customer Service and Quality to provide timely release and implementation of new and changed Material Master Data

• Bill of Materials and Routing Maintenance

• Create BOM's and Routings as needed per planning

• Create semi-finished sku's for Work In Process in order to put product into inventory as needed by production department

• Perform monthly data audits of weight, cube, pallet configurations and costing

• Extend SKUs to different sales channels in SAP as needed by Customer Service

• Provide to and/or train sales and marketing teams to obtain product specifications as required

• Manage our UPC database

Packaging Design

• Assist with box size / pallet configuration determination on new and existing products

• Manage box specifications in SAP

• Manage print plate inventory with corrugate vendors; order new print plates and send required information to vendors for artwork creation as needed

• Manage labeling database and label formats and troubleshoot any Easy label software issues

Project Support

• Create ad-hoc reports for the supply chain team

• Handle other projects or assignments as needed

Required Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:

• Understanding of integrated supply chain processes

• Collaborative and interpersonal skills

• Analytical and problem-solving skills

• Able to work independently and within a team environment

• Proficient in Microsoft Office, with expertise in Excel and Access

• Knowledge of SAP, product change control

• B.S. in Industrial Engineering or equivalent/related field

• 0 - 2+ years of experience in a Supply Chain role

Summary

Pay, benefits and more.

Sabert is eager to attract the best, so we offer competitive compensation and a generous benefits package, including full health insurance (medical, dental and vision), 401(k), life insurance, disability and more.

About Sabert:

We are a leading global manufacturer of innovative food packaging products and solutions. Our company was founded in 1983 on a single mission: to enhance and advance the way people enjoy food . Today we design, manufacture and distribute a wide spectrum of packaging solutions for food distributors, restaurants & caterers, grocery stores, national food chains and consumer entertaining.",4.1,"Sabert
4.1","Sayreville, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
335,Data Analyst- Tiktok Ads,-1,"Data Analyst- Tiktok Ads
Mountain ViewProduct - Data analysisExperienced
Responsibilities
- Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with our ads products
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions
Build/maintain reports, dashboards, and metrics to monitor the performance of our products
Mine massive amounts of data and extract useful product insights
Manage development of data resources, gather requirements, organize sources, and support product launches
Qualifications
- 2-5 years experience doing quantitative analysis
BA/BS in Math, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, or other quantitative field. Advanced degrees preferred but not required
Fluency in SQL or other programming languages. Some development experience in at least one scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Experience with large data sets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop) a plus
Ability to initiate and drive projects to completion with minimal guidance
The ability to communicate the results of analyses in a clear and effective manner
Basic understanding of statistical analysis
Apply
Share to",4.1,"TikTok
4.1","Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
336,Data Analyst - Junior,-1,"High Reliability Solutions (HRS) is our name.

Junior Data Analyst
Washington, DC 20571

HRS Consulting, Inc. is staffed by human performance and training professionals who specialize in assisting our clients to adopt the best practices of High Reliability Organizations. Our experts include professionals with extensive experience introducing HRO principles and enthusiasm for HROs in healthcare. We have a portfolio of proven tools and systems to advance our customers goals.

Position Description:


HRS Consulting, Inc. is seeking a Data Analyst Junior to work in support of the Department of Veterans Affairs to provide best value healthcare and professional consulting services to the Veterans Health Administration (VHA). Qualified candidates will have experience working with advanced computerized models to extrapolate data patterns using advanced algorithms. Experience in VA information systems and databases and ability to utilize Pyramid analytics and/or Tableau is preferred.

Duties/Responsibilities:

Providing consultation and process improvements for availability, usability, integrity, and security of the VHAs healthcare data
Working closely with VHA Systems and files to obtain data through advanced computerized models
Evaluating and recommending solutions for records management in compliance with healthcare industry standards
Extrapolating data patterns through advanced algorithms
Evaluating current data needs and establishing a reporting process
Developing graphs and charts and provide mathematical information to support projects
Maintaining communication with stakeholders and presenting data collection information and analysis to support business models, predictions, and profitable future trends
Identifying patterns in data and producing and producing reports to provide alternative approaches
Experience/Education Requirements:

U.S. Citizen or Green Card Holder
Eligibility to obtain Veterans Affairs (VA) suitability approval to access agency computer systems and facilities required to start work; current VA credentials preferred
Bachelors degree required; Studies in Mathematics, Data Science, or related discipline preferred
3+ years of related experience supporting data analysis and making recommendations on business models for a government healthcare organization
Experience conducting analysis and generating reports and documentation identifying patterns in data, using advanced algorithms, suggesting alternative approaches, etc.
Experience with data driven technologies and visualization tools
Experience in VA information systems and databases and ability to utilize Pyramid analytics and/or Tableau is preferred
Ability to clearly communicate and exchange information with co-workers, teammates, stakeholders, and other personnel, as required.
Experience evaluating and recommending records management solutions to compile, evaluate, analyze, control, and secure data in accordance with healthcare regulations
Expertise to assess existing legacy systems and document storage approaches following healthcare industry standards
Proficiency working across the Microsoft Office Suite, including advanced Excel skills
Work Environment/Physical Demands:

This job operates in a professional office environment with prolonged periods sitting at a desk, attending meetings, and using standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, and video teleconferencing equipment.
This is a largely sedentary role; however, the ability to move office items such as files, laptop/computer equipment, meeting materials, and other work supplies may require carrying and lifting items up to 15 pounds at times.
Business travel may be required.
HRS Consulting, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.

We comply with Form I-9 identity and legal work authorization requirements and utilize E-Verify for Employment Eligibility Verification in accordance the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (IRCA).

Individuals with disabilities who need assistance with the application process can reach us by email at recruiting@ihthrs.com or telephone 954-217-6241.

www.hrsconsults.com",-1,"HRS Consulting, Inc.","Washington, DC",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
337,Data Integration Analyst,-1,"Data Integration Analyst*
Buckner Heavylift is a leader in the crane industry. With over 70 years of providing reliable, quality and safe services to the heavy commercial and industrial markets, Buckner has earned our place as a nationally recognized leader in the Heavylift Crane industry. Our goal is to create long term relationships based upon confidence, trust, and integrity.

We are looking for a Data Integration Analyst to join our team. You will have an opportunity to work in with several different technologies and work with the team and stakeholders to build an integration structure form the ground up. There will also be lots of opportunities to work with data to provide insights for key stakeholders. This is an exciting time to jump into a company that is transforming an industry through technology.

We prefer someone who can be in office at least a couple days a week but we will be flexible. Our office is currently partially open. At minimum, the candidate we hire will need to be able to be onsite about 10% of the time.
What We Are Looking For*
· Provide solutions to data requirement challenges to ensure a successful data integration

· Analyze raw data and provide analysis to stakeholders

· Work with team to develop and deploy new data integrations and enhance existing integrations

· Validate data for accuracy and completeness

· Manage support inquiries related to the data transformation and flow

· Work closely with business partners on resolution of data issues

· Monitor daily data integration files

· Provide strong process and data troubleshooting experience for managing integrations

· Support partner and client integration discussions
Who We Are Looking For*
· Fast learner and self-starter. Need person with a can-do attitude and desire to learn new things

· Ability to effectively communicate both verbally and in writing to all levels of the organization

· Strong interpersonal skills and ability to work effectively with all levels of the organization

· Strong sense of ownership and the ability to work with limited set of requirements

· Creativity to come up with new ideas and patterns

· Detailed and organized, curious and persistent – Eager to dig in and find resolution to issues.

· Willing to challenge others and drive for improved results and processes

· Able to deal with ambiguity and drive tasks to completion in a collaborative environment.
Make The Cut*
· Bachelor’s degree or at minimum two years data implementation and integration experience

· SQL and Excel experience required

· Experience with Data Management and ETL tools

· Salesforce Certifications a Plus

· Data Modeling experience a Plus

· Experience reading and writing code in any language a Plus

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $22.00 - $27.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Excel: 2 years (Required)
SQL: 2 years (Required)
ETL: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Company's website:
https://www.bucknercompanies.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.8,"Buckner Heavylift Cranes
3.8","Graham, NC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Contract,Construction,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
338,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"As a software company, data is key to helping to help our Business and Product teams analyze and understand the data and key metrics driving growth and adoption of our products. Our software is used by more than 20,000 organizations around the world. Brands like the Chicago Bulls, Sony Electronics, Indiana University, Make-a-wish Foundation, Edelman, and Subaru rely on Sprout to create stronger relationships with their customers through social media.

Our Data Science & Analytics team uses Tableau, Amazon Redshift and other advanced technologies to inform product decisions and opportunities, help our business make more efficient and better decisions, and enhance our customers' experiences. This team regularly partners with all departments across the organization, but especially Product, Marketing, Sales Operations, Data Engineering and Data Science.

Your mission is to help drive forward Sprout's analytics practice by ensuring that stakeholders are data-informed and analytically rigorous. You'll bring your advanced SQL skills, experience designing insightful data visualizations in tools like Tableau, Looker or PowerBI and interest in learning new tools or technology. You will perform analysis into product usage, customer behavior and company performance, as well develop dashboards to support various teams at Sprout.

If you are someone with a passion for understanding data through analysis and visualization, has strong data fluency, a drive to continuously improve their skill set and knowledge base, and are passionate about partnering with other parts of the business to provide novel insights and improve decisions, we'd love to talk to you!

Qualifications

These are the minimum qualifications that our hiring team is looking for in this role:
Two or more years of demonstrated experience developing and validating SQL queries to support analyses, reporting and dashboards.
Proficiency and applied experience in data visualization software such as Tableau, Looker, PowerBI or another data visualization tool.
Additionally, these are the preferred qualifications that would indicate a particularly strong candidate:
Previous experience in an analytical role producing major analysis, reporting and dashboards for internal stakeholders.
Partnered directly with stakeholders to define requirements, validate results and present findings/deliverables.
Within 1 month, you will:
Experience Sprout's in-depth onboarding, covering everything from our company mission and values, hearing directly from executives and founders, to deep training on our products and the value that Sprout delivers to our customers.
Make a plan with your manager to set initial priorities, align on expectations for your role, plant goalposts for your career, and learn about Sprout's approach to analytics.
Begin developing familiarity with our business, applications, and data, as well as our company's key metrics.
Write SQL queries to fetch data from our Redshift database.
Analyze data using a tool like Tableau, Google Sheets, or Excel to create reports and analyses for business and product stakeholders.
Document your work -- What question(s) was it trying to answer? What time range did it look at? What assumptions were made?
Meet key stakeholders and learn about how the Business Analytics team supports them
Participate in team meetings and join a Business Analytics Office Hours session.
Within 3 months, you will:
Complete any necessary training on Tableau and utilize it to build and maintain dashboards for driving awareness and understanding of key business and product metrics.
Update an existing Tableau Published Data Source or create a new Published Data Source in partnership with another analyst.
Analyze a large click-stream data set to understand our customers or their product utilization.
Become familiar with our GitHub repositories and our code deployment process and submit a few changes to our code base.
Support a variety of teams with ad-hoc analyses that transform raw data into meaningful and impactful insights.
Dig into the questions being asked by our business partners, suggest appropriate metrics, and develop a plan to analyze the data.
Identify data issues and drive improvements in data hygiene.
Participate in our team's quarterly roadmap planning and project scoping sessions.
Build connections with members from other teams through active networking and community building
Within 6 months, you will:
Partner with other Analysts and/or Data Engineers to augment or enhance an existing ETL process that supports our data warehouse.
Partner with Product teams to define goals and identify actionable metrics to understand the product performance and engrain those metrics into teams' day-to-day work.
Work closely with Data Engineering to author and develop core data sets to empower operational and exploratory analyses.
Develop and execute a project plan to create a new dashboard for stakeholders.
Have your first performance conversation with your manager, where you'll discuss your accomplishments in your role and work together to build goals for your professional growth.
Present your analyses and insights to all levels of the company clearly and concisely.
Within 12 months, you will:
Use data to inform and influence the direction of the Product team roadmaps and inform business decisions.
Have improved your technical skills, especially with SQL, Tableau and Github
Have the ability to take ambiguous data questions, translate into a clear analytical plan, and produce concise summary output that includes recommendations based upon core findings.
Continually evaluate and refine your technical toolkit: teach what you learn to the team.
Surprise us! Use your unique ideas and abilities to change your team in beneficial ways that we haven't even considered yet.
Of course what is outlined above is the ideal timeline, but things may shift based on business needs and other projects and tasks could be added at the discretion of your manager.

About Sprout Social
Sprout Social powers open communication between individuals, brands and communities through elegant, sophisticated software. We are relentless about solving hard problems for our customers and committed to both customer and team success. Our team's shared belief in Sprout's mission promotes a culture of openness, empowerment and fun.

We're proud to regularly be recognized for our team, product and culture. Our benefits program includes:
Insurance and benefit options that are built for both individuals and families
Progressive policies to support work/life balance, like our flexible paid time off and parental leave program
High-quality and well-maintained equipment—your computer will never prevent you from doing your best
Wellness initiatives to ensure both health and mental well-being of our team
Ongoing education and development opportunities via our Grow@Sprout program, employee-led diversity, equity and inclusion initiatives and mentorship programs for aspiring leaders
Growing corporate social responsibility program that is driven by the involvement and passion of our team members
Beautiful, convenient and state-of-the-art offices in Chicago's Loop and downtown Seattle, for those who prefer an office setting

Whenever possible, Sprout wants to provide our team with the flexibility to work in the location that makes the most sense for them. For those that prefer an office setting, this role may be based in our Chicago or Seattle locations. If you prefer to work from your home, we can accommodate that for many locations across the United States. We are not set up in all states, however, so please take a look at the drop down box in our application to see whether your state is listed.

Sprout Social is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and an Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate based on identity- race, color, religion, national origin or ancestry, sex (including sexual identity), age, physical or mental disability, pregnancy, veteran or military status, unfavorable discharge from military service, genetic information, sexual orientation, marital status, order of protection status, citizenship status, arrest record or expunged or sealed convictions, or any other legally recognized protected basis under federal, state, or local law. Learn more about our commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion in our 2020 DEI Report.

If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please contact us by email at accommodations@sproutsocial.com and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information. We'll do all we can to ensure you're set up for success during our interview process while upholding your privacy, including requests for accommodation. Please note that only inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.

For more information about our commitment to equal employment opportunity, please click here (1) Equal Opportunity Employment Poster (2) Sprout Social's Affirmative Action Statement (3) Pay Transparency Statement.

When you apply for employment with Sprout Social, we will process your job applicant data, including your employment and education history, transcript, writing samples, and references as necessary to consider your job application for open positions. For more information about our privacy practices please visit our Privacy Policy. California residents have additional rights and should review the Additional Disclosures for California Residents section in our Privacy Policy.

Additionally, Sprout Social participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law.",4.9,"Sprout Social
4.9",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
339,Data Analyst,"$47k-$93k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst
Location: Washington, DC
Education Required: Bachelor’s degree required, preferably in math, engineering, business, or the sciences.
Skills Required:

We are seeking highly motivated individuals to support a range of critical and exciting Department of Defense (DoD) and Naval Acquisition projects. Ideal candidates will possess a Bachelor’s degree in business, engineering, or related fields and 3+ years of experience, or a Master’s degree in a related field and at least one year of experience.

Successful candidates will also possess the following qualifications:
24 semester hours of quantitative course work (mathematics, statistics, engineering, physics, chemistry, etc.)
Experience obtaining, integrating, analyzing, and reporting client data, esp. acquisition data
Ability to apply analytic techniques to define project objectives and strategic direction, resolving complex problems using an in-depth knowledge of analytic methodologies and principles
Strong researching, data gathering, and technical reviews needed to produce written deliverables to include reports, spreadsheets, databases, formal process mapping, and technical designs
Microsoft Access experience
Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance
U.S. Citizenship required
Responsibilities:
Assess requirements, determine necessary resources to accomplish task, hypothesize solutions, develop solution, and report findings to various levels of government leadership
Develop algorithms for data analysis
Plan and conducts work requiring judgment in the evaluation, selection, and adaptation and/or modification of methodologies and tools
Consult with senior consultants or functional specialists on unusual or complex problems
Assess requirements, determine necessary resources to accomplish task, hypothesize solutions, develop solution, and report findings
Benefits:
We offer competitive salaries commensurate with education and experience. We have an excellent benefits package that includes:
Comprehensive health, dental, life, long and short term disability insurance
100% Company funded Retirement Plans
Generous vacation, holiday and sick pay plans
Tuition assistance

Benefits are provided to employees regularly working a minimum of 30 hours per week.

Tecolote Research is a private, employee-owned corporation where people are our primary resource. Our investments in technology and training give our employees the tools to ensure our clients are provided the solutions they need, and our very high employee retention rate and stable workforce is an added value to our customers. Apply now to connect with a company that invests in you.",4.0,"Tecolote Research
4.0","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
340,Data Governance Analyst,"$53k-$92k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Curriculum Associates, we believe a diverse team leads to diversity in thinking, making our products better for teachers and students. If you read this job description, feel energized by what you see here, and believe you could bring passion and commitment to the role, but you aren’t sure you meet every qualification, please apply! Above all, we are looking for the right person!

Curriculum Associates is a rapidly growing educational technology and publishing company committed to making classrooms better places for teachers and students. Located outside Boston, we are an innovative, collaborative, and mission-driven company that has been consistently recognized as a Boston Globe Top Workplace and a Boston Business Journal Best Place to Work.

We are looking for a talented individual to join our growing Sales Operations Team as our new Data Analyst reporting to the Associate VP of Sales Ops. In this newly created role, you will be responsible for the accuracy and integrity of our company-wide Data Governance as it pertains to Contacts and Account Alert data. This individual will be responsible for data creation/maintenance as well as building out documentation and audit processes to proactively identify any gaps/errors to ensure the ongoing integrity of the underlying data. In this role you will interact with a variety of other departments, including Inside Sales, Account Management, and Marketing.

Your responsibilities will include:

Accountable for being the subject matter expert in all things related to Contacts in Salesforce.
Document all processes as they relate to the creation and maintenance of Contacts.
Create an ongoing audit process for Contact and Alert data to maintain integrity and accuracy.
Contribute to the successful collection of powerful, precise data that can be used to better understand and serve the needs of the company.
Engage as needed in future enhancements by providing your ideas and feedback as it relates to Contacts and Alerts.
Support the Associate VP of Sales Ops with special projects.
Lead data cleansing projects as needed.
Using tools, like SQL or Access, to effectively mine large datasets.
Creating cards in Domo to aid in keeping the data clean and supplying datasets used in marketing campaigns and company reach outs.

Why you’ll want to join our team:

A supportive, collaborative, and welcoming working environment
We are champions of a clean data-driven culture
Opportunities for growth and learning in an expanding team
See your voice and efforts affect positive change for educators and our company
Gain insight into operations across the company

Who we’re looking for:

Highly detail-oriented individual who must love clean data
Strong Excel skills
Experience with SQL databases and queries are a plus
Experience with Domo or equivalent BI tools are a plus
Analytic, critical thinker who enjoys solving problems
A clear and concise communicator both verbally and in writing
Someone with a growth mindset who is curious, ambitious, and loves to learn
A person who thrives in a fast-paced environment, and adapts well to change
Salesforce.com experience is a plus",4.7,"Curriculum Associates
4.7","North Billerica, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1969,Unknown,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
341,Data Management Analyst,"$34k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)",,2.9,"HD Supply
2.9","Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,2007,Company - Public,Construction,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
342,Senior Data Analyst,"$72k-$127k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This is for a data Entry Analyst in a Research and Development system. This position is working with one of the worlds largest consumer goods company. The position will require anaylsis of the systems, correction that should be made, details of the research taking place onsite.

Job Type: Contract

Pay: $30.00 - $33.00 per hour

Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Analysis Skills: 4 years (Required)
Research Laboratory: 4 years (Preferred)
Research & Development: 4 years (Preferred)
Contract Length:
1 year
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Company's website:
www.manpower.com
Work Remotely:
No",4.3,"Manpower
4.3","Montvale, NJ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1948,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
343,Sr. Data Mining Analyst,"$50k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","DMG – Sr. Data Mining Analyst
Under the supervision of the Manager of Data Mining, the Sr. Data Mining Analyst is responsible for taking the needs of the business and delivering products that meet those needs. This position requires the ability to take the lead on projects or be a contributing member to a project team. This position will interact will all facets of the organization and must be able to communicate between all divisions of the organization.

About Us
The Rawlings Group provides payment integrity services and claims data analysis for health insurance carriers and their members. We work behind the scenes to make sure that members are receiving the full value of their coverage and that providers recover when a claim is paid in error. Providing payment integrity and recovery services to the industry creates a more equitable distribution of healthcare dollars so members can receive the care they need when they need it most.

Our employees are the backbone of our organization. We offer opportunities for growth and development, continuing education, internal mobility and promotions, and unrivaled income earning potential. We are looking for individuals that have the drive and commitment to make a difference in the industry. We invite you to apply to become a part of The Rawlings Group team.

Our Culture is focused on:
The guiding principle of doing the right thing.
Caring for our employees and taking pride in the work they do.
Providing recognition and financially rewarding employees for their success.
Our Values are:
Integrity and Trust
Customer Service Excellence
Innovation
Diversity and Inclusion
Honoring our Veterans and their service

Responsibilities

Meet regularly with Data Mining Group leadership for new project assignments and updates on outstanding projects.
Work independently with low to moderate levels of supervision and deliver results within defined time requirements.
Capable of understanding stakeholder’s requirements and providing guidance to ensure project aligns with needs.
Responsible for the proper communication and reporting regarding all aspects of each project.
Expected to understand all the characteristics of a project from End to End, and capable of presenting results to all levels of the organization including Senior and Executive leadership.
Act as a mentor to other members on staff.
Understanding business needs and objectives
Developing strategies for effective data analysis and reporting
Selecting, configuring and implementing analytics solutions
Defining metrics and identifying relevant data sources
Extract reports from multiple sources
Perform other duties as assigned

Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, business, computer science or similar degree required. Master's degree preferred.
5 or more years of SQL, Python, or R Programming
Experience with data analysis and reporting, and knowledge of data visualization software packages
Experience building SSIS packages
Ability to leverage Machine Learning where applicable
Aptitude to learn a business that is unique to The Rawlings Group
Understanding of accounting concepts and reporting skills
Strong analytical mindset and communication skills
Proactive, inquisitive and creative in approach to work
Ability to write SQL code, extract data and generate queries/reports without guidance, integrating data when necessary between different data sources
Experience with building reports, analyzing results, and communicating findings
Understanding of data structure/integration and relational database structures
Ability to collaborate with partners and drive analytic projects end-to-end
Strong attention to detail and data accuracy
Proven team player with strong analytical and interpersonal skills
Exhibits creative thinking skills.
Database knowledge
Machine Learning and Data Mining Analysis
Statistical and Quantitative Analysis
SQL
Data Visualization
Creativity and problem solving
Critical thinking skills
Equal Employment Opportunity. It is our policy to recruit, hire, train, and promote people without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status, except where age, sex, or physical status is a bona fide occupational qualification.
The Rawlings Group is an employment at will employer.
Equal Opportunity Employer
Veteran Friendly Employer
XJ6",2.8,"The Rawlings Group
2.8","La Grange, KY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
344,Senior Data Analyst - Tableau (Remote/Virtual),"$49k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Are Hiring

Do you have a passion for creating dynamic and visually appealing visualizations with Tableau? Enjoy doing complex, sophisticated calculations within Tableau?

This Senior Data Analyst role will include building and maintaining Tableau dashboards. The maintenance of dashboards will include updating the dashboards and updating calculations. To be able to complete the maintenance of the dashboards, it will be important that you understand how joins operate, the difference between context and dimension filters, and LOD calculations. When we build new dashboards, it is important that we can make visualizations that are both engaging and easy for people to understand.

If this is you, Apply Today!

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension, you will have the opportunity to serve as key resource/SME in collection and analysis of data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information. In this role, you will complete complex, sophisticated calculations within Tableau by utilizing multiple sources of raw data and summarizing calculations in Tableau with the raw data.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports as needed.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
Oversees provision of ad hoc management reports.
May provide leadership, orientation, training, coaching, and mentoring to staff on how to access reports and interpret the data.
Identifies data trends and makes recommendations for quality improvement.
What You Will Need

Education:
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Technical degree required
Bachelors Degree preferred - Data Scientist, Data Analyst, Statistics, Mathematics, Actuarial Science, or similar degree.
Work Experience:
3 years of experience preferred.
Tableau experience of 3 years highly desired
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the links below for more information.

E-Verify Right to Work (links to E-verify sites)",3.3,"Ascension
3.3","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
345,Business Analyst - Digital Data and Analytics,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Kforce has a client in search of a Business Analyst - Digital Data Analytics in Benton Harbor, MI.

Overview:
You are able to lead technical digital data projects autonomously and unlock the value of data. You have a proven track record of establishing Data Engineering processes at previous companies and care deeply about using data to solve business problems.

Duties:
Conceive, lead, and execute projects to manage an exceptional data access solution, supporting user requests from various stakeholder groups
Work with a wide range of business partners, particularly in GIS and product management, to develop innovative analytics solutions that address top outcomes, including feature development/enhancement, system health monitoring, testing, and troubleshooting
Building strong relationships with stakeholders and mentoring junior team members
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree required
2 years of experience required
Experience working with web analytics and digital media performance data
Experience with or exposed to Google Analytics, Adobe DTM, Adobe Launch, data warehouse, data-lake or data virtualization solutions
Knowledgeable about data analysis/visualization tools such as Tableau
Knowledge and understanding of data governance challenges and best practices for website analytics tagging, metadata, data quality, and data stewardship
Know about data profiling or defining data quality rules - especially digital data collected digitally using Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics, Google Ads, etc.
Experience writing/editing internal communications or training-related materials in a corporate environment
Skilled in interpreting business measurement/reporting needs; Coordinate multiple stakeholder requests and project activities at any one time to ensure accurate, timely, and efficient reporting and analysis deliverables
Business analyst - able to synthesize data and draw insights; Able to present insights directly to business stakeholders
Understanding of digital data - like website analytics data and media analytics data
Preferred:
Experience working with multiple data sources - web data, SAP/HANA, CRM, etc.
Has experience combining different data sources into one report - either directly or leveraging a data team
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,"Kforce
4.1","Benton Harbor, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
346,Data Analyst,"$28k-$50k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This is a one year appointment, but may be extended contingent upon funding. The Jornada Experimental Range is seeking applicants for a data analyst position with a focus on building analysis tools based on a standardized vegetation, soils, and meteorological monitoring data system and in support of research activities for the Jornada Experimental Range, Bureau of Land Management, and National Resources Conservation Service.
Duties include:
• Build analysis and web tools to link monitoring databases to researchers and land managers.
• Develop analytical approaches to using standardized monitoring data in conceptual models (i.e., ecological sites).
• Develop links between the Landscape Data Commons and other rangeland management web tools, including the Ecosystem Dynamics Interpretive Tool (EDIT).
• Establish and maintain metadata, quality assurance, and quality control protocols for ecological, sediment transport and meteorological databases.
• Maintain and ensure quality of databases.
• Execute data extraction tools to couple monitoring databases with aeolian sediment transport models, water erosion models, and rangeland production models.",3.8,"New Mexico State University
3.8","Las Cruces, NM",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1888,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
347,Data Analyst,-1,"PDS Tech, Inc. is seeking a Data Analyst, in Cupertino, CA.

Summary:
Strong data and analytic skills, knowledge of excel, numbers and data modeling.
Knowledge of or experience working on subscription businesses a plus.
Reporting and presentation skills a must. Looking for a person who has a passion for data and numbers.
The successful candidate will turn data into information and insights that will help support business decisions.
Work closely with the Data Anlytics team and cross functionally in marketing to produce monthly & quarterly data driven marketing reports.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Filter and clean data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.

Skills:
MacOS
iOS
2-5 years of experience.
Education:
Bachelor's Degree or equivalent work experience preferred.",3.9,"PDS Tech, Inc.
3.9","Cupertino, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
348,Senior Data Systems Analyst,"$63k-$111k
(Glassdoor Est.)","ROLE SUMMARY

The primary function of the High throughput Clinical Immunoassays and Diagnostics (HCID) team is to generate high-quality assay data in a regulated cGLP laboratory setting to support Pfizer’s vaccine programs. The purpose of this position is join the High throughput Business Analytics team to contribute to a harmonized process across HCID functional areas in the development of written end-user requirements for data systems used in various laboratory processes, and testing of systems prior to validation and deployment in the Production environment.

ROLE RESPONSIBILITIES
Assist in the Development of Laboratory Data Systems
Contribute to a consistent, harmonized process across HCID functional areas for the development of end-user requirements for various internal data systems used in the regulated cGLP laboratory space.
Develop end-user requirements for data system builds requested by HCID functional area managers as well as for functional enhancements to existing builds.
Assist and perform end-user testing of various data system builds against end-user requirements to ensure that these systems function as intended by the end user.
Collaborate with Pfizer IT organizations on data system projects according to VRD priorities.
Attend regular meetings with HCID functional area leaders to review and monitor various data system projects.
Documentation Support
Write and review end-user requirements documents for various data system builds used in HCID per the current good documentation practices.
Review and approve various standard operating procedures (SOPs), as assigned.
Maintain compliance with SOP periodic review process.
Monitor the SOP review and approval workflows for authored SOPs.
Author, review and approve technical reports, as assigned.
Training and Safety
Maintain strict compliance with departmental and site safety regulations.
Take ownership of and successfully complete all assigned training.
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
MS/MA in a science-related discipline such as computer science / mathematics or biological science with 0+ years of hands-on industry experience with the development and testing of electronic data systems. Or BS/BA with at least 2 years of industry experience.
Must have strong verbal and written communication skills.
Must be detail oriented
Must have a be able to effectively describe complex laboratory and data-handling processes verbally and in writing in a way that is logical and can be understood by both data system specialists and laboratory personnel.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Working knowledge of laboratory information management systems and a basic understanding / familiarity with SQL and computer programming.
Direct hands-on experience with LabWare LIMS is desired.
1+ years’ experience as a Business Analyst in a corporate environment
Must be able to describe laboratory processes in the form of flow charts and testable, line-item requirements.
Proficient in Microsoft Office 365 applications and MS Visio
Strong attention to detail and commitment to operational excellence.
Basic working knowledge of laboratory assays that measure antibodies and other macromolecules in various biological fluids.
Ability to collaborate and work in a team environment
Direct hands-on experience working in a regulated (cGLP) environment.
The ability to understand, develop and effectively describe complex laboratory and data-handling processes both verbally and in writing is required.
Must be attentive to details and have a passion for data quality.
Occasional evening and weekend work and some business travel is required.

#LI-PFE

Other Job Details:

· Location: Pearl River, NY

· Eligible for Employee Referral Bonus
Sunshine Act

Pfizer reports payments and other transfers of value to health care providers as required by federal and state transparency laws and implementing regulations. These laws and regulations require Pfizer to provide government agencies with information such as a health care provider’s name, address and the type of payments or other value received, generally for public disclosure. Subject to further legal review and statutory or regulatory clarification, which Pfizer intends to pursue, reimbursement of recruiting expenses for licensed physicians may constitute a reportable transfer of value under the federal transparency law commonly known as the Sunshine Act. Therefore, if you are a licensed physician who incurs recruiting expenses as a result of interviewing with Pfizer that we pay or reimburse, your name, address and the amount of payments made currently will be reported to the government. If you have questions regarding this matter, please do not hesitate to contact your Talent Acquisition representative.
EEO & Employment Eligibility

Pfizer is committed to equal opportunity in the terms and conditions of employment for all employees and job applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, gender identity or gender expression, national origin, disability or veteran status. Pfizer also complies with all applicable national, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment as well as work authorization and employment eligibility verification requirements of the Immigration and Nationality Act and IRCA. Pfizer is an E-Verify employer.
Information & Business Tech",4.1,"Pfizer
4.1","Pearl River, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1849,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
349,Reporting Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description:
Prepare and maintain existing Investment reports for both internal and external clients
Prepare and review all reports before distributing and follows key controls
Help analyze investment information in the reports
Perform research and answer
Assist with the internal stakeholders to define and complete new report requests
Prepare reporting deadlines on a daily, weekly, monthly and quarterly basis
Prepare the reporting materials, research and resolve issues that may be present
Requirements:
Proficient with the Microsoft Office Suite, including strong Excel skills
Strong analytical, problem-solving and organization skills
Excellent verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills
Able to communicate with professionals at all levels
Able to work independently and take initiative
Able to adapt to changing priorities
Able to work on multiple projects with accuracy and efficiency, while keeping to deadlines
Detail-oriented
A team player
Strong work ethic
Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in finance, accounting, business or related field and a minimum of 3 years' relevant experience
REF # 35576",4.5,"Century Group (CA)
4.5","El Segundo, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
350,Business Manager / Data Analyst,-1,"Business Manager / Data Analyst*
Remote to start, then onsite in Redmond, WA*
Must Haves: *
Recent Enterprise level experience – 3+years in a business manager role or within Chief of Staff team

Experience querying and analyzing data for ROB processes (MBRs, WBRs, QBRs, etc)

Strong PowerPoint, Excel, PowerBI (or another BI dashboard technology)

Ability to look at channels of business and analyze data

Pulling together presentations and data to support metrics across all channels

High Visibility – slides will go into overall desk for EVP level groups

Understand and speak to slides, add broader insight

Experience working with a ton of data and be able to translate to crisp/clean visuals -

Having worked in support Team within an enterprise level company such as Microsoft, Amazon, Google, Nordstrom, Starbucks, etc.
Plusses: *
Experience writing SQL scripts for pulling data

Experience with Kusto

Background in Data Science
Day to Day: *
An employer is looking for a Business Manager/Data Analyst in Redmond, WA. This person will be querying and analyzing Azure customer support data that feed into the Rhythm of Business processes, such as MBRs, WBRs, and creating slides with actionable insight and decision support. This role will have high visibility and slides will be presented within larger decks to EVP level employees. This person needs to be comfortable analyzing data and speaking to the data. Prior experience in Azure would be a huge plus but support, business manager, and working with analytical tools.

Job Type: Contract

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.9,"Insight Global
3.9","Redmond, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
351,Data / BI Analyst,"$69k-$135k
(Glassdoor Est.)","RedCloud is seeking multiple Data and BI Analysts ranging from Mid to Senior level, to support our growing consulting team! If you are a Data or BI Analyst with an eye for capturing what others miss, a strong analytical focus, and the ability to research, model, visualize, and provide insights as well as identify trends, we want to talk with you!

RedCloud Consulting is a business and IT consulting company with local Puget Sound Enterprise and Mid-sized clients. We have been recognized by Seattle Business Magazine and ranked #1 on their “Best Companies to Work for in Washington” for Mid-Sized Businesses list, awarded #1 Fastest Growing Company in Washington by Puget Sound Business Journal, and named on the Inc. 500/5000 list.

**We are currently only considering local candidates, residing in the Greater Seattle area, for this role**

Responsibilities may include but are not limited to (will vary by experience level):
Work closely with client stakeholders and coordinate delivery of projects in scope and on time
Define business requirements and functional specifications for a BI solution – including data requirements, reporting / presentation layer requirements.
Drive data architecture and modeling recommendations
Perform data ETL processing from multiple sources
Conduct data analysis and interpret data to answer key business questions
Develop report deliverables and data visualizations producing valuable insights to stakeholders
Required Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (will vary by experience level):
An understanding of BI solutions best practices and common pitfalls from architectural design, data source, ingestion, storage, analysis and visualization
Ability to articulate BI and reporting concepts in a way that is easy to understand
Demonstrated ability to coordinate and conduct test efforts for a BI solution
Excellent stakeholder management skills and meeting presence
Proven ability to manage your workload, organizing and prioritizing tasks and clearly communicating status
Ability to multi-task and manage multiple projects and priorities
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Education and Experience:
Minimum BA/BS degree from a four-year accredited university
Demonstrated experience from the “Required Skills, Knowledge and Abilities” section above will vary by level from Mid (3-7 years) and Senior (8+ years).
Desirable systems and tools experience, which will vary by role, may include: SQL skills (connecting to databases, joining tables, queries), SSIS/SSAS/SSRS, data analytics (Advanced Excel, Python, R), reporting visualization and presentation (PowerBI, Tableau, SharePoint)
About Us:

RedCloud is a boutique Management Consulting firm founded in 1995, based in Bellevue, WA with a primary goal of empowering businesses to realize their potential and reach peak performance. We do this with a complete and unwavering focus on accountability, dependability and results. We achieve this by providing a broad array of both Business and IT consulting services in addition to staffing solutions to our clients. Our professional services include Strategic Planning, Process Improvement, Project Management, IT Management, Sales and Marketing, Business Intelligence and Cyber Security Services.

Learn more about us at redcloudconsulting.com.",4.6,"RedCloud Consulting
4.6","Bellevue, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
352,Data Analyst,-1,"Growing Insurance Software Company Seeks a Talented Business Analyst / Financial Analyst!

This Jobot Job is hosted by: Reed Kellick
Are you a fit? Easy Apply now by clicking the ""Apply Now"" button and sending us your resume.
Salary: $70,000 - $80,000

A bit about us:

Based in Philadelphia, we have built a cloud-based software platform for the insurance industry that is changing up the space. We have been around for about 10 years now, but we are still a small, agile team. We are currently looking to hire a FP&A Analyst / Accounting Analyst for our Philly location!

Why join us?
Competitive Base Salary Between $70k and $80k!
401k!
Bonuses!
Paid For Trips to California Twice a Year for Company Events!


Job Details

As a Software Analyst / Data Warehouse Analyst on our team, we are looking for:

Strong Excel background -- pivot tables, macros, etc.
Experience with XML / XSLT / JSON would be ideal
An accounting, finance, business intelligence, business analysis, or data analysis background
Good client-facing ability and willingness to interact with customers
Ability to communicate with engineers
APIs / Web Services experience would be preferred


Interested in hearing more? Easy Apply now by clicking the ""Apply Now"" button.",5.0,"Jobot
5.0","Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
353,Research /Web data Analyst,"$42k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","GeoAccuracy Judge*
Pactera is a leading industry in localization and globalization services. Pactera is looking for Geo-Accuracy Judge.

Judges use internal tools or online web information to analyze large quantities of address data to verify accuracy while demonstrating the ability to understand, follow, and apply software developer guidelines, allowing developers to analyze/update interface data.
RESPONIBILITIES*
· Navigating many internal tools efficiently while following guidelines and thinking like a user

· Judging each address uniquely and with focused attention

· Responding to guideline ambiguities/changes/updates from team lead

· Applying those changes while sometimes moving between different markets daily

· Aiming to reduce ambiguity, errors, problems while responding to team lead
REQUIRED SKILLS*
· Quick to understand, problem-solve and perform tasks diligently over sustained periods of time

· Detail-oriented problem-solving mindset

· Organized and an ability to work independently or as a team

· Familiarity with navigating the Internet - research techniques on the Internet and finding information quickly

· Ability to follow guidelines carefully and do time bound tasks with efficiency

· Ability to do repetitive tasks without degradation in quality

Position; Part Time

Job Type: Part-time-25-29.5hrs/week

Salary: $14.00 /hour

Job Type: Part-time

Pay: $14.00 per hour",4.5,"Pactera Technologies
4.5","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
354,Data Analyst,-1,"Doximity is transforming the healthcare industry. Our mission is to help doctors be more productive, informed, and connected. As a Data Analyst, you'll work within cross-functional delivery teams alongside other analysts, engineers, and product managers in discovering data insights to help improve healthcare.

Our team brings a diverse set of technical and cultural backgrounds and we like to think pragmatically in choosing the tools most appropriate for the job at hand.

About Us
Here are some of the ways we bring value to doctors
Here is an introduction to our tech stack
We use UNIX command-line interface and standard programming tools (vim/emacs, git, etc.) and have over 350 private repositories in Github containing our applications, forks of gems, our own internal gems, and open-source projects
We have worked as a distributed team for a long time; we're currently about 65% distributed
Find out more information on the Doximity engineering blog
Our company core values
Our recruiting process
Our product development cycle
Our on-boarding & mentorship process
Here's How You Will Make an Impact
Leverage Doximity's extensive datasets to identify and classify behavioral patterns of medical professionals on our platform.
Play a key role in creating both product and client-facing analytics.
Inform data team strategy by working with the product leaders and managers. Actively participate in execution and some planning of organizational data team strategy.
Collaborate with a team of product managers, analysts, and other developers to define and lead data projects from data ingestion to analysis to recommendations.
About you
At least 2 years of professional experience as a data analyst.
Knowledge of statistical concepts, especially exploratory data analysis techniques, and probability theory.
Excellent SQL skills to create and evaluate complex statements involving numerous tables and data relationships.
Excellent visualization and storytelling skills to explain your results and solutions to the stakeholders, clearly and compellingly.
Experience with Python and understanding of the object-oriented programming concepts and testing as it relates to data and Python.
Prior exposure to distributed data processing concepts and execution (e.g., working with column stores, leveraging spark, etc.)
Fast learner; curiosity about and passion for data.
Benefits
Doximity has industry-leading benefits. For an updated list, see our career page
More info on Doximity

We're thrilled to be named the Fastest Growing Company in the Bay Area, and one of Fast Company's Most Innovative Companies. Joining Doximity means being part of an incredibly talented and humble team. We work on amazing products that over 70% of US doctors (and over one million healthcare professionals) use to make their busy lives a little easier. We're driven by the goal of improving inefficiencies in our $3.5 trillion U.S. healthcare system and love creating technology that has a real, meaningful impact on people's lives. To learn more about our team, culture, and users, check out our careers page, company blog, and engineering blog. We're growing steadily, and there's plenty of opportunities for you to make an impact.

Doximity is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and committed to providing employment opportunities regardless of race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy, childbirth and breastfeeding, age, sexual orientation, military or veteran status, or any other protected classification. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state, and local law.",4.7,"Doximity
4.7",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
355,Data Analyst,"$41k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Tombras, a 330+ person, full-service, national advertising agency with a digital mindset, is seeking a Data Analyst to join the Data Analytics department.

You’ll be joining one of the top independent agencies in North America. We blur the lines between a creative agency, a digital agency and a management consultancy. Our digital offering is married to the discipline and rigor of our Effie-winning strategists and Cannes Lion-winning creative directors. We are united by our philosophy: Connecting Data & Creativity for Business Results®. You’ll also be a part of a highly creative agency that has been recognized by Advertising Age, Adweek, Communication Arts, Fast Company, Forbes and Fortune. Tombras was recently named one of Ad Age’s 2019 A-List Agencies to Watch.

The Data Analyst will report directly to the VP, Analytics. You will be responsible for the execution, evaluation and effective communication of data-driven, digital results and insights. This includes the development and implementation of holistic, cross-channel measurement.

What you'll be doing:

Measurement:
Develop and implement holistic, cross-channel measurement
Define, monitor, and analyze key performance indicators for continuous improvement of marketing campaigns
Consult with colleagues and clients on measurement strategies/techniques
Ensure appropriate analytics integration into agency production processes
Assessment and Analysis:
Works independently and with the VP, Analytics in assessing client media programs
Provides reporting & analysis for agency clients
Interpret media marketing data and analyze its effects on KPIs and ROI
Deliver analyses (i.e. insights and actions) via the appropriate means (e.g. dashboards, deep dive analyses, infographics, etc.)
Present results in a simple, story-telling fashion
Collaborate with numerous partners and agency departments to keep analyses integrated and focused.
What you bring:
1+ years of working with analysis of digital media channels in a business environment; prior experience working in an ad agency is a plus
Working knowledge of Tableau
Working knowledge of Marketing and Digital Marketing
Working knowledge of Web Analytics Platforms (Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, etc.)
Experience with AdWords, Facebook Business Manager, DCM is a plus
SQL knowledge or experience with database administration a plus
An analytical mind, an entrepreneurial spirit, and innovative strategic thinking
Ability to collaborate with cross-functional teams and make recommendations
Bachelor's in Marketing or Analytics and/or equivalent work experience
Master's in Marketing or Business Analytics a plus
Why you’ll want to work at Tombras:
New, Modern building in downtown Knoxville
Dog-friendly office
Casual dress
Highly collaborative and high-energy work environment
Competitive salaries
Benefits including health, dental, vision, life and disability insurance, 401(k) and more
Company culture of promotions from within and an atmosphere allowing for varied and rapid career development.
This position will be remote to start and will be based at our headquarters in Knoxville, Tennessee. If you haven’t heard, it’s one of the coolest cities (just ask HuffPost, Buzzfeed and Forbes). Seriously — if you’re lucky, we might help you relocate here.

Tombras is proud to be an equal opportunity employer dedicated to pursuing and hiring a diverse workforce.

This job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change or new ones may be assigned at any time with or without notice. Job may require traveling overnight, driving long distances as required and sitting for extended periods of time with occasional walking and standing and occasionally lifting or carrying articles weighing less than 10 pounds.

Tombras Offices and Locations: New York City, NY Charlotte, NC Atlanta, GA Washington, DC Knoxville, TN Nashville, TN",4.0,"Tombras
4.0","Knoxville, TN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1946,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
356,"Clinical Data Analyst (RN) - MCS Research & Development - INTEGRIS - Oklahoma City, OK","$40k-$70k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Located in Oklahoma City, OK

Data Analyst - MCS Research & Development - INTEGRIS

Don't miss out on this fantastic opportunity to take yournursing career in a new, exciting direction. INTEGRIS is look for a RN thatwould love to explore the Data field with in our Nazih Zuhdi Transplant Institute.Learn how to use your clinical experience to better understand data that isused to make business decisions, while working a M – F business schedule.

Job Code: 1729

Position Summary:

This position is responsible for the design, implementation, maintenance, integrity and data quality of the Nazih Zuhdi Transplant Institute (NZTI) in support of strict reporting requirements. This includes ongoing analysis of health care information, obtained from a variety of sources, including patient care, financial, and demographic data. It involves development and preparation of information products for transplant leadership, physicians and staff, including the assembly of documentation required for submission to regulatory agencies. It requires the ability to analyze health care data from conceptualization through presentation of the data. It requires proficiency with analytical tools (SAS, Excel), knowledge of data analysis methodology, use of presentation software, strong communication skills and a strong commitment to and affinity for delivering the highest level of customer service.

INTEGRIS Health is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.

Essential Functions:

The Data Analyst responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following:
Develop programs, methodologies, and files for analyzing and presenting data.
Works with customers to develop and understand product specifications.
Develops methodologies for collecting, analyzing, and presenting data products.
Delivers data products in report/presentation format, or verbally, to customer specifications and timelines.
Perform complex data analysis in support of ad-hoc and standing customer requests.
Develop information from a variety of data sources evaluates data.
Accountability:

Reports to the Director of Research Administration and NZTI Quality.

Required Physical Demands (Subject to Reasonable Accommodation):

Keyboarding/Dexterity: Frequently; activity exists from 1/3 to 2/3 of the time
Standing/Walking: Occasionally; activity exists up to 1/3 of the time
Strength (Lift/Carry/Push/Pull): Sedentary (exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally)
Talking (Must be able to effectively communicate verbally): Yes
Seeing: Yes
Hearing: Yes
Color Acuity (Must be able to distinguish and identify colors): No

This position may have additional or varied physical demand and/or respiratory fit test requirements. Please consult the Physical Demands Project SharePoint site or contact Risk Management/Employee Health for additional information.

Environmental Conditions:

Normal office environment.

All applicants will receive consideration regardless of membership in any protected status as defined by applicable state or federal law, including protected veteran or disability status.

Qualifications:
Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience or an Associate degree with 4 years of experience specifically involving data analysis, quality assurance, and support.
Masters degree in relevant discipline may substitute for experience.
Healthcare experience preferred.
Training and experience with Microsoft Excel, Access, Word and PowerPoint, Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services, and SAS preferred.
Must be able to communicate effectively in English (Verbal/Written).",2.8,"Integris Health
2.8","Fort Worth, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
357,Business Systems Analyst (Data Analyst),"$41k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Business Systems Analyst (BSA) is an individual contributor role that provides senior-level healthcare analysis for Medicare and Commercial lines of business. The BSA will manage various sources of information and large data sets, including member, pharmacy, claims and encounter data to support Reporting and Analytics projects. The BSA will provide a strong link between the business customers and development team, gather and document requirements, create SQL queries to pull and perform analysis of data, and conduct impact assessments and recommend solutions while staying current with industry regulations and trends.

This role will be Remote / Work From Home.

Key Responsibilities:

Will perform data analysis, data mining, identify the root cause of issues and handle ad-hoc analysis requests
Analyze raw data and disseminate results, think logically and process sequentially with a high level of detailed accuracy
Assist the Reporting & Analytics team with new business requirements and assist with functional specifications and perform quality checks on data and processes
Support the report development team to build a proof of concept. Present them to stakeholders to get their feedback and provide recommendations back to the team to improve the user experience

Requirements:

Bachelor’s degree required in Health Science, Computer Science, or related field of study
5+ years’ experience with data analysis. Strong data manipulation skills using database or spreadsheet applications. Ability to use SQL and other data tools to analyze diverse data sets
4+ years’ experience within the Healthcare or Insurance space
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, with the ability to multitask and prioritize projects to meet scheduled deadlines
Strong interpersonal skills required. Understands that the clients’ best interests are served through smooth, seamless service delivery
Ability to analyze raw data and disseminate results, with ability to think logically and process sequentially with a high level of detailed accuracy
Ability to work well independently or in a team environment
Must be self-motivated and passionate about delivering creative and value-driven reporting solutions in a fast-paced, time-sensitive environment with competing priorities and ongoing deliverables
2-3 years working in an Agile environment (SCRUM or SAFE), preferred

Job Demands

This is a work at home position. Access to high speed internet is required (all other equipment will be provided).
Must be able to sit and use a computer keyboard for extended periods of time
Very limited travel required
Must have flexibility and willingness to participate in the work processes of an international organization, including conference calls scheduled to accommodate global time zones.
After hours and/or weekend work required where necessary for major deliverables/deadlines (not consistent)

For the safety of our employees and those considering employment with Cotiviti, we are currently conducting all interviews virtually. In addition, the majority of the Cotiviti team is currently working remotely, and we are onboarding new hires remotely as well. As we monitor the pandemic, these arrangements may change and we will update accordingly.

#LI-JB1

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",2.8,"Cotiviti, Inc.
2.8","Richmond, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1979,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
358,Data Analyst,"$37k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Summary*
Advanced Radiology Services is one of the largest physician-owned radiology practices in the country. Our growing practice includes 168 radiologists, 30 advanced practice providers, and more than 100 employees providing administrative support in our wholly owned subsidiary STARS. We value diversity on our team and promote a culture of inclusion. We provide services to more than 60 different sites across the state of Michigan.
Responsibilities and Duties*
The Data Analyst is responsible for using data analytics and financial analysis to assist the billing departments in solving complex business problems and in the development of ongoing monitoring tools.
Responsibilities: *
Serve as the company expert and main source of data support as it relates to Physician billing and billing operations
Identify, analyze, and escalate critical billing risks and issues
Work with internal and external customers to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of billing and billing operations
Coordinate fee schedule updates, analyze potential impact and audit for compliance
Fulfill various data requests using Decision Support tools and databases
Develop and maintain dashboards and reports that assist in monitoring the billing process
Additional duties and projects as assigned
Requirements: *
Bachelor’s Degree in Business Administration, Analytics, Computer Science or Mathematics
Minimum of 2 years of analytic experience is required, medical billing preferred
Experience with medical billing software, Healthpac preferred
Database (SQL) experience is preferred
Proficiency in Microsoft Office products including Outlook, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
Benefits*
ARS offers career growth opportunity, work-life balance and outstanding compensation and benefits.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"Advanced Radiology Services
4.0","Grand Rapids, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
359,Clinical Data Analyst (RN) - MCS Research & Development - INTEGRIS - Oklahoma,-1,"Located in Oklahoma City, OK

Data Analyst - MCS Research & Development - INTEGRIS

Don't miss out on this fantastic opportunity to take yournursing career in a new, exciting direction. INTEGRIS is look for a RN thatwould love to explore the Data field with in our Nazih Zuhdi Transplant Institute.Learn how to use your clinical experience to better understand data that isused to make business decisions, while working a M – F business schedule.

Job Code: 1729

Position Summary:

This position is responsible for the design, implementation, maintenance, integrity and data quality of the Nazih Zuhdi Transplant Institute (NZTI) in support of strict reporting requirements. This includes ongoing analysis of health care information, obtained from a variety of sources, including patient care, financial, and demographic data. It involves development and preparation of information products for transplant leadership, physicians and staff, including the assembly of documentation required for submission to regulatory agencies. It requires the ability to analyze health care data from conceptualization through presentation of the data. It requires proficiency with analytical tools (SAS, Excel), knowledge of data analysis methodology, use of presentation software, strong communication skills and a strong commitment to and affinity for delivering the highest level of customer service.

INTEGRIS Health is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.

Essential Functions:

The Data Analyst responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following:
Develop programs, methodologies, and files for analyzing and presenting data.
Works with customers to develop and understand product specifications.
Develops methodologies for collecting, analyzing, and presenting data products.
Delivers data products in report/presentation format, or verbally, to customer specifications and timelines.
Perform complex data analysis in support of ad-hoc and standing customer requests.
Develop information from a variety of data sources evaluates data.
Accountability:

Reports to the Director of Research Administration and NZTI Quality.

Required Physical Demands (Subject to Reasonable Accommodation):

Keyboarding/Dexterity: Frequently; activity exists from 1/3 to 2/3 of the time
Standing/Walking: Occasionally; activity exists up to 1/3 of the time
Strength (Lift/Carry/Push/Pull): Sedentary (exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally)
Talking (Must be able to effectively communicate verbally): Yes
Seeing: Yes
Hearing: Yes
Color Acuity (Must be able to distinguish and identify colors): No

This position may have additional or varied physical demand and/or respiratory fit test requirements. Please consult the Physical Demands Project SharePoint site or contact Risk Management/Employee Health for additional information.

Environmental Conditions:

Normal office environment.

All applicants will receive consideration regardless of membership in any protected status as defined by applicable state or federal law, including protected veteran or disability status.

Qualifications:
Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience or an Associate degree with 4 years of experience specifically involving data analysis, quality assurance, and support.
Masters degree in relevant discipline may substitute for experience.
Healthcare experience preferred.
Training and experience with Microsoft Excel, Access, Word and PowerPoint, Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services, and SAS preferred.
Must be able to communicate effectively in English (Verbal/Written).",2.8,"Integris Health
2.8","Antlers, OK",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
360,Research Data Analyst,"$41k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","JOB DESCRIPTION AND POSITION REQUIREMENTS:

The Clearinghouse for Military Family Readiness at Penn State seeks a strong data analyst/methodologist to take the lead on identifying, accessing, and examining data from various U.S. Air Force databases to understand factors that influence clinical innovations designed to reduce suicide attempts and suicides at five Air Force bases implementing the Zero Suicide Systems Approach (ZSSA). In particular, the Zero Suicide Data Analysis (ZDA) will develop robust approaches to analyzing data on implementation of ZSSA so that it can be used to steer changes to implementation strategies targeted to different Military Treatment Facility Clinics.

Duties

Serve as the lead data analyst on the ZSSA project
Identify, access, and analyze data sets residing on Air Force and Penn State University systems
Identify best approaches to analyze implementation and patient data
Develop specific analytic approaches to be used with relevant data structures and levels
Liaison between Air Force, PSU, and local project staff to identify implementation data needs that can be used to drive implementation support efforts
Conduct record review studies in cases where database information is lacking
Field surveys and send reminder to potential respondents
Advise Air Force/Penn State project leads on the status of data collection across all MTF/clinics
Proactively identify research questions and conduct analyses to answer these questions
Respond to specific requests for data analyses
Make recommendations on improvements to data analytic approaches
Assist local implementation teams by providing them with site specific data
Conceptualize, contribute to, and write scholarly research and briefings for funders
Develop protocols, lessons learned, insights for the ZDA position
Serve as an essential knowledge source regarding ZSSA
Promoting ZSSA values through positive team member interactions
Help building ZSSA alliance and culture change
Participate in: weekly TCONS, monthly COPs, and other meetings

Requirements

Any BAA requirements as outlined by Air Force
A passion for figuring out data analytic solutions to complex problems
Expertise in power analyses, multi-level modeling, logistic regression, time series analysis, and other sophisticated data analytic techniques
Excellent communication skills and ability to explain technical issues and resolution via email, phone, and in person
Can do attitude, work independently, willing to adapt to different tasks throughout the day
Background in program implementation and evaluation research and analyses
Familiarity with research conducted in hospital settings
Ph.D. in psychology, public health, applied statistics, or related field
Familiarity/experience in conducting research in healthcare systems.

The Pennsylvania State University is committed to and accountable for advancing diversity, equity, and inclusion in all of its forms. We embrace individual uniqueness, foster a culture of inclusion that supports both broad and specific diversity initiatives, leverage the educational and institutional benefits of diversity, and engage all individuals to help them thrive. We value inclusion as a core strength and an essential element of our public service mission.

CAMPUS SECURITY CRIME STATISTICS:

Pursuant to the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act and the Pennsylvania Act of 1988, Penn State publishes a combined Annual Security and Annual Fire Safety Report (ASR). The ASR includes crime statistics and institutional policies concerning campus security, such as those concerning alcohol and drug use, crime prevention, the reporting of crimes, sexual assault, and other matters. The ASR is available for review here .

Employment with the University will require successful completion of background check(s) in accordance with University policies.

EEO is the Law

Penn State is an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer, and is committed to providing employment opportunities to all qualified applications without regards to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identify, national origin, disability or protected veteran status. If you are unable to use our online application process due to an impairment or disability, please contact 814-865-1473.

University Park, PA",4.2,"Penn State University
4.2","University Park, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1855,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
361,DATA ANALYST,-1,"FOR IMMEDIATE DETAILS ABOUT THIS POSITION, contact ANY of us direct, referencing the JOB# below:

Kindest Regards:
KIANA AREVALO: (469) 325-3712
JOANNE SMITH: (469) 298-9115
SHERRIE KRAUS: (469) 996-9697
JUSTIN MATLIN: (469) 209-5915
SUMIT KUMAR: (949) 860-4718
E M A I L: Recruiter.key3@calance.com

=======================================
=======================================
* We CAN'T accept any C2C/INC/1099 consultants, W2 ONLY**
=======================================

Position: DATA ANALYST
JOB REF#: 894155
Duration: 4+ Months (On-going Contract)
Location: Plano, TX 75024
Rate: Open/Market Rate (W2 ONLY)

Data Analyst is responsible for, but not limited to: monitoring the COVID-19 related data in Workday HR system and a custom PowerBI application for missing / inaccurate data, performing data audits, troubleshooting and investigating data anomalies and issues, and working with the business and IT to resolve data issues (proactively and reactively). The role will be working across multiple business units (i.e. IT, local HR, third party nurses, etc.) and locations virtually to help guarantee the quality of the data. The position will require flexibility, adaptability, and advanced experience utilizing Workday and Excel. The desired candidate should be deadline driven, work well under pressure, possess a strong customer service mindset, have excellent communication skills, and can build and maintain relationships across the organization.

REQUIRED EXPERIENCE:
• 1+ years’ experience as a Data Analyst working with large data sets
• Experience performing data audits, troubleshooting and investigating data anomalies and issues
• Must have WORKDAY HR functional expertise required (including EIBs and advanced reporting)
• Advanced skills and significant experience using Microsoft Excel.
• Must be proficient in MS Project, Visio, Word, and PowerPoint.
• EXCELLENT oral communication and written skills
• Experience working in a deadline driven, work well under pressure, and possess a strong customer service mindset
• Education: BS or BA degree in computer science, business administration, or related technical field

Calance Consultant Benefits Offerings:
EPO/PPO Medical Plan (Cigna)
HMO/PPO Dental programs (Cigna)
Vision - VSP (Vision Plan Summary)
Voluntary Life, Short (STD)/Long Term (LTD) Disability and Voluntary plans
401K VOYA Retirement vesting program
Paid Bi-Weekly/Direct Deposit",2.9,"Calance US
2.9","Plano, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
362,Data Analyst/Scientist,"$41k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","One in five Oregonians face mental health and addictions issues every year; one in four face addiction issues. When left untreated, these issues often manifest into chronic health conditions and uncounted social costs to families, loved ones and the larger community. LifeWorks NW has helped more than 22,000 people in their journeys toward restored wellbeing. From keeping children safe and building stronger families to our integrated approach that combines behavioral and primary healthcare, LifeWorks NW provides essential services that make our community healthier.

The Data Analyst/Scientist position is responsible for all aspects of data analytics including mining, generation, and visualization. By transforming data into readable, actionable reports for continued improvement and growth, this role will contribute to strategic decision making, operational improvement activities and organizational alignment.

Pay/Benefits: $53,452 to $58,129 per year. Full benefits

Essential Responsibilities:

Work closely with management and internal teams to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Define and implement data collection and transformation logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools to ensure data integrity while optimizing scalability and performance of the solution
Develop and maintain databases by acquiring data from primary and secondary sources, and build scripts that will make our data evaluation process more flexible and scalable across data sets
Present and explain information and data, communicating data interpretation and analysis, suggesting operational improvements. Communicating information in digestible and accessible way both orally and written including creating and maintaining rich interactive visualizations which integrate various reporting components from multiple data sources
Interpret and analyze data to discover discrepancies or to identify trends and patterns in complex data sets
Build models and analyzing data to unearth trends and patterns to address business opportunities to drive business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Uses appropriate software programs and tools, including statistical packages and programming languages to query, process, analyze, and present data and findings including required documentation
Understand health care operations and systems
Ability to handle protected health information (PHI) in a manner consistent with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA).
Exhibits an excellent attention to detail and multi-tasking ability with the capability of working independently
Acts professionally with a passion for assisting others and problem-solving
Meets performance standards set by assigned project work/objectives and organizational policies and norms.
Continually increases level of cultural sensitivity, awareness and competency.

Qualifications:

Bachelor's in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics required.
Proven working experience as a data analyst or similar required.
Preferred experience in clinical/healthcare reporting and analysis
Strong SQL proficiency with the ability to learn other analytic tools
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design, data mining and segmentation
Strong knowledge of and proficiency with reporting packages (Business Objects etc), programming (XML, Javascript, or ETL frameworks)
Practical experience in statistical analysis through the use of statistical packages (Excel, SPSS, SAS)
Strong analytical skills including collection, mining, evaluation, analysis, and visualization to disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
Experience using business intelligence tools (e.g. Tableau) and data frameworks (e.g. Hadoop)
Ability to work effectively on a team, and to work independently with minimal supervision. Self-motivated. Proven success in a collaborative, team-oriented environment.
Demonstrates critical thinking and analytical capability; Ability to learn new technologies quickly
Demonstrates punctuality, accountability, and patience
Ability to perform under pressure, be flexible, and effectively manage workload.
Strong business acumen
Outstanding organizational and problem-solving aptitude
Demonstrates effective communication and presentation skills (both written and oral) and maintains a cooperative working relationship with others in a culturally diverse environment
Organizational agility with the ability to facilitating complex projects and project specific discussions with multiple stakeholders with diverse professional backgrounds.
Must be able to pass a DHS background check.

LifeWorks NW believes that diversity strengthens our workforce and empowers our community. LifeWorks NW is an EEO/AA employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other status in accordance with law.

www.lifeworksnw.org Drug Free/Tobacco Free Site 01/09",2.8,"LifeWorks NW
2.8","Portland, OR",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1961,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
363,Sr. Data Analyst - Contract,"$88k-$152k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Sr. Data Analyst (Consultant)

App Annie

LOCATION: San Francisco

App Annie is the industry's most trusted mobile data and analytics platform. App Annie's mission to help customers create winning mobile experiences and achieve excellence. The company created the mobile app data market and is committed to delivering the industry's most complete mobile performance offering. More than 1,100 enterprise clients and 1 million registered users across the globe and spanning all industries rely on App Annie as the standard to revolutionize their mobile business. The company is headquartered in San Francisco with 12 offices worldwide.

Position Summary:

As a Senior Data Analyst, the consultant will research, mine, document, and configure App Annie's data systems. Platforms include cloud databases (Redshift and Snowflake), SaaS (CRM, CSM, and web analytics), and Tableau for visualizations. The consultant will work with business teams, other analysts, and data engineers to deliver projects as assigned. Projects may include data discovery, new visualizations, system set-up, plus adding new objects to databases.

The ideal candidate is experienced working in a small and efficient IT/ Business operation teams. You are comfortable wearing multiple hats and enjoy working with cutting edge technology to solve problems. This position is uniquely suited to highly organized individuals with a wide breadth of IT knowledge and experience and the ability to work with minimal direction. Good communication skills and ability to set and manage expectations are key to be successful in this role.

What you will do:
Strong experience in design and development of visualizations and dashboards using Tableau.
Create, automate and maintain reports in well-designed visualization/reporting in Tableau that are accessible to all the teams for self-service analytics
Perform detailed data analysis (i.e. determine the structure, content, and quality of the data through examination of source systems data)
Experience capturing and translating Business Requirements into technical solutions
Familiar leveraging stored procedures and functions within a DW environment
Familiar with data modeling and normalization
Subject matter expert – Collaborate with internal and external partners for the definition, planning, modeling, governance, and implementation of Tableau capabilities.
Deliver analytics solution to Business teams in a timely manner
What will you bring to the team:
Bachelor's degree in a STEM, Finance, or Economics discipline, or a comparable combination of education and experience.
Minimum 6 years hands-on experience delivering Data Analytics solutions.
Minimum 4 years of SQL experience writing queries and building database objects to meet business requirements.
Experience with at least two database platforms (Cloud-based preferred).
Minimum 2 years of SaaS project and/or admin experience (SalesForce or similar).
Minimum 2 years of Tableau experience.
Demonstrated experience taking charge of deliveries, organizing contributors through to project completion.
Preferred Experience: Web Analytics tools (Google Analytics, Heap) and working with globally distributed teams.
Able to prioritize and effectively manage competing priorities and set clear expectations around deliverables.
Be a team player and build strong partnerships.
Experience in a fast paced tech startup environment.
Excellent communication skills and the ability to work effectively across the organization at all levels, including C level and their office teams.
Ability to maintain composure in high-pressure situations.
Prior hands on experience using the above skills in building Executive level dashboards involving customer health or business facing KPI's
Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",3.8,"App Annie
3.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
364,Data Analyst,"$44k-$79k
(Glassdoor Est.)","MIRACORP Inc., is a veteran, women-owned firm specializing in federal government contract services. One of our competitive advantages is that we provide services to our customers with a standard of excellence that is unmatched. MIRACORP believes our employees are the cornerstone for our success.

MIRACORP is seeking a Data Analyst at our customer location in Washington DC. The Data Analyst provides functional support, including: Human capital, budget execution, budget formulation, oil and gas regulatory processing, federal employee workforce engagement, communications, and COOP.

Task Requirements:

Demonstrates integrity and diligence understanding and abiding by laws, regulations and policies associated with receiving and handling of highly sensitive, including classified, data.
Demonstrate expertise to utilize various software tools/applications in the analysis of large, bulk data sets.
Use analytical skills and in-depth research, critical thinking and judgement to draw conclusions.
Interprets analytical results and uses writing skills, verbal communication skills and creativity to convey results to others.

Your Requirements:

A minimum of three (3) years of experience that is relevant and directly related to federal travel is required.
A BS or BA degree (or an additional six (6) years of relevant experience in lieu of a degree) in a discipline that relates to the job duties.
Other relevant professional development courses and training related to administrative and organization is desirable.

Why consider a career at MIRACORP?

Our Comprehensive Benefit Package includes Medical, Dental, Vision, Health & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts, Basic Term Life and Accident, Short Term Disability, Long Term Disability, and 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan.
At MIRACORP we value and leverage your unique talents and perspectives. We will support you along the way. MIRACORP employees are the foundation of our company and valuable contributors to our continued success. We welcome professionals that want to be part of our growing team.

MIRACORP is an equal opportunity employer. Veterans are encouraged to apply!

Powered by JazzHR

YisgqsUtwV",4.8,"MIRACORP
4.8","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
365,Data Analyst,-1,"FLORIDA ASSOCIATION OF HEALTHY START COALITIONS, INC.

HEALTHY START MOMCARE NETWORK, INC.

ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICE ORGANIZATION

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER
POSITION DESCRIPTION*
Job Title: *DATA ANALYST
Department: *ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Unit: INFORMATICS
Location: *Tallahassee, Florida
Salary Range: *$50,000 - $60,000
Status: *Exempt
Employment Type: *Full-time
Reports To: *DIRECTOR OF INFORMATICS
JOB SUMMARY*
The Data Analyst is responsible for compiling, interpreting, and analyzing data to ensure Healthy Start program compliance with contract requirements. The Data Analyst is responsible for identifying trends and addressing issues in order to optimize program efficiency. The Data Analyst is required to work independently using critical thinking and discretion to make recommendations and keep management informed on data system trends and issues and comply with organizational policies and procedures.
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES*
Assists with the liaison of the data system contractor on operational and data quality issues.
Achieves and maintains working knowledge of contract requirements regarding business rules for data entry, claims payment, and compliance reporting.
Gather necessary data and claims information for payment of claims to Healthy Start Coalitions. Prepares the payment statements and all backup information required for payment.
Identify and recommend resolutions involving data submission and payment issues including, but not limited to, potential quality issues in the way data is collected stored, processed or used.
Develops appropriate algorithms and/or protocols regarding data input and the assignment of codes to ensure standardization of data entry and reporting.
Design, collect, analyze and report on data quality assurance. Develop a statewide report card on critical metrics
Manage agent roles in the Medicaid Fiscal Agent Claims System.
Assist in the preparation of necessary data driven reports for contractual compliance.
Assist in continuous quality improvement activities regarding the approved data used for invoicing for Medicaid services and Medicaid claims reports, including researching and analyzing Medicaid claims reports to determine statewide trends and potential missing or incomplete data.
Reconciles the statewide approved data base used for payment with the Medicaid claim reports.
Monitors statewide monthly payments, including submitted claims by fee type to provide trend analysis for the year as compared to previous years to determine trends in volume and claims payments.
Performs other duties as assigned by the Informatics Director.
Works with significant degree of autonomy and discretion.
RELATED FUNCTIONS*
Experience extracting and manipulating data from multiple sources.
Experience developing reports and/or dashboards and presenting the findings.
Advanced knowledge and experience with Microsoft Excel (vlookups, pivot tables, etc.) and Word.
Completes other projects assigned.
SKILLS AND ABILITIES: *
Strong problem-solving skills.
Strong SQL skills, ability to perform effective querying involving multiple tables and subqueries.
Effective verbal and written communications skills.
Ability to effectively and independently organize assigned work activities and to complete tasks in a timely manner.
Ability to manage contacts with the public in a professional, tactful, courteous, and effective manner and to maintain effective working relationships with clients and other employees.
REQUIREMENTS*
MINIMUM EDUCATION:

Graduation from an accredited college or university with a bachelor’s degree, majoring in a relevant discipline (e.g. Mathematics, Economics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field) and 2-3 years of overall data analysis experience with at least 1 year analyzing health claims data.
COMPETENCIES: *
Self-motivated
Forward thinking
Attention to detail
Excellent oral/written communication
Problem solver
Self-confidence
Personal credibility
Stress management
Flexibility
Fostering teamwork
Customer-oriented
Diagnostic information gathering
Conceptual thinking
Initiative Thoroughness
Interpersonal awareness
OTHER: *
Upon hiring, candidate will be finger-printed and a background screening will be conducted.
This position is in Tallahassee, Florida.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT*
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit, talk, hear, and use hands and fingers to operate and handle keyboards and controls. The employee is occasionally required to walk and reach with hands and arms. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $60,000.00 per year

Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Healthy Start MomCare Network, Inc.","Tallahassee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
366,Data Analyst,-1,"FLORIDA ASSOCIATION OF HEALTHY START COALITIONS, INC.

HEALTHY START MOMCARE NETWORK, INC.

ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICE ORGANIZATION

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER
POSITION DESCRIPTION*
Job Title: *DATA ANALYST
Department: *ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Unit: INFORMATICS
Location: *Tallahassee, Florida
Salary Range: *$50,000 - $60,000
Status: *Exempt
Employment Type: *Full-time
Reports To: *DIRECTOR OF INFORMATICS
JOB SUMMARY*
The Data Analyst is responsible for compiling, interpreting, and analyzing data to ensure Healthy Start program compliance with contract requirements. The Data Analyst is responsible for identifying trends and addressing issues in order to optimize program efficiency. The Data Analyst is required to work independently using critical thinking and discretion to make recommendations and keep management informed on data system trends and issues and comply with organizational policies and procedures.
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES*
Assists with the liaison of the data system contractor on operational and data quality issues.
Achieves and maintains working knowledge of contract requirements regarding business rules for data entry, claims payment, and compliance reporting.
Gather necessary data and claims information for payment of claims to Healthy Start Coalitions. Prepares the payment statements and all backup information required for payment.
Identify and recommend resolutions involving data submission and payment issues including, but not limited to, potential quality issues in the way data is collected stored, processed or used.
Develops appropriate algorithms and/or protocols regarding data input and the assignment of codes to ensure standardization of data entry and reporting.
Design, collect, analyze and report on data quality assurance. Develop a statewide report card on critical metrics
Manage agent roles in the Medicaid Fiscal Agent Claims System.
Assist in the preparation of necessary data driven reports for contractual compliance.
Assist in continuous quality improvement activities regarding the approved data used for invoicing for Medicaid services and Medicaid claims reports, including researching and analyzing Medicaid claims reports to determine statewide trends and potential missing or incomplete data.
Reconciles the statewide approved data base used for payment with the Medicaid claim reports.
Monitors statewide monthly payments, including submitted claims by fee type to provide trend analysis for the year as compared to previous years to determine trends in volume and claims payments.
Performs other duties as assigned by the Informatics Director.
Works with significant degree of autonomy and discretion.
RELATED FUNCTIONS*
Experience extracting and manipulating data from multiple sources.
Experience developing reports and/or dashboards and presenting the findings.
Advanced knowledge and experience with Microsoft Excel (vlookups, pivot tables, etc.) and Word.
Completes other projects assigned.
SKILLS AND ABILITIES: *
Strong problem-solving skills.
Strong SQL skills, ability to perform effective querying involving multiple tables and subqueries.
Effective verbal and written communications skills.
Ability to effectively and independently organize assigned work activities and to complete tasks in a timely manner.
Ability to manage contacts with the public in a professional, tactful, courteous, and effective manner and to maintain effective working relationships with clients and other employees.
REQUIREMENTS*
MINIMUM EDUCATION:

Graduation from an accredited college or university with a bachelor’s degree, majoring in a relevant discipline (e.g. Mathematics, Economics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field) and 2-3 years of overall data analysis experience with at least 1 year analyzing health claims data.
COMPETENCIES: *
Self-motivated
Forward thinking
Attention to detail
Excellent oral/written communication
Problem solver
Self-confidence
Personal credibility
Stress management
Flexibility
Fostering teamwork
Customer-oriented
Diagnostic information gathering
Conceptual thinking
Initiative Thoroughness
Interpersonal awareness
OTHER: *
Upon hiring, candidate will be finger-printed and a background screening will be conducted.
This position is in Tallahassee, Florida.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT*
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit, talk, hear, and use hands and fingers to operate and handle keyboards and controls. The employee is occasionally required to walk and reach with hands and arms. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $60,000.00 per year

Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Healthy Start MomCare Network, Inc.","Tallahassee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
367,Data Analyst,-1,"FLORIDA ASSOCIATION OF HEALTHY START COALITIONS, INC.

HEALTHY START MOMCARE NETWORK, INC.

ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICE ORGANIZATION

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER
POSITION DESCRIPTION*
Job Title: *DATA ANALYST
Department: *ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Unit: INFORMATICS
Location: *Tallahassee, Florida
Salary Range: *$50,000 - $60,000
Status: *Exempt
Employment Type: *Full-time
Reports To: *DIRECTOR OF INFORMATICS
JOB SUMMARY*
The Data Analyst is responsible for compiling, interpreting, and analyzing data to ensure Healthy Start program compliance with contract requirements. The Data Analyst is responsible for identifying trends and addressing issues in order to optimize program efficiency. The Data Analyst is required to work independently using critical thinking and discretion to make recommendations and keep management informed on data system trends and issues and comply with organizational policies and procedures.
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES*
Assists with the liaison of the data system contractor on operational and data quality issues.
Achieves and maintains working knowledge of contract requirements regarding business rules for data entry, claims payment, and compliance reporting.
Gather necessary data and claims information for payment of claims to Healthy Start Coalitions. Prepares the payment statements and all backup information required for payment.
Identify and recommend resolutions involving data submission and payment issues including, but not limited to, potential quality issues in the way data is collected stored, processed or used.
Develops appropriate algorithms and/or protocols regarding data input and the assignment of codes to ensure standardization of data entry and reporting.
Design, collect, analyze and report on data quality assurance. Develop a statewide report card on critical metrics
Manage agent roles in the Medicaid Fiscal Agent Claims System.
Assist in the preparation of necessary data driven reports for contractual compliance.
Assist in continuous quality improvement activities regarding the approved data used for invoicing for Medicaid services and Medicaid claims reports, including researching and analyzing Medicaid claims reports to determine statewide trends and potential missing or incomplete data.
Reconciles the statewide approved data base used for payment with the Medicaid claim reports.
Monitors statewide monthly payments, including submitted claims by fee type to provide trend analysis for the year as compared to previous years to determine trends in volume and claims payments.
Performs other duties as assigned by the Informatics Director.
Works with significant degree of autonomy and discretion.
RELATED FUNCTIONS*
Experience extracting and manipulating data from multiple sources.
Experience developing reports and/or dashboards and presenting the findings.
Advanced knowledge and experience with Microsoft Excel (vlookups, pivot tables, etc.) and Word.
Completes other projects assigned.
SKILLS AND ABILITIES: *
Strong problem-solving skills.
Strong SQL skills, ability to perform effective querying involving multiple tables and subqueries.
Effective verbal and written communications skills.
Ability to effectively and independently organize assigned work activities and to complete tasks in a timely manner.
Ability to manage contacts with the public in a professional, tactful, courteous, and effective manner and to maintain effective working relationships with clients and other employees.
REQUIREMENTS*
MINIMUM EDUCATION:

Graduation from an accredited college or university with a bachelor’s degree, majoring in a relevant discipline (e.g. Mathematics, Economics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field) and 2-3 years of overall data analysis experience with at least 1 year analyzing health claims data.
COMPETENCIES: *
Self-motivated
Forward thinking
Attention to detail
Excellent oral/written communication
Problem solver
Self-confidence
Personal credibility
Stress management
Flexibility
Fostering teamwork
Customer-oriented
Diagnostic information gathering
Conceptual thinking
Initiative Thoroughness
Interpersonal awareness
OTHER: *
Upon hiring, candidate will be finger-printed and a background screening will be conducted.
This position is in Tallahassee, Florida.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT*
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit, talk, hear, and use hands and fingers to operate and handle keyboards and controls. The employee is occasionally required to walk and reach with hands and arms. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $60,000.00 per year

Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Healthy Start MomCare Network, Inc.","Tallahassee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
368,Data Analyst,-1,"FLORIDA ASSOCIATION OF HEALTHY START COALITIONS, INC.

HEALTHY START MOMCARE NETWORK, INC.

ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICE ORGANIZATION

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER
POSITION DESCRIPTION*
Job Title: *DATA ANALYST
Department: *ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Unit: INFORMATICS
Location: *Tallahassee, Florida
Salary Range: *$50,000 - $60,000
Status: *Exempt
Employment Type: *Full-time
Reports To: *DIRECTOR OF INFORMATICS
JOB SUMMARY*
The Data Analyst is responsible for compiling, interpreting, and analyzing data to ensure Healthy Start program compliance with contract requirements. The Data Analyst is responsible for identifying trends and addressing issues in order to optimize program efficiency. The Data Analyst is required to work independently using critical thinking and discretion to make recommendations and keep management informed on data system trends and issues and comply with organizational policies and procedures.
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES*
Assists with the liaison of the data system contractor on operational and data quality issues.
Achieves and maintains working knowledge of contract requirements regarding business rules for data entry, claims payment, and compliance reporting.
Gather necessary data and claims information for payment of claims to Healthy Start Coalitions. Prepares the payment statements and all backup information required for payment.
Identify and recommend resolutions involving data submission and payment issues including, but not limited to, potential quality issues in the way data is collected stored, processed or used.
Develops appropriate algorithms and/or protocols regarding data input and the assignment of codes to ensure standardization of data entry and reporting.
Design, collect, analyze and report on data quality assurance. Develop a statewide report card on critical metrics
Manage agent roles in the Medicaid Fiscal Agent Claims System.
Assist in the preparation of necessary data driven reports for contractual compliance.
Assist in continuous quality improvement activities regarding the approved data used for invoicing for Medicaid services and Medicaid claims reports, including researching and analyzing Medicaid claims reports to determine statewide trends and potential missing or incomplete data.
Reconciles the statewide approved data base used for payment with the Medicaid claim reports.
Monitors statewide monthly payments, including submitted claims by fee type to provide trend analysis for the year as compared to previous years to determine trends in volume and claims payments.
Performs other duties as assigned by the Informatics Director.
Works with significant degree of autonomy and discretion.
RELATED FUNCTIONS*
Experience extracting and manipulating data from multiple sources.
Experience developing reports and/or dashboards and presenting the findings.
Advanced knowledge and experience with Microsoft Excel (vlookups, pivot tables, etc.) and Word.
Completes other projects assigned.
SKILLS AND ABILITIES: *
Strong problem-solving skills.
Strong SQL skills, ability to perform effective querying involving multiple tables and subqueries.
Effective verbal and written communications skills.
Ability to effectively and independently organize assigned work activities and to complete tasks in a timely manner.
Ability to manage contacts with the public in a professional, tactful, courteous, and effective manner and to maintain effective working relationships with clients and other employees.
REQUIREMENTS*
MINIMUM EDUCATION:

Graduation from an accredited college or university with a bachelor’s degree, majoring in a relevant discipline (e.g. Mathematics, Economics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field) and 2-3 years of overall data analysis experience with at least 1 year analyzing health claims data.
COMPETENCIES: *
Self-motivated
Forward thinking
Attention to detail
Excellent oral/written communication
Problem solver
Self-confidence
Personal credibility
Stress management
Flexibility
Fostering teamwork
Customer-oriented
Diagnostic information gathering
Conceptual thinking
Initiative Thoroughness
Interpersonal awareness
OTHER: *
Upon hiring, candidate will be finger-printed and a background screening will be conducted.
This position is in Tallahassee, Florida.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT*
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit, talk, hear, and use hands and fingers to operate and handle keyboards and controls. The employee is occasionally required to walk and reach with hands and arms. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $60,000.00 per year

Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Healthy Start MomCare Network, Inc.","Tallahassee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
369,Data Analyst,-1,"We have an exceptional opportunity for an ambitious and talented Data Analyst. The Data Analyst will be a key member of the Data and Planning Team and will analyze media and social data created by marketing activity, identifying trends and providing actionable insights to improve performance. Will be responsible for tracking and understanding the performance of campaigns using fractional attribution. Proactively builds strong working relationships with internal contacts to help support and educate the agency about how mathematical concepts can improve marketing effectiveness.

Responsibilities
Has working knowledge of technologies such as SQL, Python and Tableau to manage data preparation, analysis and presentation. This would include the management of datasets which are required for ongoing analysis.
Responsible for the creation and management of models which would be used in campaign planning and management.
Responsible for the documentation of analytics projects and ensuring that specific analytical processes can be replicated and scaled across clients if necessary.
Responsible for the delivery of robust mathematical analysis
Responsible for the production of campaign reports, studies, presentations and proposals to Jellyfish brand standards.
Achieves continuous improvement by proactively assessing Jellyfish’s working relationships, practices and methods
Demonstrates measurable success through the achievement of analysis which contributed to an improvement in client performance or an improvement in agency efficiency
Requirements
BS/BA Degree in Business Administration, Statistics, Mathematics, or related field (or equivilent work experience)
1+ years of experience
Experience in data analysis with the ability to identify causations and correlations within multiple datasets.
Excellent technical analytical experience - to include some of the following Excel, SQL, Python, R, Tableau or Data studio.
Have experience in machine learning and can identify the correct opportunities of where to use it and construct the appropriate training and production of models.
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to distill and translate complex analysis into actionable insights that a client will understand.",3.6,"Jellyfish Group Ltd
3.6","Baltimore, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Motion Picture Production & Distribution,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
370,Interim Data Analyst,-1,"A dynamic, global organization is hiring for an Interim Data Analyst for a 6-month engagement! The ideal person will have been in an Analyst role for 4 to 6 years with the ability to interpret and map data from various sources for multiple projects. This project is expected to last about six months, could become permanent for the right person, and is looking for someone ready to support a cohesive team!
As the Interim Data Analyst, your key responsibilities will include:
Manipulating raw data using Excel and other software systems
Using data to create reports and presentations of results
Analyze data trends and share with the organization
Requirements that the Interim Data Analyst need to meet:
Attention to detail
Working knowledge of Excel and ERP systems
4 to 6 years experience in a Data Analyst role
Prefer background in finance and/or accounting
If you have a background that lines up well with the Interim Data Analyst description above and are interested in learning more about this opportunity, please apply online today!

Position: Financial Analyst

Physical Abilities: Up to 10lbs

For the most prompt response, please APPLY ONLINE.
Resumes may also be sent to financejobs@aureusgroup.com or call (888) 239-5993 for more information.
As always, there is never a fee for candidates to utilize our services.
F123",3.8,"Aureus Group
3.8","Omaha, NE",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
371,Data Analyst,"$40k-$73k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Meet our professionals

CGI: An employer of choice

Position Description

CGI is looking for experienced Data Analyst to join our team in Cleveland OH. The Lead Business Systems / Data Analyst role will be engaged to perform data analysis of multiple data sources each having overlapping, similar, or derived copies of data. The role will provide oversight and will work closely with system Architect, data engineers, and QA team to break down business requirements into actionable project deliverables.

Your future duties and responsibilities

•Ensure that team builds processes that support effective data management, metadata management, and good data quality.

•Manage projects within team and work effectively with cross-functional teams.

•Provide guidance and work with team members to ensure successful completion of tasks.

•Reviews, analyzes, and evaluates business systems and user needs.

•Developing and implementing data analyses, data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality

•Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases

•Manages the progress of projects and drives them to completion, sets customer and managerial expectations, and communicates status.

•Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complicated data sets and effectively communicate this information with management

Required qualifications to be successful in this role

• Bachelor's degree and at least 3 years of experience in data Analysis; Advanced knowledge of SQL

•Experience establishing and maintaining key relationships with internal (peers, business partners and leadership) and external (business community, clients and vendors) within a matrix organization to ensure quality standards for service.

•Substantial demonstrated experience with data modelling

•Data Quality

•Able to write SQL and help us to build innovative models

•Provide valuable insights to different teams, based in rich data - you will be interfacing with the development and business team and conveying direction to both parties

•Partner with multiple stakeholders to understand business objectives and define key metrics

Skill SetYears of ExperienceProficiency Level

Banking experience 5 and above Advanced

Hadoop 2 and above Advanced

Data Analysis 5 and above Advanced

Relational Databases 5 and above Advanced

Data quality 3 and above Mid level

Agile 2 and above Advanced

planning, organization, communication and thought leadership skills 5 and above

good time management skills and Customer service orientation 5 and above

Minimum Education Required:Bachelors Degree

Skills
Banking
Data Analysis
Hadoop Hive
What you can expect from us

Build your career with us.

It is an extraordinary time to be in business. As digital transformation continues to accelerate, CGI is at the center of this change—supporting our clients' digital journeys and offering our professionals exciting career opportunities.

At CGI, our success comes from the talent and commitment of our professionals. As one team, we share the challenges and rewards that come from growing our company, which reinforces our culture of ownership. All of our professionals benefit from the value we collectively create.

Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.

Learn more about CGI atwww.cgi.com.

No unsolicited agency referrals please.

CGI is an equal opportunity employer.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.

CGI provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you need an accommodation to apply for a job in the U.S., please email the CGI U.S. Employment Compliance mailbox atUS_Employment_Compliance@cgi.com. You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested. Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.Please note, this email address is only to be used for those individuals who need an accommodation to apply for a job. Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.

We make it easy to translate military experience and skills! Clickhere to be directed to our site that is dedicated to veterans and transitioning service members.

All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary dependent upon specific assignment and/or level of US government security clearance held.

CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI's legal duty to furnish information.",3.6,"CGI Group, Inc.
3.6","Cleveland, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
372,Data Analyst,"$45k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Role: Data Analyst
Location: Tempe, AZ
Duration: 6+ Months

Job Description:

A driven, experienced data analyst to join the Vendor Managed Inventory team who has a passion for solving problems with data, an eye for process improvement, and the skill to execute changes.
You'll be a great fit if you have the grit to persevere through challenging or ambiguous problems, love a chance to step away from your desk to understand and improve processes, and get excited about translating data into action.

Â
Use statistical methods to analyze data and generate useful business reports to solve operational problems.
Be responsible for extracting, cleansing, and visualizing large data sets using the tools and techniques described above.
Plan and lead execution of identified process improvements and cross functional initiatives.
Proactively monitor existing reporting, identify areas of concern, and perform any additional analysis needed to understand underlying causes or nuances.
Deliver insights on urgent business challenges by performing ad hoc analysis and crafting accurate, easy to understand findings.
Forecast future performance based on impact of process improvements and changes to the business.
Work with management team to create a prioritized list of needs for each business segment.
Use data to create models that depict trends related to growth, consumption and forecast.
Work with Project managers to outline the specific data needs for each supplier negotiations.

Qualifications/Experience:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, or similar field from an accredited undergraduate institution required.
2+ years of professional experience in data, reporting, and analytics.
Ability to collaborate effectively and work as part of a team.
Strong attention to detail.
Strong analytical skills with proficiency in Microsoft SQL Server.
Experience with visualization software; Excel, Access, Pivot Tables, V-Look Up, Tableau proficiency a big plus.
Capable of managing competing priorities.
Ability to thrive (and preference to work) in a dynamic, fast-paced environment.
Ability to communicate confidently to senior leadership.",4.3,"Softcom Systems
4.3","Tempe, AZ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
373,CRM Business Data Analyst,"$30k-$56k
(Glassdoor Est.)","CRM Business Data Analyst

Position Overview

The CRM Business Data Analyst is responsible for analyzing Customer Relationship Management (CRM) system data in response to channel marketing initiatives. Review online and offline retail sales data and determine effective reporting to drive strategic decisions on future initiatives. Includes analyzing customer information, touchpoints, customer flow and order data by channel.

The Analyst will notice trends, discrepancies, and find effective insights or solutions by taking a holistic perspective. Uses data to predict and address problems or opportunities and finds answers that support strategic goals. Can identify “noise” to ensure focus on key goals and the task at hand.

They will help identify processes, techniques and opportunities for improvement of existing data technology. This person will work closely with the marketing team, corporate IT team and outside agencies. They should be able to work collaboratively and effectively across the team while focusing on action and learning.

Key Responsibilities

Customer Relationship + Engagement

Collaborate with Marketing + Retail teams to build customer life-cycle programs, focusing on engagement, lead generation, and nurturing initiatives.

Re-engage existing customers through the promotion of new products, services, and established relationships.

Educates cross-functional team on customer experience concepts, value, and supporting process impact.

Provides regular competitive benchmarking and customer awareness best practices.

Serves as customer advocate with senior management; ensures that customer findings are understood, tracked, and acted upon.

Insight Mining

Compiles high-quality reports on key performance indicators.

Explains the components of a marketing dashboard and its importance in guiding future marketing initiatives.

Testing + Innovation

Carries out A/B Testing and/or various digital touchpoints campaigns to establish the most effective strategy.

Analyzes basic customer touchpoints and interactions to identify the connection between customers and the brand.

Describes the needs, values, perceptions, emotions, cognitions, and behaviors of target customer profiles.

Leads customer insights gained through analytics to inform design decisions.

Monitors industry best practices and analyzes campaign performance to optimize plans going forward.

Digital Marketing

Identifies opportunities for audience development and growth through analysis of digital customer behavior.

Supports the development of digital marketing multi-channel campaigns aimed at increasing loyalty.

Monitors paid acquisition budget and performance across multiple platforms and develops recommendations on adjustments.

Analyzes creative performance and determines trends based on creative and channel.

Support segmentation initiative to drive enhanced marketing automation capabilities.

Additional Skills

Strong intellectual curiosity, attention to detail, self-motivated, and excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Communicates effectively; ensures that information is passed on to others who should be kept informed, expresses oneself clearly in conversations and interactions; provides background when working through an issue, and proactively provides the necessary level of detail. Interpret information and break down complex topics to digestible, actionable pieces.

Data modeling and familiarity with various Business Intelligent tools, including DOMO.

Experience with Salesforce Service and Marketing Cloud a plus.

Must be able to handle multiple projects simultaneously.

Required Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in business, marketing, analytics, computer science or related field.

Experience working with CRM system data and online marketing retail with 4-7 years of relevant work experience in an analytical role. Heavy focus on analysis and visual representation of the data, and understanding of ecommerce and business best practices, systems and technology.

Advanced technical experience with Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint.

This position has a partial work from home opportunity with required days at the corporate headquarters in Bassett, VA.

Bassett Furniture Industries is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer and does not discriminate against any applicant for employment because of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, age, veteran status or other protected category. Bassett is dedicated to ensuring that qualified applicants are employed and that employees are treated consistently during employment, without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, age, veteran status or other protected category.

EEO/AA-M/F/V/D

Back Share
Apply Now",3.3,"Bassett Furniture
3.3","Bassett, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1902,Company - Public,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
374,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description


Job #: 1088965

Apex is looking for a contract to hire Data Analyst in Scottsdale.

Start Date: October 5th

Location: Scottsdale

The candidate doesn’t need lots of experience – would consider recent graduates. It much more important that they have the right attitude. They need to be a “go getter” and a “digger”. “Digger” means when they hit a problem they need to research and dig in and figure out what’s going on (not just give up and go ask for help).

Job Description
Liaison between business & technical team
Liaison between technical & testing teams
Maybe some light SQL work (does not need to have high level SQL)
Great written & verbal communication skills
Ability to create written technical requirements
Ability to triage technical issues and set priorities with Director Enterprise Data
Ability to work across all levels of the organization (from C level to junior Developers)
Scrum a plus
Jira a plus
Confluence a plus
EEO Employer

Apex Systems is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate or allow discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical conditions), age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, registered domestic partner status, marital status, disability, status as a crime victim, protected veteran status, political affiliation, union membership, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apex will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 844-463-6178.",3.8,"Apex Systems
3.8","Scottsdale, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
375,Data Sourcing Data Delivery Analyst - Analytics and Data Science Lab (#150339),"$66k-$115k
(Glassdoor Est.)","A department which values Diversity and Inclusion (D&I) and is committed to realizing the firm’s D&I ambition which is an integral part of our global Conduct and Ethics Standards
The opportunity to become part of our highly motivated Analytics team focusing on building and driving new and state of the art technologies in various fields
An exciting role for you as Data Analyst within our Analytics & Data Science Lab and close collaboration with its Chief Operating Officer, Financial Crimes Compliance, Risk Management, IT and Operations teams as well as coordination with related organizations within our Bank
Manage developing, maintaining and extracting knowledge from strategic internal and external data sets
Manage documenting data attributes, data feeds and data sources in a concise and succinct way
Developing and crafting algorithms, building prototype versions, running multiple validations with business specialists and working on their operationalization
Becoming part of a forward-thinking team with an outstanding team spirit in a versatile, dynamic, and flexible working environment
Flexible / agile working options are possible
Understands the value of diversity in the workplace and is dedicated to fostering an inclusive culture in all aspects of working life so that people from all backgrounds receive equal treatment, realize their full potential and can bring their full, authentic selves to work. This should be further elaborated on in your application.
Previous experience at Credit Suisse and in particular in the risk department would be an advantage
A Bachelor or Master degree in a computer science, Information System, Information Technology (University or University of Applied Sciences) or an equivalent education
Equivalent experience of at least 5 years in Data Analysis or Business Analysis
Background in Finance, analytics methods and Data warehouse Principals and programming language like Python, R, SAS is a plus.
Due to your experience with relational database programming and complex data pipelines you feel at ease in assembling data sets from disparate sources and analysis using appropriate quantitative methodologies, computational frameworks and systems
Detailed knowledge in distributed data processing at scale using Spark or/and Hive is preferred
Experience in the regulatory technologies or Risk and compliance domain within the financial industry is a plus!
Outstanding written and verbal communication and interpersonal skills
Integrity, responsibility and confidentiality required for dealing with sensitive data
Hardworking with proven experience as a strong, self-starting standout colleague with willingness to perform in a fast paced environment and contribute to the team's success
Do you possess ability to learn and take additional responsibilities to become a respected know-how carrier in the team?",3.9,"Credit Suisse
3.9","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1856,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
376,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst Summary:

Signature Consultants is seeking a Data Analyst for an opportunity with a client in Center City Charlotte, NC (Remote until post Covid-19). The Data Analyst is responsible for identifying and defining requirements for application and use case migration off the various legacy data provisioning points to the strategic APPs. This position will work collaboratively with the LOB, application teams, APP teams, Business Data Lead (BDL) Relationship Managers, Application Business Owners (ABOs), and technology to formulate and deliver successful data

Rate: $40-45 per hour (w2) negotiable based on skills experience, (comes with weekly pay and some benefits)

Responsibilities:
Work with key partners in the business, BDL relationship managers, operations, and technology teams to identify and prioritize applications and use cases for migration off legacy provisioning points to strategic APP data provisioning.
Conduct comparative data analysis between legacy provisioning points and strategic APP data sets to inform requirements.
Understand and document data lineage where needed
Provide requirements to strategic APPs to support application migration off legacy provisioning points
Identify data dependencies impacting migration to strategic APPs
Build and maintain strong relationships with partners across the line of business, application teams, Data Management & Insights, Technology, and Operations.
Minimum Qualifications:
Working knowledge of one or more of the Solid businesses of focus: corporate and investment banking, capital markets, wealth, trust, or asset management
Familiarity with core CIB and WIM SORs such as Broadridge, Calypso, Endur, Catalyst, and other platforms such as SFDC, FACS, ISP, IPM
5+ years of delivering information strategy, data management, data governance, and/or data analytics
4+ years of participating in efforts that elicit, synthesize, and document business requirements, conduct analysis, and perform data analytics
Strong SQL and excel skills; willingness to develop R, python, or additional big data query
Excellent interpersonal skills along with a customer service orientation must be pared with strong relationship building skills at all levels of the organization
Bachelor Degree in business, finance, accounting, MIS, math or other related field or CFA
Preferred Qualifications:
Key factors in attaining success include initiative, accountability, and ability collaborate across teams to achieve goals
Familiarity with big data platforms (HDFS, MapR), business intelligence platforms (OBIEE, QLikview, Tableau) , and relational databases
About Signature Consultants, LLC

Headquartered in Fort Lauderdale, Florida, Signature Consultants was established in 1997 with a singular focus: to provide clients and consultants with superior staffing solutions. For the ninth consecutive year, Signature was voted as one of the ""Best Staffing Firms to Work For"" and is now the 14th largest IT staffing firm in the United States (source: Staffing Industry Analysts). With 28 locations throughout North America, Signature annually deploys thousands of consultants to support, run, and manage their clients' technology needs. Signature offers IT staffing, consulting, managed solutions, and direct placement services. For more information on the company, please visit www.sigconsult.com. Signature Consultants is the parent company to Hunter Hollis and Madison Gunn.",3.8,"Signature Consultants
3.8","Charlotte, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
377,Sr Data Analyst (Remote/ Virtual),"$49k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Are Hiring

Remote Opportunity!

Are you a self starter who is passionate about data trends, investigating and researching solutions? Our Ascension Data Science Institute is looking to add a Sr. Data Analysis to their team! This is a great opportunity to join a growing team with a great culture!

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

Serves as a key resource/SME in collection and analysis of data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports as needed.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
May provide leadership, orientation, training, coaching, and mentoring to staff on how to access reports and interpret the data.
Identifies data trends and makes recommendations for quality improvement.
Parses, validates and scrubs data of widely differing formats.
Analyzes data for business insight.
Initiate action on data requests with team.
What You Will Need

Education:
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
Bachelor's or higher strongly preferred.
Work Experience:

3 years of experience preferred in healthcare operations or administration preferred.

Preferred Skills:
1-3 years experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, QlikView, or Microstrategy.
Scripting language experience in Python, R and SQL preferred.
Knowledge of and some experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred.
Experience presenting to high levels of executives.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

This employer participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify links below for more information.

eVerify

Right to Work",3.3,"Ascension
3.3","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
378,Workforce Data Analyst,"$33k-$60k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*Career Steps Inc.*

*Position Description*

*Title*: Workforce Analyst

*Reports To*: President/CEO

*Exempt*: Yes No

*Supervisory Responsibilities*: No

*Position Summary*

The Workforce Analyst will be part of the CSI Management team to track and report on internal performance, . The position will additionally work with Center staff to ensure that the local operating procedures provide appropriate guidance for front line staff and to evaluate system efficiencies. *This is not an IT position.*

*Essential Skills*

* Strong analytical skills
* Strong data analysis skills
* Solid communication skills
* Detail-oriented/critical thinking skills
* Creativity - thinking outside the box
* Excellent problem-solving skills

*Essential Responsibilities*

* Oversees, collects, compiles, analyzes, and interprets workforce data and information data for the workforce system, management and staff
* Provides detailed analysis of the data in support of the workforce system goals and provides staff with the tools to monitor and achieve performance targets
* Evaluate center staff caseloads and performance then share information with management
* Prepares and provide presentations for staff to individual or in a group setting.
* Track Internal performance using Power Bi and Excel
* Review State performance reports
* Provide guidance on Local Operating Procedures
* Identify CSI and Career and Training Services front line staff in need of training
* Report identified training issues to the and CSI management
* Report weekly trends to CSI management staff
* Other duties as assigned

*Qualification Requirements*

Bachelor’s degree or higher preferred.

PBA (Professional in Business Analyst) preferred

Proficient in Microsoft Office Products including Power BI and expert level Excel skills

Exceptional Customer Service

Excellent oral and written communication skills

Knowledge of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act preferred.

*Working Conditions*

This is an administrative office occupation comprised of work that generally involves sitting at a desk or standing in office situations. Travel may be required between all 3 CSFV centers.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $24.00 - $30.00 per hour

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* 8 hour shift

Benefit Conditions:
* Only full-time employees eligible

Work Remotely:
* No",3.0,"Career Steps, Inc
3.0","Daytona Beach, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
379,BHJOB15656_15397 - Data Analyst,-1,"The recruitment team at Myticas Consulting is looking for an experienced Data Analyst who would be interested in a contract to hire opportunity offered within the Darien, Illinois region.

Deliverables and Requirements:

Update of multiple data management practices through system enhancements and process improvement projects as an integrated member of the project team.
Hands-on support of multiple data clean-up efforts in support of data reporting accuracy.
Documentation of current system settings, permissions, integrations across multiple system environments.
Review and summary of release notes for overdue updates and supporting deployment of recently released updates to the system as an integrated member of the project team.
Assessment of business processes and system suitability and configuration for features in use and those features available but not currently in use.
Updates and creates training guides and desk reference files for clarity and process accuracy.
Excellent communication and technical skills.
Expertise with relational database management systems.
Proven excellence in data analysis.
Extensive knowledge and experience with report writing and desktop reporting tools, specifically MS-SQL query building.
Preferred knowledge of ETL tools, particularly with informatica.
Experience to quickly learn capabilities of multiple commercial applications via recorded training sessions, vendor-supplied guides and videos, along with locally-developed documentation.
Ability to effectively interact with stakeholders to derive requirements and design solutions.
Able to disseminate knowledge to current staff.
Able to work both independently and as a contributing member of a technical team.

Candidates looking to apply for this role are to send us an updated version of their resume in confidence. Our team will be sure to review all applicants and follow up accordingly at the conclusion of the review process.

Job is also known as: Data Analyst

INDMY",5.0,"Myticas Consulting
5.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
380,Data Analyst,-1,"DATA ANALYST*
NuEnergen (www.nuenergen.com) is seeking a Data Analyst for its White Plains, NY office. NuEnergen is an energy consulting company focused on Demand Response, Energy Procurement, & Bill Auditing. We are located in White Plains, NY across from the Metro North train stop.

This role is for those that are highly proficient in MS Excel, the use of pivot tables, charting, and presenting data. A strong background in algebra and the ability to manipulate large data sets is required. Data Analysts are responsible for the day to day collection and tracking of Client, Supplier, and Utility information. You will also be assisting in the construction of energy-related billing models and using them to analyze our client’s energy bills. Ideally you will have a degree in Engineering, Mathematics, Economics, or Accounting.
RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES: *
· Maintain the energy usage and cost data for multiple clients in our EnerTrac dashboard.

· Assist in the development of billing, and other energy related mathematical models.

· Prepare and present reports for internal use and clients.
QUALIFICATIONS: *
· Proficient in Microsoft Office (especially Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook)

· Ability to manage changing priorities

· Excellent communication skills, both written and oral

· Must be detail-oriented and team-oriented
COMPENSATION & BENEFITS: *
· Compensation will be commensurate with experience level but is targeted in the $40K to $50K level.

Our preferable candidate lives in the Westchester County, NY area. You MUST be proficient in MS Excel. You must also be a U.S. Citizen. This is an entry level position with a small, fast growth company. We're looking for someone that is willing to learn from this role and potentially expand into other roles as needed.

Salary: $40,000.00 to $50,000.00 /year

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $45,000.00 - $50,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We have a complete set of Covid-19 protocols in place at the office to safeguard each of our employees.

Experience:
Microsoft Office: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
White Plains, NY 10606 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
nuenergen.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",2.0,"NuEnergen, LLC
2.0","White Plains, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Less than $1 million (USD),-1
381,Media Data Analyst,"$41k-$73k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Do you have a passion for working with data and an endless curiosity about the trends that numbers can reveal? Are you both a creative and quantitative thinker? The Media Data Analyst will play a central role in advancing TMP’s media analytics, intelligence, and strategy. We’re looking for a strong team player who’s keen to delve deep into large data sets, build a strong data foundation from a media trading lens, develop new measurement frameworks, articulate actionable insights, and is unafraid to challenge the status quo in their quest for data accuracy and recruitment marketing advancement.

Why Join Us?

Truly high-performing teams are hard to come by; joining us gives you an opportunity to collaborate with, learn from, and grow together with a diverse group of high achievers who listen to your ideas and support you along the way
An entrepreneurial path of progression. Hard work is recognized and individuality is embraced. Your path of progression will be designed to suit you",3.5,"TMP Worldwide
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
382,Data Analyst Lead - Tableau,-1,"Our client is an industry leader in WNY and in the Top 100 of their field nationally. This well known company has established themselves as an industry leader in the Data Analytics/Business Intelligence workspace throughout NYS. What sets them apart is their entrepreneurial spirit and ability to help their customers with innovation and growth. Work/Life balance is a high priority in addition to being extremely active in community organizations.

Company offers a competitive salary, generous paid time off and other great benefits including bonus + commission!
In this role,* you willserve as a liaison between company clients and the internal development team. You will play a key role in guiding the DBA/ETL Developers in data ingestion, data prep and transformation, automation, modeling and visualization across a broad spectrum of industries .
Day to Day Responsibilities will include: *
Working with the clients to understand requirements, gather requirement specifications, define a validation plan, and scope deliverables appropriately to ensure realistic timeframes for development.
Communicating with executive leadership and external clients in-person and remotely
Managing the development of Tableau Dashboards by designing, implementing and developing data visualizations using advanced features of Tableau software
Managing and mentoring junior level BI Developer
Designing, implementing and developing data visualizations using advanced Tableau capabilities
Assist in documenting training materials that explain how end users will leverage dashboards and visualizations
The ideal candidate *will be a true ""data geek"" who is passionate about dashboards and visualizations that can effectively use data to transform how business works.
Required Skills and Experience: *
3-5 Years of experience using Tableau BI, specifically pulling large amounts of data from a multitude of sources, organizing the data and presenting it in a fashion that is relevant to business clients.
Strong SQL and Excel experience in a setting that pulls and validates data from complex databases
Ability to manage the resources and milestones needed to deliver results. Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Tableau certification is a definite plus
Our client is currently working remotely due to Covid. Once it is considered safe to return on-site, the expectation would be to work in the office 2-3 days per week.
Please note: client is seeking candidates local to WNY only at this time*
Unable to sponsor or transfer visas now or in the future. No Corp to Corp. *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $99,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Tableau BI: 3 years (Required)
advanced Excel: 3 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Buffalo, NY (Preferred)
License:
Tableau (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"ComputerPeople Staffing
5.0","Buffalo, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
383,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Every day, Global Payments makes it possible for millions of people to move money between buyers and sellers using our payments solutions for credit, debit, prepaid and merchant services. Our worldwide team helps over 3 million companies, more than 1,300 financial institutions and over 600 million cardholders grow with confidence and achieve amazing results. We are driven by our passion for success and we are proud to deliver best-in-class payment technology and software solutions. Join our dynamic team and make your mark on the payments technology landscape of tomorrow.

Global Payments is the parent company for TSYS, Netspend, Heartland, TouchNet, OpenEdge, Xenial, Greater Giving, ACTIVE Network, and AdvancedMD. Headquartered in Georgia with over 24,000 employees worldwide, Global Payments is a member of the S&P 500 with worldwide reach spanning over 100 countries throughout North America, Europe, Asia Pacific and Latin America. For more information, visit globalpaymentsinc.com and follow Global Payments on Twitter (@globalpayments), LinkedIn and Facebook.

The Senior Data Analyst works in a global contact center environment and reports to the Director of Operations. We are looking for a data driven individual who can identify data in available resources, create summary analysis, and recommend improvements to Customer Service performance. This role is responsible for the development, delivery and maintenance of reporting to support operational objectives. They will liaison with other internal functional groups to make data driven decisions.

Responsibilities

Manage the department data infrastructure inclusive of data-warehousing, reporting, and analytics platforms.
Develop and provide standard and ad hoc reporting to internal NetSpend teams to monitor operational measures and service levels.
Identify opportunities for cost reduction or efficiency gains through operational improvement, technology enhancements & process elimination.
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Locate and quantify new process improvement opportunities.

Skills/Education/Experience

3+ years’ experience in data analyst role.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Advanced SQL knowledge and ability to write complex SQL freehand and understand complex legacy SQL.
Experience using Excel to create reporting for leadership. This is not just providing data, but providing analysis and understanding of data.
Solid understanding of data modeling principles.
Experience with shell scripting languages such as PowerShell.
Experience with data visualization platforms (QlikSense experience a plus).
Familiarity with Atlassian Jira and Confluence.
Contact Center Operations experience a plus.
Experience interfacing with internal business partners.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Works well in cross-functional teams.
Bachelor’s Degree Preferred.
As provided in Netspend's Background Check policy, eligible candidates may be subject to drug, criminal history, and credit checks, which will be conducted and used in accordance with applicable local, state, and federal laws.

Not Ready to Apply? Join Our Talent Community!!

US Applicants:
TSYS is an equal opportunity employer (EOE) committed to employing a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture.",3.0,"TSYS
3.0",Texas,-1,10000+ Employees,1983,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
384,Data Analyst,-1,"Optimove is the Science-First Relationship Marketing Hub. Were obsessed with what drives customer behavior and strive to provide our clients the solution to foster long-lasting customer relationships.
The Data Analyst position is the perfect role for an entry-level engineer whos looking to get their feet wet in the world of data science. You report to the Director of Data Science and interface directly with clients data science teams across business verticals. Your core responsibilities involve playing an active role in collaborating with internal teams to construct Optimoves tailored predictive models for our clients. The ideal candidate is a SQL whiz with a strong work ethic, robust analytical and technical capabilities and highly effective time management skills. We are looking for a master multi-tasker that thrives in challenging, fast-paced environments with agility and ease. The Data Analyst is an integral part of the Analytics team and the position is one that brings with it an excellent opportunity to learn and grow within a rapidly expanding company.
Responsibilities:
Conducting consumer data research and analytics
Working with customer-centric algorithm models and tailoring them to each customer as required
Presenting complexed analysis to clients
Extracting actionable insights from large databases



Requirements:
B.Sc in Engineering, Computer Science, Data Science, or similar major
Experience or undergraduate courses focused on SQL and Excel
Exceptional work ethic with outstanding technical skills
Ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Strong communication skills
Please note that we are unable to provide sponsorship for this position
Optimove is an equal opportunity employer. Two thirds of our managers were promoted from within. If youre looking to develop your career, get acknowledged for your efforts, and work with dedicated people who love what they do, youve come to the right place.",3.7,"Optimove
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
385,Data Analyst,-1,"Noah is a modern finance company that helps homeowners tap into their home equity without selling or adding additional debt (and the burden of monthly payments). Noah is focused on making home-ownership more affordable and accessible for millions of Americans, and is partnering with homeowners to help them maximize the value of what is likely their most valuable asset. Founded in 2016, with backing from Union Square Ventures and Tribe Capital, Noah has offices in San Francisco and New York.

The Role

Noah is seeking a data analyst to join our Data Science & Analytics team. Candidates should be comfortable owning a broad range of data science-related responsibilities, including the ideation and development of Noah's business and portfolio analysis tools, as well our risk and pricing models. Candidates will be expected to operate both at an execution and strategic level. This position offers high exposure to Noah's executive team, and will be reporting directly to the CIO.

Day-to-day responsibilities will include:
Translating business priorities and requirements to data science deliverables
Working with data scientists, data engineers, and software engineers to develop and support the internal tools used for pricing, underwriting, marketing, product & operations support.
Design, develop and maintain business dashboards to track KPIs across marketing, operations and product linked activities.
Develop and maintain a suite of portfolio analytics and metrics utilized for reporting to internal and external stakeholders
Developing methods to analyze risk of the US housing market in a systematic and objective manner
Identifying, sourcing and managing the data required to build Noah's risk and pricing models
Contributing to developing the core algorithms and analytical models for Noah's products
Creating frameworks for back-testing Noah's proprietary models
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics, Economics or other technical field
3 years of data science/analytics experience
Experience with analytic and visualization tools such as Mode Analytics, Looker etc.
Experience with: data collection, filtering, and cleaning techniques, statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, hypothesis testing), and SQL and relational databases like Postgres
Development experience, preferably in Python
Ability to organize and present complex data to technical and non-technical audiences
Team player with high integrity
Nice to have:
Experience working at an early stage startup
Open to feedback with an ongoing desire to improve
Understanding of financial concepts such as risk, volatility, IRR
A high degree of self awareness
Exposure to: A/B testing, statistical models and their interpretability, mortgage and home price models.
Working knowledge of backend software development, including RESTful APIs and databases
A collaborative mindset, and eagerness to partner with engineering, product, and business development teams
Benefits include:
Competitive salary, 401k, and equity in a company that is growing rapidly
Comprehensive health, vision, and dental insurance, FSA
Paid time off
Ongoing training and development",3.6,"Noah
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
386,Research Data Analyst,"$36k-$65k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Utilize advanced scientific knowledge and experience toward specialized scientific research interests of Clinical Research projects in the Division of Transplantation at Johns Hopkins School of Medicine.

Specific Duties/Responsibilities:

Use advanced knowledge base to formulate and perform research data analytical methods.
Assist in writing grant proposals for research, utilizing the application of specialized knowledge with discretion and judgment.
Coordinate own objectives and those of project team members at JHU.
Provides data verification based on specialized skill and knowledge.
Co-author/ author publications. Contribute original thoughts, hypotheses, and analysis to write reports, abstracts and manuscripts.
Presents original research at weekly lab meetings as requested by PI.
Mentor students and junior staff members in theory and methods of data analysis.
Speak at or attend conference representing issues and Hopkins research.
Performs miscellaneous job-related duties as assigned.

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree in related field required.
Three (3) years related experience required.
Additional education (Master's level) may substitute for required experience, to the extent permitted by the JHU equivalency formula.

JHU Equivalency Formula: 18 graduate degree credits (semester hours) may substitute for required experience. For jobs where equivalency is permitted, up to two years of non-related college course work may be applied towards the total minimum education/experience required for the respective job.

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's degree in public health or closely related field.

Special Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:

Ability to read and comprehend research protocol and advanced data and analytical methods.
Solid communication and interpersonal skills.
Solid planning and organizational skills, ability to prioritize work independently.
Sound working knowledge of databases and statistical software for data analysis.

Classified title: Research Data Analyst

Working title: Research Data Analyst

Role/Level/Range: ACRP 37.5/E/04/MC

Starting Salary Range: $45,195.12- $62,225.04 (commensurate with experience)

Employee group: Full time

Employee Status: Exempt

Schedule: Monday-Friday - 8:30am-4:30pm 37.5hrs/Wk

Location: ERGOT - 2000 E. Monument St., Baltimore, MD

Department name: 10003182-SOM Sur Transplant Surgery

Personnel area (School): SOM - School of Medicine

The successful candidate(s) for this position will be subject to a pre-employment background check.

If you are interested in applying for employment with The Johns Hopkins University and require special assistance or accommodation during any part of the pre-employment process, please contact the HR Business Services Office at jhurecruitment@jhu.edu . For TTY users, call via Maryland Relay or dial 711.

The following additional provisions may apply depending on which campus you will work. Your recruiter will advise accordingly.

During the Influenza (""the flu"") season, as a condition of employment, The Johns Hopkins Institutions require all employees who provide ongoing services to patients or work in patient care or clinical care areas to have an annual influenza vaccination or possess an approved medical or religious exception. Failure to meet this requirement may result in termination of employment.

The pre-employment physical for positions in clinical areas, laboratories, working with research subjects, or involving community contact requires documentation of immune status against Rubella (German measles), Rubeola (Measles), Mumps, Varicella (chickenpox), Hepatitis B and documentation of having received the Tdap (Tetanus, diphtheria, pertussis) vaccination. This may include documentation of having two (2) MMR vaccines; two (2) Varicella vaccines; or antibody status to these diseases from laboratory testing. Blood tests for immunities to these diseases are ordinarily included in the pre-employment physical exam except for those employees who provide results of blood tests or immunization documentation from their own health care providers. Any vaccinations required for these diseases will be given at no cost in our Occupational Health office.

Equal Opportunity Employer
Note: Job Postings are updated daily and remain online until filled.

EEO is the Law
Learn more:
https://www.eeoc.gov/sites/default/files/migrated_files/employers/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdf",4.2,"Johns Hopkins University
4.2","Baltimore, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1876,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
387,Data Analyst,"$33k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Law360, a LexisNexis company, is an online newswire for business lawyers that covers major litigation, transactions, and regulatory issues. Founded in 2004 and acquired by LexisNexis in 2012, Law360 is a cutting-edge organization and one of the fastest-growing subscription news services in the U.S. Our subscribers include the largest law firms in the U.S. and around the world, in-house counsel at major corporations, and key decision-makers in the government sector.

Law360, a LexisNexis company, is seeking qualified candidates for the position of Data Analyst to join our newsroom.

The Data Analyst will be part of a growing team in our Law360 newsroom, helping to implement surveys and rankings of law firms that support our efforts to report on the legal industry. The Data Analyst will support the accurate, timely, relevant and efficient delivery of that research, and would work collaboratively with editors, reporters and graphic designers to analyze the results of the team’s surveys. The analyst will also work on data management, cleaning and verification. The analyst will employ statistical methods to help improve analyses and data usage. Training will be provided.

Primary Duties/Responsibilities:
Help conduct surveys and interviews.
Help develop the methodologies used in annual reports and rankings from survey data.
Collaborate with editors on research projects, based on surveys and publicly available data.
Help create data visualizations based on surveys and publicly available data.
Participate in drafting and presenting key research findings to reporters and editors.
Combine, clean and verify data from multiple sources.
Help manage our data set. Work with a wide range of stakeholders in Editorial and IT with regard to data management.
Basic Requirements:
1+ years of related experience, including in data management, cleaning, and analysis. Relevant coursework may count toward this experience.
Preferred Requirements:
Previous expertise using quantitative analytical tools.
Advanced Excel skills (e.g., Pivot Tables).
Familiarity with R programming, Tableau and/or Python a plus.
Previous working experience with data visualization techniques. Tableau experience preferred.
Previous experience working with data of varying quality and from varying sources.
Ability to communicate complex ideas to a wide range of audiences.
Legal industry research experience preferred but not required.
A good teammate, collaborator and relationship builder who can also work independently.
RSRLNLP

Law360 offices are located in NYC, Washington DC, and Los Angeles. We offer a casual and flexible work environment, comprehensive benefits (including; medical, dental, generous paid time off, 401(k), tuition reimbursement, and a pre-tax commuter program), and competitive salary.

Portfolio Media Inc.is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. If a qualified individual with a disability or disabled veteran needs a reasonable accommodation to use or access our online system, that individual should please contact 1.877.734.1938 or accommodations@relx.com.

Please read our Candidate Privacy Policy",3.8,"LexisNexis Legal & Professional
3.8","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1818,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
388,Data Analyst,-1,"Over the coming years, biotech will fundamentally rewrite the way we live. Gene editing and cell therapy are dramatically changing how we treat cancer and other major illnesses. Biofuels and biomaterials are transforming the cars we drive, the clothes we wear, and the makeup of everyday objects. Crop science and synthetic biology are producing sustainable and ethical food. Benchling’s mission is to accelerate the research that propels us towards this reality, and magnify its impact, through modern software. Every day, scientists around the world use Benchling’s applications, platform, & analytics in their efforts to solve humanity's most pressing problems. For these scientists, Benchling is the central technology they use to conduct their research. Our customers include pharmaceutical giants, leading biotechs, and the world's most renowned research institutes. Benchling is building an Internal Data and Analytics team, which will be focused on establishing the necessary data infrastructure and systems to enable all of our business units to answer key questions and make strategic decisions. If you have a passion for investigating what makes a growing business tick, and if you imagine yourself exploring data from systems across an entire company to dig up answers to these questions, we want to meet you. You will establish key metrics for many stakeholders within the company, including Product, Marketing, Sales, and Customer Success, and identify opportunities for data to guide critical strategic product and business decisions. In addition, you will be one of the first people at Benchling building the next generation of our data infrastructure, which will be used not only by the data practitioners on our team, but by the rest of the company as well. As one of Benchling’s first data analysts, you’ll be joining a rapidly growing, world-class engineering and product team and form the foundation of our data organization. You will help to build the next generation of our data infrastructure and enable the company to answer key questions and make better decisions. Benchling is growing really quickly, and you’ll be setting the bar for high quality data and a metrics-driven culture as we scale. RESPONSIBILITIES Work closely with cross-functional teams across all of Benchling to develop a strategy around our data platform and to establish best practices for a metrics-driven culture. Build dashboards / reports and empower the business to answer key questions across Sales, Marketing, Customer Success, Recruiting, Product, and Engineering. Prioritize between multiple planned analytics projects and ad-hoc data requests for our internal stakeholders Define and design data pipelines and data integrations to collect, clean, and store large scale, cross-functional datasets. YOU BS or MS degree in Computer Science or a related quantitative field 3+ years experience, not counting academic experience, on data science or data analytics teams, especially on data teams focused on internal operations Experience with querying and exploring data stored in MPPs (Redshift, Snowflake, Hive/Presto, or similar technologies) Demonstrable fluency with SQL (primarily PostgreSQL) Experience with a scripting language (Python, Ruby, or similar) Experience with data visualization tools such as Tableau, Looker, or similar tools Strong communicator with both words and data - you understand what it takes to go from raw data to something a human understand OUR VALUES Empower through information. We explain the “why” behind every decision, unless there are highly sensitive circumstances. We're honest about how we're doing, especially in difficult times. We believe that sharing information builds trust and enables better decision-making. Rely on tenacity. Hard work is one of the greatest factors to determine success and is fully under our control. We must make the most of every day by bringing the highest level of determination. Dreaming big is not enough. Raise the bar. Pushing ourselves and others to improve will be uncomfortable and at times result in failure. However, it's critical to our success. We're dedicated to creating a place where everyone feels challenged to improve. Build a lever. We choose to build tools and infrastructure that will help others make world-changing innovations. There's less glory in it, but in the words of Archimedes, ""Give me a lever long enough and a fulcrum on which to place it, and I shall move the world."" PERKS AND BENEFITS Work with a talented yet humble team Competitive compensation & equity package 401k Medical, dental, and vision insurance Monthly health & wellness stipend Weekly virtual social events, and annual company retreats *$1,000 work-from-home stipend In following best practices and safety protocols, all Benchling employees are expected to work remotely until we are further advised that it is safe for employees to resume work in their respective office locations. *To support remote work conditions, Benchling provides each employee a one-time stipend of $1,000 upon commencing employment, and additional discounted employee purchase plans for home-office equipment.",5.0,"Benchling
5.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
389,Data Analyst,"$36k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Duties and Responsibilities:
Design reports in web-based analysis tools, Crystal Reports, and label systems
Client data loads into SQL database
Monitor business systems through queries to alert and resolve issues
Provide initial technical support and analysis to business users
On-boarding and testing of EDI trading partners in ERP system
Maintaining industry standards documentation
Skills and Specifications:
Knowledge of Microsoft SQL and how to write SQL queries is required
Proficiency with Microsoft SQL Server Management Studio
ETL (extract, transform, load) skills
Crystal Reports or SSRS
Microsoft Office (Excel, Word)
General knowledge of ERP systems and business processes
Education and Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Information Systems, MIS, or Computer Science
Authorized to work for any company in the United States
Written and oral communication in English required
Must reside in the Toledo, Ohio area, no relocation available
Competitive Benefits Package:
Competitive compensation will be based on educational background
Health Insurance and company paid health care spending account
401(k)
Holiday, personal, and vacation paid time off",4.0,"Tech Group International
4.0","Toledo, OH",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
390,Data Analyst,"$60k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Datadog:

We're on a mission to build the best platform in the world for engineers to understand and scale their systems, applications, and teams. We operate at high scale—trillions of data points per day—providing always-on alerting, metrics visualization, logs, and application tracing for tens of thousands of companies. Our engineering culture values pragmatism, honesty, and simplicity to solve hard problems the right way.

The team:

We are building a first-class Internal Analytics team composed of Data Engineers and Data Analysts. We use cutting-edge data collection, transformation, and analysis tools in order to provide other teams with data that will help them better understand both our customers and our own operations so they can make strategic data-driven decisions.

The opportunity:

As a Data Analyst within the Internal Analytics team, you will help ensure all teams at Datadog have the data they need to drive their projects. You will have a chance to interact with all other departments including other Engineering teams, Product Managers, Designers, Marketing, and Customer Success.

You will:
Contribute to building the data model layer that is used by the whole company to query internal data and analytics
Build actionable data reports and visualizations that will help other teams make strategic decisions
Help product managers, designers, and engineers to understand our products usage and user behaviors, and facilitate data-driven decision making
Help marketing teams optimize their initiatives
Run deep data analyses and investigations
Work to discover how different technologies are being adopted over time by different segments of users
Present findings to team leads and executives
Train other employees to use data to answer questions without assistance
Requirements:
You are a clear, concise communicator that works well with others
You can explain complex datasets to non-technical people in understandable ways
You are able to clean a dataset and conduct a data analysis in Python or similar language
You are fluent with SQL and are able to write complex and performant queries with no assistance
You’ve mastered data analysis and visualization in Looker, Excel, Google Sheets, Tableau and/or similar tools
You have a natural curiosity and investigative mindset - driven to know “why”
You want to work in a fast, high-growth startup environment and thrive on both autonomy and collaboration
2+ years of professional experience
Bonus points:
You are familiar with Spark and/or Hadoop
You have some experience with data stores similar to AWS Redshift or S3
You are familiar with data storage optimization (keys, schemas, …)",4.1,"Datadog
4.1","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
391,Simulation Modeling and Data Analyst,"$41k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This position is within the Advanced Analytics practice of LMI, a government consultancy, dedicated to the mission charter of agencies and organizations across government. Leverage your “science first” mentality, curiosity, technical expertise, and problem-solving skills to use computational experimentation with large-scale simulation models for determining optimal allocation and planning of resources within transportation networks. This includes enabling government to capitalize on the value proposition of advanced analytics, and the derivation of clear narratives that help our clients understand their data and how those insights address their research questions.
**In the interim this is a remote work position until the client’s remote work policy has ended. Normal position location is at the client site in Washington, D.C.**

Developing input data sets for large-scale inventory simulation analyses, from multiple data sources with diverse formats, and performing quality assurance on that data.
Leveraging design of experiments thinking to develop appropriate parameter sweep scenarios to best generate optimal and prescriptive decision-making insights.
Interpreting simulation output to clearly identify findings, caveats, assumptions, and implications.
Transforming simulation data and analysis outputs into clear data visualizations and/or reports to communicate findings.
Deriving analytic narratives from experiment insights for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to specific research questions.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment.
Possess the ability to work in teams and independently.

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree or higher in operations research, data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, physics, computer science, engineering, or other quantitative discipline.
2 – 5 years of overall experience.
Expertise in modeling and simulation theory and methods (e.g., discrete-event simulation) and considerations specific to stochastic modeling, for example, best practices related to random number generators, random seed, steady state, and replications.
Advanced Excel knowledge and an ability to work with access queries/SQL.
Experience with programming (e.g., Python, Java, R).
Experience with commercial simulation modeling platforms, with strongly preferred experience with JDA and TMOD for modeling transportation networks and route optimization.
Experience working with large and diverse data sets and database technologies.
Superior communication skills, both oral and written.
Preferred Qualifications:
Understanding of the ground transportation network
PMP certification
USPS experience",4.2,"LMI
4.2","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1961,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
392,Data Analyst,"$45k-$83k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Location: Glen Allen, VA

Job Number: VA399185

Job Type: Full Time

Position Overview: Daily oversight of Campaign Segmentation process, incl metrics & analysis, Continuous improvement agenda & business case for ideas. Develop & drive strategic goals for team to meet dept imperatives. Lead change management around segmentation capability roll-out, Maintain process document & review cycle. Manage horizontal processes of Stmt Optimization & Cross Sell services. Partner with IT, M&A, Ops & other div. Subject Matter expert in Segmentation process release, Qs/issues escalation, triage & resolution. Automate campaign process pulling data from data sources assisted Busn/Operation Analysts, Project Mgrs on diff fin models & spreadsheets & conduct root cause analysis & develop value added solutions. Design/refine reports used to ID data quality issues.

Required Skills: Master’s degree in Information Systems or equivalent. Employment will accept any combination of education, training & experience equivalent to MS in Info Systems as determined by Credential evaluation including a BS in any subject +5 years of progressive, post -BS experience. Experience in &/or Knowledge of Unix, SAS, Oracle 8.0, incl. VB ASP, Ftp plus Visual sciences, Windows NT, MVS, DB2, SQL, PL/SQL,, SQL*NET, Shell scripting, Unica, Toad, MS Access, Java SQL*Loader, ETL, VBA, SQL Server, Informatica & Teradata.",3.0,"CSXPERTS
3.0","Glen Allen, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
393,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst


Job ID: FA-0100-559

Open Since: 2019-12-17

City: Redmond
State: Washington
Country: United States of America

Job Description:


Frontend Arts brings together the brightest minds to create breakthrough technology solutions, helping our customers gain a competitive advantage. We are continuously evolving how we work and how we look at business challenges, so we can continue to deliver measurable, sustainable solutions to our clients.

We are looking for a self-motivated ""Data Analyst"" with excellent communication and customer service skills.

Job Skills:
To be part of the product development team to help in different phases of the program
Skill sets- SQL queries preferably JUMP, Python
To be able to understand a large amount of data, understand the dependencies, relationship in order to drive useful insights
Should know the statistical along with product engineering/hardware background
Should be able to work in ambiguous situations
Minimum Experience: 10 Yrs

Education:

Must have a Bachelor's degree, preferably in Computer Science or Engineering",4.5,"Frontend Arts
4.5","Redmond, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
394,Data Analyst - Equinox Fitness Clubs,"$41k-$73k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Description

OUR STORY

We are a company with integrated luxury and lifestyle offerings centered on Movement, Nutrition and Regeneration. In addition to Equinox, our other brands, Blink, Pure Yoga, SoulCycle, Furthermore, and Equinox Hotels are all recognized for inspiring and motivating members and employees to maximize life. Within our portfolio of brands, we have more than 200 locations within every major city across the United States in addition to London, Toronto, & Vancouver.

OUR CODE

We are passionate about high performance living and we practice what we preach – investing time in our own health and fitness. We believe that everyone has untapped potential within them and it takes a disruptive approach to unleash it. We dream big and don’t settle for the status quo. We sweat the details. We never accept less than 110% to help each other deliver the Equinox experience and enable our members to get great results. We are obsessed with what’s new, what’s now, what’s next. Never following, always leading, living ahead of the moment in fashion, culture and consumer behavior. We aren’t just a company; we’re a community vested in each other’s success. We value humility and a team approach at every level of the company.

If you are a high performing individual who is passionate about winning and inspiring others then we are excited to discuss career opportunities with you.

Job Description

The Role

Equinox is seeking a Data Analyst to join our Data Insights team. As an Analyst, you will be working with the business and broader Technology groups on various analytic initiatives. You will also have significant exposure to modern data processing and analytic tools.

Responsibilities
Provide data reporting functions to the business and technical community using SQL querying
Liaise with business and technology partners to build insightful analytical solutions
Troubleshoot data discrepancies; resolve and articulate them
Identify areas where operational efficiency can be improved through enhanced automation; implement those enhancements
Qualifications
You have a bachelor’s degree with a concentration in MIS / Computer Science / Engineering / Data Science
You have expertise in SQL Server/ Redshift; 10 out of 10 SQL Ninja analytic capabilities (with 2+ Years hands on experience in SQL)
You have 1+ years working as a Data Analyst with a strong ability to analyze data and perform root cause analysis
You have the ability to extract information from multiple databases using complex query statements and advanced database tools
You are able to organize, analyze, and disseminate medium to large amount of information with great attention to detail and accuracy
You have knowledge of analytic tools like Tableau and Business Objects
You have exposure to Data Warehouse principles and basic understanding of data modeling concepts and methodologies
You have experience working with structured and semi-structured data (xml, json)
You have experience working with ticketing and project management systems (Zendesk, Jira)
You possess strong documentation and communication skills
You are creative, flexible, eager to learn, and able to work productively in a multi-project, deadline-driven environment
Additional Information

AS A MEMBER OF THE EQUINOX TEAM YOU WILL RECEIVE:
We offer competitive salary, benefits and industry leading commission opportunities for club employees
Complimentary Club membership
30- 50% discounts on all Equinox products and services including Personal Training, Private Pilates, Spa and Café’ services and Shop items
This job description is intended to describe the general requirements for the position. It is not a complete statement of duties, responsibilities or requirements. Other duties not listed here may be assigned as necessary to ensure the proper operations of the department.

Equinox is an equal opportunity employer. For more information regarding our career opportunities, please visit one of our clubs or our website at https://careers.equinox.com/

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines. Must have a legal right to work in the United States.",3.4,"Equinox Fitness
3.4","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1991,Company - Private,Sports & Recreation,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
395,Data Analyst,"$60k-$105k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Grant Thornton is seeking an Associate to join its Data Management and Analytics (ADTA) service line and take an active role in engagement execution, project management and key business development activities.

Grant Thornton Public Sector helps executives and managers at all levels of government maximize their performance and efficiency in the face of ever tightening budgets and increased demand for services. We give clients creative, cost-effective solutions that enhance their acquisition, financial, human capital, information technology, data analytics, and performance management. For more information, visit grantthornton.com/publicsector.

At Grant Thornton, our professional staff applies traditional, cutting-edge approaches and methods to a variety of analyses. As part of our team, the Associate will utilize various methodologies and models to execute client projects.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES:
Meet or exceed targeted billing hours (utilization).
Assist with business development activities, such as proposals, capture, account teams, whitepapers, conferences, and/or other thought leadership materials.
Develop Information portals (e.g., dashboards) that support business user and executive information needs (e.g., CIO Balanced Scorecard)
Maintain a Performance Metrics Catalogue
Use associated tools and methods (e.g., investment optimization) used in a machine learning/data science setting; and
Support and use Government-provisioned tools associated with business intelligence and analytics (BI&A) (such as Power BI), advanced analytic and data wrangling tools such as SAS, R, and Python
Support and use emerging tools associated with data science/mining and machine learning in a Cloud environment (such as Azure Machine Learning)
Develop a data management and analytics capability and deliver analytic results that, at a minimum, provides data delivery or data analyses associated with the following methods/frameworks: (1) Performance Management Frameworks, Measurement, and Analysis, to include Value Management and Balanced Scorecard Development, (2) Performance Metrics Development, (3) Workforce Analysis and Management, (4) Program Impact Evaluation and Diagnosis, (7) OIT Investment Analytics and Prioritization, (8) Operations Research Analysis, including Soft Methods as well as Quantitative Methods (e.g., Linear Programming, Multi-Criteria Decision Analysis),
Utilize best practices in solution development, which may include concepts such as Scrum, XP, Kanban, and related approaches and shall optimize delivery of products through use and evaluation of the methods.
Guide the partitioning of the analytic solution into smaller tasks that can be solved using an Agile approach to solution delivery
Use the CRISP-DM framework to address core elements of data selection and data cleansing processes
Apply analytic method(s) to the prepared data and calibrate and test as appropriate to evaluate goodness of fit, multicollinearity, normality, heteroscedasticity, and related statistical features.
Use data mining and learning analytic methods, such as regression, clustering, and classification.
Use appropriate simulation and optimization modeling techniques, to include geospatial simulation.
Document and summarize a Data Analytics Deployment Strategy/Plan
Address governance activities, learning and adoption, and the BI Activity Monitoring Processes (e.g., Usage Metrics, Customer/User Satisfaction).
Support monitoring and maintenance of the product and identify means to extend the results from the current to other possible domains

Develop Information portals (e.g., dashboards) that support business user and executive information needs (e.g., CIO Balanced Scorecard)
Maintain a Performance Metrics Catalogue
Use associated tools and methods (e.g., investment optimization) used in a machine learning/data science setting; and
Support and use Government-provisioned tools associated with business intelligence and analytics (BI&A) (such as Power BI), advanced analytic and data wrangling tools such as SAS, R, and Python
Support and use emerging tools associated with data science/mining and machine learning in a Cloud environment (such as Azure Machine Learning)
Develop a data management and analytics capability and deliver analytic results that, at a minimum, provides data delivery or data analyses associated with the following methods/frameworks: (1) Performance Management Frameworks, Measurement, and Analysis, to include Value Management and Balanced Scorecard Development, (2) Performance Metrics Development, (3) Workforce Analysis and Management, (4) Program Impact Evaluation and Diagnosis, (7) OIT Investment Analytics and Prioritization, (8) Operations Research Analysis, including Soft Methods as well as Quantitative Methods (e.g., Linear Programming, Multi-Criteria Decision Analysis),
Utilize best practices in solution development, which may include concepts such as Scrum, XP, Kanban, and related approaches and shall optimize delivery of products through use and evaluation of the methods.
Guide the partitioning of the analytic solution into smaller tasks that can be solved using an Agile approach to solution delivery
Use the CRISP-DM framework to address core elements of data selection and data cleansing processes
Apply analytic method(s) to the prepared data and calibrate and test as appropriate to evaluate goodness of fit, multicollinearity, normality, heteroscedasticity, and related statistical features.
Use data mining and learning analytic methods, such as regression, clustering, and classification.
Use appropriate simulation and optimization modeling techniques, to include geospatial simulation.
Document and summarize a Data Analytics Deployment Strategy/Plan
Address governance activities, learning and adoption, and the BI Activity Monitoring Processes (e.g., Usage Metrics, Customer/User Satisfaction).
Support monitoring and maintenance of the product and identify means to extend the results from the current to other possible domains

Bachelor’s Degree required from an accredited college or university in a related field.
Ability to obtain and maintain certain job-related certifications if no job-related advanced degrees.
U.S. citizenship may be required. Ability to work in the United States indefinitely required.
Travel may be required.
Ability to work overtime required on occasion.
Ability to sit in an office environment for long periods of time.
Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance.
Ability to communicate clearly in writing and verbally.
Ability to obtain and maintain firm independence and abide by firm ethics requirements.
Meet or exceed continuing professional education (CPE) requirements.

Grant Thornton Public Sector LLC (“Grant Thornton Public Sector”), based in Arlington, VA, is a global management consulting business with the mission of providing responsive and innovative financial, performance management and systems solutions to governments and international organizations. Visit Grant Thornton’s Public Sector at www.grantthornton.com/publicsector.

It is Grant Thornton’s policy to promote equal employment opportunities. All personnel decisions, including, but not limited to, recruiting, hiring, training, promotion, compensation, benefits and termination, are made without regard to race, creed, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, citizenship status, veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.",3.7,"Grant Thornton
3.7","Arlington, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1924,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
396,Data Analyst,-1,"Do you have a Bachelor's Degree in GIS or related field? Are you looking for a new career opportunity in the Detroit area? Luttrell Staffing Group is currently recruiting for Data Analyst.

Job duties and details for Data Analyst:

Responsible for the monitoring and analysis of new construction, including but not limited to LiDAR and aerial photography from all types of sensors (could include aerial, terrestrial and/or static platforms).
Responsible for evaluating Commercial Data Feed, Classifying Construction Projects, Identifying New Projects, Identify Closed/Updated Projects and the scheduling of Pre-Drive Validations.
Support other aspects of advanced Change Management, Production and Acquisition Operations.
Ensure the Change Management Tasks are completed free of gross errors or anomalies.
Temp-to-Hire position.
Pay rate, $20-$24/hr.
Bi-Weekly pay, direct deposit available.

Job requirements for Data Analyst:

Bachelor’s Degree in GIS or related field.
Knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite.
Knowledge in CAD software where layers are often used.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and ability to work in a team.
Attention to detail and focus on quality.
Ability to organize work and manage multiple priorities.
Capable of working under pressure to meet deadlines in a fast paced, dynamic environment.

Please apply by clicking the link below, then call our office (805) 928-6555. Please send resume to santamaria@Lstaff.com.
For more information on this or other opportunities, text Luttrell to 25000*
""We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy, age, national origin, disability status, genetic information, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.""",4.2,"Luttrell Staffing Group
4.2","Detroit, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
397,Jr. Business Data Analyst (position added 9/10/2020),"$37k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Fall 2020 Update from WebFX: We're still actively hiring and conducting interviews via video conferencing

Hi there! We're WebFX, a full-service digital marketing agency based in the US. We've been named the Best Place To Work in Pennsylvania 5 times in a row and we'd love to meet you. We're looking for people to join our mission to provide world-class digital marketing solutions to mid-size businesses around the world. We get super excited about driving business growth for our clients and are looking for people who take pride in their marketing work and enjoy having a little fun at the same time.

We have a multi-step interview process, where we focus on giving both our candidates, and ourselves, opportunities to get to know each other a bit better. While our process may be more thorough and perhaps longer than other interview processes that you've been a part of, our goal is to work together with our candidates to find a mutually beneficial fit, where a candidate is a great addition to the FXFamily, and WebFX is the right fit for their career goals. Interested in joining the FXFamily? More info below!

What We're Looking For

Desired Education
Bachelor's Degree in Marketing, Advertising, Business, Business Information System, Management of Information Systems, or Statistics (GPA above a 3.4)

General Knowledge
Solid understanding of interpreting business analytics
Strong data analysis skills
Solid Understanding of the Internet

Experience
Should have customer service experience in any industry
Part time/summer job/internship experience is a must
Basic HTML or data manipulation software experience (a plus)
Experience with Google Analytics (a plus)

Qualities
Stays up to date on new changes to the web and actively reads several blogs
Professional, dependable, solid work ethic
Solid analytical skills and ability to make decisions based on data
Passion for research and deep-diving into business analytics
Excellent time/project management skills
Approaches problem solving proactively and in a professional manner
Creative problem solving abilities
Detail-Oriented
Self-motivated
Ability to meet deadlines

What You'll Do

Responsibilities
Gather and analyze campaign data
Consult with clients about their business goals and propose solutions and strategies that meet their needs
Analyze competitors’ websites and online marketing initiatives
Perform industry analysis and forecasting of trends
Interpret web analytics, demographic data, market research, and buyer behaviors
Optimizing client websites for search engines (on-page SEO)
Create and manage all aspects of SEO, PPC, and paid search ad campaigns for clients
Manage email marketing, website analysis and online advertising programs
Prepare monthly digital marketing campaign reports
Correct technical issues on the backend of website
Perform A/B, website usability, and website conversion rate testing
Responsible for driving client success on the web

Percentage Breakdown
5% analyzing clients’ competitors
10% writing ad copy, emails, etc.
10% working in the backend of websites/fixing technical issues
10% creating revenue, ROI and traffic reports for client campaigns
10% managing client projects and ad campaigns
15% performing industry, demographic and market research, and trend forecasting
20% client strategy and analytics
20% client interaction- phone calls, emails, in-person meetings
Note: The Jr. Business Data Analyst is a client-facing position

Training
Our “Bootcamp” web marketing training program will be provided for new WebFX “family members”.
On-site, state-of-the-art training amenities to facilitate departmental trainings, trend watch reports, and monthly Lunch-and-Learns

What You'll Get

Opportunities for Growth
WebFX grew 250%+ over the past 3 years, and merit-based promotional opportunities are abundant for new family members who meet or exceed position performance metrics.

Potential Promotional Path for Jr. Business Data Analyst:
Digital Marketing Research Consultant
Director of Digital Marketing
Sr. Digital Marketing Research Consultant

Compensation
$36,500 to $39,500 (potentially higher based on work experience)
Potential additional bonus may be offered for GPA's of 3.8+
Potential additional bonus may be offered for attending an elite college or university & graduate with high honors

Candidates interested in the Jr. Business Data Analyst position may also have interest in:
Digital marketing, online marketing, paid advertising, search marketing, inbound marketing, web marketing, content marketing, PPC, SEO, SEM, blogging, writing, editing, research, communications, entry level positions, etc.
WebFX Perks & Benefits
Flexible Schedule
Pet Friendly Office
Profit Sharing
Little Amps Coffee & Tea Bar
Yoga
On-site Fitness Center
150% Company Match Of Personal Charity Donations
Supplemental Insurance
IRA With Company Matching
Generous Paid Time Off
Employee Wellness Program
FXLearns Library
Activity Groups
Humanitarian Trips
Health/Vision/Dental Coverage
New Parent Support
Casual Dress Code
Home Buyer Program
Personal Desk Fund
Green Commute Benefits
Pawternity Leave",4.7,"webfx.com
4.7","Harrisburg, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
398,Data Analyst,-1,"Must speak Mandarin!

Premier Logic is currently seeking a Data Analyst for an exciting role with a top Accounting Advisory company- this position can be done remotely!

Opportunity to work for a great company utilizing business transformation, data analytics & automation.We are looking for someone that has a background in investigations, disputes (litigation, regulatory actions, etc.), or other legal-related consulting. You will be performing on-site data modeling, data migration, writing technical documentation and workflow optimization. Experience in forensics and fraud is a plus.

Must have a strong knowledge and experience in SQL analysis, especially using Microsoft SQL Server.

We prefer candidates who speak Mandarin but would also strongly consider candidates who don't speak Mandarin.

If you are interested in this exciting opportunity- please send me your resume to sarah.groff@premierlogic.com

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.4,"Premier Logic
3.4",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Unknown,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
399,Data Analyst,-1,"About Us: At Emendata, we help bridge the gap between data and the real world. We partner with organizations that have a social mission and help them tackle their problems using analytics. Our role in these partnerships goes end to endwe handle everything from wrangling the data to analyzing the problem to turning the results into something actionable. Importantly, we understand that this analytics pipeline does not live in a vacuum. Getting to meaningful numbers requires more than just the right methods; it calls for understanding the people, policies, data, and systems involved. With this approach, our small but fast-growing team is having a big impact, taking on challenges like using analytics to combat fraud, waste, and abuse in Medicare.

About the Role: Fundamentally, this role is for someone who likes solving problems with data. To take these analytic projects from end to end, we need your help in:
Context: Understanding the client's problem and identifying the right research questions
Data: Corralling the data needed for analysis by cleaning, linking, and structuring large datasets
Analysis: Deploying the right analytic tool for the job and interpreting the results
Delivery: Bringing the results together in a narrative and communicating it effectively
Beyond individual projects, you would also help shape how we as a company approach analytics. Right now, we are putting in place the institutions and practices that will define what analytics at Emendata look like, which spans everything from tools and methods to processes and roles.

Qualifications: We are growing rapidly and looking for people at all stages of their careers, from new grads to analytics experts. If you do not meet all the criteria below but still think you would be a good fit, please apply so we can see if we can find the right spot for you on the team. We value experience but also welcome aptitude and enthusiasm.
Education: Bachelor's or master's degree in a quantitative field or equivalent technical training
Programming: Intermediate experience with SAS, Python, Stata, R, or SQL
Analysis: Exceptional problem-solving skills with an understanding of statistical/social science research methods
Working Style: Intellectually curious (keep pulling on threads until finding an answer) and enterprising (eager to tackle the unknown and find a way to make things happen)
To be considered for this position, applicants must have the ability to work in the U.S. without a need for current or future visa sponsorship and must be able to pass a background check.

About the Interview Process: We want both sides to learn what it would be like to work together. Part way through the interview process, we incorporate a lightweight at-home exercise that serves as the basis for a technical interview. The exercise gives us an outlet to show you what kind of problems this role would tackle and offers you an opportunity to show us how you would approach the work.",-1,Emendata,"Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
400,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst
If you are an SSRS/ Power BI Developer with experience, please read on!
Top Reasons to Work with Us
Fortune 500 Company!
Contract to Hire Role
What You Will Be Doing
Provide detailed analysis, design, tuning, testing, implementation and documentation of the SSRS system and data warehouse.
Provide expertise in writing and editing queries that read, manipulate, and analyze data from SSRS, relational databases, and data warehouses.
Perform data analysis with appropriate programming and analytic methodologies; present data or reports in a meaningful fashion; work collaboratively with teams and leadership.
Responsible for SSRS quality testing, stakeholder approval and user acceptance testing.
Conduct periodic analysis of infrastructure and application performance and contribute to the annual IT strategic plan.
Write and edit automated jobs that import and export data between systems.
What You Need for this Position
SSRS developer experience
SSRS reports
Mid- to senior-level experience (5+ years)
Experience building tabular reports, scorecards, dashboards
SQL / stored procedure development
SQL scripts for ETL
Complex query development and tuning
SSRS admin experience
Work through configuration issues related to SSRS and Oracle database connectivity, SSRS and SharePoint connectivity
Platform optimization
Platform support
Understanding of MS SQL Server databases
Other reporting and data visualization tools
Power BI development
What's In It for You
Competitive Hourly Rate
Contract to Hire Opportunity!
So, if you are a SSRS/ Power BI Developer with experience, please apply today!
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.

CyberCoders will consider for Employment in the City of Los Angeles qualified Applicants with Criminal Histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring (Ban the Box) Ordinance.",4.2,"CyberCoders
4.2","Los Angeles, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
401,Data Analyst,-1,"Description:

***Note: This is a contingent opportunity***
SNA International seeks a bright, collaborative Data Analyst with a strong work ethic to join our team. SNA International’s team works together in pursuit of the same cause: build a safe and just world by empowering organizations in the use of forensics, biometrics, and identity intelligence.
Qualified candidates will utilize their statistical and analytical skills to conduct full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities, and design. Data analysts will develop analysis and reporting capabilities. They will also monitor performance documentation, and metrics to identify improvements.
The following list is representative of the types of activities and responsibilities anticipated to be performed, but are not limited to:
Responsibilities:
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques.
Develop and implement data analyses, data collection systems, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports.
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
Support additional activities, functions, or duties, as required.
Minimum Education and Experience Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics, or in another field with demonstrable coursework in these areas.
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst.
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (e.g. Business Objects), databases (e.g. SQL), programming (e.g. XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (e.g. Excel, SPSS, SAS)
Possess strong written and verbal communication skills
Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, Excel, and Adobe Acrobat
Attention to detail and strong organizational skills
The ability to prioritize job responsibilities in a fast-paced environment while maintaining a focus on excellent customer service is a must.
This position is located in Quantico, Va.
Candidates must be US citizens and able to pass a background check, drug screening, and a polygraph (if required).

Please submit your resume and a cover letter that outlines why you should be considered for this position and position level. Applications without a cover letter will not be considered.

No phone calls

SNA International is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",4.1,"SNA International
4.1","Quantico, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
402,Data Analyst,"$44k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Description

ARE YOU READY TO WORK AT ALTISOURCE?

Are you looking for an opportunity to flex your skills in data analysis?
Do you enjoy solving complex business problems using financial and sales data?
Are you interested in seeing how your work has a direct impact on the business and making recommendations for continuous improvement?

If so, Altisource would love to hear from you! Altisource is seeking a Data Analyst to mine, compile, manipulate and interpret large complex sets of data in order to make important business decisions.

Job Description

WHAT YOU GET TO DO

Use a variety of technologies (SQL Server, Oracle, Visual Studio, Microstrategy, Salesforce) and business data to help LendersOne and the Business Unit
Help maintain database to track and report on key member & corporate metrics to drive retention, improve efficiency, and enhance value to all stakeholders
Use data to run a variety of advanced analytic/risk models that can help drive decision-making for both tactical and strategic purposes including assessments of existing products, new products, member consultation, and process improvement
Participate in the design and implementation of lean reporting processes and initiatives within databases and CRM’s
Collaborate internally as well as build and manage relationships with clients or consultants while sharing insights based on analysis

Qualifications

WHAT ABOUT YOU? You have...

Knowledge in creating SQL queries is highly beneficial. Exposure to Tableau, major databases (Oracle & SQL Server), and CRM’s (Salesforce). Familiarity with SnowFlake and Posman preferred
Background in the mortgage industry strongly preferred, or experience in banking/financial services industries (investments, trusts, portolios, financial assets)
Strong reporting skills in MS Excel (pivot tables, macros, etc.) and MS Access
A highly analytical ability, yet skilled at distilling complex ideas and data into meaningful and actionable business insights
An ability to tell an insightful narrative with data with advanced reporting and/or presentation skills

Additional Information

THE PERKS OF WORKING AT ALTISOURCE

Prosperity:

Competitive base salaries!
401k plans with company matching – we want to empower you to further your career, and prepare for retirement!

Good Health:

Comprehensive Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance plans
Tax-free Flexible Spending Account
Life insurance, short-term, and long-term disability

...And Happiness!

Paid holidays, plus 19 days of accrued PTO for a total of 28 paid days off per year!
Free snacks, drinks and coffee!
Plenty of employee engagement activities including sporting events, happy hours, and other fun team-building activities
Opportunities to join our community service initiatives, including Habitat for Humanity",3.1,"Altisource
3.1","Cleveland, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
403,Regulatory Data Analyst - Monetary & Reserves Team,"$47k-$84k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Regulatory Data Analyst - Monetary & Reserves Team-265365
Federal Reserve Bank of New York
Primary Location NY-New York City
Full-time / Part-time Full-time
Employee Status Regular
Overtime Status Non-exempt
Job Type Experienced
Travel Yes, 5 % of the Time
Shift Day Job

Working at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York positions you at the center of the financial world with a unique perspective on national and international markets and economies. You will work in an environment with a diverse group of experienced professionals to foster and support the safety, soundness, and vitality of our economic and financial systems. It is a challenge that demands the skills of a financial service professional and the intelligence an academic—all combined with a passion for public service.

What we do:

The mission of the New York Fed’s Data and Statistics function is to increase utility and ability to leverage financial data through standardization, thoughtful collection design, and increase capacity of the Function to scale operations. Reporting to the Regulatory Data Manager, you will be a part of the Monetary and Reserves team within the larger Financial Analysis Services Team (FAST), responsible for performing data analysis, building out and managing analytical products and responding to ongoing stakeholder and firm inquiries related to interpretive reporting topics.

Monetary and Reserves provides services focusing on data quality assurance and analysis of financial data received from domestic and foreign depository and financial institutions.

Your role as Regulatory Data Analyst:

Conduct data analysis and visualizations, develop questions that resolve data quality anomalies, and research interpretive inquiries for complex data series, reporters, and data concepts

Establish and lead dialogue with financial institutions to enhance data quality and controls

Assess and respond to requests from Board staff on data collection operations and conduct studies on institutions’ reporting practices

Prepare procedure documents and assist peers on data collections and reporting concepts

Participate in Function and System work groups as assigned

What we are looking for:

Bachelor’s degree, preferably in Accounting, Business, Finance or Economics with 2-5 years of relevant work experience

Familiarity with financial and market conditions and financial statements (income statement and balance sheet)

Understanding of U.S. and global capital and money markets structure and products, e.g., Deposits, Securities, Private Equity, Fed Funds, Repo, Agency MBS

Experience identifying data and reporting discrepancies and analyze the impact of new and evolving financial instruments and market conditions concerning reporting requirements and regulations

Familiarity with financial organization structures, accounting practices, and Federal Reserve regulations, including Regulation D

Experience providing timely and accurate analysis, verbally and written

Ability to work across all levels of staff and management at Reserve Banks, regulatory agencies, and regulated institutions

Proficiency in Excel, Word, and Power Point

Familiarity with Tableau, R, SAS, Python, SQL or similar technology

Benefits:

Our organization offers benefits that are the best fit for you at every stage of your career:

Fully paid Pension plan and 401k with Generous Match
Comprehensive Insurance Plans (Medical, Dental and Vision including Flexible Spending Accounts and HSA)
Subsidized Public Transportation Program
Tuition Assistance Program
Onsite Fitness & Wellness Center
Flexible Work Arrangements
And more

Please note that the position requires access to confidential supervisory information and/or FOMC information, which is limited to ""Protected Individuals"" as defined in the U.S. federal immigration law. Protected Individuals include, but are not limited to, U.S. citizens, U.S. nationals, and U.S. permanent residents who either are not yet eligible to apply for naturalization or who have applied for naturalization within the requisite timeframe. Candidates who are permanent residents may be eligible for the information access required for this position if they sign a declaration of intent to become a U.S. citizen and pursue a path to citizenship and meet other eligibility requirements.

In addition, all candidates must undergo an enhanced background check, comply with all applicable information handling rules, and will be tested for all controlled substances prohibited by federal law, to include marijuana.

The Federal Reserve Bank of New York is committed to a diverse workforce and to providing equal employment opportunity to all persons without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, genetic information, disability, or military service.

This is not necessarily an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, performance standards or requirements, efforts, skills or working conditions associated with the job. While this is intended to be an accurate reflection of the current job, management reserves the right to revise the job or to require that other or different tasks be performed when circumstances change.",4.3,"Federal Reserve Bank of New York
4.3","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1913,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
404,Data Analyst Intern,-1,"Purpose of Job
USAAs 10-week, summer internship program offers college students the chance to discover what its like to work at a Fortune 100 company and leading financial services organization. Our interns deliver innovative solutions to real business challenges, and build enduring relationships with their manager and an assigned mentor. While gaining insight into the service of the military community and USAAs noble mission, interns are immediately part of USAAs collaborative culture. Spend your summer at USAA and gain a career where you can make a difference!

Our 2020 summer internship program will start on May 24, 2021 and last through July 30, 2021. To be eligible, you must be a college student during the time of the internship program.

Summary:
Provide decision support for business areas across the enterprise. Staff in this area will be responsible for applying mathematical and statistical techniques and/or innovative /quantitative analytical approaches to draw conclusions and make 'insight to action' recommendations to answer business objectives and drive change. The essence of work performed by the Decision Science Analyst involves gathering, manipulating and synthesizing data (e.g., attributes, transactions, behaviors, etc.), models and other relevant information to draw conclusions and make recommendations resulting in implementable strategies.
Job Requirements


Tasks:

Performs professional duties in support of operations for the functional area assigned.

Applies foundational functional knowledge to produce work deliverables in support of departmental initiatives.

Manages limited departmental projects and/or participates as a project resource on larger initiatives.

Identifies opportunities and facilitates basic improvements to processes and systems.

Performs routine tasks under direct supervision and within established procedures and guidelines.

May interact with clients for technical requests to understand requirements and limitations in different phases of project lifecycle to include research, testing and implementation.

Minimum Education:

Pursuing a bachelors degree or higher at a 4-year accredited university

Graduation date cannot be prior to the end of the internship

Minimum Work Experience:

0 to 2 years of related experience and accountability for simple to moderately complex tasks and/or projects required.

Foundational and conceptual knowledge of the function/discipline and demonstrated application of knowledge, skills and abilities towards work products required.

Foundational level of business acumen in the areas of the business operations, industry practices and emerging trends required.",3.6,"USAA
3.6","Phoenix, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
405,Data Analyst,"$45k-$77k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Responsibilities

The Department of Pathology and Laboratory Medicine is seeking to hire a Data Analyst to join their Technology Center for Genomics & Bioinformatics. The Data Analyst will serve as the primary bioinformatician for the Center and be responsible for next generation sequencing (Ion Torrent and HiSeq2000) and microarray data management. Duties include:

•NGS data analysis (RNAseq, WES, WGS, Chipseq, Methseq, single cell RNAseq)
•NGS data management (data delivery, data transfer, data storage)
•Customer support
•Other laboratory pre-analytical and post-analytical activities

Note:
Due to the pandemic, this position is 100% remote until further notice
Qualifications

•At least one year experience working with NGS data analysis
•Demonstrated understanding of the statistical principles behind current best practices in bioinformatics
•Broad experience with data generated by high-throughput molecular assays including microarrays and next-generation sequencing, preferred
•Experience in molecular biology combined with a very strong record of high-throughput data analysis, supported by publication in this area, preferred
•Experience in bioinformatics, biostatistics, computational biology or similar molecular biology, genetics, or biotechnology, preferred
•Strong experience in the use of a high-level programming language such as R, MATLAB, Python or Perl for complex data analysis
•Strong communication, data presentation and visualization skills. In particular, a demonstrated ability to effectively interact with scientific and thought leaders who specialize in areas other than bioinformatics, biostatistics, etc.
•Ability to work both independently, collaboratively, and interdependently to handle numerous concurrent, fast-paced projects
UCLA is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",4.0,"UCLA Health
4.0","Los Angeles, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1919,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
406,Data Analyst,"$55k-$100k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst

Govplace is seeking an experienced Data Analyst to join our team in Reston, VA to provide unparalleled support to our customer through the Continuous Diagnostic & Mitigation (CDM) Program. The CDM Program is a high-profile, high-visibility, cybersecurity modernization and risk management program where you can contribute innovative solutions and consult with government agencies to enhance their Information Assurance (IA) programs and continuous monitoring capabilities.

Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Lead data analytical evaluation of a large set of data across multiple COTS
Create visualizations and dashboards in Elasticsearch's Kibana web site based on requirements or

customer needs.

Use query languages (KQL/JSON) to find
Lead the technical engagements to assess client business and technical objectives, determine deliverables, evaluate risk and execute projects
Awareness of data reported in cyber security
Understands and improves how data is modeled against the program Logical Data
Ensures that enterprise architects are addressing all data requirements in their respective projects and solutions by reviewing data
Align standards, frameworks and security with overall business and technology
Conduct Design Workshops with multiple
Respond to data call looking for a certain scenario requested by the
Provide reporting and feedback to senior management as
Follow the data across various systems to suggest breakdowns in data
Analyze and Review business requirement shared by the
Create data mapping. Identify any gaps in data mapping and Business Requirements Document and review with business team and close the
Support production deployments by working with the operation team to validate the
Participate in daily agile sprint meetings, set up review meetings, prepare status updates on periodic
When applicable, prepare clear and concise application documentation for business users
Train and support users on the applications and visualizations
Meet professional obligations through efficient work habits such as, meeting deadlines, honoring schedules, coordinating resources and meetings in an effective and timely manner
Experience in both Descriptive Analytic and Diagnostic
Support other duties as

Required Education and Experience:
5+ years of enterprise data analytical experience and using technologies such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI and the like, SQL, and query syntax
Experience with JSON and Unix commands a
3+ years of experience working in and/or dynamic cross-competency teams using a structured project development methodology.
Minimum Education and Certifications – Undergraduate degree or equivalent combination of education and work experience
Experience supporting technical solutions in complex and heterogeneous
Experience remediating data issues, documenting Source to Target Mapping of Data Sources
Experience with conceptual Data Models Creation and Input
Experience with Data Quality Research, Testing, Reporting
Ability to analyze, summarize and characterize large or small data sets with varying degrees of fidelity or quality; ability to identify and explain any insights or patterns within them
Strong expertise in designing, developing, and implementing reports, visualizations and dashboards

Knowledge of database design techniques and advanced SQL and NoSSQL skills
Proven skills in Business Intelligence analysis
Strong detail-orientation and excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Desire to enhance development skills and research alternatives to accomplish tasks and drive innovation
Positive interpersonal and communication skills, including the ability to listen, ask probing questions, and ensure accurate understanding of internal client needs
Ability to function independently and within an agile team
Solid experience in exploratory data analysis and visualization
Experience collaborating with US Government Agencies, state or local governments, or commercial entities to develop IT service program maturity in accordance with Federal IT mandates and best practices. Experience with DHS Continuous Diagnostics and Mitigation (CDM) a plus
Strong experience in ensuring customer satisfaction, problem resolution, and risk management on several medium to large projects
Experience in conducting assessments at an Enterprise by reviewing technical documentations, conducting interviews and workshops to identify gaps and developing a tailored solution is highly desired
Applicants should be able to develop application domain knowledge and provide subject matter expertise as needed over time.

Preferred Qualifications:
Developed data models and the ability to present to senior leadership and the client
Created Visualization using, Kibana. Microsoft Power BI, Tableau
Experience in large data sets and evaluating trends and
Perform root cause analysis on data
Knowledge of data engineering and data science with machine learning a
Experience with Jira

Clearance Requirements:
Candidate is required to be a US citizen (non-dual citizenship) with the ability to obtain DHS Suitability/Entry on Duty (EOD).

Physical Requirements:
Office work, typically sedentary with some movement around the office",3.9,"Govplace
3.9","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
407,Data Analyst,"$44k-$53k
(Glassdoor Est.)","American Credit Acceptance is a fast growing automotive lender with $3,100,000,000 in assets. We are currently seeking a highly skilled, professional Data Analyst to provide critical data reporting & analytics capabilities. This role would analyze complex data structures to generate useful business insights and develop reporting to monitor business critical results. Supports leadership team with data consultation, data gathering, and data analysis.

Quantitative and qualitative analysis; Communicate with business customers to establish data requirements
Create tools or queries to obtain data from central data repository for the purposes of reporting and analysis
Present final analysis to customers
Participate on project teams

Minimum Qualificaitons
Bachelor’s degree
Experience with SQL or similar data querying language
Experience with programming language
Entry-level candidates will be considered
Preferred Qualifications
Degree from an analytical field
1+ Years experience with SQL
1+ Years experience in programming",2.9,"American Credit Acceptance
2.9","Spartanburg, SC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
408,Data Analyst,"$46k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Morning Consult is a global data intelligence company delivering insights on what people think in real time. By surveying tens of thousands across the globe every single day, Morning Consult is unmatched in scale and speed: It determines the true measure of what people think and how their decisions impact business, politics and the economy. Industry leaders rely on Morning Consult's proprietary technology and analysis for real-time, intelligent data to transform information into a competitive advantage.

The Role:

Morning Consult is re-defining how public opinion data is collected, visualized, and measured. We're looking to add talented, ambitious talent to support our client services and data science teams and continue pushing the boundaries of survey research.

This role requires getting your hands dirty with all aspects of the public opinion data collection and client delivery process, from managing survey vendors to using internal tools to parse data and produce deliverables. Given the wide ranging nature of this role, success requires a positive, team-focused attitude that delights in helping colleagues succeed and a relentless attention to detail no matter the task.

Candidates must be comfortable in a fast-paced, ambiguous start-up environment and demonstrate an eagerness to learn; entrepreneurial builders who proactively seek out ways to help their teammates and improve processes will thrive. As a newly created position, those in this role will have the opportunity to help shape the scope, responsibilities, and direction of the team.

Key Responsibilities:
Manage the process of transferring written questionnaires into web-based live surveys
Place online hosted surveys into the sample collection ecosystem, and monitoring survey sample collection progress using online platforms
Generate sample proportion targets using the Census and other verifiable sources
Use internal tools to take collected sample data, and process it into different client facing products such as Powerpoints, Excel tables, and PDFs
Team player that is willing to have fun and work hard in a fast-paced startup environment
Continuous self-improvement; willing to accept feedback
Desired Skills

Note: we view this section as a guide, not a checklist. We encourage you to apply even if you don't satisfy every single bullet on this list. Competitive candidates will have solid fundamentals and demonstrated experience in a few key areas. We regularly budget time and resources for learning new techniques when a project requires specific domain expertise -- which is one of the things we love most about our team.
A bachelor's degree in a quantitative field (e.g., economics, statistics, computer science, math)
Intro to intermediate experience with R statistical software (i.e., data visualization and processing)
Prior education or training with regards to survey research
Thrives in fast, high pressure, entrepreneurial environment
About Morning Consult:


Named one of the fastest growing technology companies in North America by Deloitte, Morning Consult is revolutionizing ways to collect, organize, and share survey research data to transform how global leaders in business and government make decisions.

With offices in New York, San Francisco, Chicago, and Washington D.C., Morning Consult provides research, news, and brand-tracking technology for over 200 of the world's biggest companies and industry associations. Additionally, Morning Consult conducts regular surveys for major media organizations including POLITICO, The Hollywood Reporter, Bloomberg, and The New York Times.


We are committed to a work environment that is inclusive to all and free of discrimination. It is our policy to be an equal opportunity employer without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, ability, citizenship status or any other factors prohibited by law. Morning Consult will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals. If you have any questions, please contact hr@morningconsult.com.",4.4,"Morning Consult
4.4","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
409,Data Analyst,"$29k-$38k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Smith is an entrepreneurial company with global reach, a casual environment, and limitless paths for success. For over 35 years, we’ve offered a place for driven, creative people to set and achieve ambitious goals in sales, procurement, and our supporting departments.

Opportunities await around the world. If you’re curious to see how you can help Smith grow while pursuing the next step in your own growth and development, apply today.

This Data Analyst will be responsible for data mining and building mining data tables, along with researching external methods, processes and software to provide business solutions tailored to new trends, demands and concepts. This person will need to have experience with the ETL process and strong experience with working with data coming from various sources, channels and in different formats. The candidate will also need to have the ability to structure the data for a software architect, correspond directly with clients, project or department managers, and/or business leaders to identify analytical requirements. This person will also be working with Project Managers, Architects, DBA, and Data Scientists. He or she must be comfortable utilizing both quantitative data, and qualitative knowledge. Other typical functions include but are not limited to:
Perform routine trend analyses and evaluations.
Analyze audit findings, identify trends and assist in the development of programs.
Brainstorm and form effective solutions to business problems.
Develop, maintain and assist in the implementation of programs and business solutions.
Monitor correction action follow-up from audits in business units.
Provide status reports to management, identify problem areas and verify compliance.
Clean, update and aggregate the data into more operable formatting.
Required Skills:
Bachelors Degree in MIS and/or CS.
Experience with tools such as SQL, Oracle & MongoDB.
Any ETL too experience (ex: Informatica, Oracle Data Integrator or Warehouse Builder)
Ability to work with relational and non-relational databases.
Ability to handle multiple tasks simultaneously and switch between tasks quickly.
Ability to facilitate discussion, drive consensus and build partnerships.
Detail oriented and able to work in group projects and take direction.
Excellent verbal and written communication skill is a must.
Experience as a Business Analysis is preferable.
If you like wild growth and working with happy, enthusiastic over-achievers, you'll enjoy your career with us!",4.1,"Morning Consult
4.4","Houston, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
410,"Analyst - New Grads (Data Analysis, SQL Client Consulting) Anticipated Hiring July","$54k-$95k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview and Summary


Position Overview: This Analyst role is a very team oriented position which encorporates the use of Technical, Analytic and Client facing communications skills. A person in this role supports the delivery of client services using their technical skills (mostly SQL, Advanced Excel and Using Urban Science Poprietary Software Solutions) to execute quality data-related projects and assignments with a high degree of accuracy and in a timely manner. STEM focused degrees in Computer Science, Math and Statisics as well as other technical degrees are a good foundation for this kind of position. The technical aspect of the role is not developer level but uses a lot of basic SQL skills.

Urban Science is a business-solutions company focused on supporting the needs of the sales and marketing function of the automotive industry. We leverage a scientific methodology to help our client partners sell more vehicles, improve profitability and increase customer loyalty. And we do that by helping solve their toughest challenges including planning an optimal dealership network, improving individual dealer performance and efficiently converting sales leads into sales. In short, we guide business through science—and we’ve been doing this since 1977.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
With manager guidance, plans, organizes, develops and delivers client-requested reports, deliverables and projects on time, adhering to client requested specifications.
Designs, creates and manages client databases, utilizing Urban Science proprietary software, ensuring accurate and high quality data.
Accurately performs application coding and testing functions associated with the development of custom client software.
Tracks, processes, analyzes and verifies data in order to improve accuracy and quality.
Use technical skills to accurately monitor, update and maintain Urban Science internal software systems.
Adheres to quality control standards for Urban Science and client organizations.
Coordinates with individuals or teams to complete analyses, tasks and projects on time and with high quality.
Effectively responds to client inquiries/requests in a timely manner to help improve client satisfaction.
Proactively communicates with management to provide updates and report issues in a timely manner.
Actively works with manager to understand and implement solutions to improve NPS (client satisfaction).
Actively supports and participates in required Urban Science training programs to achieve targeted development objectives.
Works with manager in completing own annual goal setting and performance review in a timely manner.
Works with manager to prioritize other duties as assigned.
Qualifications - Education and Experience


Qualifications:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, ability and/or competency needed for successful performance in the role. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Verbal Communication: Requires the ability to compose and verbally deliver information of varying levels, using appropriate grammar, tone, inflection and non-verbal cues, while also listening to and correctly deciphering verbal communication delivered by others
Written Communication: Requires the ability and capacity to communicate ideas, facts and data in writing using appropriate grammar, syntax and sentence structure
Analytical Thinking: Requires the ability to understand a situation by breaking it apart into smaller pieces, and/or tracing the implications of a situation in a step-by-step causal way
Results Oriented: Requires the ability to strive for optimal results by taking responsibility for timeliness, commitment to task and adherence to performance standards
Ethics & Integrity: Requires the ability to behave in a trustworthy & transparent manner
Teamwork & Cooperation: Requires the ability to work cooperatively with others and be part of a team
Self-Control: Requires the ability to keep emotions under control and to restrain from negative actions or behaviors
Math & Statistics: Requires knowledge of basic descriptive statistics and ability to execute simple statistical analyses, create scatter plots, bar charts and histograms; requires ability to apply the right mathematical methods or formulas to solve a problem
MS Office: Requires demonstrated knowledge of MS Excel for charting and graphing of data, writing formulas, utilizing functions, and filtering, sorting and formatting of data; intermediate knowledge of MS Word, PowerPoint, and Access is preferred
Database: Working knowledge of relational database concepts, which require gathering and manipulating data manually is preferred; knowledge and experience with SQL is preferred


EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:
University degree required; technical degrees are strongly preferred (i.e., engineering, applied math, statistics, applied science, information systems, operations research, etc.) from an accredited college or university, or equivalent foreign institution. Non-technical degrees will be considered if candidate possesses appropriate level of analytical and technical knowledge required for the role
WORK ENVIRONMENT: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

This description is intended to describe the type and level of work being performed by a person assigned to this position. It is NOT an exhaustive list of all duties and responsibilities required by a person so classified. The job may require additional hours beyond the normal 40-hour workweek.",3.4,"Urban Science
3.4","Franklin, TN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
411,Data Quality Analyst Lead,"$80k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Purpose of Job We are currently seeking a talented Data Quality Analyst Lead for Phoenix, Tampa, San Antonio Home Office II/III or 100% Remote Work Environment.

Manages and analyzes information using a variety of techniques and tools in alignment with USAA's Enterprise Information Standards. This role may be responsible for one or more information management function noted below:
Metadata includes defining and documenting data ensuring the information is understood. This may include working with project teams or support teams to define, redefine, or continue maintenance of the metadata.
Data Quality includes defining data quality rules ensuring data is measured and trusted. This may include working with project teams to define data quality requirements as well as ensuring ongoing assessments of data quality.
Information Lifecycle Management includes archiving and purging of data to meet the needs of the business while reducing corporate risk.
Data Security and Privacy includes managing the security of data access as well as privacy of data sharing in compliance with external regulations and internal policies. This may include working with other departments to ensure compliance to GBLA, FCRA, PCI DSS, etc.
Master Data and Reference Data includes managing key corporate data to ensure the organization can manage its operations with accurate and consistent information.

Job Requirements

About USAA
USAA knows what it means to serve. We facilitate the financial security of millions of U.S. military members and their families. This singular mission requires a dedication to innovative thinking at every level.

In each of the past five years, we've been a top-40 Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work For®, and we've ranked among Victory Media's Top 10 Military Friendly® Employers 13 years straight. We embrace a robust veteran workforce and encourage veterans and veteran spouses to apply.

USAA Careers - Award Winning Workplace (17 seconds)
USAA Careers – World Class Benefits (31 seconds)

Leverages expert data management knowledge to support in one or many of the information management functions.

Tasks may include any of the items noted below:

General

Identify and implement process improvements Lead discussions with cross-functional teams on complex problems
Oversee alignment of best practices and tools based on business needs.

Metadata and Data Quality Support

Metadata repository maintenance, access requests, and proper metadata association Review, validate, and record metadata and data quality information.
Development of definitions, data quality rules, thresholds, and standard metrics of quality for data elements that support critical business processes.
Development of controls to mitigate data quality risks including data quality plan development, monitoring data quality results, reports and dashboards for high risk issues.
Define and oversee high risk data quality corrective action plans.
Oversee data quality compliance assessment process.

Information Lifecycle Management

Oversee archiving and purging activities of data.
Develop archiving and purging strategies and processes.
Oversee ILM compliance assessment process identifying items that may be a risk to the corporation.

Data Security and Privacy

Manage Data Access security as needed
Support Privacy initiatives through analysis of sensitive data
Ensure sensitive data is accessed and shared in accordance to policies and processes.

Master and Reference Data

Develop Master and Reference Data processes and procedures to align with Enterprise Policies and Standards
Create and maintain reference data in accordance to processes and procedures.
Ensure quality and maintenance of master data.

Requirements
Bachelor's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or 4 years work experience in data management, data quality or business application function or related experience can be substituted in lieu of a degree in addition to the minimum years of work experience required.
OR
A Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline
OR
A PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline

8 or more years of experience in one or more information management functions below and any relevant tools:
Metadata
Data Quality including metrics, dashboards, advance knowledge of frequency and duplicate analysis, cross dataset dependencies, orphan 'child data' rows, redundancy analysis, etc.
Information Lifecycle Management including archiving, purging, content and document management
Master and Reference Data
Data Security & Privacy
OR
Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline PLUS 6 or more years of experience in a data management/quality analytic function.
OR
Master's Degree and PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline PLUS 5 or more years experience in a data management/quality analytic function.
Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*
When you apply for this position, you will be required to answer some initial questions. This will take approximately 5 minutes. Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not able to change your responses.

Preferred
Advanced SQL or SAS programming skills
Experience mentoring/leading junior team members, prioritizing work items, and establishing/executing peer review processes
Strong technical acumen; previous experience working on or in support of a data and analytics team
Excellent attention to detail and ability to create synergies/draw connections across multiple platforms/disparate systems to drive consistency and reuse in metadata
Intermediate understanding of the data development life cycle and information management principles (ETL/ELT process, SDLC, metadata management, data quality, etc.)
Demonstrate familiarity with IT development environments, tools, and maintenance processes and how these pieces impact metadata and quality
Previous experience as a DPO/Scrum Master or experience working in an Agile environment
Prior experience with tools: JIRA, Rally, IBM InfoSphere Suite (Information Governance Catalog, Information Analyzer, DataStage)
Experience working for a large financial institution

The above description reflects the details considered necessary to describe the principal functions of the job and should not be construed as a detailed description of all the work requirements that may be performed in the job.

At USAA our employees enjoy one of the best benefits packages in the business, including a flexible business casual or casual dress environment, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, along with wellness and wealth building programs. Additionally, our career path planning and continuing education will assist you with your professional goals.

Relocation assistance is available for this position.

For Internal Candidates:
Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement) or must have manager’s approval prior to posting.

Last day for internal candidates to apply to the opening is 9/02/20 by 11:59 pm CST time .",3.6,"USAA
3.6","Gilbert, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
412,2021 Junior Data Analyst Intern,"$33k-$58k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At LabCorp, we provide real-world experience by working on assignments in a team atmosphere which furthers an education in STEM and Healthcare disciplines.

Our interns have the opportunity to showcase their work by demonstrating their achievements to their supervisors, their mentors, and our senior management team. Each intern will participate in group projects that illustrate their creativity and builds on their technical teamwork skills.

Your Summer at a Glance
May -- Take Off
Program Kick-Off and the Start of the Summer!
June -- Teamwork and Discovery
Work with your assigned team and fellow Interns on projects while also attending workshops, panels, and tours
July -- Networking and Public Speaking
Present to Senior Leadership, work with team members on innovative new projects, and expand your career network
August -- Takeaways
Provide insight for your future career, and create lasting career networks
Details
Routinely collaborate with clinical, product and engineering teams in solving for the objectives of the project
Develop a foundation of experience that will promote an ability to move into a data analyst or business analyst role
Gain experience in identifying and solving for patient care related challenges leveraging the clinical expertise and data within LabCorp
Exposure to overall SDLC processes leverage agile principle while working in JIRA and Confluence
Skills
Knowledge of Microsoft Office
Knowledge of reporting packages (Business Objects etc), databases (SQL, etc), programming (XML, Javascript, or ETL frameworks)
Excellent Interpersonal and Communication Skills
Pursuing a degree that includes courses in statistics, math and/or computer science
Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",3.2,"LabCorp
3.2","Durham, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
413,Data Analyst,"$44k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","\*Must be a US Citizen or Green Card holder to apply, at this time.\**
\*Must Have AWS Cloud Practitioner certification (or other advanced AWS certification) and Experience with python (NumPy, SciPy, pandas, etc) programming\**
Epitec*
POSITION: *
Data Analyst
LOCATION: *
Remote for now, but must be able to commute eventually to Champaign, IL or Peoria, IL
JOB SUMMARY FOR DATA ANALYST: *
The Cloud Analytics Engineering team within Advanced IoT Analytics is seeking a talented and motivated data scientist to advance the data collection, preparation, manipulation, analytics, and reporting for cloud applications. This role will also be instrumental in improving quality of telemetry data that is coming in to Client.
The main function of a specialty analyst/developer is to develop, create, and modify general computer applications software or specialized utility programs utilizing software packages considered.
A typical specialty analyst/developer is responsible for designing software or customizing software for client use with the aim of optimizing operational efficiency
RESPONSIBILITIES FOR DATA ANALYST: *
• Improving data quality for telemetry data (time series, aggregate data, etc)
• Improving data quality for scheduled oil samples and other machine data
• Manipulating, transforming, and pre-processing data to speed up and improve analytics and modeling projects
• Developing APIs to data for different types of applications and data formats
• Maintaining cloud data and resolving potential issues
Modify existing software to correct errors, allow it to adapt to new hardware, or to improve its performance.
Analyze user needs and software requirements to determine feasibility of design within time and cost constraints.
Coordinate software system installation and monitor equipment functioning to ensure specifications are met.
Design, develop and modify software systems, using scientific analysis and mathematical models to predict and measure outcome and consequences of design.
Analyze information to determine, recommend, and plan computer specifications and layouts, and peripheral equipment modifications.
Obtain and evaluate information on factors such as reporting formats required, costs, and security needs to determine hardware configuration.
REQUIRED EXPERIENCE FOR DATA ANALYST: *
Applicants must have completed a BS undergraduate, or MBA, MS or PhD degree in Applied Statistics, Business Analytics, Business Intelligence & Analytics, Engineering (various), Computer Science, Computer Science + X, Informatics, Information Systems Management, Marketing Analytics, Mathematics, MBA with Technical Undergrad, Predictive Analytics, Statistics, or equivalent.

Candidates with a relevant Master's degree with less experience will also be considered
SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS FOR DATA ANALYST: *
Verbal and written communication skills, problem solving skills, customer service and interpersonal skills.
Basic ability to work independently and manage one’s time. Basic knowledge of computer hardware and software.
Basic knowledge of design techniques and principles involved in production of drawings and models.
Basic knowledge of niche computer software, such as Oracle, Csharp.net, Lawson, etc.
• Experience analyzing time series data files in HDF, netCDF, Parquet, Avro, or other big data file formats
• Experience with AWS boto3, S3, EC2, SQS, Fargate, etc
• Experience in machine, engine, transmission, automotive, or aerospace equipment
• Experience with software development tools like GIT, SVN, AZDO, Clearcase, etc
• Experience working with CAN / ethernet data acquisition systems (ex. Vector CANape, Kvaser, INCA, etc)
• Demonstrated excellence in online computer coding challenges with Kaggle, TopCoder, Hacker Rank, etc
Soft Skills Required
• Good communication, interpersonal and collaboration skills
• Strong technical, analytical, and problem-solving skills
BENEFITS*
Medical, Dental, PTO, Holiday tailored to meet your needs. 401K/Match, $15,000 Life Insurance, Award-Winning Employee Care Program.
Why should you choose Epitec?*
We started Epitec with a single focus, “Placing People First.” Knowing every good endeavor begins with listening and understanding, we’ve set about challenging every part of the employment process. Bringing the proper connections together for the perfect fit.
How is Epitec different?*
Epitec gets to know our prospective employees, using these insights to locate the perfect placement for you. We are there, every step of the way. Providing a best-in-class compensation package combined with the opportunity to grow financially and personally through your work.
What is the result?*
Epitec represents the world’s top companies and works to fill their open jobs with the world’s best talent. That’s led to Epitec servicing an impressive list of Fortune 100 companies. We've also won many awards, including one of Crain’s Detroit Business “Cool Places to Work,” and 101 Best & Brightest – local, national and elite winner. And that’s just the beginning, as we work to innovate the way the world thinks about employment.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $30.00 - $33.00 per hour

Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
AWS: 1 year (Preferred)
Data Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
cloud development: 1 year (Preferred)
Statistical Analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Python: 2 years (Preferred)
Location:
Peoria, IL 61605 (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.4,"Epitec
3.4","Peoria, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
414,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"**Not able to use 3rd Party Agencies***
Senior Data Analyst
Our client is seeking Senior Data Analyst to join their team.

Key Responsibilities
Business and Technology primary point of contact for Applications Data Capture (as it relates to Application Lifecycle Management).
Work with the business & technology teams to explain data requirements for capturing Applications information.
Act as a cross-functional connection between engineering leadership and architecture.
Provide guidance and partner with engineering leadership and architecture teams by applying knowledge of data design.
Analyze existing and new data to ensure consistency, correctness and completeness.
Query datasets from various data sources and perform ad-hoc data analysis.
Investigative analysis on functional pain points (data capture process gaps).
Help establish and maintain processes to support massive data capture at scale and ensure data is kept up to date.
Work with developers to align dataset design with report design.
Partner with enterprise data management and strategy on governance and stewardship.
Participate in data definition and data management reviews.
Partner with QA in test planning activities, especially in data integration efforts.

Requirements for the position include:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Computer Science or equivalent; 3 years of additional relevant experience in lieu of a degree.
3 years of experience in Data Modeling and design.
3 years of experience in data analysis, business analysis or system analysis.
Strong knowledge of Relational and Dimensional data modeling concepts.
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment where change is a constant.
Ability to handle ambiguous requirements.
Strong data analysis and communication (verbal & written) skills.
Proficient in database design, implementation and maintenance.
Demonstrated ability to influence critical business outcomes in a matrix based, global environment.
Strong networking skills and ability to work across multiple organizations to accomplish diverse goals.
Excellent communication skills in both formal and informal settings.
Self-starter with high motivation and passion.
Self-organize, speak up when blocked or need help.

Benefits are available to eligible VanderHouwen contractors and include coverage for medical, dental, vision, life insurance, short and long term disability, and matching 401k.

About VanderHouwen
VanderHouwen is an award-winning, Women-Owned, WBENC certified professional staffing firm. Founded in 1987, VanderHouwen has been successfully placing experienced professionals throughout the Pacific Northwest and nationwide. Our recruitment teams are highly specialized in either Technology and IT, Engineering, or Accounting and Finance career markets. Our recruiters value building meaningful, professional relationships with each candidate as well as developing honed knowledge of companies' staffing needs and workplaces. Partner with us to land your next exciting career.

VanderHouwen is an Equal Opportunity Employer and participates in E-Verify. VanderHouwen does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local, state or federal civil rights laws.",4.2,"VanderHouwen
4.2","Hillsboro, OR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1987,Private Practice / Firm,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
415,Quality Data Management Analyst (Corporate Quality),"$34k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Quality Data Management Analyst for Corporate Quality will be responsible for conducting various data management responsibilities and help establish a new Data Management organization for the Quality department. This role will collaborate cross functionally with various areas of the organizations to develop a deep understanding of how our Quality Data is managed and governed across the Edwards Quality Management Systems globally. The successful individual must have a combination of analytical skills, data management understanding, and business acumen with an ability to think enterprise-wide. The Analyst would be comfortable with interacting with upper management and enforcing standards.

Key Responsibilities:
Data Management and Preparation: Identify, evaluate, cleanse, and organize disparate data sources. Identify data sources available and collect primary data where necessary. - Understand and assess the value of data sources based on our organizational need. Prepare and structure data within our systems.
Collaboration: Work across functions to understand the nuances of our data from across the organization and external sources. Seek to understand the data and analytical needs of our stakeholders. Work closely with the Quality Data Analytics, business process owners, and IT organizations to manage and maintain data within our systems.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree with 2 years of experience with data analytics; OR Master’s degree in Data/Business Analytics field.
Ability to capture and document Entity Relationship Diagrams for Enterprise Quality Systems across all Quality areas
Be able to develop data dictionaries for Enterprise Quality Systems across all Quality areas
Be able to contribute to data source identification, data mapping, functional design and detail design.
Be able to draft Data Management Plans for Enterprise Quality Systems across all Quality areas
Experience with data visualization/modeling related tools such as: Power BI, Tableau, QlikView.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in the medical device, pharma, biotech, or healthcare related industries
Using reporting tools and querying languages such as: SQL
Utilizing programming languages such as: Python, R
Experience with electronic Quality Management Systems (ETQ Reliance, Pilgrim)
Knowledge and experience with Quality Systems (e.g. CAPAs, NCRs, Complaints)
Good written and verbal communication skills
Results-oriented, positive “can-do” attitude with demonstration of appropriate urgency and initiative
Detail-oriented, producing high quality work
Strong ability to manage and work with different cultures and nationalities
Ability to manage competing and evolving priorities in a fast-paced environment
Ability to adapt to new technologies and rapidly changing environment
Participate in project communications, training materials, and business procedures/documentation
Edwards is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer including protected Veterans and individuals with disabilities.",3.7,"Edwards Lifesciences
3.7","Irvine, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1958,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
416,JPSC-8710 - Oracle Data Analysts,"$43k-$80k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview

Must have Healthcare experience

 Bachelor’s degree with 8+ years of work experience in data analysis and visualization.

 Experience in preparing and conducting extensive business analysis and studies, process

assessments, data analysis and cost benefit analysis in an effort to support data driven strategies.

 Minimum 4 years of experience working with healthcare data and helping businesses make better data driven decisions.

 Minimum 4 years of strong troubleshooting and problem-solving skills

 Experience with various data platforms.

 Proficiency in PL/SQL coding with ETL

 Willingness to participate in team on‐call rotation, and perform off hours work as needed.",4.5,"Avani Technology Solutions
4.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
417,Data Analyst,-1,"Amarillo, TX Location. Company is looking an experienced data analyst to join a growing a rapidly expanding organization. Looking for an engaged, enthusiastic, and excited folks to become an integral part of our team. As a data analyst, you’ll get to directly see the impact or your projects, be empowered to understand the everyday needs of users and make decisions that deliver real business value. At the same time, you’ll enjoy a friendly work environment and nimble small-business culture.

Someone experienced in SAS, or with experience using another stack (Python, R, etc.) to analyze large datasets. College degree or work equivalent; Data Mining / ETL experience; SQL; SAS Programming; Microsoft SQL Server; Experience with project management and delivery Distributed Version Control

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
SAS or similar: 3 years (Required)
Data Analysis: 3 years (Required)
Data Mining: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Amarillo, TX (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.recruitingassociates.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",4.3,"Recruiting Associates
4.3","Amarillo, TX",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
418,Data Analyst (Learning and Development),"$48k-$88k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Tailored Management is seeking a candidate to join the world's largest social media network who enables over a billion users to openly connect with friends and family, share content, and explore the world. You'll have the opportunity to work with great people, tackle big challenges, and make a real impact – while being your unique, authentic, self at work!

Title: *L&D Data Analyst II*
Location: Menlo Park, CA (Remote until further notice)
Pay*: $60-$70/hr.
Department*: Learning & Development
Duration: 6-month project with the opportunity for an extension!
Health Benefits + PTO

Job Duties*:
Deliver standard reports/dashboards on a regular cadence
Document reporting requirements with stakeholders, drive iterations and changes to core dashboards and solutions
Pull, organize, and analyze relevant data from multiple sources
Create visualizations and dashboards that display meaningful and actionable (KPI’s)
Triage requests for people data and ad hoc reports
Maintain code-base (SQL) used to drive self-service tools, and recommend opportunities for improvement
Build and automate easy to use, self-service reports and dashboards
Audit data integrity, investigate concerns, and establish processes to streamline and improve data quality
Support non-technical program managers to design, build, launch, scale and run learning products
Provide direction and coaching to end users on how to use and interpret metrics
Cross-functional partnering with People Insights, People Analytics, Research, Forecasting Analytics, and Engineering
Tools and programming languages such as Tableau, Hive, Excel, Workday, and Visier
Translate data and trends into stories to drive business decisions
Prioritize requests and effectively communicate appropriate delivery expectations
Must be comfortable with navigating ambiguity while working in a fast-paced, rapidly evolving environment and exercising agility to alternate between strategic projects and tactical reporting/analysis requests
Experience initiating and driving projects to completion with minimal guidance
Strong initiative, curiosity, and comfort with uncertainty
Excellent presentation and communication skills, including the ability to explain technical subject matter to a non-technical audience and influence others
Skills*:
6+ years of experience with SQL (or similar language aimed at querying)
6+ years of experience creating custom reports/dashboards and building visualizations in Tableau data.
6+ years of experience with visualization tools (SQL, R, Tableau, SASS, etc.)
BA/BS in a field that emphasizes data analysis and visualization (e.g., computer science, social sciences, physical sciences, math, engineering, or statistics), or equivalent work experience.
Must have advanced Microsoft Excel skills (conditional formulas and formatting, charting, pivot tables, Vlookup, etc.)
Experience with data management, specifically with validating and auditing data and reports from multiple systems
Experience manipulating large data sets through statistical software or other methods
IND2

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60.00 - $70.00 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
using visualization tools (SQL, R, Tableau, SASS, etc.: 6 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.6,"Tailored Management
4.6","Menlo Park, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1965,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
419,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description: Analyze and interpret financial risk data for Beshton, its customers, and its partner companies using expertise in economics and statistics; Develop software and mathematical tools to evaluate loan applications and risk management, design statistical methods and algorithms for use in tools; Identify trends in financial data and risk factors for businesses, process large amounts of collected data and make use of increased data points to increase forecasting accuracy; Design Artificial Intelligence and machine learning models, apply modeling to Beshton’s data analysis tools and services; Evaluate the algorithms and methods in risk management software to validate results and verify the accuracy of calculations; Present software deliverables to management and client companies, make changes to analysis tools based on software requirements; Report analysis results using internal tools, provide statistical visualizations and in-depth reporting that translates data into business insight. Requirement: Minimum a Master’s Degree in Economics/Econometrics. Apply send email to career@beshton.com",4.0,"Beshton Software
4.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
420,Data Analyst,-1,"The Perduco Group, a LinQuest company, is seeking a Data Analyst to join our team at Eglin AFB.

Applicants should have experience working with both very large and very small data sets and be familiar with the complexities and hurdles that come with each. Applicants should understand the insights and limitations that data analysis brings in support of research, analysis, problem solving and decision support. The Data Analyst will be expected to already have deep knowledge of some statistical data processing package and be conversant in others. Understanding customer data needs, adjusting data collection efforts to meet those needs, and effectively communicating results are some of the expectations for Data Analysts.

Successful applicants should understand how underlying data distributions will impact inferential and parametric statistics. Additionally, the Data Analyst will be able to clearly articulate when underlying data do not support hypotheses and research objectives. Finally, a successful Data Analyst will be interested in and willing to continually expand their knowledge of automated tools.

Required Skills:

Expertise with using the Microsoft Office Suite of tools (Excel, Access, Word, Powerpoint)
Ability to work well both independently or as part of a team
Experience with JMP, SPSS, SAS, MatLab, or other automated statistical package
Experience with data validation and “cleaning”

Preferred Skills:

Significant experience working in JMP
Ability to create JMP scripts for further automation

Required Experience:

A Bachelor’s degree in data science, operations research, computational methods, statistics, or related field
5 years experience in analytic or related roles (with at least 3 years working primarily with data sets)
An active Secret clearance

Preferred Experience:

A Master’s degree in data science, operations research, computational methods, statistics, or related field
10 years experience within the DoD or as a Defense Contractor working in analytic or related roles (with at least 3 years working primarily with data sets)
Experience using data analysis results to support larger analytic objectives
Understanding of analytical methods and their uses/applications
Understanding of military operations
Working as part of a team to refine study requirements based on larger research goals
Understanding of AF munitions and weapon system capabilities, limitations, and employment concepts

Experience
Required
5 year(s): Data Analysis
Education
Required
Bachelors or better in Statistics or related field
Licenses & Certifications
Required
Secret
Skills
Preferred
MATLAB
SAS
SPSS

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",4.6,"The Perduco Group
4.6","Eglin AFB, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
421,Data Analyst,"$33k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Law360, a LexisNexis company, is an online newswire for business lawyers that covers major litigation, transactions, and regulatory issues. Founded in 2004 and acquired by LexisNexis in 2012, Law360 is a cutting-edge organization and one of the fastest-growing subscription news services in the U.S. Our subscribers include the largest law firms in the U.S. and around the world, in-house counsel at major corporations, and key decision-makers in the government sector.

Law360, a LexisNexis company, is seeking qualified candidates for the position of Data Analyst to join our newsroom.

The Data Analyst will be part of a growing team in our Law360 newsroom, helping to implement surveys and rankings of law firms that support our efforts to report on the legal industry. The Data Analyst will support the accurate, timely, relevant and efficient delivery of that research, and would work collaboratively with editors, reporters and graphic designers to analyze the results of the team’s surveys. The analyst will also work on data management, cleaning and verification. The analyst will employ statistical methods to help improve analyses and data usage. Training will be provided.

Primary Duties/Responsibilities:

Help conduct surveys and interviews.
Help develop the methodologies used in annual reports and rankings from survey data.
Collaborate with editors on research projects, based on surveys and publicly available data.
Help create data visualizations based on surveys and publicly available data.
Participate in drafting and presenting key research findings to reporters and editors.
Combine, clean and verify data from multiple sources.
Help manage our data set. Work with a wide range of stakeholders in Editorial and IT with regard to data management.

Basic Requirements:

1+ years of related experience, including in data management, cleaning, and analysis. Relevant coursework may count toward this experience.

Preferred Requirements:

Previous expertise using quantitative analytical tools.
Advanced Excel skills (e.g., Pivot Tables).
Familiarity with R programming, Tableau and/or Python a plus.
Previous working experience with data visualization techniques. Tableau experience preferred.
Previous experience working with data of varying quality and from varying sources.
Ability to communicate complex ideas to a wide range of audiences.
Legal industry research experience preferred but not required.
A good teammate, collaborator and relationship builder who can also work independently.

RSRLNLP

Law360 offices are located in NYC, Washington DC, and Los Angeles. We offer a casual and flexible work environment, comprehensive benefits (including; medical, dental, generous paid time off, 401(k), tuition reimbursement, and a pre-tax commuter program), and competitive salary.

Portfolio Media Inc.is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. If a qualified individual with a disability or disabled veteran needs a reasonable accommodation to use or access our online system, that individual should please contact 1.877.734.1938 or accommodations@relx.com .

Please read our Candidate Privacy Policy",3.7,"LexisNexis Legal & Professional
3.7","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1880,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
422,Data Analyst,"$60k-$83k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analysts, Stafford, TX: Analyze, architect, design & dev data warehouse & BI Reporting solutions using Microsoft BI Stack including SQL Server, Oracle, SSIS, SSRS, SSAS(MDX & DAX) and Power BI. Convert functional reqs to high & low level design documents. Bach degree or foreign equiv degree in Info Sys, Comp Sci or related+ 24 mos rel exp. 2 years of experience developing data warehousing, BI projects, w/Power BI, in SSPS Statistics & Rapid Minor. Microsoft SQL Server Certification is required. Travel/relocate to various unanticipated locations.

Send res to Pareto Systems LLC

4434 Bluebonnet Dr, Ste 158, Stafford, TX 77477.",4.3,"Pareto Systems
4.3","Stafford, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
423,Data Analyst,"$77k-$135k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Taos is looking for an experienced Data Analyst to help us support an enterprise video communications client .
What you'll be doing
Working as a Data Analyst within the Trust and Safety group of a large video communications company
Use data to identify trends, conduct root cause analysis and suggest potential opportunities for process improvements
Set, monitor, and maintain the key quality and abuse metrics, and identify the issues in product, engineering, and operations
Develop metrics to evaluate risks of service and effectiveness of safety programs
Conceptualize, develop and maintain dashboards for risk detection and monitoring
Devise data-driven strategies to proactively identify, detect, and mitigate risks to our users and propose possible improvements to prevent it from happening again
Work on data association, clustering, segmentation, filtering, and estimation
Strong storytelling: distill interesting and hard-to-find insights into a compelling story
What you'll bring with you
2+ years as a Data Analyst
Solid SQL Programming skills.
Demonstrated coding and programming abilities is other languages is a plus
Strong metrics management / dashboarding experience is a plus
Strong communication and organizational skills
Self-driven with the ability to work in a self-guided manner
Who is Taos?
Taos helps today’s enterprises and rapidly growing businesses harness the power of the cloud and DevOps with digital transformation and optimization solutions. From Executive Leadership to our delivery teams, Taos listens, understands, and delivers best-in-class work. Our deep technical expertise and solutions-driven approach help address our client’s biggest business challenges and opportunities. As a Global Leader of Cloud and DevOps, Taos continues to solve What’s Next.
Talent at our Core®
Taos Consultants are adaptable problem-solvers, growth-minded doers, and lifelong learners.
Thanks to this mindset, we have helped thousands of clients achieve their goals and solve their challenges. From Cloud Architects to Security Analysts to DevOps Engineers, Taos is always seeking the best and brightest technical talent. Joining Taos gives you the opportunity to work with national enterprises and innovative Silicon Valley companies. Our model provides the support and benefits of full-time employment while giving you exposure to a variety of environments and technologies to sharpen your skills and deepen your technical expertise. These advantages combined with competitive benefits, continuous training and education, and a clear career progression path make Taos a great place to work.
Referrals:
We love referrals so much that we pay for them! If you know someone that you would recommend, send an email to referrals@taos.com or Contact Us and we will do the rest! We'll make sure that you receive the $1000 referral bonus after they are employed with us.
Compensation:
Our compensation package includes a competitive salary, medical and dental insurance, 401k, paid vacation, sick time and holiday pay, plus loads of free training (Puppet, Chef, Nagios, LAMP Stack, PMP, ITIL, Python, etc.)!
Equal Opportunity:
Taos Mountain, LLC is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color national origin, sex, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability.
Veterans are encouraged to apply!
E-Verify Participant:
This employer will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee’s Form I-9 to confirm work authorization. Please go to http://www.taos.com/join-our-team/ and review the E-Verify Participant and Right to Work links for more information.

#DICE",4.2,"Taos
4.2","San Jose, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
424,Data Analyst,-1,"Steampunk is searching for a Data Analyst to support a government customer on site in Washington, DC. The primary responsibilities for the position are retrieving data, manipulating data, and responding to requests for specific data pertaining to subjects removed from the United States. The nature of the work requires that the candidate demonstrate initiative, organization, responsibility, customer service skills, and the ability to be flexible and adaptive to a fast-paced, fluid business environment. The candidate must be able to communicate effectively and decisively with all levels of the organization and be able to solve practical problems as well as exercise sound judgement with regards to sensitive and confidential information.
Contributions
Familiar in the usage of ACCESS, Hyperion, and or JavaScript and able to perform the following would be helpful:
Query building
Enterprise database management
Proficient in utilizing Excel to perform the following:
Creating PivotTables and utilizing dynamic ranges
Using a master pivot table to drive other pivot tables (via a VBA macro)
Measuring your data: COUNT(), COUNTA(), COUNTIF(), SUBTOTAL()
Formatting data and reformatting datatypes in Excel using formulas
Utilizing COUNTIFS, SUMIFS, VLOOKUP, IFERROR, and combinations of these formulas
Manipulation of large datasets in Excel (100,000+ rows)
Ability to learn and understand a business model and fully comprehend operational concepts, relationships between those concepts and data being utilized
Great critical thinking abilities, willingness to learn, and eagerness to do research
Support all analytical and statistical reporting requirements for program activities;
Analyze the efficiency of the enforcement lifecycle;
Develop, analyze and produce standardized statistical reports AND ad hoc reports for internal and external customers, including Congress, Agency leadership and various stakeholders;
Track tasking’s assigned to the program
Qualifications
Two (2) years relevant experience in research, organizational and business analyses and forecasts
Bachelor’s degree



Steampunk is a Change Agent in the Federal contracting industry, bringing new thinking to clients in the Homeland, Federal Civilian, Health and DoD sectors. Through our Human-Centered delivery methodology, we are fundamentally changing the expectations our Federal clients have for true shared accountability in solving their toughest mission challenges. As an employee owned company, we focus on investing in our employees to enable them to do the greatest work of their careers – and rewarding them for outstanding contributions to our growth. If you want to learn more about our story, visit http://www.steampunk.com.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Steampunk participates in the E-Verify program.",4.6,"steampunk
4.6","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
425,Data Analyst,"$45k-$80k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Logistics done differently.

At XPO Logistics, we’re constantly looking for ways to improve, enhance and adapt in an ever-changing marketplace. As the Industrial Engineer, you will be responsible for identifying facility design and personnel requirements to help keep our operations running smoothly. You’ll also develop work instructions and update standard operating procedures. As a part of the XPO team, you’ll have a starring role in helping us continue to provide daily business solutions for our global customers.

Pay, benefits and more.

We are eager to attract the best, so we offer competitive compensation and a generous benefits package, including full health insurance (medical, dental and vision), 401(k), life insurance, disability and more.

What you’ll do on a typical day:
Identify facility design requirements based on activity levels, product dimensional profiles, product flow and transportation methods
Develop production time studies, head count analyses, downtime analyses, efficiency improvement plans, warehouse slotting and SKU velocity analyses
Identify bottlenecks and improve flow; analyze inbound, outbound and inventory operations to create and maintain optimum warehouse operations
Perform value stream mapping, process improvements and standardization across multiple sites
Assist pricing and solutions teams in providing operational cost and other key info needed for RFPs
Track KPIs and develop basic analytics for all operational metrics
Work with vendors to identify operational equipment and automation solutions
Develop and manage project plans for major operational improvement activities
Support the Maintenance department by developing list of critical spare parts, min/max tracker; daily P&L tracking for Finance
Convert contract documents, proposals and statements of work into work instructions and operating procedures; submit ISO-compliant work instructions and standard operating procedure documents to the Quality Management System (QMS)
What you need to succeed at XPO:

At a minimum, you’ll need:
Bachelor’s degree in Industrial Engineering or a related field, or equivalent related work or military experience
1 year of engineering experience
Experience with analytical tools such as flow charts, Pareto charts, cause and effect diagrams, run charts, etc.
Microsoft Office experience
It’d be great if you also have:
Lean/Six Sigma Black Belt designation
Availability to travel up to 50% at times
Experience with BI software such as Tableau, Power BI, Data Studio, etc.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills; ability to present clean, organized and thorough information and data appropriate for intended audience
Ability to compose thorough and detailed technical documentation, job aids, procedures manuals, etc.
Ability to develop insightful, value-added and actionable analyses with detailed explanations regarding drivers of those results; ability to produce unambiguous, comprehensive and accurate interpretations
Be part of something big.

XPO is a leading provider of cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the most successful companies in the world. We help our customers manage their goods most efficiently using our technology and services. Our greatest strength is our global team – energetic, innovative people of all experience levels and talents who make XPO a great place to work.

We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran or other protected status.

The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. All employees may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed.",3.7,"XPO Logistics
3.7","Lebanon, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,2011,Company - Public,Transportation Management,Transportation & Logistics,$10+ billion (USD),-1
426,Data Warehouse Analyst,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Kfroce has a client seeking a Data Warehouse Analyst in Troy, MI. This person will be responsbile for gathering and eliciting data from SQL and Oracle to pull together for reporting. This will also include database design and engineering when applicable.

REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree
SQL, SQL Queries
Oracle, Pl/SQL
HIPAA
Inspections
Life Cycle
Maintenance
Metadata
MS Windows
Healthcare and EDI experience
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,"Kforce
4.1","Troy, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
427,Data Analyst,"$79k-$144k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Snowflake started with a clear vision: develop a cloud data platform that is effective, affordable, and accessible to all data users. Snowflake developed an innovative new product with a built-for-the-cloud architecture that combines the power of data warehousing, the flexibility of big data platforms, and the elasticity of the cloud at a fraction of the cost of traditional solutions. We are now a global, world-class organization with offices in more than a dozen countries and serving many more.

We are looking for a Data Analyst to research and gather data to analyze the performance of all aspects of marketing programs to help our business grow. The Analyst will be responsible for evaluating the effectiveness of all global marketing programs and will assist with forecasting lead flow, conversion metrics, and influenced pipeline.

AS A DATA ANALYST ON THE MARKETING TEAM AT SNOWFLAKE YOU WILL:
Analyze full-funnel metrics using Snowflake to combine data from various platforms to help the marketing team make ongoing decisions to improve performance focusing on growth.
Use Snowflake in your daily work to help us to better understand the impact of marketing.
Dive into data to find trends and patterns in large datasets and theorize ways to exploit those trends.
Work closely with our Analytics and Sales Operations teams to implement data analysis best practices.
Analyze key drivers in growth for our free trial, and help develop new campaigns to attract growth.
Evaluate email performance to improve database health and recommend database segmentation to increase performance and better nurture demand.
Provide insights that will help guide our attribution methodology and enhance our understanding of customer lifetime value.
OUR IDEAL DATA ANALYST WILL HAVE:


3+ years of experience working with SQL.
1+ year evaluating marketing data
Experience working with data from Google, Marketo, Google, Salesforce and other digital ad platforms.
Understanding of marketing and sales process.
Exposure to business intelligence tools such as Looker, Tableau, Business Objects, and Microstrategy.
Must be highly organized, able to pick up things quickly, and create processes that scale in a rapidly evolving and growing environment.
The ability to thrive in a dynamic environment. That means flexibility and willingness to jump in and do whatever it takes to be successful.
4-year degree

Snowflake is growing fast, and we're scaling our team to help enable and accelerate our growth. We are looking for people who share our values, challenge ordinary thinking, and push the pace of innovation while building a future for themselves and Snowflake.

How do you want to make your impact?",4.2,"Snowflake
4.2","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
428,Data Analyst,-1,"About Eleanor Health

The opioid epidemic and widespread alcohol and other substance use disorders continue to deeply impact communities across the country.. Individuals seeking treatment face obstacles at every stage of their journey, from accessing care to the proliferation of ineffective treatment; communities are experiencing far too frequent overdoses and deaths and local resources are stretched thin; the healthcare system overburdened and unable to address the unique needs of each patient.

Eleanor Health is rethinking addiction by fully treating it as a chronic condition and building an integrated solution that expands access to effective, whole-person treatment to drive sustained recovery. Our goal is to improve upon earlier generations of opioid and substance use disorder treatment to create more accessible clinic- and community-based care that is integrated with the rest of a patient's life and care journey, and delivers superior outcomes for patients (we call them community members), their loved ones and communities, the healthcare system, and society.

Eleanor Health and its associated health care providers deliver best-in-class substance use disorder care utilizing Medication-Assisted Therapy (MAT), behavioral health therapy, care management, and social support and wrap services. As a multi-site, outpatient treatment organization, Eleanor delivers accessible, evidence-based, and clinically excellent care, supported by innovative technology.

A fast growing startup, Eleanor Health launched in September 2019 and already has a half-dozen clinics in North Carolina and New Jersey and is poised to continue our rapid expansion into more states in the coming months.

If you are passionate about building a great business that makes a difference, we seek highly skilled, motivated and compassionate individuals who take responsibility and adapt quickly to change to join our deeply committed and collaborative team.

Position Description

Eleanor Health is looking for a data analyst to help build and maintain our analytics layer. This position will play a key role in maintaining and tuning our BigQuery environment, establishing governance and access controls, as well as integrating third party data sources into our warehouse. You will work to apply best practices to the production and maintenance of analytics code and transform raw data into consumable information and business logic. As a member of the Data team you will work closely with other key stakeholders to empower end users to answer key questions that drive the business.

Responsibilities.

Perform complex data analysis using SQL and data visualization using our BI tool, Mode analytics
Design and build data models to store the data in an easy to use format for reporting, dashboards, and self-service analytics
Be the data expert supporting cross-functional teams, gathering data from various sources, and building automated reporting to democratize data across the company
Build internal data quality measures and processes to ensure the accuracy of data models, reports and dashboards

Qualifications

Advanced knowledge of SQL with exposure to dbt a plus
2+ years working with a data warehouse/BI-tool (BigQuery experience is a plus)
2+ years experience with self-service BI tools (e.g. Mode, Looker or Tableau)
Experience in a startup data environment; exposure to common tools is a plus (Google Analytics, Zendesk, Netsuite, etc.)
Some experience in a programming language like Python or R is beneficial but not required

Job Type: Full-time",5.0,"Eleanor Health
5.0",Massachusetts,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
429,Overpayment Data Analyst/Programmer,-1,"Overpayment Data Analyst
Classification: *Exempt
Level: *Tier II
Reports to: *Director, of Development and Programming
Closing Date: * Open; minimum 3 days internal and 3 weeks external
Salary Range: *$70k-$100k per year, plus incentives based on production
JOB DESCRIPTION
Summary/Objective*
Asset Protection Unit (APU) seeks an experienced data analyst to join our team. APU is growing rapidly and we look for engaged, enthusiastic, and excited folks to become an integral part of our team.

As a data analyst at APU, you’ll get to directly see the impact or your projects, be empowered to understand the everyday needs of users and make decisions that deliver real business value. At the same time, you’ll enjoy a friendly work environment and nimble small-business culture.
What are we looking for?*
We are searching for someone who can take a new dataset, understand all of its components and derive business meaning. This person will become the expert in all things data, all the while, keeping in mind business objectives.

We are looking for experience in SAS, or with experience using another stack (Python, R, etc.) to analyze large datasets.

As a small business we are looking for someone who has broad experience including some project management duties. Duties such as gathering requirements, clarifying user expectations, communicating with management and stake-holders, and recognizing opportunities for improvement.
Essential Functions*
Programmer / Analyst I*
Follow Directions (written and verbal) to prepare client data for programming
Follow Directions (written and verbal) to run existing SAS programs
Do basic troubleshooting to find issues with client data
Do basic troubleshooting of existing SAS Programs
Under direction, make basic modifications to existing SAS Programs.
Write SAS Infile programs.
Make modifications to existing Audit templates
Programmer / Analyst II*
Demonstrate a firm grasp on the elements that make up existing programs
Identify areas where existing programs have deficiencies
Independently make test and verify functional changes to existing programs
Take an idea for a new program and, under direction, find the needed data, test and verify output
Take loosely defined requirements and create programs from them.
Programmer / Analyst III*
Demonstrate expertise in existing programming environment (SAS or other tools)
Independently Identify new programs and programming opportunities
Independently generate an idea for a new program, find or request the needed data, test and verify output, train audit and call staff on new idea
Be able to interview users to find requirements for programming, document and execute on those requirements
Senior Programmer / Analyst*
Recognize architectural improvements needed to improve APU Programming
Perform any programming or data related task independently and efficiently
Think strategically about existing or conceptual opportunities
Mentor other programming staff
Provide direction to other programming staff
Communicate clearly with C-Level executives
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Competencies*
Ability to Perform the Essential Functions
Education and Experience: Development and Programming
Exercise independent judgement and discretion
Professionalism
Problem Solving/Analysis
Communication Proficiency
Time Management
Strategic Thinking
Supervisory Responsibility
This position has no supervisory responsibilities
Required Education and Experience
We expect this candidate to be able to self-learn and gather the right information to make informed decisions. APU will train the right candidate in the specific duties of the position, but the person must be able to take the initiative without being told what to do. A skills test will be required.
College degree or work equivalent
Data Mining / ETL experience
SQL
Preferred Education and Experience
SAS Programming
Microsoft SQL Server
Experience with project management and delivery
Distributed Version Control
Eligibility Qualifications
Intermediate Windows & MS Office skills are mandatory.
Passing a skills test may be required.
To be considered for this role, please complete the Predictive Index Assessment at: https://assess.predictiveindex.com/eArRQ.
Internal Candidate Eligibility Qualifications
Cannot have any written warnings or performance improvement plans currently in place.
Proven leadership and problem solving initiative in an APU role as documented by their department director and/or performance evaluations.
Other Duties
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of

activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
Work Authorization
Candidates selected will be subject to a pre-employment background investigation (drug test, credit check, reference verification) and skills test.
Compensation and Benefits
There will be an attractive compensation package that is commensurate with experience. APU offers a full suite of benefits for full time employees. Those benefits include medical, dental, vision, life, LTD, 401k, PTO and holiday pay. Join our growing team based exclusively in Amarillo, Texas.
Position Type/Expected Hours of Work
This is a full-time position. Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8 a.m. to 5 p.m. This position requires 40 hours per week with some time outside of the normal hours.
Travel
No travel is expected for this position.
Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee will be required to sit for extended periods of time and is frequently required to

stand; walk; use hands to finger, handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms.
This position requires sitting over 66% of the time.
This position requires Visual Acuity at 20 inches (or less) over 66% of the time.
Work Environment
This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines.
AAP/EEO Statement
APU is an affirmative action/equal opportunity employer (AA/EOE). All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, sexual orientation, disability status, genetic information, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.
SignaturesThis job description has been approved by all levels of management. Management: Daniel Reagan, Director of Programming and Development HR: Kim McKinney, Director of Human Resources
Applicant signature below constitutes understanding of the requirements, essential functions and duties of the position.

Signature: Date

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Experience:
Data Analysis Skills: 5 years (Preferred)
SQL: 5 years (Preferred)
SAS (Statistical Analysis System): 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Amarillo, TX 79102 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
8 hour shift
Company's website:
www.apuinc.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/asset-protection-unit-inc/?viewAsMember=true
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Asset Protection Unit, Inc.","Amarillo, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
430,Research Data Analyst,-1,"Research Data Analyst – Schaumburg, IL*
$45,000-$50,000*
Full Time Job Description: *
Our *Research* *Analysts* are considered our company engine. While a *Research Analyst* is responsible for a wide variety of important tasks, the best RA's analyze our advertising research study results and translate those findings into a story that allows clients to make smarter advertising decisions. This responsibility is an integral part of us achieving our overall success.

RA's work closely with Project Managers and Project Directors on a daily basis to ensure that our final product delivers a clear and concise picture to our clients. Excellent communication, attention to detail and a willingness to learn are vital qualities in our RA team. We provide full training and are looking for a sharp, college graduate who is interested in a long-term career.
Research Analysts* typically move on to other positions in the company depending on their specific talents and interests. From consultants and project managers, to data analysts and IT, there are ample opportunities to add value to the business in different areas that all relate back to our core purpose of optimizing advertising campaigns.
If you have had some exposure to market research and have found it interesting, and if you are good with numbers, analysis, and enjoy multi-tasking, this could be a great fit for you.
Attention to detail
Focus on precision
Excellent analytical skills
The ability to quickly learn new tasks
Team player who will own the quality and timeliness of their work
Flexibility - You will be involved in a wide variety of activities on a daily/weekly basis
Effective communication of your ideas
Self-motivated
Research Analyst Required Skills: *
Bachelor's degree in business, marketing, advertising, communications, math, social sciences or a related field; market research coursework is a plus
Strong demonstrated abilities in working with numbers
Ambitious team player, with both professionalism and drive
Good working knowledge of MS Office
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $45,000.00 - $50,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday",-1,Corporate Resources/CRT,"Schaumburg, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
431,Research Data Analyst,-1,"Research Data Analyst – Schaumburg, IL*
$45,000-$50,000*
Full Time Job Description: *
Our *Research* *Analysts* are considered our company engine. While a *Research Analyst* is responsible for a wide variety of important tasks, the best RA's analyze our advertising research study results and translate those findings into a story that allows clients to make smarter advertising decisions. This responsibility is an integral part of us achieving our overall success.

RA's work closely with Project Managers and Project Directors on a daily basis to ensure that our final product delivers a clear and concise picture to our clients. Excellent communication, attention to detail and a willingness to learn are vital qualities in our RA team. We provide full training and are looking for a sharp, college graduate who is interested in a long-term career.
Research Analysts* typically move on to other positions in the company depending on their specific talents and interests. From consultants and project managers, to data analysts and IT, there are ample opportunities to add value to the business in different areas that all relate back to our core purpose of optimizing advertising campaigns.
If you have had some exposure to market research and have found it interesting, and if you are good with numbers, analysis, and enjoy multi-tasking, this could be a great fit for you.
Attention to detail
Focus on precision
Excellent analytical skills
The ability to quickly learn new tasks
Team player who will own the quality and timeliness of their work
Flexibility - You will be involved in a wide variety of activities on a daily/weekly basis
Effective communication of your ideas
Self-motivated
Research Analyst Required Skills: *
Bachelor's degree in business, marketing, advertising, communications, math, social sciences or a related field; market research coursework is a plus
Strong demonstrated abilities in working with numbers
Ambitious team player, with both professionalism and drive
Good working knowledge of MS Office
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $45,000.00 - $50,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday",-1,Corporate Resources/CRT,"Schaumburg, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
432,Data Analyst,"$47k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Analyst to join our team based in Falls Church

Requirements:
Must have good interpersonal and communication skills both verbal and written.
Must have strong time management and organizational skills, attention to detail and ability to multitask.
Must have a good understanding of data structure and management.
Must be organized, self-motivated, and self-directed.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Desired Skills:
A fair understanding of SQL, Python and R is a plus.
Experience in developing Pivot Tables/Charts as well as complicated formula is desirable.
BI Dashboards
QLIK OR Tableau
Excel:
V lookup
Data Validation
Data Clean up
Education:
Must have a bachelors degree (in a similar discipline preferred) in any related field.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go tohttps://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,"Nolij Consulting
4.1","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
433,Senior Data Content Analyst,"$45k-$84k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About us

Designed for unlimited discovery and unmatched safety, Epic isthe leading digital library for kids. With tens of thousands of high-quality books, audiobooks, and videos from the world's best publishers, every year millions of kids read, learn and explore on Epic.

To learn more about our vision to unlock the potential of every child, visit us at www.getepic.com.

About the job

Keeping kids engaged through a fun experience is the core of our service. If kids are not happy, nothing else matters. This is as core to Epic as it gets. Content is a key driver of engagement and developing deep content insights on what children like and how they interact with our content is core to our mission. We are looking for a Senior Data Content Analyst to increase our understanding of content drivers for engagement and optimize user engagement via awesome content!

What you will be doing
Build the most engaging content catalog from scratch
Develop an understanding of content engagement paths by title
Increase performance of our original content
Help build a world-class Analytics function
What you should have
Bachelor's degree + 4 years relevant experience or Masters degree + 2 years of relevant experience
Strong SQL and another programming language (preferably Python / R)
Strong analytics experience - good statistics background; experience with visualization tooling such as Looker or Tableau.
Experience working with ambiguity in business problem definition
Sharp business judgement and the ability to see past the noise in large datasets to synthesize and present actionable insights
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Ability to multitask and take on diverse projects in a dynamic environment
Exposure to Economics, Math, Statistics, Computer Science and/or Business.
Benefits
Full medical, dental and vision coverage
401(k) plan
Take as you need vacation plan
$80/month transportation reimbursement
Weekly yoga
Unlimited access to our product!",4.9,"Epic
4.9","Redwood City, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
434,Data Analyst,"$53k-$96k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Senior Data Analyst in the CACI Data Analytics lab is responsible for providing senior-level support for data analytics projects surrounding investigations or litigation. This includes managing projects on various cases from initiation to closure, developing deliverables and serving as a primary point-of-contact for Attorneys and Case teams. Senior Data Analysts gather a wide variety of data types from primary and secondary sources through diverse channels using a combination of methods that will be researched and employed by the Data Analytics Lab Management team. Senior Data Analysts develop, maintain, and enforce streamlined and efficient processes for project lifecycles, from collection through transformation of data; manage timelines, training, resources, and budgets through the finalization of client deliverables. Manage the collection, documentation, vetting and onboarding of data, manage the database development and set up, and oversee the population of data into the appropriate analytical tools. Must have the ability to guide and assist other data analysts as required.

The senior data analyst is responsible for defining, developing, and communicating data analytics solutions to support the customer. This includes:

• Corresponding with key case personnel to elicit requirements and provide regular status updates,
• Performing data analysis and modeling to understand and identify data relationships/trends/classifications/predictions
• Enriching data using open source or online investigation tools (e.g. CLEAR, FINCEN, Lexis-Nexis, etc.)
• Proposing reporting solutions that best present the information to the end user
• Delivering the completed solution.

This position requires strong analytical, problem solving, and communication skills with a keen attention to detail. Additionally, the problems and toolset are quite varied, and the candidate should take the initiative to attack new challenges and learn new skills independently. This person must be well organized and flexible. We desire someone with the diverse experience and skills in data analysis, analytic programming languages (Python, R, Java, SAS), litigation support, statistical software, link analysis, visualization software, and database management.

Requirements:

• Minimum of 5 years of experience performing using the tasks outlined in the job description utilizing one or more of the following tools: Tableau, Python, R, SAS, Palantir, Foundry
• Experience with analysis stemming from multiple Databases: SQL Server, Oracle, PostgreSQL, MySQL
• Experience working with the SAS VIYA statistical software suite strongly preferred
• Programming and/or scripting (Python, R, Java)
• Background in Data Science, Investigations, Data Analysis, Computer Information Systems, or Statistics
• Industry analytics/business intelligence knowledge including current industry trends, challenges, and data quality approaches
• Deep understanding of database, ETL, and analytics tools and concepts
• Must be able to work independently and prioritize work effectively, as well as to function as an effective team member in a local and virtual team development environment
• Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with an unsurpassed attention to detail
• Excellent communication (written and verbal) skills
• Experience supporting federal agencies

What you can expect from us:

• Real opportunity for career growth in an environment where your achievements will be celebrated
• Constant collaboration with numerous teams to ensure client success
• A team that respects and embraces your ideas and expertise
• Coworkers that are motivated by pursuing excellence, rather than the prospect of personal gain
• A workplace dedicated to supporting and bettering public safety and government agencies

Benefits:

• Very competitive salary based on qualifications and experience
• Comprehensive, Company paid United Health Care Medical for you and your family (We pay your premiums and deductibles)
• 401(k) & 4% matching
• Travel & performance incentives
• 3 weeks paid time off (plus Federal Holidays)
• $5K annual training allowance
• $500 book allowance
• Tuition reimbursement program

Praescient Analytics is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for all. Employees and applicants without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity, national origin, legally protected physical or mental disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or status in the uniformed services of the United States, status as a disabled veteran or veteran of the Vietnam era, or on any other basis which is protected under applicable law. This includes a commitment to provide a work environment that is free from all forms of illegal harassment including sexual harassment.

This covers all terms and conditions of employment including (but not limited to):

• Hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, or demotion of all job classifications;
• Recruiting, advertising or solicitation for employment;
• Treatment during employment;
• Rates of pay or other forms of compensation;
• Benefits;
• Selection for training;
• Company sponsored social and recreational activities; and
• Layoff or termination

Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
US Citizenship Required
Praescient Analytics is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Interested Candidates: Please forward your resume to recruiting@praescientanalytics.com and please visit our website to apply online at www.praescientanalytics.applicantstack.com/x/openings.",3.2,"Praescient Analytics
3.2","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
435,Business Info Data Analyst,"$37k-$64k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Help People Live their Lives to the Fullest Potential!

For more than 30 years, Beacon has changed the way people live with behavioral health conditions. Today, we are the undisputed leader in behavioral health management, serving 40 million people across all 50 states. At Beacon, we are committed to delivering a‘world-class’ candidate experience from the moment you click‘Apply’! Our goal is to help you reach your fullest potential, while utilizing your talents and expertise to help us deliver on our promise.

Do you have a passion for helping others? If so, we are looking for you!

Beacon is currently seeking a Business Information Data Analyst to join our team at our Latham, NY office. The Data Analyst provides analytical support for payment integrity, clinical informatics, program evaluation, quality improvement and outcomes projects. Viewed as an expert in development and execution of data mining analyses, responsibilities include design and validation of summary report requests, data management, and analysis including interpretation and presentation of results

What does a typical day look like?
Ensure confidentiality and compliance in accordance with HIPAA and Code of Conduct standards.
Interact with AVP, Payment Integrity or other designated point-of-contact(s) to review and validate results of data mining requests
Required experience with healthcare data, claims, member, provider, resource, and other aspects
Establish and maintain advanced knowledge of data warehouse, database design, data definitions, system capabilities, and data integrity issues.
Demonstrate proficiency in PC, spreadsheet, and database skills, as well as experience in business information tools, dashboards, and programming/query languages.
Complete analytical services for business data needs, prepare reports that summarize methodology, analysis, interpretations, and make recommendations for viable solutions
Address data integrity issues as they arise
Troubleshoot data issues, validates result sets, recommend and implement process improvements
Document process flows
Review and manipulate data and reports from multiple sources, including encounters, authorizations, Medicare, Medicaid and Commercial claims data for behavioral health.
Design and maintain data, reports, and dashboards for tracking and reporting of payment integrity concepts, clinical, quality, outcomes, financial, and other research projects.
Develop functional and technical specifications for data extracts to be used for data analysis and reporting.
Shift priorities when necessary to support urgent business needs
Ensure the quality and timeliness of assigned deliverables, and demonstrate ability to manage multiple concurrent projects.
Demonstrate ability to work independently, self-motivate, set goals, and meet deadlines
Maintain courteous and professional working relationships with employees at all levels of the organization
Demonstrate excellent analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skills
Other duties as assigned
What you Contribute?

Education: BA/BS degree

Licensure:NA

Knowledge, Skills& Abilities:
At least 2 years of previous healthcare analytical experience is required.
Critical thinking skills with a high attention to detail required
Strong organizational skills including ability to manage concurrent data projects with competing priorities and deadlines
Drive to support business partners
Proven ability to work both independently and in a dynamic team structure
MS Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, Project, Access)
SQL Coding (or similar query method)
Statistical program/Modeling languages (SAS, R, etc.)
Dashboarding (PowerBI, Tableau, etc.)
What Makes Us Different?
Here, it’s not just a job– it’s an opportunity to change lives.
Our employees are learners, innovators and original thinkers.
Our mission and values guide the way we treat our members, providers and each other.
What We Have to Offer:
Healthcare benefits available starting day 1!
Health& wellbeing incentives, such as gym membership reimbursement
401K with company match to help reach your future financial goals
Generous PTO, because we know life happens outside of work
Tuition reimbursement so you can keep reaching your fullest potential
If Beacon sounds like the place for you, what are you waiting for? Apply with us today to get started!

Beacon Health Options is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer as well as a Drug Free and Tobacco Free Work Environment. EOE/AA/M/F/Veterans/Disabled

At Beacon Health Options, our candidate's data privacy is a top priority. Our recruiting team conducts all communications using official company email (@BeaconHealthOptions.com). Only candidates who have applied for an open position through our Careers page (careers.beaconhealthoptions.com) will be engaged in our interview process. Beacon conducts all interviews in person or over the phone. At no time during the recruiting process will any Beacon recruiter request any financial or personally identifiable information from you.

#GD

Requirements
Dashboarding (PowerBI, Tableau, etc.)
Statistical program/Modeling languages (SAS, R, etc.)
SQL Coding (or similar query method)
Healthcare analytical experience",2.6,"Beacon Health Options
2.6","Seven Fields, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
436,Data Analyst,"$36k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Valid USA is a secure, make-it-happen partner. We are a global company with a market capitalization of more than $1 billion and 6,000 associates worldwide. Our job is to ensure every solution is seamless and secure - whether it’s for big data, payment cards, government issued identification, mobile financial services or highly targeted direct marketing campaign management. Our website is www.valid.com.

Valid is hiring a Data Analyst at our Downers Grove location. This individual will maintain and update data conversion scripts and layouts, and create new scripts for clients. The Data Conversion Analyst will deliver products according to a pre-defined schedule in a self-managed environment. Interfaces with IT, Manufacturing Engineering, Product Engineering, Service and Support and Sales

What will you do?
Use basic programming and logic skills to create, update, and maintain data layouts and conversion scripts for various clients (Python and FoxPro are the main programming languages used).
Receive data files from clients and then convert the data into scripts we can use with our production machinery.
Perform accurate and timely completion of reports and tasks related to data conversion.
Demonstrate knowledge about data’s role in the card personalization process. Understand how we get the data, how it is converted, and how it is used after conversion.
Meet the requirements and deadlines established for a given project.
Follow internal processes and procedures.
Investigate and resolve reported defects.
Work closely with other team members to coordinate assignments and communicate status.
Actively participate in departmental and project design meetings. Effectively communicate project status with direct supervisor and functional project owner. Meet the desired due date for all assigned projects
Work to understand clients' needs and analyze user requirements.
Perform related responsibilities and duties as required.
What are we looking for?
Associate's degree in Information Technology or related field and a minimum of 3 years experience in a similar position.
Demonstrated programming experience in Python and/or FoxPro.
Experience in the plastic card manufacturing and packaging industry is a big plus.
A team player with strong problem solving and organizational skills.
Excellent verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills; the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of employees and a service orientation.
Intermediate to advanced skills in Microsoft Word and Excel.
What we offer:
Benefits are effective on the 1st of the month following 30 days of employment and include a choice of 4 medical plan options under the Blue Cross Blue Shield, Dental, Vision, Disability and Life Insurance, 401(K), 2 weeks of vacation and 6 additional days of paid time off and paid holidays",3.5,"Valid USA
3.5","Downers Grove, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1957,Company - Public,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
437,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

Expertise.com connects over 8 million consumers annually to the best local experts in their area, whether they need a dog walker, financial advisor, or wedding photographer. With over 200,000 providers across more than 200 different industries, we dive deep into figuring out what makes a professional the best in their area of expertise and how to help the reader find the professional best for them.

We're looking for a Data Analyst based in the Los Angeles (Encino) area to join full-time. You will be joining Expertise.com at a formative time where there is large amounts of data being gathered (including site analytics, Google rankings, marketing operations, and more), but little of it exposed to the business. You will play a major role in tapping into this data to help shape & define the business strategy and execution plan going forward.

What You’ll Do

Influence business strategy by discovering and exposing compelling data insights
Translate data insights into actionable recommendations, balancing strategic objectives and tactical optimization
Ensure data integrity by testing and comparing similar data sources
Build and refine models to support business growth, such as pricing and forecasting
Consult with business leaders in Sales, Marketing, Operations, Content and other team members, helping define the business strategy

What It’ll Take

2 to 5 plus years of experience in a data-oriented role
Highly skilled in building queries using SQL & analysis in Excel
Experience building visualizations in tools such as Tableau, Qlikview or PowerBI
Experience with Salesforce SOQL (APEX is a plus)
Experience with Python and API creation a plus
Must be intellectually curious, extremely detail oriented and passionate about learning new technologies
A hands-on, team player with a positive outlook, an entrepreneurial spirit, the capacity to thrive in ambiguity, and the willingness to adapt to the needs of the business
Ability to work with diverse remote teams.
B.S. in engineering, economics, applied math, stats or any other quantitative field (preferred)

Who We Are

We’re a small but rapidly growing team driven by a bias-to-action mentality, balanced with a sense of humor.
We love to problem-solve creatively while keeping a sharp focus on the important drivers of the business.
We prioritize relentlessly to ensure that whatever we're working on is vital to our business' growth
We’re results-focused, but not afraid of failure as we lean into change and pursue our goals.
We’re open to new ideas and not afraid to break the status quo

Powered by JazzHR

IaAChcvYfa",-1,Expertise LLC,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
438,Data Analyst,"$48k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Provide Data Analysis and Management for Hemophilia and Sickle Cell grants.-Provide data management for Hemophilia grant by: entering weekly stats from nursing and social worker, entering patient data into Clinical Manager database, and other hemophilia databases or programs -Provide data management for sickle cell grant by: setting up and maintain database for sickle cell program and entering all nursing and community outreach workers stats on a weekly basis. Provide reports as needed. Enter data on quality improvement projects for Federal Sickle Cell Grant. -The Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting quality improvement efforts, IRB applications, and collecting and submitting data required for program evaluation by the regional collaborative and HRSA for the Federal Sickle Cell Grant. (S) He will attend an annual webinar through the duration of the grant. -The Data Analyst will be responsible for development and maintenance of data capture and data entry tools; data collection; data entry; and preparation of reports, as required-Review database and verifies information in order to ensure accuracy and consistency of reports -Compiles and analyzes information from standardized reports on a monthly/quarterly basis as necessary. -Reports to program manager of sickle cell/hemophilia programs and principal investigator. Prepares reports and analyzes data with PI and program manager. -Provide data management for clinical trials and research projects by entering data and submitting to company/coordinating center as per the protocol. Review database and verifies information in order to ensure accuracy and consistency of reports. Responsible for ensuring integrity of information reported for all sickle cell and hemophilia grant reports Experience in Excel, Access and Microsoft Office required. Experience with database set up management required. Experience with analysis of data required. Experience in a health care setting preferred. Experience abstracting data from Electronic Medical Records. Attention to detail and ability to track and organize multiple projects.RWJBarnabas Health is an",3.7,"RWJBarnabas Health
3.7","Newark, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1982,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
439,Data Analyst- Win 10 Migration- NYC,-1,"Data Analyst Contract New York City

Job # 440
Provides strategic and tactical support to the organization by analyzing and interpreting the data to provide creative solutions.
Provides strategic and tactical support to the organization by analyzing and interpreting the
Task & Deliverables:
Review desktop software used in environment in preparation for Windows 10 migrations by working closely with team that pulls data from Microsoft SCCM and runs the needed SQL queries
Scrub software inventory to remove non-software such as patches, etc.
Research unknowns using Internet Browsers, internal tools and better judgment to validate if true software or if it can be excluded
Research to determine what software are Microsoft Office plugins
Compare each software product to internal database to determine
Windows 10 certification status
Latest available software package number
If software package requires unique license key for activation post installation
Use pre-determined software categories to classify each line item of software
Review scrubbed data to ensure updates are being reflected for each Business Units set of software Repair or create Microsoft Excel formulas as needed
Once software is properly scrubbed, reviewed and classified we should be able to identify which software has already been internally Windows 10 certified, not yet certified/packaged, unknown software, for each Business Unit
Provide daily updates to team on analysis
Skills Required:
Expert with Microsoft Excel
Familiar with SQL Queries
Familiar with desktop software
Software Asset Management (SAM) experience is a plus
Excellent attention to detail
Well organized
Powered by JazzHR",3.0,"Royal Communications Consultants Inc
3.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
440,Analyst - Data/Program/Statistical,-1,"Program Statistcal Analyst (Data)
Washington, DC

MUST:
Must have a Public Trust
Experienced Program Statistcal Analyst (Data)
5+ years' experience in managing teams, Statistics, Business Intelligence, Data Analyst, Data mining or similar
Prior experience in contract managing and processing data utilizing statistical software, programming, or database tools
Past experience utilizing SQL and fuzzy matching logic
Prior experience in T-SQL/ SSIS/ SSRS/ SSAS packages or other statistical software
Prior experience managing contract and employees, overseeing work of program analysts and compile data list for standard operating procedures
Experience with the Federal Government or prior work with the Department of Labor preferred
Working knowledge of technical and non-technical users and experience with the Federal Government
Master's Degree in Statistics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Information Systems or related field

DUTIES:
Support corporate proposal and strategic growth efforts
composing scheduling methodology, updated scheduling methodology, and managing contract and employees
Ensuring all scheduling lists are accurate and meet requirements
Manage scheduling inbox, oversees wok of program analysts, and ensures standard operating procedures are met
Utilizing statistical programming for data capture and reporting
Ensure business distribution strategy execution and preparing lists and data per scheduling methodology
Quadrant, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.Quadrant is committed to administering all employment and personnel actions on the basis of merit and free of discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or status as an individual with a disability. Consistent with this commitment, we are dedicated to the employment and advancement of qualified minorities, women, individuals with disabilities, protected veterans, persons of all ethnic backgrounds and religions according to their abilities.",4.8,"Quadrant, Inc.
4.8","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
441,Data Analyst,"$53k-$96k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Details Level Experienced Job Location Agoura Hills - Agoura Hills, CA Position Type Full Time Education Level 4 Year Degree Salary Range Undisclosed Travel Percentage None Job Shift Undisclosed Job Category Admin - Clerical Data Analyst JOB SUMMARY: Creates functional specifications from business requirements and defines business processes. Serves as a primary liaison between Business and IT. Authors use cases and test cases. Is directly involved with the installation, modification, testing, implementation, documentation and maintenance of purchased vendor software and developed solutions. Gathers and analyzes data in support of business cases, proposed projects, systems requirements, and provide solutions and recommend best practices. Responsible for creating SSRS reports, developing ad-hoc SQL queries, dashboards using BI tools such as Tableau, and providing end user training. Applies proven communication, analytical, and problem-solving skills to help maximize the benefit of IT system investments. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: Develops working relationships with a diverse group of business people and gains an understanding of the complex nature of the company’s business. Maintains familiarity with the business plans of the company and the departments serviced. Leads design sessions in identifying business requirements needed for selecting new systems for the purpose of enhancing business processes, operations, and information process flow. Creates system design proposals. Provides creative solutions to user areas and also contributes ideas to improve the function, reliability and quality of services from IT. Coordinates and performs in-depth tests, including end-user reviews, for modified and new systems, and other post-implementation support. Ensures compatibility and interoperability of in-house computing systems. Maintains knowledge of current Data Warehousing, Business Intelligence (Tableau) and Reporting tools (SSRS). Understand statistics and statistical analysis. Take ownership of designing and building end to end BI solutions using SQL Server, T-SQL, SSIS and Tableau Are able to produce visualizations of data to clearly communicate ideas. Development experience in at least one scripting language (R or Python preferred) Gathers and analyzes reporting needs; identifies and analyzes data systems; designs reports and assists in the design and implementation of a reporting infrastructure to support the business reporting needs. Responds to elevated Help Desk Tickets in a timely manner. Provides orientation and training to end users for all modified and new systems. Supports IT Team in planning and implementing backup, security or disaster recovery actions. Maintains a professional awareness of tools and techniques that might be used to improve the quality of service. Conducts research on software and hardware products to justify recommendations and to support purchasing efforts. QUALIFICATIONS: Technical Competencies: Bachelor in Computer Science, Information Technology or related field preferred and 4+ years of work experience in the field. Hands-on experience using Tableau to create impressive visualizations Proven experience in Databases and Data Relationships particularly Microsoft SQL Server including T-SQL and SSIS Development experience in at least one scripting language (R or Python preferred) Good working knowledge of manufacturing business systems Strong organizational and communication skills. Experience working in manufacturing environments is a plus. (ERP). Good verbal, written and listening communication skills. Demonstrated ability to troubleshoot and solve problems and to communicate with and support clients. Able to communicate technical information to non-technical people effectively. Proven ability to work across organizational boundaries to identify business information needs and to implement applications that fulfill them. Core Competencies: Ethics, Values, Integrity & Trust - Adheres and acts in line with CPI core values. Functional/Technical Skills - Possesses high level of skill, knowledge and ability in assigned functional area. Safety – Complies with company safety rules and regulations. Takes a proactive approach to identify and eliminate safety hazards. Customer Focus - Gives high priority to customer satisfaction. Interpersonal Skills - Uses diplomacy and tact. Uses collaborative skills. Action Oriented & Adaptability - Takes initiative; acts promptly; is proactive. Ownership & Accountability - Proactively models, guards and demonstrates all of CPI’s core values. Priority Setting, Planning & Organizing- Uses resources effectively and efficiently. Problem Solving & Creativity - Uses logic and methods to solve problems with effective solutions. Develops new and unique ideas. Listening, Informing and Written Communications - Practices attentive and active listening. Shares information. Presents ideas and facts clearly and effectively in writing. PHYSICAL/ENVIRONMENTAL REQUIREMENTS: Works on computer majority of the day. Ability to lift up to 25 lbs. to move computers, equipment, etc. as needed. Some travel (domestic and international) may be required both by automobile and airplane. May have to perform duties in tight spaces (phone closet, etc.). Must be able to work flexible hours.",3.4,"Chatsworth Products
3.4","Agoura Hills, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
442,Data Analyst,-1,"RGP is a global consulting firm helping some of the most recognized companies in the world work differently. Our success comes from a shared belief in rolling up our sleeves and doing the hard work of solving complex challenges, executing plans and implementing technology to help transform organizations.

Working as a consultant you will be connected to work that matters, putting your expertise to its best use while developing skills for the future. The result is a career defined by you, supported by RGP and built on tangible accomplishments.

As we continue to grow and deepen our impact on organizations around the world, we are looking for the right people to join us on our mission. If you are interested in being part of our team, there are a few things you should know:
We are energized by challenges and the effort needed to solve them.
We like working with people who are positive, adaptable and growth-minded.
We care how work gets accomplished and are deeply invested in the success of our clients and our colleagues.
If this sounds like you, we invite you to read on and learn more.
THE RGP CONSULTING EXPERIENCE
RGP has a unique consulting model that provides opportunities for consultants to work in different ways. Most consultants work in a model where they have the flexibility and autonomy to choose projects aligning to their experience, skills and desired lifestyle. Other opportunities exist in team-based, strategy and solutions work. In all models, you will feel the full support of RGP to assist you in your work and guide you on your chosen path.
PURPOSE OF THE ROLE
As a Data Analyst, you will assist business leaders in making improved business decisions through the analysis of large data sets, creation of comprehensive reports and informed recommendations.

ATTRIBUTES OF CONSULTANTS WITH RGP
Respect for people and opinions and confidently offer your point-of-view with clients and among colleagues
A drive for proactively cultivating relationships with clients and colleagues
Optimism when faced with challenges and complex situations, coupled with the drive to solve client issues
Dedication to continuous improvement and development of your skillset and talents
A strong personal identification with RGPs values loyalty, integrity, focus, enthusiasm, accountability and talent
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE ROLE
Analyze, manipulate, profile and extracts large data sets
Assist with documenting requirements
Build, review and modify data reports
Transfer knowledge to client team members to enable them to be self-sufficient in building and maintaining reports to address future needs
DESIRED EXPERIENCE AND REQUIREMENTS
Bachelors Degree in Finance, Accounting, MIS or other related business discipline required
5 to 10 years of data analysis experience
Strong understanding of financial statements and the interrelationship of the income statement, balance sheet and statement of cash flows, including account reconciliation and financial analysis skills
Excellent interpersonal communication skills
Capable of working independently; a self-starter
Experience with SAP or Oracle software required, including the ability to access reports and data as needed
Intermediate to Advanced Excel skills required, including strong data retrieval and downloading abilities, and proficiency with macros, PowerBI, PowerPivot, etc.
Technical capability in one or more of the following: SQL, Tableau, QlikView, Cognos, ERWin, etc. strongly preferred

Equal Opportunity Employer
RGP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, gender, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, genetic information or veteran status, and encourage all applicants to apply.",4.0,"RGP
4.0","Charlotte, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
443,"Analyst II, Data Science","$100k-$166k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We deliver our customers peace of mind every day by helping them protect what they value most. Our passion for placing the customer at the center of everything we do is driving a transformational shift at Liberty Mutual. Operating as a tech startup within a Fortune 100 company, we are leading a digital disruption that will redefine how people experience insurance.

Job introduction:

The Hosting Data Science team is looking for a highly motivated Analyst II, Data Scientist. This candidate will join the team at an exciting time as they embark on developing AI/ Machine Learning tools to support employee digital experience and productivity across all Lines of Business. This person will collaborate closely with IT Product owners and LOB Operations, other Data Scientists, and Technology teams. They will leverage data and advanced techniques to develop, implement and analyze predictive models that enable data-driven, strategic decision-making. This role requires expertise in a broad range of predictive analytics techniques and their application to business opportunities. A successful candidate will be organized, creative, and interested in solving business problems using data and analytics. They will have the right mix of analytical, technical, and communication skills to thrive in a fast-paced environment.

About the job:

Performs the following moderately complex to complex activities:

Broad knowledge of predictive analytic techniques and statistical diagnostics of models.
Expert knowledge of predictive tool set; reflects as expert resource for tool development.
Demonstrated ability to work independently, exchange ideas and convey complex information clearly and concisely.
Ability to establish and build relationships within and outside the organization.
Has a business value-driven perspective with regards to understanding of work context and impact - interacts with customers to gather and define requirements.
Works in a test-driven development environment in close cooperation with a data engineer.
Operates in an Agile sprint environment, coordinates work with scrum master and writes production support documentation.
Analyzes user stories for validity and feasibility.
Develops effective, defect free code that meets business requirements.
Develops software component design and explores technical alternatives when necessary.
Reviews defects or discrepancies in requirements and resolves with stakeholders.
Works within the team on iterative development that delivers a high-quality product.
Executes all levels of model deployment, testing and monitoring in collaboration with the data engineer.
Ability to give effective training and presentations to team members.
Identifies and recommends appropriate continuous improvement opportunities.
Desired skills:
Bachelor’s or Master's degree in technical or business discipline or equivalent experience.
Minimum 5+ years’ experience in Data Science lifecycle and statistics.
Minimum 5+ years of experience in R, Python, SAS, Java, and other OOP language experience.
Experience leveraging R language and developing machine learning models (RF, XBG, MARS, NLP, text mining, others).
Knowledge of development and delivering cloud technologies.
Strong oral and written communication, presentation, and collaboration skills required.
Ability to prioritize and adapt.
Must be proactive, demonstrate initiative, and be a logical thinker.
Proficient with agile software development concepts and processes.
Preferred skills:
Understanding of data analytics, processing and BI tools (PowerBI, Microstrategy, Tableau, others).
Familiarity or experience with call center, infrastructure operations and incident/problem management.
Knowledge of SDLC & CI/CD process and tools, testing frameworks, and practices.
Competent in automating the configuration management of operating systems.
Benefits:

We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://www.benefitsatliberty.com/

Overview:

At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.

We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Portsmouth, NH",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
444,Data Analyst,"$39k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Do you have a passion for innovation? Are you excited to leverage cutting edge technology to solve big business problems? If your response to those questions is ""yes"", we would love for you to join us! At OrangePeople we consult for some of the most prestigious brands in the world. But more importantly, our consultants have a voice in the vision and future of the company. At OrangePeople, our focus is people. It's right there in our name.
Responsibilities:
The Data Analyst is responsible for, but not limited to: monitoring the COVID-19 related data in Workday HR system and a custom Power BI application for missing / inaccurate data, performing data audits, troubleshooting and investigating data anomalies and issues, and working with the business and IT to resolve data issues (proactively and reactively).
The role will be working across multiple business units (i.e. IT, local HR, third party nurses, etc.) and locations virtually to help guarantee the quality of the data.
The position will require flexibility, adaptability, and advanced experience utilizing Workday and Excel.
The desired candidate should be deadline driven, work well under pressure, possess a strong customer service mindset, have excellent communication skills, and can build and maintain relationships across the organization.
Requirements:

BS or BA degree in computer science, business administration, or related technical field or equivalent experience is preferred
1-3 years experience working with large datasets
Strong Excel proficiency
Workday functional expertise required (including EIBs and advanced reporting)
Detail oriented
Critical thinker
Ability to formulate and present recommendations regarding functional and technical solutions
Excellent written and verbal communication, presentation and organizational skills, and the ability to build strong working relationships with technical and non-technical teams alike at all levels including senior management
Must be able to video interview
Additional Responsibilities:

Participate in OrangePeople monthly team meetings, and participate in team building efforts.
Contribute to OrangePeople technical discussions, peer reviews, etc.
Contribute content and collaborate via the OP-Wiki/Knowledge Base.
Provide status reports to OP Account Management as requested
About us:
Orange People is an Enterprise Architecture and Project Management solutions company. Our most valuable asset is our people: dynamic, creative thinkers who are passionate about doing quality work. As a member of the Orange People team you will have access to industry-leading consulting practices, strategies & technologies, innovative training & education. An ideal Orange Person is a technology leader with a proven track record of technical achievements and strong process/methodology orientation.",4.1,"Orangepeople
4.1","Plano, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
445,Data Analyst,"$55k-$87k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position: Data Analyst

Agency: New York City Employees’ Retirement System’s (NYCERS).

Project Name:Information Technology (IT) Division.

Duration: 3 Years

Project Description:

NYCERS seeks one (1) Data Analyst with ETL Expertise to work with the Information Technology (IT) Division for a period up to 36 months. NYCERS reserves the right to hire the candidate(s) as an employee, at no additional cost, after a period of six (6) months. The Data Analyst will primarily be responsible for detailed field level analysis, profiling and mapping of the current IBM z/VSE Mainframe VSAM files loaded into SQL tables.

Mandatory Skills:
Candidates must meet all the requirements below to be considered for this position.
Minimum of five (5) years of source-to-target data mapping experience in a mixed Mainframe, relational database and object storage environments.
Experience creating and/or maintaining ETL applications.
Experience migrating mainframe VSAM files to relational and/or dimensional SQL databases.
Experience working in multiple development environments/systems: IBM Mainframe, Windows Server, UNIX and SQL Server.
Strong SQL knowledge working with complex queries and stored procedures.
Proficiency in mainframe applications encompassing COBOL, VSAM and DB2.
Experience creating data dictionary documentation and data definitions/domains.
Excellent interpersonal, communication, presentation, writing, analytical, problem solving, and information gathering skills along with fundamental technique troubleshooting abilities.
Strong analytical skills demonstrated by the ability to receive and analyze requirements and propose a suitable solution that adheres to the team’s methodology.
Preferred Experience:
Experience with Data Quality/Profiling tools.
Experience extracting business rules from the existing legacy code.
Experience with Data Warehouses and/or Data Marts.
If this isn’t the role for you, perhaps you have a friend or colleague that would be a fit. I would appreciate your help forwarding this to people in your extended network that may be interested in exploring the opportunity.

I look forward to hearing from you soon.

--

Regards,

Asim Ghafar

Technical Recruiter.

ZDAAS

1107 North Point Blvd, Ste 228

Baltimore, MD 21224

Office: 443-836-4932 X 1004

Cell: 239-666-8767

hr3@zd-techsolutions.com",4.4,"ZDAAS
4.4","Brooklyn, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
446,Sales Ops Data Analyst,"$54k-$94k
(Glassdoor Est.)","TriNet is a leading provider of comprehensive human resources solutions for small to midsize businesses (SMBs). We enhance business productivity by enabling our clients to outsource their HR function to one strategic partner and allowing them to focus on operating and growing their core businesses. Our full-service HR solutions include features such as payroll processing, human capital consulting, employment law compliance and employee benefits, including health insurance, retirement plans and workers’ compensation insurance.

TriNet has a nationwide presence and an experienced executive team. Our stock is publicly traded on the NYSE under the ticker symbol TNET. If you’re passionate about innovation and making an impact on the large SMB market, come join us as we power our clients’ business success with extraordinary HR.

JOB SUMMARY/OVERVIEW

The Sales Ops Data Analyst is responsible and accountable for sales data enrichment, data analysis and related recommendations to influence business decisions, reporting and managing the dedupe data application. This role is responsible for ensuring data integrity of Salesforce and managing ongoing data needs, such as data entry, uploads, cleanup, evaluation, validation. In addition, this role is responsible for providing recommendations for continuous process improvement and leading implementation/adoption of new practices, as applicable.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES

• Identify data process inefficiencies, develop and implement solutions and track progress continuously to improve data quality
• Provide reporting coupled with suggested actions to leaders whose teams provide master data inputs, to reduce data quality issues, non-value record maintenance, and process deviation.
• Understand end to end business processes, flow of data within and between processes and recommend process improvements for better territory planning and forecasting process.
• Develops technical and functional specifications based on business requirements and
analysis of relevant workflows.
• Identify and manage data cleanup projects to improve data accuracy, lead relevant resources to desired project outcome
• Oversee ongoing data hygiene efforts and appends of prospect records
• Identifies issues in data quality that would impact reporting (i.e. duplicate records, missing data, etc.) and influence business decisions
• Develop and implement a periodic review, inclusive of robust reporting, of all master data to ensure data is current and accurate across business functions, conforms to business rules, and meets data quality standards
• Responsible for investigating industry information for accurate sales territory assignment. Provides recommendations to leadership to optimize territory assignment and related business results
• Provides expertise and resolution to questions from the Sales Teams related to data management and rules of engagement
• Build data quality executive dashboards and reports to track and monitor data accuracy for use by executive leadership with CRM
• Provides a pivotal role in the research for data mining, analytic and data quality assurance tools
• Responsible for resolving escalations that require in-depth research and judgement
• Perform data analysis in Salesforce using CRMFusion Demand Tool and other data deduplication applications in production and sandbox environment
• Partners with sales strategy and leadership to define the company’s Go-To-Market (GTM) strategy and provides downstream impact analysis and recommendations to existing operations
• Work with cross-functional team to clarify business process and data needs on process-related IT projects, as well as supporting and executing end-to-end UAT
• Respond to ad hoc data analysis requests and provide technical assistance
• Complies with all data best practices, rules of engagement and data protocols
• Other projects and responsibilities may be added at the manager’s discretion

JOB REQUIREMENTS AND QUALIFICATIONS

Education:
• Bachelor’s degree required
• 3+ years of Salesforce experience
• Previous experience working with PRM applications
• Previous experience with Analytical tools including MS Excel and Tableau
• Data cleanup skills required

Experience:
• 3+ years of experience in sales operations or sales support role
• Experience with deduping application tools
• Ability to work well with a variety of disciplines while remaining effective in a high-volume, tight-deadline driven environment with seasonally affected workloads
• Flexibility and adaptability to changing business needs
• Strong analytical skills and ability to generate sound business recommendations based on data
• Proficient in MS Office Suite
• Collaborative team player and project leader who is detailed oriented, focused on solution quality and execution
Other Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills
• Ability to communicate with employees at all levels of the organization
• Strong knowledge and understanding of both state and federal employment laws
• Excellent interpersonal skills
• Excellent presentation and facilitation skills
• Strong influential skills
• Excellent project leadership abilities
• A demonstrated commitment to high professional ethical standards and a diverse workplace
• Ability to adapt to a fast paced continually changing business and work environment while managing multiple priorities

WORK ENVIRONMENT/OTHER INFORMATION (Travel required, physical requirements, on-call schedules, etc.)
• Minimal travel required
• Work in clean, pleasant, and comfortable office setting
• The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Please Note: TriNet reserves the right to change or modify job duties and assignments at any time. The above job description is not all encompassing. Position functions and qualifications may vary depending on business necessity.

TriNet is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate against applicants based on race, religion, color, disability, medical condition, legally protected genetic information, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions), age, veteran status or other legally protected characteristics. Any applicant with a mental or physical disability who requires an accommodation during the application process should contact recruiting@trinet.com to request such an accommodation.

LI-RG1",3.3,"TriNet
3.3","Fort Mill, SC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
447,Intern - Data Analyst,-1,"Join Episerver in an exciting Internship as a Data Analyst with our Product Team.

As a Data Analyst Intern, you will:
Analyzing historical win/loss data as well as identifying trends in the business
Analyzing product usage by region and customer
Developing reports for C suite
Requirements:
Interested in business
Must be pursuing a Bachelors degree with a major finance or business
Needs to know Excel with experience building pivot tables
This internship will be for 6 months long, 20-25 hours/week, remote-based USA. You will be compensated at $18.00/hour. There are no benefits offered.",4.2,"Episerver
4.2",United States,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
448,Data Analyst,-1,"*Local Seattle candidates preferred

*W2 candidates only. No Corp to Corp.

We are seeking a Data Analyst who can work with independently on a burgeoning Data Science team. In this role you will work directly with the business to understand what data is needed for Data Analysis. From there you will be responsible for gathering the data from the Snowflake date warehouse. Ultimately you will act as a bridge between the Data Scientists and the internal customers. This is a 6 month contract position with strong potential to convert next year and long term career growth potential.

Experience we seek for the Data Analyst:

· At least 2 years experience as a Data Analyst

· Bachelors degree of higher

· Strong SQL Experience -

· Basic Level Python

· Snowflake and Kusto / KQL experience preferred but not required

· Qualitative analysis and quantitative analysis techniques

· Statistical analysis and machine learning

For further information about this data analyst position please send your resume to michael@primeteampartners.com. For information on other similar positions currently available, please go to the careers page of our website at www.primeteampartners.com #Dice

Prime Team Partners is an equal opportunity employer. Prime Team Partners does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, pregnancy status, gender, age, marital status, disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, or any other characteristics protected by applicable state or federal civil rights laws.",4.5,"Prime Team Partners
4.5","Seattle, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
449,Central Flow Data Analyst,"$28k-$59k
(Glassdoor Est.)","ACES/Central Flow is seeking Data Analysts for the NACF Central Data Analyst team. This is a new team that will be located at AZA3 (Tempe, Arizona) and support Fulfillment Centers across NACF.
A successful candidate will be highly organized, extremely detailed, self-motivated, able to handle confidential information, as well as a possess a demonstrate ability to respond effectively to changing workloads and priorities. Must have the ability to communicate well and to manage multiple assignments and people simultaneously. Other responsibilities will include: Configuration requests from NA FCs, Launch Teams, the ACES SME Team, and running projects related to Centralized Flow in order to improve the process and operations of multiple Fulfillment Centers (FCs).

Key areas of responsibility include researching and analyzing issues, participation in pilots, fixing bugs, and partnering with FCs on building Excel tools, automating reporting, and ICQA research, including IRDR research and deep dives. A successful candidate will have a strong blend of project management skills, with an ability to conduct in-depth analyses, think big, and identify strategic opportunities.


Basic Qualifications

· High School Diploma or Equivalent Diploma
· 3+ years of experience with Excel spreadsheets and data analysis
· 2+ years of experience creating VBA code and tool writing
· 2+ years of experience working with SQL; demonstrating fluency

Preferred Qualifications

· 2+ years of Data Analyst or Research Analyst experience
· Demonstrated problem solving skills and analytical skills
· Proven ability to clearly communicate with managers at all levels
· Global perspective and solid understanding of business objectives
· Excellent attention to detail and work with the highest level of accuracy
· Initiative to develop tools, data collection processes, and data management systems
· Understanding of Kibana toolset

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",3.9,"Amazon
3.9","Tempe, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
450,Data Analyst,"$35k-$67k
(Glassdoor Est.)","General Summary:

ConnectWise, Inc. is seeking a self-motivated and results-driven Data Analystfor the Partner Success team in support of the delivery of strategic insights to the greater organization. This individual will be responsible for building reports, data analysis, gathering requirements, prioritizing projects, documenting processes and communicating business needs into business intelligence solutions.

Successful candidates will understand Business Intelligence and analysis concepts and best practices so they can effectively translate the needs of various product leadership throughout the organization into actionable reports and self-service reports. They will also need to be able to manage multiple projects simultaneously and align them with overall organizational priorities. Candidates must also be able to analyze and communicate findings from these projects to leadership teams throughout the organization.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Build, document, analyze and communicate product metrics, KPIs and reports to various leaders throughout the organization.
Work with leaders to build various reports and dashboards. Analyze various data related to these teams and work to align these findings with corporate goals.
Perform requirements and data gathering for business review. Interact with various team members to ensure reports are fulfilling user requirements, are efficiently designed and are easy to support and maintain.
Analyze business requirements and document existing processes and proposed solutions.
Understand various concepts and terminologies, including highly technical content, and express them in a clear and concise manner to non-technical personnel.
Work with Business Intelligence and other teams across the organization to ensure data is organized, captured and designed to support the business need.
Participate in multiple projects simultaneously.
Prioritize projects assigned based on organizational need.
Define understand and recommend changes to existing reporting environment in alignment with the current business needs and direction.
Work with the Project Management Office on corporate projects to ensure stakeholders and other participants are aligned with the project’s desired outcome.
Knowledge, Skills, and/or Abilities Required:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Demonstrated ability to analyze business needs and work with technical staff to formulate technical solutions consistent with organizational objectives.
Strong strategic thinking skills, with a demonstrated ability to identify business issues/opportunities and to frame business questions.
Strong communication skills (oral and written).
Good analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent organizational skill, attention to detail, self-motivation and a desire to succeed.
Must possess a professional presence suitable for interaction in meetings, in-person or via email. Must have excellent communication skills.
Familiar with relational database and data processing concepts.
Fluent with Microsoft applications, particularly Excel, Access, etc.
Strong knowledge of SQL and MS Power BI.
Experience with JSON and XML a plus.
Experience with Python a plus.
Strong knowledge of a variety of report design tools, Microsoft BI stack (SSRS, SSIS, SSAS) a plus
Basic knowledge of how SaaS companies operate
Educational/Vocational/Previous Experience Recommendations:
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience required.
2 years relevant experience
Working Conditions:
Professional office environment
Some travel may be required
Only local candidates need apply.

The statements above are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. Other duties may be assigned as needed.Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

ConnectWise is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.4,"ConnectWise
3.4","Tampa, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
451,Data Analyst,"$73k-$130k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description Data Analyst The Data Analyst will utilize analysis and visualization software to assist various engineering groups with evaluation of Semiconductor Wafer Foundry, Assembly, and Wafer Sort and Final Test data for New Products introduction and sustaining products support and business needs. Responsibilities: Generating yield reports, TC analysis reports of initial product lots, parametric analysis reports, and data analyses to enhance new product introductions. Generating engineering reports based on testing and characterization of products in support of ongoing wafer facility management as well as a wafer facility transfers. Interactively manage and enhance a suite of analysis templates as well as generated new templates upon demand and business needs. Generation and support of analysis for Operations Support. Performing other duties upon request Qualifications: S. in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science/ Engineering or an equivalent technical discipline is required Knowledge of R, S, or Python is desirable. Knowledge of Tibco Spotfire or another semiconductor yield analysis software package is desired. Knowledge of database structures, big data analysis, and a sound fundamental understanding of statistics is desirable. Ability to work independently is required. 2-5 years of experience in production/engineering data analysis is desirable. 5+ years of experience in the semiconductor industry is preferred but a suitable new graduate should apply. Candidates with electronics manufacturing experience are preferred Clear written and verbal communication skills in English are required",3.6,"Power Integrations
3.6","San Jose, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1988,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
452,Data Analyst - Brand Strategy & Communications,"$37k-$65k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


Ayco is an industry pioneer and preeminent leader of company-sponsored financial counseling services.

We believe companies best serve their stakeholders and the greater economy when their employees’ financial lives are clear, understood and in their own control. For nearly 50 years, we’ve aspired to deliver a more productive and engaged workforce to our clients by providing their employees a path to financial well-being through holistic and personalized services tailored for each stage of the career cycle—from entry-level to C-suite.

Training: Ayco has a best-in-class new hire training program, covering the technical and practical elements of the job. Initial new hire training includes a combination of classroom learning, practical exercises, and shadowing of existing associates. Through Ayco and Goldman Sachs University, new hires have access to classes that focus on building foundational professional and technical skills, to culture and learning focused training. We take a personal approach to talent development and foster an environment that values different perspectives, challenges thinking and maximizes the potential of our people. Our annual and ongoing feedback ensures our people and their managers have the information they need to excel in their careers.

Diversity & Inclusion: Ayco values the different perspectives and experiences our associates bring. The firm supports the Ayco Diversity Network, an employee-led initiative open to all associates that provides education and awareness on topics of interest to diverse communities. In addition, our firm wide diversity and inclusion efforts expand professional and career development opportunities through programs such as the Women’s Advisor Initiative to support our commitment to having the best talent at all levels.

Benefits & Wellness: From benefits to wellness, we aim to support your commitment to your job as well as your priorities and interests outside of work.

Career Advancement: Ayco offers coaching, mentoring and on-the-job learning that supports your growth and development.

Visit Ayco.com/careers for more information about the firm

Responsibilities


We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst to join the Brand Strategy and Communications group in Cohoes, NY. This role sits at the intersection of marketing, product, sales, and customer engagement teams, providing measurement and reporting support for cross-channel campaigns.

• Measure and analyze marketing performance of owned channels and cross-channel campaigns (e.g., Web, SEO, Paid Ads, Affiliates, Email, Social Media, etc.) and prepare regular performance reports for the Brand Strategy team and senior management• Work with the website product owner on design of site experiments, implementing and testing personalization opportunities and A/B testing• Continually assess and audit web analytics effectiveness, funnel optimizations and ensure data is accurate • Work with team leads across marketing, engagement and sales on key growth metrics and reporting framework and lead the build of cross-channel dashboards through use of data visualization tools • Be an analytics lead to identify improvements to reporting procedures or advise on technology gaps• Support the implementation of additional analytics toolsets (e.g., Qlikview, Content Square, Tableau, etc.)• Collaborate across functions – Sales Strategy, Sales, Product, and Technology- to discover new sources of data and evangelize data-driven decision making• Mine data from existing databases and extract clear and actionable insights • Work with the Brand Strategy team to develop strong content around extracted data insights that support Ayco’s business goals • Work with the Brand Strategy team to develop, analyze and report on bespoke research studies with internal and external audiences• Work with the Lead management team to develop processes to automate the ingestion, cleaning and categorization of leads• Create reports and dashboards that track leads across the Marketing and Sales funnel, clearly tracking lead stages, lead velocity, lead conversions, revenues • Deliver on ad-hoc data requests, queries, reports and analysis as required

Preferred technology experience: • R / Python / SQL / Alteryx• Tableau / Qlikview• Adobe Analytics / Google Analytics• Adobe Campaign (reports) / Marketo / Pardot• Adobe Dynamic Tag Manager / Google Tag Manager• Adobe Target or other site personalization/recommendation tool• Salesforce / other CRM platforms

Qualifications


• Minimum 2 years of professional experience in an analytics role working full-time with Marketing or Data Analytics teams• Minimum Bachelor’s degree required; Major in data science, mathematics, statistics, engineering, computer science, business analytics or related field • Hands on analytical and measurement experience of digital channels such as Web, SEO, E-mail, Affiliates, Paid Ads, Social Media • Basic understanding of the Adobe Marketing Cloud products• Knowledge of web development technologies - JavaScript, HTML, SQL is preferred• Experience with web personalization, A/B Testing, funnel conversion optimization is preferred• Creative mindset to ideate and test concepts to optimize online and offline audience experiences and maximize user engagement for each digital channel• Experience in modeling and creating compelling insights from data• Highly organized with excellent attention to detail",3.3,"Ayco, a Goldman Sachs Company
3.3","Cohoes, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1971,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
453,Data Analyst,"$40k-$70k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This is a contract role in the public sector. It does offer working remotely until all workers' are back in the office during this health crisis then the position will be working in the office Monday - Friday. The role is scheduled to go for about 4 months or so. Primary responsibilities include data analysis, data collection, fiscal analysis, and data sharing.

Responsibilities:

Developing and running data quality assurance programs,

Communicating findings to team and adding new QA rules and standards to programming.

Data analysis for a variety of internal and external projects and stakeholders,

Developing report-ready presentations of data in graphic and tabular form

Data collection by accessing outside data sources, such as census data, GPS data, internal statistical reporting database and others and incorporating such data into analyses.

Identifying data quality issues related to survey instruments and making recommendations for improvements,

Maintaining and modifying survey instruments.

Collaborate with IT in their efforts to develop dashboards and reports for a variety of purposes

Managing and documenting source datasets for all dashboarding projects, which involves working with IT and other teams,

Creating datasets and documentation per specifications for agency-wide data sharing.

Skills and Experience:

Bachelor's Degree

Proficient in R or SAS, and advanced Excel (mandatory)

Proficient in Access, Qualtrics, PowerBI (desirable)

Experience with fiscal analysis

Four to six years experience managing large-scale data collection efforts",3.5,"TemPositions
3.5","Sacramento, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1962,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
454,Data Analyst,"$46k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This position supports analysis of complex, multi-organizational clinical and financial data to assess quality, cost, and access outcomes and various supporting healthcare practice patterns. This positions supports holistic analysis across health system and independent provider services. Technical experience with SQL, coding and in one or more languages, database architecture principles, and business intelligence tools are required. A Master's degree in Health Information Technology, Computer Science, Statistics, Business or a related discipline is preferred; a Bachelor's Degree is required combined with 3-5 years of experience delivering credible and timely analysis.",3.3,"Cayuga Medical Center
3.3","Ithaca, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
455,Data Analyst,-1,"Mackin

Duties:
Gather, decompose, and document requirements needed to build analytics tools
Practice iterative, end-to-end development, to rapidly develop and deliver complex data sets, reports, and dashboards, as required by business stakeholders
Writes complex SQL to extract and transform data for visualization in Tableau and/or other Business Intelligence tools
Partners with Solutions Leads and QA team to build and own test strategy, test plan, test scenarios and test cases leading to business sign-off on analytics solutions
Skills:
5-7 years of experience.
Ability to write complex SQL to create and manipulate and test large data sets, and perform ETL required to formulate insights and drive solutions
Hands-on development experience using Tableau, Qlik, or other Business Intelligence Tools
Experience in combining complex data sources (e.g., data lineage, complex joins) to extract “how” and “what” that are needed for validating end-to-end reporting metrics
Strong understanding of of data management principles across large scale, unstructured, and transactional databases
Hands-on experience in setting up test beds, installing 3rd-party tools, debugging problems through logs and backend workflows
Ability to create and execute test strategies, test plans, test cases
Education:
Bachelor's degree",3.4,"Mackin
3.4","Menlo Park, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
456,Data Analyst,-1,"Love data? Love to make a huge impact? As the Analyst within the Customer Analytics vertical at goPuff, you’ll bring thought-leadership and insights to help optimize many aspects of our business - from customer acquisition and retention to user behaviors and branding. You’ll help
lead our efforts to use data to understand how to improve all aspects of the customer experience. This role is within our data & analytics team and we’re designed to move fast. You’ll have the opportunity to make a huge impact as the future success of goPuff will depend
on the insights we derive from our data.

Help drive analytics for the Customer side of the business - including marketing analytics, site analytics, merchandising, pricing and promotions, and more.
Bring your unique data perspective and proven experience and hit the ground running as an analytical thought leader.
Obtain a deep understanding of the business drivers through data exploration, and make recommendations to optimize performance and deepen our understanding of customer behaviors
Perform deep-dives to analyze problems, identify opportunities and suggest experiments based on findings
Own data accuracy and integrity
Partner with other Analytics team members, Product Management, Engineering, and other functions to identify opportunities, propose solutions, and share insights - ensuring consistency of data-driven decision-making throughout the org

2+ years of experience in analytics or data science - preferably in fields related to marketing, digital merchandising, or consumer product
Bachelors in Business, Statistics, Engineering, or other quantitative discipline
Expert in SQL and database table design - able to write structured and efficient queries on large data sets
Proficiency in R or Python
A deep understanding of statistical analysis and experiment design
Experience in data warehousing concepts, big data technologies, and analytics platforms
Development experience with BI platforms such as Looker, Tableau, PeriscopeData
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Experience managing multiple cross-functional stakeholders
Experience collecting business requirements and working with engineering teams to implement marketing data pipelines
Top-notch organizational skills and ability to manage multiple projects in a fast-paced environment
Move fast, be a team player, always be learning and give back",3.9,"ORS Partners
3.9",Pennsylvania,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
457,Senior Pharmacy Data Quality Analyst,-1,"A nonprofit health company in New York City is currently seeking an experienced professional to join their staff as their new Senior Pharmacy Data Quality Analyst. In this role, the Senior Pharmacy Data Quality Analyst will be responsible for developing and maintaining databases and analytics utilized for quality performance improvement and patient safety planning efforts, decision-making and improvement opportunities.

Responsibilities:

The Senior Pharmacy Data Quality Analyst will:

Create and provide reporting for HEDIS measures to support Enterprise Quality Initiatives
Collaborate with other department staff to convert HEDIS data sources for use in HEDIS reporting as needed
Build Enterprise reporting for various STAR metrics including Medication Adherence in order to close gaps and achieve Enterprise Stars goals
Support operational dashboard efforts to record member’s metrics for HEDIS and STARS measures
Collaborate with Department Leadership to develop and maintain reports, database tools, and provide analytical support for key strategic initiatives
Serve as a technical liaison for the Pharmacy Department and assist with outside vendors to ensure technical needs are being supported
Troubleshoot data inconsistencies and identify resolutions to improve reporting processes
Explain data models, requirements and quality issues to non-data savvy users

Qualifications:

2+ years of related work experience
Bachelor’s Degree in Business, Finance, Health Administration, Mathematics, Sciences, and/or Information Technology
Experience in a Pharmaceutical setting
Solid analytical, problem solving and time management skills
Great interpersonal skills
Excellent communication skills (written and verbal)
Strong attention to detail
Highly organized

Desired Skills:

Master's Degree in a related field",3.7,"The Execu|Search Group
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
458,Data Science Support Analyst (Journeyman),"$84k-$140k
(Glassdoor Est.)","BAE Systems is seeking to hire multiple Journeyman Data Science Support Analysts to help support counterterrorism intelligence integration on a multifaceted U.S. Government program. The Journeyman Data Science Support Analyst will leverage numerous analytic tools and databases to evaluate information that bolsters the U.S. Government’s response to and prevention of potential threats to the homeland and interests abroad.

The Journeyman Data Science Support Analyst is responsible for constructing scripts and configuring controls to support analysts performing repeatable complex database queries in multiple databases. This role is responsible for creating automated-scripting to assist analysts with data discovery. Responsibilities include working independently and collaboratively to identify and implement solutions.

Required Skills and Education

Degree : BA/BS in a technical field such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science (6 years of work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor's degree)
Experience supporting complex data science and analytic projects
Experience/knowledge of computer science concepts including programming, statistics, data architecture, and data analytics
Experience with quantitative and qualitative content analytics
Excellent reading comprehension skills
Detail-oriented with a proficiency for researching, analyzing, and prioritizing intelligence reports and cables
Ability to work with IC tools and databases
Strong problem-solving, analytic, and written and oral communication skills
Excellent attention to detail and ability to accurately follow SOPs
Ability to work shift work/extended hours
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work well both independently and in a team environment

Preferred Skills and Education

Demonstrated knowledge of intelligence analysis and experience with synthesizing large amounts of data
Familiarity with analytic tools; experience with constructing and performing complex database search queries across multiple databases
Proficiency with software applications/databases used in support of research and analysis for the U.S. Government

About BAE Systems Intelligence & Security
BAE Systems Intelligence & Security, based in McLean, Virginia, designs and delivers advanced defense, intelligence, and security solutions that support the important missions of our customers. Our pride and dedication shows in everything we do—from intelligence analysis, cyber operations and IT expertise to systems development, systems integration, and operations and maintenance services. Knowing that our work enables the U.S. military and government to recognize, manage and defeat threats inspires us to push ourselves and our technologies to new levels. That’s BAE Systems. That’s Inspired Work.",3.8,"BAE Systems
3.8","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
459,Data Analyst,"$37k-$67k
(Glassdoor Est.)","SUMMARY

A mid-level position in the finance department reporting to the Senior Data Analyst or Financial Analysis Manager responsible for developing and overseeing various data management, analysis, and reporting solutions for key stakeholders across the organization.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES The following statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by an individual assigned to this job. Other duties may be assigned.

• Provide support to teams and management by creating, maintaining, and analyzing reports to identify issues, trends, and opportunities.

• Collaborate with various departments to determine reporting needs as well as develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize efficiency and quality while driving business growth.

• Streamline existing, and introduce enhanced, modeling, reporting, and analysis solutions that leverage large, complex data sets derived from multiple sources.

• Interpret data model and report results and communicate meaningful insights to senior and executive management in a non-technical manner.

• Seek out new sources of data for incorporation into existing collection, analysis, and reporting workflows.

• Educate end users about features and functions of new reports and dashboards.

• Ad hoc requests, special projects, and other duties, as necessary.

EDUCATION/YEARS EXPERIENCE

• Bachelor’s degree in data science, analytics, statistics, economics, business, or other quantitative field.

• 1-2 years experience with data management, modeling, visualization, and analysis.

REQUIREMENTSTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES

• Capability of programming in SQL as well as R and/or Python (VBA and DAX a plus) and demonstrated experience working with large relational databases.

• General understanding of database design and development, data sources, and data feeds used to populate reports and dashboards.

• Familiarity with applications used to support data analytics, data visualization, and report and dashboard development such as Tableau, Power BI, and JD Edwards EnterpriseOne One View Reporting.

• Strong grasp of applied statistical tools and methodologies, including effective research design.

• Proficiency in Microsoft Office with advanced knowledge of Excel and Access.

• Exceptional interpersonal, analytical, problem-solving, and organizational skills with the capacity to handle multiple, high-priority projects with a keen attention to detail.

• Experience in the trading card, memorabilia, or toy/game industries highly preferred.

• Excellent oral and written communication skills with an ability to interface with all levels of the organization.

• Energetic intellectual curiosity with a desire to learn and apply new skills.

• Committed to contributing to a collaborative, adaptable work environment focused on team success.

• Ability to handle confidential or otherwise sensitive information with appropriate discretion.",2.8,"Upper Deck
2.8","Carlsbad, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1988,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
460,Data Analyst,-1,"Total Solutions, Inc. (TSI) is recruiting for a full-time Data Analyst to support FEMA offices in Washington, DC.
Duties:
In this role you’ll work on defining, measuring and process improvements for our internal teams. As a member of the Business Process Improvement team, the Data Analyst creates analysis that drives process improvements and measure effectiveness of improvements.
As a Data Analyst, you will:
Understand your stakeholders’ objectives, the metrics that are the most important to them, and how they measure their performance.
Turn business requirements into technical requirements
Find and understand the correct data sources for a given analysis
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements including automating manual processes and optimizing data delivery
Shape how our team manipulates and visualizes data
Advocate and strategize ways for our Sales and service groups to move faster and more efficiently
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree plus 2 years’ experience
6 years’ work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor’s Degree
Associate’s Degree plus 4 years’ work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor’s Degree",4.1,"Total Solutions, Inc.
4.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
461,Data Analyst,"$54k-$97k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Number: R0092656

Data Analyst, Mid

Key Role:

Provide business and technical expertise to analyze interacting operational activities of military and governmental policies, plans, and processes to obtain a quantitative, rational basis for decision making and resource allocation. Apply advanced consulting and extensive technical expertise, including modeling, statistical methods, operational mathematical techniques, and other principles and laws of scientific and economic disciplines in determining solutions. Coordinate with Navy enlisted manpower stakeholders from across the enterprise to develop innovative solutions to complex business problems. Work without considerable direction and mentor and supervise team members.

Basic Qualifications:

-7+ years of experience in a professional work environment

-Experience with data analysis using methodologies, including statistics, data modeling, forecasting, and optimization

-Experience with data visualization and dashboard development

-Experience with Microsoft Office, including Excel and Access database development

-Ability to learn organizational policy and guidance on-the-fly and apply that to in-house data analytic efforts to address key organizational and process challenges

-Ability to take on multiple roles, including information management, analytic methodology, and decision framework development

-Possession of excellent oral and written communications skills, including synthesizing findings into written communications, including briefings or point papers and presenting them to organizational leadership to inform decision making

-Secret clearance

-BA or BS degree

Additional Qualifications:

-Experience with Navy or DoD

-MA or MS degree

Clearance:

Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; Secret clearance is required.

We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.

#LI-AH1",3.9,"Booz Allen Hamilton Inc.
3.9","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1914,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
462,Entry Level Data Analyst,-1,"W3Global has recently partnered with a client in the Cocoa, Fl area who is seeking an Entry Level Data Analyst to join their team. This is a Direct Hire/Permanent position with opportunities for growth and advancement. The Data Analyst must have strong knowledge in SQL servers along with excellent analytical skills.

Responsibilities:
Offer immediate first level technical support to all levels of staff including: Management, Accounting, Collections, General Legal Staff, Attorneys, etc.
Case Management System (QLaw preferred)
Microsoft Office products
Updating and maintaining document templates
Building SFTPs for client interactions
Building interfaces for existing/new clients data transfers
Maintain vendor relations for importing/exporting, such as:
Bankruptcy software - daily updates
Credit reporting updates/scoring
Letter vendor - bulk mailing
Copier/printer troubleshooting
Mail Vendor maintenance and troubleshooting
Support requests for performance reports, forecasting, financial status, liquidation, etc.
Provide solutions for efficiency, automation, and workflow
Collaborate with team to resolve help desk matters
Excellent communication skills
Basic knowledge in Sharepoint
Basic knowledge in Word press
Dialer knowledge preferred
Required:
Associates or Bachelor's Degree in computer science or relevant experience
At least 3-4 years working in SQL Server 2008 and up
At least 2 years working with VB.NET language
Working knowledge in SSRS & SSIS as well as Crystal Reports
Troubleshooting skills",4.2,"W3Global
4.2","Cocoa, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
463,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description


Data Analyst
Carlsbad, CA.
3 Months Contract


Overview
Experienced data analyst to provide both database programming capabilities and analyze complex datasets.
This person will provide analysis on all data related subjects, from identifying and extracting data, creating both relational and non-relational Data Marts, and drive database requirements with IT for the LSG Group.
This person will also be a hands-on programmer who will integrate multiple complex marketing, finance and e-business data sources into easily consumable visualizations and generate marketing insights.
This role will analyze, design and develop an efficient data framework and will use the architecture to support Marketing and Data Science initiatives.
Qualifications:
5 years Data Engineering experience - design, develop, deliver and maintain large-scale and well-documented robust “data marts” to drive data insights.
5 years SQL experience - Extensive knowledge and vast experience with SQL Queries (various joins, correlated subqueries, knowledge of recursive queries).
5 years Scripting experience in Linux Shell Scripting and Python. Scripting ability to understand and translate scripts written in legacy languages such as Perl.
5 years of experience in building reports and visualization using Power BI and Power BI Premium. Experience maintaining and troubleshooting on-premise Data Gateway. Experience with DAX and ability to create appealing visualization for derived datasets.
3 years of experience working with multiple ERPs (E1, SAP, etc.) and SFDC as main CRM.
3 years of extensive Data Modeling experience - Star schema, 3rd Normal form, partitions etc.
Drives communication, strong communicator, shows initiative, works well with stakeholders.
Able to troubleshoot the data issues in dashboarding or reporting tools (Power BI, SFDC, Cognos, etc.) and suggest solutions.
Ability to anticipate hidden nuances and potential pitfalls in complex data sets.
Great communication skills. Able to present executive summaries of actionable insights and recommendations to executives.
Collaborate with the immediate and broader functional team to help provide holistic actionable insights.
Apply by creating/using an account

Quick Apply

Quick Apply
x
Your Email
Upload Resume
Browse
Upload Resume
Upload from Google Drive
Upload from Dropbox
Upload from your device
Message
OK

Cancel
Quick Apply
x
Your Email
Upload Resume
Browse
Upload Resume
Upload from Google Drive
Upload from Dropbox
Upload from your device
Message
OK

Cancel
Data Processing Agreement
x
In order to support your job search to the best of our ability, we request your consent for our recruiting company to collect, store and reasonably disclose your resume and/or personal information for the sole purpose of job placement.

Our company is committed to maintaining your privacy. Upon receiving your consent, your data will be maintained in accordance with all applicable laws, and we will take every reasonable measure to ensure that this information is kept secure against unauthorized loss, disclosure or destruction. We will retain your information as necessary for the fulfillment of the purposes for which it was collected, subject to reasonable legal limitation periods, statutory or regulatory retention requirements and legitimate business requirements. However, you have the right to request your data be removed from our database in accordance with any applicable legal requirements and regulations.
I Agree

Cancel
Data Processing Agreement
x
In order to support your job search to the best of our ability, we request your consent for our recruiting company to collect, store and reasonably disclose your resume and/or personal information for the sole purpose of job placement.

Our company is committed to maintaining your privacy. Upon receiving your consent, your data will be maintained in accordance with all applicable laws, and we will take every reasonable measure to ensure that this information is kept secure against unauthorized loss, disclosure or destruction. We will retain your information as necessary for the fulfillment of the purposes for which it was collected, subject to reasonable legal limitation periods, statutory or regulatory retention requirements and legitimate business requirements. However, you have the right to request your data be removed from our database in accordance with any applicable legal requirements and regulations.
I Agree

Cancel
Message
x
You've applied! Good luck!
OK
Message
x
You've applied! Good luck!
OK
x
Application for job

#

20-02471

,

Data Analyst
Sign in
Email
Password
Forgot your password?

Sign in

Don't have an account yet?
Register
x
Application for job

#

20-02471

,

Data Analyst
Sign in
Email
Password
Forgot your password?

Sign in

Don't have an account yet?
Register",4.1,"Cogent Infotech
4.1","Carlsbad, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
464,Data Analyst,-1,"DATA ANALYST I, II, or III

WHY WORK WITH EDULOG?

Work with talented, interesting, and fun co-workers in a growing and dynamic company! EDULOG offers exciting opportunities to enhance your career in a custom software company. You will join teams that improve student transportation systems across the U.S. and internationally, most specifically by partnering with new and long-term customers whose relationships are key to EDULOG’s success. If you are looking for a dynamic company in which to expand your knowledge and experience professional growth, consider EDULOG for a collaborative atmosphere where quality customer attention and your efforts are appreciated. SUMMARY & OBJECTIVE Specialty Services team staff are responsible for advanced aspects of application analysis, support, triage, and product functions. Team members develop creative and effective ways of addressing customer concerns, in order to maintain a high level of customer satisfaction. The person in this position is responsible for analyzing, defining, and proposing client software problem fixes. Efforts are focused on advanced software features - developing software enhancements, improving existing software, developing new modules, and adding functions in collaboration with school districts, end-users, and project managers. This person reports to the company headquarters’ Specialty Services Manager and/or AVP of Client Services. PRIMARY FUNCTIONS  Test software code coordinates testing with multiple users, compiles and analyzes test results, makes corrections and improvements as necessary to tune programs for optimum performance, for the purpose of ensuring proper system utility and advancing program functioning.  Organize and facilitate client problem-solving sessions to better understand user preferences for product development and software functionality  Help define and report back on key performance indicators in order to drive product development  Improves client references by writing and maintaining documentation  Improves practical software application by recommending methods and techniques for the overall system performance  Support EDULOG’s proprietary routing and planning school bus delivery system software used by School Districts primarily in the US and Canada  Attends to customer quality improvement needs.  Offers courteous and responsive customer service.  Continuous learning and awareness of technology changes affecting company products. Smarter Transportation. Education Logistics, Inc. | 3000 Palmer Street | Missoula, MT 59808 | www.edulog.com Education Logistics, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer.  Contributes to team project outcomes and overall collaboration with co-workers. EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS & QUALIFICATIONS  1+ years of previous technical application support experience 6 months related to data analysis and software troubleshooting experience. Courteous, responsive, and articulate verbal and written communication skills  Technical program & project analysis skills. Transportation industry experience preferred. Criminal background clearance required to comply with school district contracts EDULOG offers experienced mentors and a congenial workplace in which to experience professional growth and development. Join us!

TO APPLY: Please visit our website at https://www.edulog.com/employment/ to complete an application, and submit your cover letter and resume.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $1.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.edulog.com/employment/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.4,"EDULOG
2.4","Missoula, MT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
465,Data Analyst,"$54k-$97k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Max Experience (yrs): 5 7 years ( not more than that) Job description: 4 5 years of industry experience in statistical data analysis Experience with data structures, algorithms, object-oriented design and patterns. Experience gathering and analysing requirements for Data and Analytics solutions Responsible for gathering and assessing business information needs and preparing system and data requirements. Performs analyses and profiling of the data, create detailed mapping documentation including transformation rules. Assesses evolving business requirements to include establishing, evaluating, and validating technical requirements Understanding of data governance and data management concepts Knowledge of dimensional/data modelling concepts Strong communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills Master's degree is preferred",3.9,"Netpace, Inc.
3.9","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
466,Healthcare Data Quality Analyst,-1,"GoAhead Solutions has a great opportunity in Chicago, IL for a Healthcare Data Quality Analyst. This would be a Six to Twelve-month contract to start out.

Job Description:

The Enterprise Data Quality Analyst - Customer Data Domain requires a candidate with strong data management background who understands data, data ingestion, proper use/consumption, data quality, and stewardship. In this role you will perform data quality processes, measurements, and analyses to assess patterns, identify root cause, define data quality rules, champion automated measurement, and partner with stakeholders to identify data improvement opportunities.

Responsibilities

-Implement data quality rules, automated measurement/monitoring, issues management framework, operational dashboards, and predictive models for proactive data quality assessment and identification of improvement opportunities.

-Work with source systems and downstream data consumers to apply advanced data quality techniques through automation to remediate issues, and implement processes to monitor data quality risks, including:

-Analyzing data quality results.

-Measuring and auditing large volumes of data for quality issues and improvements.

-Performing root cause analysis of data anomalies.

-Triaging data quality issues and creating remediation plans.

-Evaluating and quantifying the business impact of data quality issues and making recommendations for data improvements including required process and system changes.

-Develop data quality policies, procedures, best practices, and related knowledge content.

-Collaborate with stakeholders to ensure data quality best practices are implemented across enterprise data assets.

-Lead efforts to communicate the quality of enterprise data assets and the value realized through data improvement efforts.

-Orchestrate data quality work within the Agile framework and other methodologies where required for on-time delivery of data quality measures and results to stakeholders.

Qualifications

-5+ years’ experience of doing data quality analysis, root cause investigations, and remediation (not application testing).

-5+ years’ experience working with data tools such as SQL, R, Python, SAS, Looker, Tableau, Hue, and TOAD.

-Experience and working knowledge of data in a healthcare data management environment.

-Experience in migrating manual data quality processes to an automated, sustainable framework.

We Are Actively Hiring on VirtualFair!

About VirtualFair:

Virtualfair is every Recruiter’s Best Friend. It is a hiring platform that assists both job seekers and recruiters for the best virtual interview experience. Virtualfair saves time and resources to help companies hire, while we also commit to delivering the best potential candidates to our clients, like Nike, Pierpoint, Office Depot, and more through sourcing and engaging. Virtualfair offers an improved process for engagement, creating awareness, and pipelining candidates.

VirtualFair features include:

* Invites and screens diverse qualified candidates

* Intuitive video platform with no attendee limit

* One-on-One breakout sessions with recruiters

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Schedule:
* Monday to Friday",4.9,"GoAhead Solutions
4.9","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2001,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
467,Data Analyst,-1,"What Is The Job?

As a Private Equity Data Analyst on our team, you will be working with our Advanced Analytics team that includes a data scientist and data engineer to find and execute actionable insights to improve the business of our portfolio companies.

You will need excellent communication skills because you will be communicating with the CEO and other C-level executives, as well as their technology teams, to transfer reports to actionable insights. You will design, develop and implement reports to fulfill business requirements and lead the development of business and functional requirements to ensure effective working relationships with the business department

This role is located in New York City, but for the time-being we are all working remote, but we hope to return to our office in the near future.

Who Are We?

We are a family investment office located in Downtown New York City. We make long-term majority ownership investments in middle-market businesses and work hands-on with our companies to help support long-term growth and success. We pride ourselves on an excellent work culture and make sure to uphold those expectations across all platforms of the company.

What Skills Do You Need?
Excellent communications Skills
Snowflake
Tableau
SQL
PowerBI is a plus
Outgoing and energetic personality
Compensation?
$140,000 - $160,000
15% Targe Bonus
Full Medical, Dental and Vision Benefits
Very lucrative matching 401k
What’s in it for you?

This is an opportunity to join a company and have an immediate impact. We offer a great culture and stability. As an analyst if you are looking to make a pivot in the near future and get into Data Engineering or Machine Learning Engineering, this opportunity gives you a clear path to move into that position.",5.0,"Averity
5.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
468,Data Analyst,-1,"About Us *
At Orchid Health we believe that rural community members deserve to have accessible, high-quality healthcare that is local, comprehensive, and takes the time to address what matters most to each individual. We are driven by health equity, innovation, and teamwork.

We currently operate three Rural Health Clinics; in Oakridge, Blue River, and Estacada, Oregon, where we provide comprehensive primary, preventative, behavioral health, and dental care services to approximately 4,000 patients. We are headquartered in NE Portland, although most of our admin staff split time between traveling out to our clinics, working remotely, and working at HQ. This position will split time between working at our HQ office and remotely.

At Orchid Health, we strive to be a place where a diverse mix of talented people want to come, to stay, and do their best work. We believe in diversity of race, gender, sexual orientation, religion, ethnicity, national origin, and all the other fascinating characteristics that make us different.

We believe this is a great position for someone who identifies with the following:
You have a creative spirit, one that pushes you to experiment, remain flexible, and solve problems with a new, fresh perspective.
You have an insatiable drive to discover actionable insights, you constantly ask questions and search for solutions.
Curiosity fuels you and the possibility of failure does not scare you.
The data analyst position’s primary goal is to turn data into information, information into insight and insight into business decisions.

In this role, you will be in charge of reporting quality measures and company KPIs for all clinic sites, creating new reports to measure improvement initiative success, and supporting the Billing and Administrative Director, Clinic Manager, QI Team, Executive Director, and other leadership team member data requests.
Responsibilities *
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports that are easy to access and understand for clinical staff
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets and present findings
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports and performing manual audits
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Support our Quality Improvement Committee to define new process improvement opportunities and the supporting data elements to measure improvement
Qualifications/Experience *
3+ years experience working as a healthcare data analyst
BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics Quality Improvement in healthcare experience preferred
Understanding of lean methodologies preferred
Skills *
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages and databases to include Google Sheets, Excel, and EHR systems.
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques.
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets.
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy.
Adept at queries, report writing, and presenting findings in a user-friendly way.
Position Specifics*
Compensation: $26.00-$28.00/hour DOE
Hours per week: Part-time (26-28hours per week) hourly position
Work location: Portland office, clinics, and work from home as agreed upon.
For more information about Orchid visit www.orchidhealth.org.

Job Types: Full-time, Part-time

Pay: $26.00 - $28.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Healthcare : 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Portland, OR 97217 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Company's website:
https://www.orchidhealth.org/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply",5.0,"Orchid Health
5.0","Portland, OR",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
469,Data Analyst,"$40k-$73k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Published Job Title:
Data Analyst - Service Operations

Location:
BRKFD-Brookfield

Position:
MAF006-Data Analyst

Job Summary::

Milwaukee Tool's service experience is a customer expectation and a competitive advantage. As Service grows larger and faster and is more data-driven, we are seeking a Data Analyst to support our operations and innovations.

This position will be tightly integrated with all operational and commercial aspects of Service, as well as its support functions like Finance, Supply Chain, and others. In addition to creating and deploying ""single source of truth"" analytics, this role will use its knowledge of the Service business and operations to accurately articulate past and present performance, project future activities and results, identify new business and operational opportunities, and provide early warning of issues or concerns. As such, we want a Data Analyst who is business savvy, detail oriented, entrepreneurial, and who won't allow the status-quo to impede on innovation.

The ideal candidate will be able to demonstrate experience in:
Effectively communicating and interacting with business and technical personnel in evaluating and solving complex business problems.
Reviewing historical results and trends, current performance, and future projections and forecasts to develop clear, accurate, and repeatable business models.
Analyzing and researching opportunities for improvement, and clearly documenting action steps for desired change.
Interacting with multiple locations, business units, and cross-functional teams to drive consistency and standardization across the enterprise.
Leveraging both new and existing technologies to create reports, dashboards, scorecards, and visualizations that clearly measure KPIs. Teaching end-users how to interpret and use to maximum effect.
Working with the end users to understand requirements, formulate use cases, and translate needs into effective solutions.
Education and experience requirements:
Requires a Bachelor's Degree in mathematics, statistics, computer/data science, supply chain, or economics.
Minimum 1 years' experience working with data warehouses, data visualization techniques, & BI development tools.
Experience working in service or manufacturing environments is preferred.
Expert-level knowledge of Microsoft Suite, including Excel, VBA, & PowerPivot.
Advanced-level knowledge of SQL Server and relational data.
Experience with programming and computing languages; Power BI & R preferred.
Functional knowledge of corporate finances.
Oral and written communication skills for presentations to all levels of plant and management teams.
Occasional travel will be required, up to 10%-15%. Travel is generally domestic and short durations. Destinations can include Milwaukee Tool facilities as well as customer and supplier locations
Minimum Requirements::

Shift::
1st Shift

Full/Part Time:
Full-time

Pay Range::",4.6,"Milwaukee Tool
4.6","Brookfield, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1924,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
470,Senior Technical Data Analyst,"$86k-$149k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


As a senior member of the analytics team, you will have a strong track record of combining advanced analytical skills with exceptional business and entrepreneurial acumen. You will also have an ownership mindset with a strong willingness to take on new challenges with enthusiasm.

Data is central to Intuits decision-making process, and analysts are a critical component to evangelize data-driven decision making.
What you'll bring
Bachelors degree in a quantitative field - Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering or related fields; Masters preferred.
5+ years of work experience involving quantitative data analysis.
Database experience with advanced SQL skills; experience researching and manipulating complex and large data sets; Hadoop experience a plus.
Proficient in analytical and modelling tools, such as Python, R or SAS
Experience with business systems such as Salesforce, Connect, EWFM
Experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau, Qlik
Experience with A/B test and experimental design

How you will lead
Partner closely with business and technical teams to understand their project objectives and provide data-driven solutions and recommendations.
Ability to sift through large amounts of information, extract the key insights, and communicate succinctly at all levels of leadership.
Design and develop data preparation components and processes that extract and transform data across disparate database tables by creating aggregates tables for reporting and analytics, ensuring integrity of analysis data by developing the requirement specifications and assisting the development and testing of data tables.
Apply existing data mining techniques descriptive and predictive modeling tools, and methodologies and/or design new data mining algorithms to drive solutions.
Partner directly with the product development team on product instrumentation, product flow and data capture.
Ensures solutions are scalable, repeatable, efficient and effective.",4.6,"Intuit - Data
4.6","Woodland Hills, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
471,Data Analyst,"$37k-$67k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Overview

Donegal Insurance Group is a regional property-casualty insurance company doing business in 26 states, headquartered in Marietta, PA, with 7 regional offices located in Athens, GA, Le Mars, IA, Grand Rapids, MI, Albuquerque, NM, Greenville, OH, Glen Allen, VA, and Sheboygan Falls, WI.

Donegal offers a broad range of personal and commercial insurance products sold exclusively through our network of independent agents. We are committed to the independent agency system and proud of the company's heritage, which spans over 130 years. Donegal's strong financial foundation and successful operating strategies have earned the company a rating of 'A' (Excellent) by the A.M. Best Company, the nation's leading insurance rating organization.

Job Summary

Donegal Insurance Group has an opening for a Data Analyst to work in the Business Intelligence area. Primary responsibility will be to provide data for business intelligence solutions for all functional areas based on business need. This role will work closely with IT to acquire data, identify analytical requirements and perform business analysis using various techniques, e.g. statistical analysis, explanatory and predictive modeling, data mining. This role will help in determining best practices and develop actionable insights and recommendations for the current business operations. This role will help ensure business intelligence applications and analyses enhance business decision-making capabilities.

Responsibilities and Duties
Based on business requirements, provide data from multiple sources for use in building analytical solutions which enhance decision-making and/or refine operations.
Aid in the interpretation of results from multiple sources using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation to complex data mining.
Coordinate the use of data to develop, modify, and enhance reports and dashboards based on user requirements.
Create, enhance, and maintain data models/sets.
Identify business trends and problems through data analysis.
Collaborate with business users and members of IT, including business analysts, database architects, and managers.
Gather and document user requirements.
Perform usability testing and report data validation against end user requirements.
Gain familiarity with data structure in the Donegal data warehouse and various data marts.
Exhibit a commitment to data quality by validating results against requirements.
Ensure duties are performed in adherence to all Federal, State, and Local laws and regulations.
Comply with guidelines, policies, and directives outlined in the company handbook and department manuals.
Provide timely, courteous, and quality customer service to customers.
Clearly demonstrate commitment and participation to team goals and objectives.
Reliable attendance and punctuality.
Qualifications and Skills
Bachelors Degree in Business Intelligence, Computer Sciences, Information Technology, Data Science, Data & Analytics, Mathematics, Statistics, Actuarial Science or related field required.
1-2 years of related experience preferred.
Experience working with property/casualty insurance preferred
PC skills to include:
Microsoft Office applications
Power BI, SSRS and Excel
SQL
Oracle
Relational and dimensional modeling concepts
DAX and M expression languages
Open-Source Software (e.g. R / Python)
Benefits

Donegal Insurance Group offers a comprehensive benefits package for all full-time, permanent positions. Learn more about our benefit offerings by visiting our Benefits page.

Additional Information

Donegal Insurance Group participates in E-Verify in the following states: Alabama, Arizona, Georgia, Louisiana, Mississippi, Nebraska, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, and Utah. If you reside in one of the listed states, please review the ""Notice of E-Verify Participation"" and the ""Right to Work Poster"" on the links below:
Notice of E-Verify Participation Poster (English and Spanish)
Right to Work Poster (English and Spanish)
Powered by JazzHR",3.7,"Donegal Insurance Group
3.7","Marietta, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1889,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
472,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Responsibilities: *
Provides data driven input, with insight and forward-thinking recommendations to business leaders.
Interpret, evaluate and interrelate company and research data and develop integrated business analyses and projections for incorporation into strategic decision making
Consistently provide proactive and prescriptive analytics
Monitor daily/weekly/monthly metrics and alert business leaders to issues and trends
Conduct insightful, ad hoc analyses to investigate ongoing or one-time operational issues
Analyze business activities and present results and recommendations to enhance operational strategies both for awareness, effectiveness and overall financial benefit.
Review business processes via analysis and involvement to develop optimization strategies the focus on value-add work.
Develop predictive models of customer value, behavior, and responsiveness based on various business activities related to Fraud, Fed Gov, Account Management, Account Recovery, Sales, HR, and Underwriting
Recognizes and communicates financial implications of business decisions and strategy.
Provides support related to data needs stored within databases, including Domo reports.
Maintains relationship with IT and Finance teams to assure data accuracy and integrity.
Conduct and coordinate financial, product, market, operational and related research to support strategic and business planning within the departments you support
Creates process procedures, standards, and flows for current and future state initiatives/analysis.
Completes special projects as assigned for various departments such as Fed Gov, Account Management, Account Recovery, Sales, HR, and Underwriting
Ensure all deliverables adhere to department quality and delivery standards.
Maintaining and staying up to date on the latest analytical tools and trends.
Lead meetings and develop presentations to easily explain analysis and drive actionable results.
Actively participate and partner in operational department financial related meetings.
Incorporate proven modeling that provides future predictions on business operations and financial status.
Requirements & Preferred Skills: *
Bachelor's in Economics, Decision Sciences, Mathematics, Finance or related field
Minimum of 3 years of business analysis experience
Four or more years of extensive experience with SAS and other statistical software packages
Minimum of two years of experience with VBA, SQL, Microsoft Access, BI/data visualization
Advanced Analytic Techniques: Knowledge of advanced quantitative analytic techniques and protocols used to build necessary business models
Advanced knowledge with data analytics and data mining
Experience working with cross-functional teams to build consensus and project plans
Contract length: 8 months

Job Type: Contract

Work Remotely:
No",-1,Microagility,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
473,Data Analyst,-1,"Overview:
Based in Northern, VA, Axiologic Solutions LLC has opportunities for you to become part of our high-quality team that delivers innovative solutions to key Federal clients.

Position is contingent based on awarded contract.

Responsibilities: Data Analysts use technology to mine complex, voluminous, and different varieties of data from various sources and platforms in order to collect, analyze, and compile data to meet customer needs. Data Analysts will perform the following duties:

Identify new sources of data and methods to improve data collection, analysis, and reporting
Collect customer requirements
Determine technical issues
Design algorithms and data manipulation capabilities using R, Python, C++, JavaScript, Go, and other known programming languages.
Build data solutions, tools, and capabilities to enable self-service frameworks for data consumers to monitor and report on data.
Improve the quality of data use and usability by driving an understanding and adherence to the principles of data quality management including metadata, lineage, and business definitions
Work collaboratively with Intelligence and Data analysis teams to produce qualitative and quantitative data that support Intelligence products.
Qualifications:

Possess a minimum of a bachelor's degree in a computer science discipline.
Experience providing services similar in required tasks, scope, and complexity.
Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.

Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.

Applicants with a physical or mental disability, who require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, may e-mail their request to Jennifer.chavira@axiologicsolutions.com, call 571-758-3780, or visit our office at 8280 Willow Oaks Corp. Dr. Suite 450, Fairfax Virginia for assistance. Determinations on request for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.",4.5,"Axiologic Solutions
4.5",Colorado,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
474,Data Analyst,-1,"FAR Government, Inc. (FARGOV) headquartered in Stafford, VA., is a premier, economically disadvantaged woman-owned Small Business that provides federal professional services, primarily engaged in providing advanced information technology, cyber security, management systems support, as well as business and infrastructure management services.

We are among the most innovative, respected and ethical providers of technology solutions to the United States government. Our mission is to provide superior-quality, innovative, information technology solutions that help federal agencies best aid, serve and protect the American people

Duties:

General duties include data entry into government-specific software, review and follow-up of database entries for tracking and proofing/verification, and report generation and error checking as needed.
This position requires accuracy in data entry, so attention to detail is important; the ability to meet crucial deadlines; the ability to work with numbers, financial information/documents; the ability to generate reports from government specific software programs; and the ability to proofread and correct errors on financial reports for accuracy.
Minimum/General Experience:
An Associates degree or a minimum of 3 years of experience in a related field.
Why FAR Government ?

You can take pride in working for a company dedicated to serving our government by providing the best, most cost-effective solutions for the US Government. Our work helps the US Government secure our nation, support the efforts of our military and intelligence communities, and provide lifesaving medical services to our soldiers, vets, and their families.

Please submit your most up-to-date resume. Please be sure to highlight your relevant experience.

FAR Government is an equal opportunity employer and encourages all qualified candidates to apply.

Powered by JazzHR",-1,"FAR Government, Inc.",United States,-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
475,Data Analyst,"$41k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Search by Keyword
More Options

Clear

Loading...

Title

All

Country/Region

All

×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Apply now »



Data Analyst

Date:

Sep 9, 2020

Country/Region:

US

City:

Findlay OH

OH

Job Requisition:

31769

Cooper Tire offers an entirely unique work experience because no matter what your title is, you’ll play a part in contributing to the development, manufacturing and marketing of some of the most innovative tire products in the world. Cooper is a fun and exciting place to work. We are constantly on the lookout for motivated individuals who lead by example and inspire others to greatness. The opportunities are endless and the rewards rich for those who believe that job satisfaction and career success begin with a satisfied customer. Careers are a Journey…Come Ride with Us!

The IT Data Analyst is charged with effectively managing Cooper Tire & Rubber Company’s master data within its ERP/SAP systems. This position will be focused in the Global Operations space supporting the Manufacturing Plants, Corporate Purchasing and Corporate Quality globally but will have opportunities to cross-train in Customer, Material, and other master data functions.

Job Responsibilities:
Maintain data integrity to ensure that standards are being followed and data is consistently maintained and enhanced where possible to meet business needs.Define data standards where required coordinating with appropriate stakeholders.
Facilitate master data workflow processes by working directly with customers to ensure timely completion and process adherence.
Understanding of Technical business and strategy to execute and support the development and utilization of effective and insightful reports and visualizations.
Initiate and participate in projects or actions to improve the overall performance and quality of master data handling, including workflow development, data profiling, data score-carding and creation and maintenance of data dictionaries.
Provide on-demand/ad-hoc data manipulation/analysis as requested by Technical business.
Design of Technical Data Strategy based on Global strategy (IT and Global Operations).
Review requests for new or modified master data to ensure they are in line with business rules.
Respond to or appropriately redirect all Technical data requests.
Collaborate with other data analysts within IT and the businessareas globally to standardize data and set strategy to support all business analytics.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Marketing, or Business related field
2+ years of experience in Data Management, Business Administration, Product development, Marketing/Customer Service
Strong communication skills and the ability to work with all levels of the business, employees, consultants, and contractors
Team oriented with the ability to promote the successful advancement of the group
High quality analytical skills, the ability to pay attention to details
Self-motivated and the capability to work with limited direction
Ability to identify priorities, deadlines, and expectations and execute assignments accordingly
Preferred Qualifications:
Green Belt Certification
Experience working with SAP Master Data & data structures
Experience with Winshuttle Foundation and Studio
Working knowledge of Service Now tools
Cooper Tire is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. We strive to recruit, develop and retain top candidates by providing an engaging culture and opportunities to grow and develop. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, status as an individual with a disability or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.

Nearest Major Market: Lima
Nearest Secondary Market: Findlay
Job Segment:
Database, Data Analyst, ERP, Product Development, SAP, Technology, Data, Research

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Information Technology

Apply now »



Data Analyst

Date:

Sep 9, 2020

Country/Region:

US

City:

Findlay OH

OH

Job Requisition:

31769

Cooper Tire offers an entirely unique work experience because no matter what your title is, you’ll play a part in contributing to the development, manufacturing and marketing of some of the most innovative tire products in the world. Cooper is a fun and exciting place to work. We are constantly on the lookout for motivated individuals who lead by example and inspire others to greatness. The opportunities are endless and the rewards rich for those who believe that job satisfaction and career success begin with a satisfied customer. Careers are a Journey…Come Ride with Us!

The IT Data Analyst is charged with effectively managing Cooper Tire & Rubber Company’s master data within its ERP/SAP systems. This position will be focused in the Global Operations space supporting the Manufacturing Plants, Corporate Purchasing and Corporate Quality globally but will have opportunities to cross-train in Customer, Material, and other master data functions.

Job Responsibilities:
Maintain data integrity to ensure that standards are being followed and data is consistently maintained and enhanced where possible to meet business needs.Define data standards where required coordinating with appropriate stakeholders.
Facilitate master data workflow processes by working directly with customers to ensure timely completion and process adherence.
Understanding of Technical business and strategy to execute and support the development and utilization of effective and insightful reports and visualizations.
Initiate and participate in projects or actions to improve the overall performance and quality of master data handling, including workflow development, data profiling, data score-carding and creation and maintenance of data dictionaries.
Provide on-demand/ad-hoc data manipulation/analysis as requested by Technical business.
Design of Technical Data Strategy based on Global strategy (IT and Global Operations).
Review requests for new or modified master data to ensure they are in line with business rules.
Respond to or appropriately redirect all Technical data requests.
Collaborate with other data analysts within IT and the businessareas globally to standardize data and set strategy to support all business analytics.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Marketing, or Business related field
2+ years of experience in Data Management, Business Administration, Product development, Marketing/Customer Service
Strong communication skills and the ability to work with all levels of the business, employees, consultants, and contractors
Team oriented with the ability to promote the successful advancement of the group
High quality analytical skills, the ability to pay attention to details
Self-motivated and the capability to work with limited direction
Ability to identify priorities, deadlines, and expectations and execute assignments accordingly
Preferred Qualifications:
Green Belt Certification
Experience working with SAP Master Data & data structures
Experience with Winshuttle Foundation and Studio
Working knowledge of Service Now tools
Cooper Tire is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. We strive to recruit, develop and retain top candidates by providing an engaging culture and opportunities to grow and develop. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, status as an individual with a disability or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.

Nearest Major Market: Lima
Nearest Secondary Market: Findlay
Job Segment:
Database, Data Analyst, ERP, Product Development, SAP, Technology, Data, Research

Apply now »",3.3,"Cooper Tire & Rubber
3.3","Findlay, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1914,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
476,Data Analyst - Payements,-1,"Job Title: Data Analyst - Payments
Location: Menlo Park, CA
Duration: 6 months

Summary:
This position is in the Payments Org.
The mission of the Payments org is to empower everyone to participate in the digital economy.
We are looking for a person who can dive into our payments & operations data, and clearly articulate what is working, and what can be improved.
The job is to be the ""data eyes and ears "" guiding product and operations teams.

Skills:
Good analysis skills
Proficient in SQL & Excel/Tableau, with good quantitative logic
Ability to work with multiple teams to drive real world impact
Good verbal & written communication
Ability to work in a fast paced environment
Attention to details is a must
Experience working with Payments a plus

Education: BA/BS/Masters in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field.

IND123",4.5,"Ursus
4.5","Menlo Park, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
477,Data Analyst,-1,"About Cultivate

Come develop the next generation of leadership coaching.

We’re developing the world’s first AI-powered personal leadership coach. Interested? With a substantial Series A funding round, a great roster of brand name Fortune 500 clients, and an enviable product-market fit, we’ve already got good market traction.

You’ll collaborate with a brilliant team of people on a product that makes the workday better.

About the Role

As a Data Analyst, you will be collaborating in a cross-functional capacity to enable data-driven decision making across all company operations.
Responsibilities include
Drive product impact by proposing and conducting quantitative research into key user behaviors and business trends, in partnership with product managers, engineers, designers, and other team members
Building automated data processes to power real-time dashboards, and building self-service reporting tools to enable others to leverage the data.
Creating analytical frameworks to enable efficient product experimentation, and working closely with engineers on instrumentation to ensure thorough capture of product data.
Defining metrics for measuring product success, and creating the tools to effectively track and troubleshoot said metrics.
Conducting exploratory data analyses to identify product gaps, evangelizing data insights to key stakeholders and defining our product roadmap.
Qualifications
2+ years of industry experience in a relevant role
Experience running A/B tests and a strong understanding of hypothesis testing
Demonstrated knowledge of statistics and statistical software (e.g., Python, R, SPSS, Stata), and fluency in data visualization
Strong SQL skills (i.e. proven ability to tap into and extract insights from our data pipeline)
Strong communication skills with a growth and learning mindset
Ability to translate data into insights for a non-technical audience
Ability to navigate ambiguity and solve problems in a fast-paced environment
Nice to Have
Experience with BI tools like Looker
Experience with tools like Mixpanel and Chameleon
Experience in text and/or time-series analytics
Interest in ML and NLP technologies
Cultivate is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and unique experiences. We are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",5.0,"Cultivate
5.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
478,Data Services Analyst,-1,"Data Services Analyst

Job Description:
Audit Electricity, Gas, Water, and other types of utility invoices using proprietary software
Key data into Excel spreadsheets
Utilize online logins to retrieve customer invoices
Become familiar with utility tariffs
Research and maintain utility tariffs
Verifying system performance and data accuracy (historical, quarterly and as requested)
Monitor, work through, and respond to emails
Load consumption reports of utility data using proprietary software
Provide daily status update related to work queue and tasks
Submit, track, and follow up on IT support tickets
Continuously review processes and software functionality for potential improvements.
Work on projects with others as needed
Once trained, able to work autonomously even in a remote environment if required (work from home)
Other tasks as directed
Skills and Traits:
Detail-oriented – takes pride in work and strives for accuracy
Intermediate level Excel skills
Formulas
Pivot tables
Macros
Reporting capabilities as needed
Proven research abilities
Ability to comprehend complicated documents
Big picture mindset – able to research problems while maintaining a focus on the problem at hand
Ability to multi-task effectively
Ability to interact effectively and professionally with both internal and external contacts
Ability to successfully counterbalance the need for speed with the need for accuracy
Responsible with the ability to work in a flexible work environment and stay motivated to complete work
Able to empathize, listen, and connect with others both socially and emotionally
Ability to remain focused during monotonous tasks
Strong time management and organizational skills
Must be able to self-motivate
Excellent problem-solving skills
Strong aptitude for math
Ability to work deadlines and to realize when extra time is needed
Willingness to work additional hours when needed
Bachelor’s degree required
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $40,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We are currently working from home but plan to return to the office when possible

Experience:
customer: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Tulsa, OK 74120 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.thgenergy.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"THG Energy Solutions, LLC
4.4","Tulsa, OK",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
479,Senior Health Data Analyst,"$79k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Nuna, our mission is to make high-quality healthcare affordable for everyone. We are dedicated to tackling one of our nation's biggest problems with ingenuity, creativity, and a keen moral compass.

Nuna is committed to simple principles: a rigorous understanding of data, modern technology, and most importantly, compassion and care for our fellow human. We want to know what really works, what doesn't—and why.

Nuna partners with healthcare payers, including government agencies, health plans, and employers, to turn data into learnings and information into meaning.

YOUR TEAM


Nuna's products are built to help deliver value-based care, at scale, across the United States healthcare system. Value-based healthcare is a delivery model where providers are paid based on patient health outcomes, instead of traditional fee for service arrangements, driving delivery of higher quality care for patients at lower cost. Today, value-based care is incredibly difficult to operationalize so we're making it easier with products that enable automated, accurate, and transparent operation of value-based payments.

YOUR IMPACT


In this role you'll work as part of a cross-functional team of engineers, healthcare data experts, product managers, and customer liaisons to expand, adapt and configure Nuna's data products towards the delivery of accurate and scalable value-based payment solutions. Along the way, you'll help customers understand what key capabilities our products provide, how to implement and migrate their existing processes to our products, and to identify ways to leverage our product technology to deliver measurable business value. You will also help Nuna's product and engineering team understand clients' needs and pain points to inform product roadmaps.

YOUR OPPORTUNITIES
Lead, coordinate and train team members in supporting and building products for healthcare plans and providers.
Identify and understand clients' needs and pain points in operationalizing value based payment arrangements. Translate and distill them into systematic tactical plans to support scoping and prioritization of development work.
Solicit, interpret and document client business requirements and value based payment methodologies.
Lead and coordinate efforts to verify and validate Nuna's implementation of clients' value based payment models
Collaborate with Product Managers, Engineering, and Design to identify and design new ways to extend Nuna's products to better serve customer needs.
YOU BRING
Bachelor's degree or above in quantitative or engineering fields (Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Health/Medical Informatics, Computer Science, or similar)
6+ years of experience working with healthcare data paired with a passion to connect with, understand, and shape the healthcare industry.
4+ years of client facing experience in the healthcare industry; Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Keen attention to detail and deadline driven.
Proficiency in SQL
BONUSES
Experience with value-driven payment arrangements, healthcare financial models or provider quality measurement strategies.
Experience working at or with health plans or providers.
Experience with Enterprise Software deployment
Nuna is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, genetics and/or veteran status.",4.2,"Nuna
4.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
480,Programmatic Data Analyst,"$70k-$128k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About this Role


We are seeking a Programmatic Data Analyst to join the Fandom Revenue Operations team. The ideal candidate will have a passion for generating quantitative analysis and insights that will drive global programmatic revenue. This role reports to the Director of Revenue Strategy which oversees cross channel yield at Fandom. The role will be focused on improving measurement and refinement of collected data and analysis and make a significant contribution to how Fandom's programmatic inventory is measured, analyzed, and monetized.

You Will...
Own and deliver daily, weekly, monthly programmatic business reporting supporting Sales, Finance, and Executive management
Build, maintain, and monitor key revenue and monetization metrics dashboards
Assist with the development of existing and new reporting tools and resources
Streamline the current reporting process to drive improved yield management insights
Consistently analyze partner performance, optimize as necessary, assist Programmatic Sales with partner insights and deals.
Provide regional inventory and revenue analysis to direct tactical execution of monetization strategies across North America, EMEA and APAC
Contribute to the overall development and implementation of our evolving revenue strategy
You Have...
BA/BS degree in a quantitative/problem-solving discipline (or equivalent training and experience)
2+ years experience in programmatic advertising or programmatic ad tech.
A desire to work on advertising challenges that require flexibility in approach -- everything from on-the-fly analytics to statistics, big data, machine learning, and mathematical algorithms
High level of proficiency in Microsoft Excel (e.g. pivot tables, advanced formulas and lookups); Google Sheets proficiency
Strong interpersonal and communication skills and an ability to collaborate cross functionally with multiple stakeholders across different time zones
Strong organizational skills and a very high degree of attention to detail
Ability to work independently and drive projects to completion in a fast-paced environment
Bonus Points if You Have...
BI and query tools experience, including SQL, Amazon Athena, Tableau, Mode
Experience with log-level data analysis of programmatic media
Experience working with Data engineering teams and/or experience with ETL processes
Benefits & Perks
Stock options
Training based on business needs
Flexible working hours
Open, energetic and fan-focused, international work environment
Miscellaneous perks such as wellness programs, swag, etc.
About Fandom


Fandom is a global entertainment media brand powered by fan passion. The fan-trusted source in entertainment, Fandom provides a home to explore, contribute to, and celebrate the world of pop culture. Whether looking for in-depth information on favorite fandoms or what's buzzing in entertainment, Fandom has your pop culture curiosities covered through fan-expert knowledge and carefully curated and fun, original multi-platform content.

Fandom has a global audience of almost 300 million monthly unique users and encompasses over 400,000 fan communities. We currently feature more than 55 million pages of content, inclusive of video. Our Fandom values are:
We serve a global community.
Connection with our fans, creators, and partners is at our core, and it's grounded by our active efforts of inclusion.
We build experiences.
We imagine, improve, and deliver solutions.
We bring joy.
We celebrate our fandoms, our teammates, and the work we do.
Fandom is an Equal Opportunity Employer

San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance Police Code, Article 49",2.5,"Fandom
2.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Private,News Outlet,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
481,Data Analyst,-1,"_Candidates must be local to Chicago. No sponsorship available. _
Job brief*
We are looking for a passionate Data Analyst to help grow CoinFlip’s brand new Analytics department. The data analyst will pioneer brand new data sources and data usage in a fast-growing and exciting industry.
Data Analyst Job Duties*
The data analyst will own the following: extract data from APIs, SQL databases, and other sources, manipulate and clean data, and turn data into insights. They will develop analysis and reporting capabilities, as well as monitor performance of our ATMs to identify improvements.
Responsibilities*
· Help grow a new Analytics department by pioneering brand new data sources and ways to use the data

· Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from APIs and other sources

· Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in data sets

· Work closely with both business and engineering teams to prioritize needs, monitor data quality and build models

· Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Requirements*
· Advanced SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases

· Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.

· Experience with reporting packages (BI tools, Excel, etc.), databases (SQL etc.), programming (Python, Java, Scala, ETL frameworks, etc.)

· Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, RStudio, SAS etc.)

· Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy

· Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Discount
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Referral Program
Relocation Assistance
Retirement Plan
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Commission Pay
Experience:
Scala: 2 years (Preferred)
SAS: 2 years (Preferred)
Excel: 2 years (Preferred)
BI: 2 years (Preferred)
RStudio: 2 years (Preferred)
Java OR Python: 2 years (Required)
Data Analytics: 2 years (Required)
SQL: 2 years (Required)
Relational Databases: 2 years (Required)
ETL: 2 years (Required)
Location:
Chicago, IL 60622 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
What is your previous experience with cryptocurrency? If none, why are you interested in applying to a cryptocurrency company?
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.coinflip.tech
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/coinflipatm/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,CoinFlip,"Chicago, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
482,Data Analyst,-1,"_Candidates must be local to Chicago. No sponsorship available. _
Job brief*
We are looking for a passionate Data Analyst to help grow CoinFlip’s brand new Analytics department. The data analyst will pioneer brand new data sources and data usage in a fast-growing and exciting industry.
Data Analyst Job Duties*
The data analyst will own the following: extract data from APIs, SQL databases, and other sources, manipulate and clean data, and turn data into insights. They will develop analysis and reporting capabilities, as well as monitor performance of our ATMs to identify improvements.
Responsibilities*
· Help grow a new Analytics department by pioneering brand new data sources and ways to use the data

· Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from APIs and other sources

· Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in data sets

· Work closely with both business and engineering teams to prioritize needs, monitor data quality and build models

· Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Requirements*
· Advanced SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases

· Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.

· Experience with reporting packages (BI tools, Excel, etc.), databases (SQL etc.), programming (Python, Java, Scala, ETL frameworks, etc.)

· Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, RStudio, SAS etc.)

· Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy

· Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Discount
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Referral Program
Relocation Assistance
Retirement Plan
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Commission Pay
Experience:
Scala: 2 years (Preferred)
SAS: 2 years (Preferred)
Excel: 2 years (Preferred)
BI: 2 years (Preferred)
RStudio: 2 years (Preferred)
Java OR Python: 2 years (Required)
Data Analytics: 2 years (Required)
SQL: 2 years (Required)
Relational Databases: 2 years (Required)
ETL: 2 years (Required)
Location:
Chicago, IL 60622 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
What is your previous experience with cryptocurrency? If none, why are you interested in applying to a cryptocurrency company?
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.coinflip.tech
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/coinflipatm/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,CoinFlip,"Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
483,Data Analyst,"$33k-$58k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This position is the campus expert in data architecture and business intelligence and exists to provide campus-wide leadership for the analysis, design, architecture, and support of the enterprise data warehouse and enterprise reporting system for St. Cloud Technical & Community College. This position will create a repository for data, integrating data from multiple data sources, working with departments and senior staff to identify data reporting needs, creating reports and conducting data analysis. The person in this position develops and maintains a data warehouse that key business owners can use to make solid decisions using real-time data. This position will also provide database management system (DBMS) expertise and support for the campus in defining and generating desired information from various databases and the enterprise data mart. In addition, the person in this position is also responsible for providing work direction to the campus card system and commerce transaction system team members.

Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications

Two-year degree in computer science, computer information systems or related field and two years of experience working in enterprise-level database architecture and design, or equivalent combination of work experience and education.
Experience designing and implementing high-availability data mart and data decision systems
Technical knowledge of Microsoft SQL Server 2012 or higher, SQL Server Integration Service (SSIS) (ETL), SQL Server Analysis Services (SSAS) (Cube design), or similar OLAP database experience.
Two years’ experience application development with MS Access, JAVA, VBA or .NET
Two years’ experience using T-SQL for the creation of functions and stored procedures.
Ability to develop reports using SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) or Power BI.
Excellent presentation, communication, project and time management skills
Project management skills sufficient to manage multiple projects simultaneously, create clear and attainable project objectives, build project requirements, time and scope of projects, manage project constraints, and communicate progress and end results.
Problem solving skills sufficient to perform fault isolation and initiate corrective action
Experience working with different Operating Systems (UNIX and Windows)

Preferred Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in a computer science related field
Skills in web programming languages such as PHP.
Advanced Technical knowledge of Microsoft SQL Server 2012 or higher, SQL Server Integration Service (SSIS) (ETL), SQL Server Analysis Services (SSAS) (Cube design), or similar OLAP database experience.
Experience with the Blackboard Transaction System
Experience working with POS (point of sale) systems
Knowledge of TCP/IP and network management
Experience administering a print management system
Knowledge of PCI-DSS (payment card industry data security standard)
Experience with ISRS database (CAP Server) for day to day operation
Demonstrated knowledge of policies and issues relating to campus card offices.
Experience designing, implementing and supporting enterprise applications
Prior working knowledge of MDX in relation to OLAP and cube modeling and interrogation
Have knowledge about federal and states regulations on data practices

Physical Requirements

Ability to perform work that requires the following lifting/carrying strengths:
Occasional 10lb maximum
Primarily sitting: walking and standing occasionally

Additional Requirements

This position requires successful completion of the following:

In accordance with the Minnesota State Colleges & Universities (MnSCU) Vehicle Fleet Safety Program, employees driving on college/university business who use a rental or state vehicle shall be required to conform to MnSCU’s vehicle use criteria and consent to a Motor Vehicle Records check.

Application Details

Other Information

Employment information for this position can be found in its collective bargaining agreement or its plan document at http://mn.gov/mmb/employee-relations/labor-relations/Labor/.

Why Work For Us

GREAT BENEFITS PACKAGE! The State of Minnesota offers a comprehensive benefits package including low cost medical and dental insurance, employer paid life insurance, short and long term disability, pre-tax flexible spending accounts, retirement plan, tax-deferred compensation, generous vacation and sick leave, and 11 paid holidays each year.

How to Apply

Click “Apply” at the bottom of this page. If you have questions about applying for jobs, contact the job information line at 651-259-3637.

For additional information about the application process, go to http://www.mn.gov/careers.

Contact

If you have questions about the position, contact Tanya Cimenski at tanya.cimenski@sctcc.edu.

AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

Minnesota State Colleges and Universities is an Equal Opportunity employer/educator committed to the principles of diversity. We prohibit discrimination against qualified individuals based on their race, sex, color, creed, religion, age, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, or membership in a local commission as defined by law. As an affirmative action employer, we actively seek and encourage applications from women, minorities, persons with disabilities, and individuals with protected veteran status.

Reasonable accommodations will be made to all qualified applicants with disabilities. If you are an individual with a disability who needs assistance or cannot access the online job application system, please contact the job information line at 651-259-3637 or email careers@state.mn.us. Please indicate what assistance is needed.",3.7,"State of Minnesota
3.7","Saint Cloud, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1967,Government,State & Regional Agencies,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
484,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description:

PrimCorp, LLC is seeking to fill a full-time Research Data Analyst position in support of the National Intelligence University (NIU) in Bethesda, MD. The candidate will support the NIU Director of Institutional Effectiveness. Top Secret Sensitive Compartment Information (TS/SCI) Clearance mandatory (current within 2 years).

Responsibilities include:

Work with the Director of Institutional Effectiveness to support the design and use of evaluation results and analysis to facilitate university-wide conversations on institutional assessment and planning at NIU.
Consult with faculty and administration to conduct and use assessment; designing assessment tools and measures; analyzing and interpreting assessment; preparing studies and reports.
Inventory assessment information and instruments used at NIU for purposes of external accreditation, such as the Middle States Commission on Higher Education.
Be responsible for maintaining assessment and evaluation databases; validating the accuracy and security of the information developed, merged, and reported.
Identify problem areas associated with the assessment activities of the university and recommend solutions and strategies for continuous improvement.

Education Requirements:

Must have a Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Business Administration, Education or closely related field

Security Clearance:
Top Secret Sensitive Compartment Information (TS/SCI) Clearance mandatory (current within 2 years).",4.2,"PRIMCORP
4.2","Bethesda, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
485,"Senior Manager, Data Analyst","$77k-$132k
(Glassdoor Est.)","New York, NY

Apply Now
GENERAL SUMMARY

This position will provide day-to-day and strategic support for NKF’s Salesforce and data analysis. This includes overseeing data integrity, report writing, data interpretation and analysis, end user support, and on-going training. The Senior Manager, Data Analyst will also participate in cross-departmental collaboration to produce strategic analysis for different business units at NKF. The position will report to the Salesforce Director and help to identify and meet current and future data needs.

PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Work with management to identify and prioritize analytical and reporting needs
Interpret data, analyze results and present findings and recommendations to business stakeholders
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in various data sets
Assist teams and individuals with creating and customizing reports and dashboards
Salesforce user administration – setting up and managing users, roles, views, etc.
Manage day-to-day support and troubleshooting
Manage regular system maintenance and data cleansing activities
Work alongside IT, implementation partners, and internal stakeholders to ensure Salesforce configuration supports the business requirements
Participate in ongoing CRM enhancement projects, continuing to identify areas for improvement and growth in the CRM platform
Develop and implement training for users and maintain guides and procedure documentation
Other duties as assigned
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited college or university
2+ years of hands-on Salesforce administration experience. Familiarity with NGO Connect and Salesforce certification preferred.
Strong ability to create and upkeep comprehensive Reports & Dashboards
Experience with statistical methodologies, Google Analytics and/or other data analytics tools preferred
Experience with Business Intelligence tools such as Domo, Salesforce Einstein, or Tableau preferred.
Ability to develop and deliver application usage/best practice trainings on an ongoing basis
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Excellent interpersonal, time-management and organizational skills.
Must be assertive, confident and project a positive presence.
Please apply via email with your resume, cover letter, and salary expectations:

Contact: NKFrecruitment@kidney.org",3.2,"National Kidney Foundation
3.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1964,Nonprofit Organization,Health Fundraising Organizations,Non-Profit,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
486,Data Analyst,-1,"Description:
Projection analyst for forecasting and other business needs
Manager will accept a fresh college graduate.
Must have experience working with sales data
This is a part time position 8 am to noon.
It does have potential to go perm. at that point it would be full time hours.
Comments updated: 6.5.20 could go permanent.
Minimum Required Qualifications:
Must have Power BI & Excel experience.
Bachelor’s degree in information science, data management or related field or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Excellent knowledge of Microsoft Office using Excel, Power BI, PowerPoint
Comfortable working in newly forming, ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability
The Sales Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting the sr. global sales analyst on developing, implementing and automating global sales reporting and analytical models in support of the EP/HF commercial organization.
The analyst will ensure the portfolio enhances organizational strategy and global sales operations management through successful, consistent, and predictable delivery of programs, projects and applications.
This role will be reporting to the Director of Global Sales Operations, EP & HF
Nice to have:
NOT a must, would be nice if they have experience with ETL , DW and medical device experience.
1-2 years working experience in the medical device or healthcare industry with strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong business acumen with the ability to translate information into relevant and actionable insights
Related work experience and knowledge of ETL, data warehouse, and business intelligence tools.
Candidate can start as soon as completed onboarding.",4.2,"Horizontal
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
487,"Sr Data Analyst, Go-Live",-1,"About Us


Riskified is the AI platform powering the eCommerce revolution. We use cutting-edge technology, machine-learning algorithms, and behavioral analytics to identify legitimate customers and keep them moving toward checkout. Merchants use Riskified to increase revenue, prevent fraud, and eliminate customer friction. Riskified has reviewed hundreds of millions of transactions and approved billions of dollars of revenue for merchants across virtually all industries, including Wayfair, Wish, Peloton, and many more. We're privately funded and VC backed, and our recent Series E round raised $165 million with a valuation in excess of $1 billion.

About the Role


We are looking for a business-minded, Senior Data Analyst to join our growing operations team in NYC. You will become a fraud expert, working closely with many internal teams (Sales, Integrations, Product, Analytics etc.), responsible for creating accurate performance projections for Riskified's merchants by running live pilots and doing deep analysis.

You'll leverage your analytical skills and knowledge of our product to provide meaningful insights to our prospective enterprise merchants by conducting live pilots for each merchant as a significant part in our pre-sales and onboarding process.

What You'll Be Doing
Run pilots for enterprise merchants, working closely with our Sales and Operations teams
Project manager for very technical, live integrations for new merchants in collaboration with our Integrations team
Use analytical tools in a high level technical environment (R, SQL)
Share deep analysis conclusions and sophisticated technical methods in a clear manner to both technical and non-technical audiences
Master the online fraud prevention domain through hands-on analysis of live data
Become an expert in Riskified's Machine Learning models and features
Qualifications


Candidates must be eligible to work in the U.S. for other than practical training, without any Visa sponsorship (including OPT Visas)
4 years+ hands-on work experience with SQL
4 years+ hands-on work experience with or Python (an expert in one of these languages)
Strong analytical skills with complex data sets
Experienced problem solver and critical thinker
Great communication skills
Ability to work simultaneously on different tasks and lead multiple projects
Life at Riskified


We are a fast-growing and dynamic startup with 500+ team members between our offices in Tel Aviv and New York City. We value collaboration and innovative thinking. We're looking for bright, driven, and passionate people to grow with us.

Some NYC Benefits & Perks:
Fully-covered medical, dental, and vision insurance from your first day
Stock options for all employees, 401(k) + matching, commuter benefits
Catered lunch, team events, healthy snacks, yoga, pilates, soccer league, and more
In The News


Fortune Magazine: 25 Best Workplaces in New York

Announcing Riskified's $165M Funding Round

Inc Magazine: Best Workplaces

Built In NYC: 100 Best Workplaces

Great Place to Work: Riskified

Crain's: Best Places to Work in New York City

TechCrunch: Riskified Prevents Fraud on Your Favorite eCommerce Site

Riskified is deeply committed to the principle of equal opportunity for all individuals. We do not discriminate based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",4.5,"Riskified
4.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
488,Data Analyst,"$46k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Experience: 5+ Years
Clearance: Top Secret / SCI Eligible

AERMOR LLC is qualified candidates to provide technical and analytical support for FCC OCA in support of all OCA inspections. Candidates shall perform a wide variety of technical support services and functions required to meet the mission of FCC OCA to enhance overall DoDIN-N readiness and security.

Responsibilities Include:

Process, inspect, cleanse, transform, and model data to discover useful information, informing conclusions, and supporting decision-making.
Conduct technical analyses and develop reports (e.g., General reports: detailed, grouped, crosstab, column, query reports, etc.) related to cybersecurity and cyber operations.
Analyze inspection findings for the compilation of quarterly and annual lessons learned.
Support future analysis efforts, perform detailed studies, and execute pilot programs as determined by OCA, draft instructions, or conduct post-inspection follow-up/research/analysis and includes, but is not limited to:
Provide detailed analysis of cybersecurity inspections (i.e., CCORIs, CCRIs, CSIs, SAV results) in a manner that ensures OCA and Onsite leadership understands the Navy’s cybersecurity posture, the status of trends in cybersecurity findings, and aids inspected site prioritization of mitigation and remediation efforts.
Provide cybersecurity and programmatic analysis to identify vulnerabilities across multiple Navy platforms, programs, and Enterprise Networks that may be systemic in IT infrastructure and its assets.

Publish cybersecurity results and other products such as visualizations and/or Responsible, Accountable, Consulted, and Informed (RACI) documents within FCCs unclassified/classified portals.
Develop trend data from completed cybersecurity inspections/assessments.
Compile and provide ad hoc and recurring cybersecurity inspection metrics and trend reports.
Develop technical reports, standard operating procedures (SOPs), briefings, messages, information papers, and other reporting formats for analytical results.
Present trends, findings, and results to Navy leadership in dashboard formats.
Communicate analysis results to management via reports, visualizations, etc.
Develop SharePoint Dashboards and administer user permissions
Adhere to established Navy and DoD policies and procedures

Required Skills and Experience:

Minimal of 5 years of experience in data management, analytics using technologies such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI and the like, SQL, and query Syntax
3 years of experience working in dynamic cross-competency teams
Experience remediating data issues, documenting Source to Target Mapping of Data Sources
Experience with conceptual Data modes Creation and Input
Ability to analyze, summarize and characterize large or small data sets with varying degrees of fidelity or quality; ability to identify and explain any insights or patterns within them
Strong expertise in designing, developing, and implementing reports, visualizations, and dashboards
Possess a bachelor’s degree or higher from an accredited university in automated data management
DoD 8570.01-M IAT Level II
Education: Bachelor’s degree in a related field, or equivalent education or experience and related training

Apply Now

For more information contact: careers@aermor.com",3.6,"Aermor LLC
3.6","Suffolk, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
489,Data Analyst - Listings,"$41k-$80k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Compass is building the first modern end-to-end real estate platform by integrating agents, buyers and sellers through technology. Before Compass, no one has achieved the blend of the Natural Intelligence that hundreds of thousands of enterprising real estate agents bring to this market, with the Artificial Intelligence that cloud, mobile and AI technologies enable.

As one of the fastest growing technology companies of our generation, in an industry larger than any other, we have an opportunity and obligation to build a world-class engineering team and the operating platform that will transform the real estate industry. In 2019 we tripled the size of our Product & Engineering team, and are searching for creative and inspiring colleagues at all levels of the organization to join us as we continue to expand in 2020.

The Data Product team's mission is to envision, build, and deploy the next generation end-to-end platform for real estate data ingestion, processing, storage, serving, and analysis at massive scale to provide leverage for Compass. Every team and agent at Compass relies on our platform to make data-informed decisions as they grow their business on top of this strong foundation.

About This Role

In this role, you will help Compass become the leading source of real estate information by expanding our geographic coverage, introducing new data types and sources, and ensuring the highest data quality standards are met. You will work cross-functionally with company leadership, product managers, engineers, support teams, and other analysts to grow and maintain the Compass data platform.

Responsibilities

Support our expansion team in efficiently onboarding new listing data sources with a high bar for quality
Create, test, monitor, and improve key data quality metrics tied to the customer experience
Serve as a subject matter expert and escalation point on data quality issues reported by front-line customer and product support teams
Directly interface with third party data sources during onboarding and change or incident management activities
Create and maintain operational and analytical scripts, or other tools to swiftly resolve data quality issues or drive actionable decision-making
Leverage data to build conviction and consensus around prioritizing features that improve the customer experience and scale the business
Confirm feature release readiness by performing ad hoc analyses and tests in support of new product development
Advocate for process improvements to drive our data platform forward with a metrics-driven, continuous improvement approach

What We Look For

2+ years experience in software product, project management, or engineering roles, building and launching successful data-driven products at scale
Experience manipulating large datasets using various tools or techniques, including Python/Google Apps scripting, SQL, pivot tables, lookups
Looking for people with expertise in data forensics, and who are detail-oriented, outstanding communicators, and are quick to learn new technologies/concepts
Preference given to candidates with 2+ years experience designing, implementing, and maintaining databases and/or data conversion/ETL pipelines
B.A., B.S., or similar degree in a technical discipline (Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics) is strongly preferred
Knowledge of, or prior experience with, real estate data integrations is a plus

At Compass, our mission is to help everyone find their place in the world. This means we continually celebrate the diverse community different individuals cultivate. As an equal opportunity employer, we stay true to our mission by ensuring that our place can be anyone's place.",3.9,"Compass
3.9","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
490,Data Analyst,-1,"Company Description

null
Job Description

Data Analyst

Summary

An IT Data Analyst is responsible for working as part of a team to create, enhance and maintain

custom reports that are relied upon to run the business effectively and efficiently. An IT Data

Analyst is also heavily involved in the ETL process by helping to identify source systems for

required data and assisting in the building of data cleansing procedures.

Duties/Responsibilities

· Develop custom reports to address business needs

· Conduct exploratory meetings with business partners to generate ideas on how data and reporting can be used drive operational efficiencies, as well as new business opportunities

· Participate in all aspects of Scrum, including but not limited to daily stand-ups, estimation meetings, demos and retrospectives

· Work with vendors and the internal software development team to retrieve and manage required data

· Design tables in the data warehouse in such a way that enables drilldown reporting

· Create and update stored procedures that are part of the ETL process

· Assist in the automation of manual data analytic efforts

Qualifications

Qualifications

· Degree in Data Analytics or equivalent experience

· 2+ years creating reports in a BI tool

· At least 1 year of professional experience writing queries in SQL/T-SQL

· At least 1 year of professional experience working in a relational database

· PowerBI experience a plus

· Strong analytical skills

· Detail oriented with the ability to multitask

· Self-motivated individual with excellent written and verbal communication skills

· A willingness to work both independently and in a team-oriented environment

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",5.0,"HireTech Group
5.0","Bedford Heights, Cuyahoga, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
491,Data Analyst,"$51k-$92k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Tracking Code

2409-056

Job Description

COMPANY OVERVIEW:

Knoll is a constellation of design-driven brands and people, working together with our clients to create inspired modern interiors. Since 1938, we’ve been thinking about how people interact with their environments, and how their environments impact what they do. Our strength in office systems, seating, furniture, textiles, leather and architectural accessories allows us to compose integrated solutions from products and services that naturally work together.

To learn more, visit www.knoll.com

POSITION OVERVIEW:
The Data Analyst, functioning within the Procurement Organization, will create and maintain the databases used for reporting key procurement data.
Responsible for supporting the Procurement teams in various aspects of metric management (definition, target setting, ongoing status reports), process development and deployment – with emphasis on definition, development and roll out of related IT systems and tools, and program management for new and ongoing purchasing initiatives.
Enhance and refine procurement database strategy to meet changing business requirements.
Leverage existing database and systems to provide monthly procurement results for:
Spend
Savings, Inflation and Tariff
Compliance
Supplier Performance
Supplier Stocking Agreements
Lead and develop enhancements for Supplier Performance Scorecard.
Manage key operational projects to contribute to strategic plans; preparing and completing action plans; implementing, productivity, quality, and customer-service standards; resolving problems; identifying trends; determining system improvements; implementing change.
Compile reports and documentation to aid in the planning of the Procurement yearly fiscal plan.
Compile data and documentation to aid in the preparation of annual GSA report.
Compile data and documentation to aid in the preparation of annual Conflict Minerals report.
The position holder will also drive business investigations within the Procurement organization to identify improvement opportunities or specific change requirements to better support the business through enhanced contributions from our supply base in terms of cost, responsiveness, on time delivery and technology capabilities/innovation.
Prepare reports and documentation to prepare for purchase price standards.
Expert in MS Office suite and knowledge with JDE and Oracle applications. Proficient with MS Access is required.
Job Responsibilities:
Procurement database development and optimization (simplification, automation, integration)
Prepare and facilitate monthly, quarterly and annual reporting meetings and provide related documentation. Keep related scorecards up to date.
Update and publish monthly Supplier Scorecards.
Manage monthly Supplier Scorecard data review process.
Manage monthly Procurement Savings, Inflation and Tariff review and reporting process.
Manage quarterly Procurement data required for Knoll Financial Results reporting.
Update/create written procedures/work instructions and training documents.
Process design and review with all stakeholders.
Collaborate and align with key partners on development and improvement of cross functional processes.
Interface and work with IT teams (Local and HC Global Teams assigned) for system architecture and related activities.
Develop business cases in support of business requirement.
Report out to management on progress, achievements and required escalations for support.
Prepare and facilitate monthly/quarterly reporting meetings and provide related documentation. Keep related scorecards up to date.
Required Skills

Expert in MS Office, particularly MS Access and MS Excel, is required.
Knowledge of JDE and/or Oracle applications preferred.
Knowledge and experience with Tableau preferred.
Experience in project management is preferred.
Required Experience

College Degree in related discipline.
Knoll is an Equal Employment opportunity employer. Employment selection and related decisions are made without regard to race, color, sex, religion, age, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected under federal, state or local law. Applicants with disabilities may be entitled to a reasonable accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act and/or other applicable laws. If you require an accommodation due to a disability at any time during the application or interview process, please contact Talent Acquisition at recruiting@knoll.com..

Job Location

East Greenville, Pennsylvania, United States

Position Type

Full-Time/Regular",4.0,"Knoll
4.0","East Greenville, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1938,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
492,Data Analyst,-1,"Large online marketplaces like Amazon have trained consumers to expect products to be delivered in two days at no extra cost. As a result, millions of sellers on other marketplaces are falling behind, unable to cost-effectively deliver products to their customers within two days. Deliverr enables any seller, regardless of size, to delight their customers with fast, cost-effective fulfillment. If you get excited about joining a company on a mission to deliver products anywhere in the world within two days, we're looking for you. What You'll Do: Build Critical Data Infrastructure: Design, build, and maintain databases, reports, and analyses for business operations and financial reporting for internal and external parties Solve Problems: Use data to identify problems, understand causes, and recommend resolutions; execute ad-hoc requests for data insights Think Strategically: Work with company leadership to develop financial and operating goals and forecasts, plus the right operating cadence to make it all happen Learn the Business: Be an integral part of both the Data Science and Finance teams and help a fast growing startup scale and mature its finance processes Make an Impact: Partner with Finance, Data, Eng, Ops, and Growth on key initiatives What We're Looking For: 4+ years experience in a related role. Academic background in mathematics, statistics, physics, computer science, or engineering; familiarity with finance and accounting concepts highly critical Fluency in Python, SQL, and / or other similar languages required Ability to express complex information to both technical and non-technical audiences Ability to work, prioritize, and adapt in a rapid-growth startup Know the difference between sophisticated and effective Must be based in North America.",4.8,"Deliverr Inc
4.8",California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
493,MIM - Senior Data Analyst – Data Operations & Pricing team,"$64k-$109k
(Glassdoor Est.)","MIM - Senior Data Analyst – Data Operations & Pricing team


Philadelphia

Apply now

Refer someone

We are looking for a Senior Data Analyst to join our Data Operations & Pricing team in Philadelphia. This is an opportunity for a motivated candidate looking to continue a career in investment operations and work on security and pricing data for Macquarie’s Mutual and Institutional Funds. The Data Operations & Pricing team is responsible for security master maintenance and pricing oversight of all positions in Macquarie’s investment book of records (IBOR). Additionally, the team oversees data maintenance and fidelity over 3rd party data vendors (Reuters, Bloomberg). The team also assists in research and resolution of data analytics and updates to security masters. The right candidate for this role will quickly develop into owning and managing the ongoing data governance execution for Macquarie Investment Management.

We’re looking for someone with 5 -7 years of Investment Industry experience with at least 2 year of Data Management & security pricing experience. You’ll bring a practical, pragmatic, hands on approach, with strong focus on delivery and outcomes.

Your key responsibilities will include:
reconciliation & review of daily vendor pricing files
security Master set up, maintenance & review in Aladdin
review and resolution of security master and data integrity reports in Aladdin
Aladdin dashboard monitoring for trades & security master edits
Eagle-Pace load error resolution of data files
management of Data Operation & Pricing associate
resolution of Ad hoc questions from front office and Investment teams
About you
Understanding of asset management terminology and familiarity with investment instruments (including derivatives)
Experience and working knowledge of Bloomberg and security vendor pricing. (Reuters, ICE,etc)
Working knowledge of SQL Server and MS Mysql.
Experience and working knowledge of Blackrock’s Aladdin to include security master set up and maintenance.
Flexible schedule to provide coverage for both European Investment teams and a.m. US Investment teamsMacquarie Investment
Management is a global asset manager with offices throughout the US, Europe, Asia, and Australia. As active managers, we prioritize autonomy and accountability at the team level in pursuit of opportunities that matter for clients. Our conviction-based, long-term approach has led institutional and individual clients to entrust us to manage US$256.9 billion in assets as of Dec. 31, 2016. Macquarie Investment Management is a division of Macquarie Asset Management, a global asset manager with US$362.1 billion in assets under management as of Dec. 31, 2016.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, marital status, gender identity or any other impermissible criterion or circumstance. Macquarie also takes affirmative action in support of its policy to hire and advance in employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, colour, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, marital status, gender identity or any other impermissible criterion or circumstance. Macquarie also takes affirmative action in support of its policy to hire and advance in employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

We recognise that flexibility comes in a variety of forms. Talk to us about what flexibility you need.",3.6,"Macquarie Group
3.6","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
494,Data Analyst - Research,"$38k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About City of Hope
City of Hope, an innovative biomedical research, treatment and educational institution with over 6000 employees, is dedicated to the prevention and cure of cancer and other life-threatening diseases and guided by a compassionate, patient-centered philosophy.

Founded in 1913 and headquartered in Duarte, California, City of Hope is a remarkable non-profit institution, where compassion and advanced care go hand-in-hand with excellence in clinical and scientific research. City of Hope is a National Cancer Institute designated Comprehensive Cancer Center and a founding member of the National Comprehensive Cancer Network, an alliance of the nations leading cancer centers that develops and institutes standards of care for cancer treatment.

Position Summary
Reporting to the Director, Research Data Management and Analysis (RDMA), this position is responsible for data collection, performing analysis to validate the accuracy and integrity of the data, updating and/or enhancing existing databases, creating new databases, and providing reports based on information housed in the various databases. Advises applications development staff and users on database solutions to business problems, data architectures, database management system facilities and capabilities, and the operation and tuning of databases. Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors and has the ability to draw well-informed conclusions from research findings and relevant data and present recommendations. Identify innovative techniques and ideas regarding routine processes used to gather and analyze data and maintenance of data in databases that will increase efficiency.

Key Responsibilities include
Database and Data Management:
Collect data that assists with establishing benchmarks for the overall business objectives of the BRI and the COHCCC
Oversee evolution of existing databases as well as the creation of new ones as business needs change over time
Incorporate new data feeds as they become available and keep up to date with changes to SFS to prevent overlapping data
Investigate opportunities to enhance database architecture to reduce manual processing and increase analytical capabilities
Identify innovative techniques and ideas regarding routine processes used to gather and analyze data and maintenance of data in databases that will increase efficiency; Provide database support to include data input, data analysis, evaluation of data, maintenance of data and quality control service of mission specific related databases
Evaluate the completeness and validity of datasets
Gather analyze and maintain institutional data from various sources to support planning and other management processes as well as other reporting requirements.
Implement data gathering procedures and design and maintain necessary files and databases necessary to support analysis and reporting needs.
Studies and designs benchmark data to be used for institutional comparisons and peer studies.
Coordinates collections and reporting information for various surveys and inquiries regarding institutional data.
Prepare and maintain contract files, and assist with grant proposal processing and award set-up on an as-need basis.
Reporting and Analytics:
Perform data analysis including multivariate analysis
Summarize statistical findings
Completes surveys requests by COH management, federal agencies state offices associations and others as well as for internal projects and forecasting
Prepare and execute weekly, monthly and annual reports documenting status or process.
Continually monitor data and provide dashboards, reports and communication updates that keep appropriate individuals apprised of the information.
Develops and produces written and oral presentations for campus and COH administration and external agencies.
Develops models for analysis of historical trends and projection of future trends.
Act as project manager by organizing coordinating managing and producing reports studies and survey for other special projects as assigned.
Performs other related duties as assigned or requested.
Qualifications
Basic education, experience and skills required for consideration:
Bachelors Degree in Business, Finance, or Information Management, preferred. Experience may substitute for minimum education requirements.
Bachelors Degree + 3 years relevant business experience or Masters Degree + 1 year relevant business experience
Preferred Experience:
3+ years of experience as a data analyst, preferably in a research/academic environment
Detailed oriented, possess a high degree of intellectual curiosity, and have excellent organizational skills.
City of Hope is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability",3.5,"City of Hope
3.5","Irwindale, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1913,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
495,Data Analyst,-1,"About DMI


DMI (Digital Management, LLC.), the world’s first end-to-end mobility company, combines all the skills and services necessary to deliver mobile enterprise solutions. Built to reinvent business through mobility, DMI has expertise in mobile strategy, UX, web, and app development, omni-channel commerce, brand and marketing, IoT and big data analytics, and secure device and app management. The company’s unique, integrated approach to mobility has resulted in dramatic growth as well as an expanding client base, which includes hundreds of Fortune 1000 commercial clients and all fifteen U.S. Federal Departments. DMI is headquartered in Bethesda, MD, with satellite offices around the world. The company was named one of the 2018 Top Workplaces and 2019 Top Workplaces in the Washington, DC area by The Washington Post and received Inc. Magazine’s Hire Power Award as one of the top 100 Private Job Creators in the US. Additional information is available at www.dminc.com and on LinkedIn, Twitter, Facebook, and Instagram.

About the Opportunity


DMI is currently seeking to hire a Database Analyst to support Federal Government customers on a long-term contract in the DC metro area. This developer will work on a variety software projects implementing database components for several portal and web-based systems.

Duties and Responsibilities:

· Interpreting data, analyzing results using statistical techniques

· Analyze customer data and write ETL scripts to load this data into an existing database schema

· Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases

· Developing and implementing data analyses, data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality to accommodate new requirements

· Create and deploy new reports using SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS)

· Perform break/fix analysis for reported issues

· Work with management to prioritize business and information needs

· Locate and define new process improvement opportunities

Qualifications


Education and Years of Experience:
BS in Computer Science or equivalent or 4+ years of relevant experience
4+ years of experience in MS SQL Server database development -including DB design, coding of stored procedures, functions, and development of complex queries
4+ years of experience in data analysis - reviewing business data and adjusting it to existing data models, or adjusting data models as necessary to accommodate data patterns.
Experience with SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) - defining, deploying, and maintaining report
Required Skills/Certifications:
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst
Demonstrate excellent data analytical abilities and best practices scripting standards
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Strong communication & presentation skills
Working Knowledge of Data Warehousing concepts and modeling techniques (dimensional modeling, Star Schema, Snowflake, SCD, ODS, ETL, OLAP)
Working knowledge of software processes (Agile/Scrum Methodology, project management, architecture/design, requirements, development, QA/QC, deployment)
Min. Citizenship Status Required: Permanent Resident

Location: Work from home or Tysons Corner Office, VA office

Physical Requirements: N/A

Working at DMI

DMI is a diverse, prosperous and rewarding place to work. We provide our employees with competitive benefits, educational assistance, and career growth opportunities. Every employee is valued for their talents and contributions. We all take pride in helping our customers achieve their goals, which in turn contributes to the overall success of the company.

The company does and will take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals with disabilities and protected veterans, and to treat qualified individuals without discrimination on the basis of their physical or mental disability or veteran status. DMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled.

***************** No Agencies Please *****************

Applicants selected may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. US citizenship may be required for some positions.",3.4,"DMI
3.4",United States,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
496,Data Analyst,-1,"HRS is looking to add a Data Analyst to its growing data team. This person will be responsible for maintaining and curating current data pipelines and reports, building out data transformation pipelines and dynamic dashboards, primarily using tools like SQL and Chartio. This is an exciting role for someone with a quantitative mindset and desire to create data products as well as communicate their findings with various stakeholders. Through this work, you’ll have ample opportunities to make a positive difference in the lives of clinicians and patients who use our platforms.

What you’ll be doing

Writing efficient SQL queries to pull data from our databases
Creating clear and informative dashboards and reports using SQL-based BI tools such as Chartio
Maintaining, improving and building out data transformation pipelines
Ensuring data quality that leads to reproducible results
Be a primary point of contact for HRS marketing, product, tech support, sales and client success teams, eventually taking full ownership of their data requests

What we’re looking for

A data skeptic with strong organizational skills
Someone with a degree in a scientific discipline, including but not limited to mathematics, statistics, informatics/bioinformatics/health informatics, quantitative psychology, business analytics, or 1-2 years of relevant work experience
Knowledge of SQL and best coding practices
Knowledge of Excel and/or BI tools such as Tableau, Looker, Chartio
Internal drive for consistency, willingness and ability to find optimal and maintainable solutions when it comes to building data products, such as BI dashboards
Strong communication skills and a passion for communicating through data

Bonus points

Knowledge of analytics engineering principles and tools like dbt
Experience with git and Jira
Experience with R or Python for Data Visualization and Exploratory Analysis
Self-motivation and willingness to learn new tools and technologies in a fast-growing start-up environment

What we offer

Competitive salary commensurate with experience
Flexible hours and work environment
Paid vacation
Medical, dental, vision, disability and life insurance packages to fit your needs
Flexible spending account for medical, commuter benefits
401(k) savings plan
Unlimited snacks, coffee, and drinks
Employee events and catered team lunches
ZogSports Team
The opportunity to work with some of the smartest, most driven people in the industry and have fun while doing it!

Creating a new standard of care requires passion, drive, and the desire to make health care accessible, efficient, and effective. HRS is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we are proud to celebrate and foster diversity within our workplace. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, gender, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, veteran status, physical or mental disability, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.

Powered by JazzHR

27fshagMyf",4.7,"Health Recovery Solutions Incorporated
4.7","Hoboken, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
497,Data Analyst,"$32k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)",".

Do you dare to reinvent the future of education?


At Cengage, we are harnessing the power of tech to build a future where all learners have the tools and confidence to achieve their goals.

As a Cengage employee, you will blaze a new trail to transform the way people learn. Collaborating with the best of the best, you will feel challenged and inspired to do breakthrough work. With the support of our united team, there is no limit to what you can imagine, create and set in motion.

Are we right for you?


We set the bar higher by bringing our unique talents and point of view to the table every day. We are curious and comfortable with change and are willing to take risks to transform education. Most importantly, with everything we do, we put learning first.

What You'll Do Here:


The Data Analyst, Product Data Analytics will be responsible for delivering data-driven insights across the finance, product, strategy, technology, and legal groups designed to significantly improve Cengage’s Higher Education and Skills product and content development. The Data Analyst will be a critical contributor to the team, focusing on deriving business outcomes from data, driving improvements in data quality, building out new proof of concepts, engaging and communicating analysis to cross-functional teams, and providing analytic and operational support to multiple areas.Cengage Learning is a collaborative environment. This role will bring data-first thinking to projects that are transformational in nature. The right candidate will possess strategic thinking, effective problem structuring, proven analytical skills, and an ability to influence within diverse teams.

This position is full-time, on-site in one of the following locations: Boston, MA/Mason, OH/Clifton Park, NY.

· Form a deep understanding of Cengage Learning’s product data, processes, systems and tools, while shaping workflow best practices and improving data integrity· Assist in structuring and executing operational and strategic initiatives by gathering and synthesizing relevant data, leading analyses, and developing final recommendations and documentation· Drive analysis to recommendations to meaningful operating results, such as higher quality, faster cycle times, less costly, etc.· Capture and communicate findings within broader project structure; maintain healthy project management practices, including work plan development and trackingTo successfully accomplish the above, engage with and on cross-functional teams

Skills You Will Need Here:


· BA/BS with high proven achievement· Minimum 3 years of experience working directly with complex data systems · Demonstrated ability to conceive and execute quantitative analysis and deliver data-driven insights· Outstanding organizational skills and a very strong attention to detail· Demonstrated writing and verbal presentation skills enabling her/him to prepare and present information and recommendations to a diverse and often senior audience· Proven commitment to providing excellent customer service to internal and external stakeholders; demonstrated willingness to take ownership of customer issues and see them through to resolution· Collaborative problem solving and working style to drive change through influence· Able to self-manage progress against milestones and deliverables with a high degree of accountability and personal urgency· Advanced skills with Microsoft Office Suite of systems, particularly MS Excel and MS Access

Preferred Skills/Knowledge/Experience:· Experience with successfully navigating and driving change in complex organizations· Experience with successfully implementing strategic initiatives; collecting, analyzing, and synthesizing large datasets to identify problems and propose solutions · Prior experience in the publishing or technology industries is beneficial",4.0,"Cengage
4.0","Clifton Park, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
498,Data Analyst,-1,"We believe that mobile voice calls should be secure, engaging, and protected from fraud and robocalls. We believe the phone app is the most outdated app on your smartphone, and that the mobile network - as the largest communications network of any kind - urgently needs a trust and identity layer. You should know who's calling you and why! You should get the calls that are relevant to you (at that time) and none of the ones that aren't. Hiya is building the modern layer for the voice experience. We already serve over 120M users worldwide directly through our apps and in partnership with smartphone makers like Samsung and mobile carriers like AT&T. Are you ready to work with our sales team on the road to help us serve 1B users?

We are looking for a Sales Analyst to support our sales efforts for Sponsored Caller Profiles. As the Sales Analyst you will work closely across the Sales team to build metrics and key insights in order to demonstrate the value of our product to potential customers. Our pre-sales efforts require us to be top-shelf in our analysis of both customer data and the intersection with our own Hiya data.

In this role, you will:
Create custom reports and dashboards, audit performance on an on-going basis, and build automated reports where relevant
Develop internal tools and applications that bring data and actionable insights much closer to our account executives so that scaling and automation demands can be met
Develop and distribute repeatable reports and performance metrics/insights on client marketing campaigns
Collect, maintain, manage, interpret and analyze data received from internal and external data sources
Report requirements collection/analysis, writing SQL, extracting structured and unstructured data sets, building reports
Perform ad hoc analysis and data investigation/discovery to identify and/or explain business and marketing trends or anomalies
Analyze marketing channel and website performance data for assigned projects and develop recommendations on ways to further optimize for performance
Support the Hiya Account Executives in sharing data insights with both prospects and customers and deliver high-quality, persuasive data 'testimonies' in a highly competitive market
Deliver a work product that is both consistent and accurate: strive to maintain the highest levels of service for internal and external clients
Identify new ways of analyzing and extracting actionable insights from call center and telephony event data that will deliver value to Hiya Connect customers
You don't have to check all the boxes, but we believe these are important requirements for this role:
3-5 years experience working with consumer databases and support of market-facing data analytics output
Proficiency in Python
ETL and data warehousing
A/B Testing
Advanced skills with Excel and PowerPoint (or Google-equivalent Applications)
Expert-level Proficiency with SQL, R and other analytics languages
Must have experience working with unstructured and raw data
A knack for accuracy and consistency: refusing to compromise and produce a half-baked product
Desired: AI and/or ML experience and demonstrated success deploying AI/ML solutions in a corporate environment
Bachelor's degree
What you should expect from us:
Work at a supportive and fast-growing startup with a fantastic team
Make an impact in the lives of tens of millions of consumers
Many office perks and great company benefits
Collaborate and learn from other great team members
Support in developing your skills and accelerating your career
Hiya is a fast-growing startup that offers a team of dynamic and experienced executives at the helm, and a hardworking team of international colleagues at your side. We value getting things done for our customers and consistently improving ourselves and products along the way.

Hiya is an equal opportunity employer. We value and embrace diversity. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, marital status, age or disability status.

This role is based in Seattle.",5.0,"Hiya
5.0","Seattle, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
499,Data Analyst,"$44k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

Job ID#:
2359

Job Category:
Behavioral Health (Promesa)

Position Type:
Full Time

Details:


Acacia Network, the leading Latino integrated care nonprofit in the nation, offers the community, from children to seniors, a pathway to behavioral and primary healthcare, housing, and empowerment. We are visionary leaders transforming the triple aim of high quality, great experience at a lower cost. Acacia champions a collaborative environment to deliver vital health, housing and community building services, work we have been doing since 1969. By hiring talented individuals like you, we’ve been able to expand quickly, with offices in Albany, Buffalo, Syracuse, Orlando, Tennessee, Maryland and Puerto Rico.

The Data Analyst is responsible for entering information into the Nextgen EHR, importing data results for analysis, analyzing data trends, completing QA/QI to improve program performance and outcomes based on trends and will be a member of the integrated treatment team. Under supervision of the Program Director, the requirements listed below represent the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities as defined by the ADA to perform the essential functions of the job. The functions below outline the general responsibilities associated with this position. Each of these functions is considered critical to effective department operations and our Mission. It is expected that all staff in this position will have satisfactory attendance and will perform these functions as assigned in a competent, cooperative, and timely manner. The Job Description will be reviewed periodically for accuracy and/or adjusted according to business necessity.


KEY ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Will enter all required data into Nextgen and run queries in SQL at the back end
Will run daily, weekly, monthly, and quarterly reports as per program needs and performance indicators.
Generates quality indicator reports from Nextgen database as requested and assigned by supervisor.
Maintains Data spreadsheet up-to-date by keeping all required data indicators as per program regulations by mapping from front end to back end and validating it.
Coordinates and maintains record of consumer participation in the program by conducting surveys, activities and integrating consumers to participate in activities as per program regulations.
Generates and inputs discharge and re-entry information for consumers on the Nextgen database as per program requirements and assigned by supervisor.
Participates in integrated team meetings, collects data information as per program requirements and maintain accuracy in data spreadsheet.
Complete quality improvement projects based on data trends.
Act as curator of new datasets, documenting and performing quality checks.
Completes all required training as per program regulations for entering consumer data and as assigned by supervisor.
Completes office duties as needed/required by Supervisor.
Completes additional tasks as assigned by Supervisor.

REQUIREMENTS:
College degree preferred
Knowledge of the Nextgen database and proficiency in SQL
Experience or desire to work with people who have a mental illness
Positive attitude and professional demeanor
A self starter
Ability to complete work independently as well as in collaboration with team members
Must be team oriented with a willingness to be flexible and helpful.
Excellent computer skills including, Microsoft Windows, Excel, PowerPoint, and electronic communications tools: internet and email
Ability to communicate effectively orally and in writing
Highly organized, motivated self-starter
Excellent time management skills.
Acacia Network is an equal opportunity employer*

Job Requirements


Already have an account? Log in here",3.3,"Acacia Network
3.3","Bronx, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1966,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
